council
counsel

"Stories about the problems of tourism have become legion in the last few years."
"Indeed, it can even be a vehicle for reinvigorating local cultures"
"Local concern about the rising number of second home developments"
sweltering sun
myriad of different ways

emotions:
whinging and whining
scared stiff
wound up
mortified
peer group
to be heavily regulated
to set smth up
to set out to do smth
to be left out
to turn people off
to be in the river of tears
to burst out laughing/crying
a (no) laughing matter
bored to tears
to be close to crying
dog-eat-dog world
to dig himself out of this hole
he grew up well off and alway felt indebted to those who didn't
underserved
I tend to get upset, sulk or laugh hysterically, depending on the situation. I can also be cynical, sarcastic and argumentative.
However, what seems overly emotional to one person can seem reserved to another.
A flatmate from Italy used to tell me how uptight I was because I didn't gesticulate and shout with the same carefree abandon that he did.
From a young age, both men were surrounded by an invisible structure referred to as culture or environment.
The stadium was a seething cauldron of emotion.
In the words of Voltaire: "I may not agree with what you have to say, but I will fight to the death ti defend your right to say it."
I wanna tell you how I hit the worst bump in the road yet, one that shook me to my very core.
They sy you life can change in a split second.
ingrain (emotion) in sb's heart
злопмятный? vindictive(ly, ness), revengeful, spiteful, vengeful (formal)
attention span
granularity

winch (also windlass) - лебёдка
morbid obesity
morbid
morbidity
squats - приседания?
insatiable - ненасытный
receptive - восприимчивый
diehard fans
jolly
clammy
Ricky Gervaise
The Office - TV show
an idiot abroad
Dr Phil.
green light - зелёный свет, the go-ahead (informal)
greenlight, green-light - давать зелёный свет
sprawl(ed, ing), urban sprawl - the spread of a city into the area surrounding it, often without planning: "Huge tourist attractions have produced choking urban sprawl."
ghosting
jolt
sleek - гладкий, плоский?
liturgical
reinstate
expository
instill
streamline
showcase - показывать с лучшей (с выгодной) стороны
illicit
quadruple
quadruplet - тетрада
quintuple
quintuplet - пятерня
gutter
revision
segue
extraneous
backlash
sallow
uniformly
percolation
fallback
eject
truism - прописная истина (a statement that is so obviously true that it is almost not worth saying): "As far as health is concerned, it's a truism that prevention is better than cure.", "It has become a truism that every woman wants to choose how she delivers her baby."
causality
scrub
tingle
throb
matrilineal / patrilineal
poise
hue - оттенок, undertone - оттенок, полутон
voracious(ly, ness)
veracious
acclaim, acclamation, plaudit
acclaimed
buzzword
cross-functional
accommodation, lodging
oversleep
caveat (formal) - условие, оговорка, ограничение, proviso - условие
suburbia
parkland
C2/-- mishap - неудача, "незадача" (a small accident or piece of bad luck that does not have serious results: "I'm afraid your son had a slight mishap in the playground.", "The group suffered an extraordinary series of minor mishaps.", "A series of mishaps led to the nuclear power plant blowing up.", "I managed to get home without (further) mishap.", "The parade was very well organized and passed without mishap.")
throughput - пропускная способность
leverage
handout - подачка
C2/?? house - приютить, разместить, see also: accomodate
turnkey - под ключ
C2 coin - придумать (термин): "Allen Ginsberg coined the term 'flower power'.", "Maslow also coined the term 'metamotivation'"
to coin a phrase
pitfall - подвох, ловушка
holistic(ally) - целостный, комплексный
pipeline, in the pipeline
at the expense of someone (also at someone's expense)
playbook
scapegoating, scapegoat, whipping boy
fallacy (formal)
sustainability of the forest is in question; unsustainable future
resilience
fob - брелок
conditioning - выработка рефлекса
gentrify - облагораживать, see also: reconstruct, upgrade
gentrification
buckle - пряжка
buckle - застегнуть пряжку
buckle up
foresight - предусмотрительность, предвидение
scoop
flux "Like all other musical genres, pop music is in a constant state of flux."
gospel
hordes: "hordes of screaming teenage fans followed the boy bands everywhere"
psychedelic
epitomy
epitomize (UK usually epitomise)
epitomising (UK usually epitomizing)
elicit (sth (from sb), formal) - добиться, заручиться, получить, вытянуть, выявить, вызвать (to get or produce sth, especially information or a reaction): "I could elicit no response from him.", "Her tears elicited great sympathy from her audience.", "The teacher elicits definitions from the students."
elicited
elicitation
tie into: "This also ties into the fact that the beat of pop music is now mechanised, making it much more accurate than when the beat was set by drummers."
gaudy (disapproving) - кричащий, безвкусный, аляповатый, garish (disapproving) - броский, яркий, gimcrack, tawdry (TODO): "Glam metalperformers and fans often had long, back-combed hair, lots of make up and gaudyclothing."
upbeat
shunt
shunting yard
startling(ly) = striking(ly), поразительный
authoritarian(ism)
incongruent (formal) = incompatible
precedence - приотритет, see also: rank, priority
show no sign: "Since the 1960s, music festivals have continued to grow and show no sign of losing popularity in the present day, though they have certainly changed a lot since they first hit the mainstream."
never more so than = especially?: "Listening to music is often a social experience, and never more so than when surrounded by thousands of screaming fans in a muddy field,	enjoying a festival."
one-off (US one-shot) - разовый
irretrievable - безвозвратный; необратимый - irreversible, irrevocable
self-sufficient - самодостаточный
dry up - иссякнуть
porter - носильщик
trekker
labourer (US laborer) - рабочий
wage labour - наёмный труд
transient workers - временные рабочие
swirl
swirling
artistry
осуждающе = judgmental, accusingly, reproving
trounce, flog - пороть, thrash
squeamish - брезгливый? (fastidious - 1) привередливый, 2) брегливый, 3) скрупулёзный, щепетильный)
prolific
solidified
permutation, transposition (transpose)
clamp - сжимать, зажимать: "He clamped his hand over her mouth."
clamp - зажим, струбцина
preferable(-ly)
underdeveloped - недоразвитый
introspect(ive(ly)) - заниматься самоанализом (to examine and consider your own ideas, thoughts, and feelings): "Sometimes we need to introspect about our own motives."
introspection - самоанализ (examination of and attention to your own ideas, thoughts, and feelings): "These situations are best resolved with the minimum of introspection or self-analysis.", "His defeat in the world championship led to a long period of gloomy introspection."
all-time - рекордно, за всё время (an all-time high, low, best, etc. is the highest, lowest, best, etc. level that has ever been): "one of the all-time great players", "my all-time favourite song", "Profits are at an all-time high/low.", "Unemployment reached an all-time record of 3 million." "After three years of drought, the water in the lake had reached an all-time low."
notably - примечательно, в особенности: "Football is notably absent."
deft - ловкий (skilful, clever, or quick): "She answered the journalist's questions with a deft touch."
deftly
deftness
underpin
underpinning
abridge
unabridged
tenure
subsume
ramify (formal) - ветвиться, разветвляться
ramified
ramification
dressing - заправка для салата
dressing - повязка, перевязка
dressing - одевание
lookout
rundown
flounder
incendiary
C2/-- complexion
C1/C1 nominate
barrage
indignant(ly)
chthonic - хтонический (dark, primitive, and mysterious; Chthonic literally means "subterranean", but the word in English describes deities or spirits of the underworld, especially in the Ancient Greek religion. (в представлении древних греков — олицетворяющий собой дикую природную мощь земли, относящийся к подземному царству и т. п.; подземный))
foreordain
foreordinance
strum - бренчать
expressly - прямо, чётко, явным образом, определённо, непосредственно (clearly; definitely: "She was expressly forbidden to touch my papers.", "I expressly told you to be home by midnight.")
expressly - специально, преднамеренно (for a particaular and deliberate purpose: "The farmer put up the fence expressly to stop people walking across his field."), see also: especially (TODO)
well read - начитанный
brazen(ly, ness) - нагло, дерзко, бесстыдно
impunity - безнаказанность
trinket, bauble
fester
obsequious(ly, ness) - подобострастный, угодливый (too eager to praise or obey someone: "She is embarrassingly obsequious to anyone in authority."), servile (disapproving) - раболепный
exact (formal) - взимать, получить своё (to demand and get sth, sometimes using force or threats: "She was determined to exact a promise from him.")
exact (formal) - to make sth bad happen to sb: "He exacted (= took) a terrible revenge for their treatment of him.", "Stress can exact a high price from workers (= can affect them badly)."
ferocious(ly)
retaliate
rendition = performance (TODO), see also: productivity
reave - ?
pillage - грабить
wench
chuckle, chortle
insalubrious (formal), unhealthy
perilous(ly)
bygone
encumbrance (formal)
encumber (formal), constrain
rouse
chastise (formal)
rattle
unbecoming
vouch
behest (at sb's behest/at the behest of sb, old use or formal) - распоряжение, повеление (because sb has asked or ordered you to do sth):
  "at the King’s behest/at the behest of the King"
  "The budget proposal was adopted at the mayor's behest."
mulled wine - глинтвейн
mull = to heat wine or beer with added sugar and spices
fornicate (formal disapproving) - блудить
fornication
fornicaor
jarring
C2/-- shrewd, astute
procure (formal) - добыть (to obtain something, especially with difficulty: "She's managed somehow to procure his phone number.", "He'd procured us seats in the front row.", "They procured us a copy of the report. / They procured a copy of the report for us.", "She managed to procure a ticket for the concert.")
procure (formal) - сводничать, сутенёрствовать ( to provide a prostitute for somebody: "He was accused of procuring under-age girls.")
procurement (formal) - закупка, приобретение, поставка (the process of obtaining supplies of something, especially for a government or an organization: "arms procurement", "She has responsibility for the procurement of equipment in the company.")
beat the odds - to succeed despite having a disadvantage: "Many mergers fail to deliver value to shareholders, but the bank's new president thinks it will be able to beat the odds."
grovel - пресмыкаться
trundle
copious(ly)
besmeared (formal) - запятнанный, измазанный, заляпанный; see also: smear
besmirch, defile(d) / unbesmirched
larder, pantry - кладовка
stingy (informal disapproving) - скупой (not given or giving willingly; not generous, especially with money: "It was a stingy offer and he turned it down.", "The landlords are so stingy - they refused to pay for new carpets.")
molasses - патока
lecherous (disapproving) - блудливый
lechery (formal disapproving) - разврат
debauch(ed)
vermin(ous)
C2 at length - for a long time: "George went on at great length about his various illnesses."
(formal) at length - If something happens at length, it happens after a long period of time: "At length, the authorities allowed her to go home."
crackle
abet(ment, tor) - подстрекать
brothel, bordello (literary)
C2/-- daresay
savagery
servitude (formal)
swoon
fondle - ласкать
pauper - нищий
geld - оскопить
fortnight(ly)
neigh - ржать
neigh - ржание
affable, genial(ly, ity) - добродушнай (friendly and cheerful: "a genial person", "He was a sweet old gentleman with white hair and a genial smile."), formal: cordial(ly, ity), see also: amiable
compendium (plural compendiums or compendia)
sag
Three judges will render a verdict. I will preside.
Before long, she will turn her eyes to Westeros.
gawk
embroider(y)
mutineer - мятежник
mutiny - мятеж
mutinous(ly) - мятежный
clank (gate clanking)
clang
ascention
(has) a sweet tooth - сластёна, сладкоежка
austerity
gurgle
plunderer - мародёр
plunder - грабить, мародёртвовать
salacious(ly, ness) - непристойный, сладострастный
adjourn (formal)
adjournment (formal) - перерыв, отсрочка
undisclosed
captor
C2/ formidable - грозный
formidably
paramour (old use or literary) - любовник, любовница (the person you are having a romantic or sexual relationship with, but are not married to, a lover)
predilection (formal)
unadulterated, undiluted
unadulterated, pure
mete out (formal)
C2/ uphold
upholder - сторонник
fratricide
fratricidal
femicide
foeticide (US feticide)
regicide (formal)
affinity, rapport
the wherewithal (to do sth) - (необходимые) средства (the money, things or skill that you need in order to be able to do something: "I'd like to buy a bigger house, but I don't have the wherewithal.", "Poor families lack the wherewithal to hire good lawyers.", "They lacked the wherewithal to pay for the repairs.")
toll (bells tolling)
the prospect of imminent death
flay
scoff
C2/-- premises
upfront - прямой, открытый, честный (not trying to hide what you think or do: "He's been upfront about his intentions since the beginning.", "She's very upfront about why she wants the job - she'd earn a lot more money."), honest, frank
upfront - авансом (paid in advance, before other payments are made: "There will be an upfront fee of 4%.")
up front (informal) - авансом, вперёд (as payment in advance):
  "We'll pay you half up front and the other half when you've finished the job."
  "He wants all the money up front or he won't do the job."
flank
silo
oversight
lifeblood
pane
splurge
smidge
cutback - a reduction in something, made in order to save money: "cutbacks in public spending", "The closure of the Manchester printing factory is the company's biggest single cutback so far."
--/C1 blessing
systemic (formal)
enforcement
increasingly globalized world
she placed second in the race
heifer
quay
brooch
augur (formal)
lactic acid

hefty
wisp
niche
consummate (formal) - to make a marriage or a relationship complete by having sex: "The marriage lasted only a week and was never consummated."
consummate (formal) - безупречный, непревзойдённый (showing great skill; perfect: "a life of consummate happiness", "He's a consummate athlete/gentleman/liar.", "She was a consummate performer.", "He played the shot with consummate skill.", "(disapproving) a consummate liar"), see also: masterful
consummately (formal) - безупречно (in a way that shows great skill or is perfect: "I think she handled it consummately.", "The play is impressively directed and consummately acted.", "He was a demanding boss, consummately fair, a model leader.")
masterful - властный (able to control people and situations in a confident way): "He has a deep, masterful voice.", "Once she became a prosecutor, she quickly established herself as a masterful trial lawyer."
masterful (also masterly) - мастерский, виртуозный (showing great skill or understanding: "a masterly performance", "Her handling of the situation was masterly."), see also: consummate
rascal - негодник. проказник, scallywag (UK informal humorous)
seminal (formal) -  (containing important new ideas and having a great influence on later work: "a seminal work/article/study", "His book on social policy proved to be seminal.", "She wrote a seminal article on the subject while she was still a student.", "He played a seminal role in the formation of the association.")
seminal (specialist) - семенной (of or containing semen: "seminal fluid")
smoke and mirrors - пыль в глаза (the fact of hiding the truth with information that is not important or relevant: "The new budget isn't smoke and mirrors; it's an honest attempt to reduce the deficit.", "There's a lot of smoke and mirrors in the financing of this film."), see also: equivocation (TODO)
nutcase (informal) - сумасшедший (a crazy person; someone who behaves in an extremely silly way: "She’s a complete nutcase.", "Only complete nutcases like myself swim in the sea in winter.")
nutcase (offensive) - псих (someone who is mentally ill: "At that point, he reached for the knife. He was facing me. I said, "Don't come near me, you nutcase.")
infallible, unfailing / fallible, see also: erroneous? misguided?
infallibly
insoluble
gritty
diversion
To hit the sack
B2 set an example - подавать пример
next year of the following year
chant - кричалка
chant - скандировать
glass ceiling
hit the roof (also hit the ceiling), have a fit
hit the road
take on sth - (to begin to have, use, or do sth; to begin to have a particular quality:
  "Her voice took on a troubled tone.")
  "A chameleon takes on the color of its surroundings."
hose (also hosepipe) - шланг (a long tube made of rubber, plastic, etc., used for putting water onto fires, gardens, etc.: "The firefighters trained their hoses on the burning building.", "You need a fire hose; a garden hose isn't powerful enough to tackle a fire.")
hose - поливать из шланга (to wash or pour water on something using a hose: "Firemen hosed the burning car.", "He was covered in mud so we hosed him down.", "I’ll just hose down the car.")
byproduct (also by-product) - побочный продукт
urgency
briquette (also briquet) - пресованный уголь (a small block made from coal dust or peat, used as fuel in a fire)
peat - торф: "peat bogs" - торфяные болота, "peat extraction"
outwit (also outsmart) - перехитрить (to get an advantage over someone by acting more cleverly and often by using a trick: "the amusing story of a bird outwitting a cat", "In the story, the cunning fox outwits the hunters.", "Somehow he always manages to outwit his opponents.", "She always managed to outsmart her political rivals."), outmanoeuvre (US outmaneuver) - переиграть, перехитрить: "The president has so far managed to outmanoeuvre his critics.", "The team was outmanoeuvred physically and mentally.", "In the negotiations, he outmanoeuvred his rivals by offering a higher price."
at heghtened risk of
to narrow in on
probed by / with
causality (formal) - принцип причинности (the principle that there is a cause for everything that happens)
refocus
to be bombarded with
a cascade of
a build up of
outermost
upheaval = unrest?
remifications = consequences?
subsequently
squarely
chisel - долото
chisel - высекать долотом
choppy
of yore (literary) = of a long time ago: "This was once a Roman road in days of yore."
peeve - бесить, раздражать (to annoy sb): "What peeved her most was his thoughtlessness.", "It peeves me that she didn't bother to phone."
peeved (about/at/by sth) - раздражённый (annoyed): "a rather peeved tone of voice", "He sounded peeved about not being told."
peevish - раздражительный (easily annoyed, often by things that are not important: "Sebastian was a sickly, peevish child."), see also: irritable
peevishly - раздражённо, сварливо (in a way that shows you are easily annoyed by things that are not important: "‘It’s your own fault,’ she said peevishly."), see also: irritably
somebody’s pet peeve (UK usually: somebody’s pet hate) - something that you particularly dislike:
  "Weak coffee is one of my pet peeves."
  "My pet peeve (= pet hate) is cleaning the bathroom."
preclude (formal), obviate (formal)
preclusion (formal) - препятствие, запрет (sth that prevents sth or makes it impossible, or the act of preventing sth or making it impossible: "preclusion of the passing of credit card details without consent", "Your age should not act as a preclusion to you being accepted for the course.")
interlocking, intertwined, interwoven
slouch - сутулиться, сутуло брести/плестись (to stand, sit or move in a lazy way, often with your shoulders and head bent forward: "Straighten your back - try not to slouch.", "A couple of boys were slouched over the table reading magazines.", "Several students were slouching against the wall.", "He slouched across the room and collapsed in a chair.", "A group of teenagers were slouching around outside the building.")
slouch - сутулость (a way of standing, sitting, or walking with the shoulders hanging forward: "He's developed a slouch from leaning over his books all day.")
slouchy (disapproving) - сутулый (holding your body in a lazy way, often with your shoulders and head bent forward: "his slouchy posture", "Straighten up, you’re too slouchy.")
slouchy (approving) - мешковатый, "с напуском" ((of clothes) without a definite outline; not stiff: "a beautiful slouchy leather bag", "The jeans have a relaxed slouchy look.", "The slouchy suede boots look great with slim pants.")
suede - замша
velvet - бархат
expository (formal) - пояснительный (intended to explain or describe something: "expository writing", "The film suffers from too much expository dialogue.")
performant
wither - увядать
TODO perspective vs prospective
TODO eminent vs preeminent(ly) (pre-eminent(ly))
litany
excise duty
C1/?? overwhelming, consuming
demigod
bust
to give the benefit of the doubt
to settle a bill/debt
interrelated
destined
refrigerant - хладагент
C2/-- abusive
perfunctory - небрежный, поверхностный, cursory - беглый
perfunctorily
.. speech has to do more of the work
inflecting and raising your tone ..
.. smiling can go a long way ...
I didn't quite catch that ..
to do some overtime
throwback
misconstrue (formal), misinterpret, misunderstand
boathook - багор
personify "How are the fertility of the earth and the underworld personified in Greek mythology?"
incase
harden
hardened
hardened criminal - закоренелый преступник
the calm before the storm - зтаишье перед бурей (a calm time immediately before an expected period of violent activity or argument: "I like to get everything done before the guests arrive and relax for a moment in the calm before the storm.", "For most teachers, the days just before the school year begins are the calm before the storm.")
exposure - the fact of experiencing something or being affected by it because of being in a particular situation or place: "According to received wisdom, exposure to low level radioactivity is harmless.", "She gradually became deaf after lengthy exposure to noise in the workplace."
give yourself something to aim for
gimmick - an unusual trick or unnecessary device that is intended to attract attention or to persuade people to buy something: "a promotional/publicity/sales gimmick", "We don’t use gimmicks to sell our products.", "The promise of lower taxation may have been just an election gimmick to gain votes."
safety net - подстраховка, подушка безопасности (an arrangement that helps to prevent disaster if something goes wrong: "a financial safety net", "The welfare system was set up to provide a safety net for the poor.")
moar
empowerment
prop - (a piece of wood, metal, etc. used to support something or keep it in position: "Rescuers used props to stop the roof of the tunnel collapsing."), pillar - a strong column made of stone, metal, or wood that supports part of a building: "Two white marble pillars stood on either side of the entrance."
have the time of your life
in next to no time
in the blink of an eye - в мгновение ока (extremely quickly):
  "There was a huge 'boom' and in the blink of an eye the buildings were gone."
criminal record
gain insight into - to have a clear and deep understanding of a complicated problem or situation: "Using storytelling to gain insight into patient perspectives on disease"
energy crisis - a shortfall in or interruption to the provision of energy supplies: "A solution to the global energy crisis may be at hand.", "Oil shortages have brought on an energy crisis."
misjudge - to form an opinion or idea about someone or something that is unfair or wrong: "She now realizes that she misjudged him.", "It is difficult to understand how they could have misjudged the mood of the workforce so badly."
misdiagnose - to give an explanation of the nature of an illness or a problem that is not correct: "Her depression was misdiagnosed as stress."
well-adjusted - reasonable and has good judgment and their behaviour is not difficult or strange
well-bred - having or showing good manners; typical of a high social class: "a well-bred young lady", "She was too well bred to show her disappointment."
well-brought-up - хорошо воспитанный (People, especially children, who are well-brought-up are polite and act in a quiet and pleasant way, because they have been taught this behaviour at home: "He was a very well-brought-up young man.", "Despite the family's problems, the children were well brought up.")
conspicuous consumption - the situation in which you spend a lot of money on expensive goods in order to impress people and show them how rich you are
be in (bad/poor/the worst possible/etc.) taste - causing offence by being insensitive or downright rude to someone else, perhaps by not taking account of their cultural sensibilities: "offering a bacon sandwich to someone you know is a strict vegetarian, could be in bad taste.", "He told a joke about death that I thought was in bad taste considering that Steve's father had just died."
intimidating, daunting - пугающий (making you feel slightly frightened or worried about your ability to achieve something: "She has the daunting task of cooking for 20 people every day.", "Starting a new job can be a daunting prospect.")
to pull yourself up by your bootstraps
to pull yourself together
reconnaissance (recon) - рекогнисировка, разведка
Ferris wheel  - колесо оборзения
bindle, bundle
peer pressure
unconventional
faraway
scatterbrain
crybaby - плакса?
homestay
binge
the momentum keeps you going
inertia
life sentence
be snowed under with sth - быть заваленным (делами, работой и т.д.) (to have more things, especially work, than you feel able to deal with: "I'd love to come but I'm completely snowed under at the moment.", "I'm absolutely snowed under with work at the moment.")
apprehensive - настороженный, встревоженный, испытывающий тревогу (worried or frightened that something unpleasant may happen: "an apprehensive face/glance/look", "She was deeply apprehensive that something might go wrong.", "You have no reason to be apprehensive of the future.")
apprehensively - с опаской, настороженно (with a feeling of worry about something you are going to do or that is going to happen: "They looked at each other apprehensively.", "She glanced apprehensively at the clock.")
poach
prayer - молитва (the words that someone says or thinks when they are praying: "a prayer of thanks", "a prayer book", "She always says her prayers (= prays) before she goes to sleep.", "We thought he'd been killed, but our prayers were answered when he arrived home unexpectedly.")
concrete jungle - каменные джунгли (a way of describing a city or an area that is unpleasant because it has many buildings and no trees or parks)
rebate - налоговый вычет?
self-deprecating - done in a way that makes your own achievements or abilities seem unimportant: "He gave a self-deprecating shrug."
self-congratulatory - praising yourself or saying how well you have done something : "The winners gave themselves a self-congratulatory round of applause."
self-absorbed -  (only concerned about or interested in yourself: "only concerned about or interested in yourself")
C2/-- shudder - содрогаться, дрожать, трястить (to shake because you are cold or frightened, or because of a strong feeling: "The sight of so much blood made him shudder.", "Just thinking about the accident makes me shudder.", "Alone in the car, she shuddered with fear.", "She shuddered at the thought of kissing him.", "I shuddered at the thought of all the trouble I'd caused."), see also: shiver
      shudder - содрогаться ((of a vehicle, machine, etc.) to shake very hard: "I heard a massive explosion and the ground shuddered beneath me.", "The floor was shuddering beneath us.", "There was a screech of brakes and the bus shuddered to a halt (= shook violently and stopped).")
      shudder to think - я содрогаюсь при мысли (said when you are worried about something unpleasant that might happen or might have happened: "I shudder to think what my parents will say when I tell them I've failed my exams.", "I shudder to think how much this is all going to cost (= I don't want to think about it because it is too unpleasant)"), see also: dread to think
      shudder - содрогание, дрожь (a shaking movement you make because you are cold or have a feeling of fear or horror: "a shudder of fear", "She gave an involuntary shudder.", "A cold shudder ran through him.", "She recalled with a shudder how her boss had once tried to kiss her.", "He gave a slight shudder as he considered how close he had come to death.")
      shudder - содрогание, дрожь (a strong shaking movement: "The elevator rose with a shudder.", (figurative) "America's second biggest supermarket chain has sent a shudder through (= has had a strong effect on) its rivals by slashing its prices.")
      send shudders/a shudder down your spine - пробирать до дрожи (to cause you to feel extremely worried or frightened: "When I think of what might have happened in the accident, it sends shudders down my spine.")
C2/-- dread to think - боюсь представить (used to say that you do not want to think about something because it is too worrying: "I dread to think what would happen if he was left to cope on his own."), see also: shudder to think
TODO dump, landfill
internalize (UK also internalise) - усваивать, перенимать
aquifer (geology) - водоносный слой (a layer of rock or soil that can take in and hold water)
squint - (при)щуриться, покоситься (взглянуть прищурившись) (to partly close your eyes in order to see more clearly: "to squint into the sun", "The sun was shining straight in her eyes and made her squint.", "The driver had to squint against the sun to see where he was going.", "She was squinting through the keyhole.", "He squinted at the letter in his hand.", "When he squinted his eyes, he could just make out a house in the distance.")
more fine grained control
solidify
solidification
attest
attestation
irreparable
handstand
downright
have time on your hands - to have nothing to do: "Gina has some time on her hands, so she is taking a college course."
turbulent - бурный? (in which there is a lot of sudden change, confusion, disagreement and sometimes violence: "a short and turbulent career in politics", "a turbulent part of the world", "turbulent emotions")
chief claim to fame - someone's main reason for being well-known or famous: "Her chief claim to fame is that she can recite the entire works of Shakespeare.", "This little town's chief claim to fame is that the president was born here."
new-found fame - recently discovered or achieved fame: "How is she handling her new-found fame?", "McClellan had trouble dealing with her new-found fame", "15-year-old French fashion star Thylane Blondeau earns new-found fame on Instagram, earning 600,000 followers with her stunning images"
stockpile - a large amount of food, goods, or weapons that are kept ready for future use: "They have a stockpile of weapons and ammunition that will last several months"
to be in vogue - быть в моде (fashionable, especially if it is temporary: "Black is in vogue again., "Sixties music has come back into vogue.")
high-profile - attracting a lot of attention and interest from the public and newspapers, television, etc.: "high-profile politicians", "Some very high-profile British players have transferred to clubs abroad.", "The club has signed several high-profile players over the summer."
muted
mauve
C2/-- muddle (about/over something) - путаница, неразбериха (a situation in which there is a lack of understanding about arrangements, etc. and things are done wrong: "There was a muddle over the theatre tickets.", "There followed a long period of confusion and muddle.")
C2/-- in a muddle - в беспорядке (a state in which things are untidy and not in order: "My papers are all in a muddle.", "The documents were in a muddle."), see also: mess
C2/-- in a muddle - сумятица ("Can you start from the beginning again—I'm in a muddle.", "Whenever I go to Europe I get in a muddle about/over (= become confused about) how much things cost.")
      muddle - путать, перемешивать ("Don't do that—you're muddling my papers.", "Their letters were all muddled up together in a drawer.", "All the cups and saucers have been muddled up.")
      muddle sb (up) - путать, сбивать с толку (to confuse somebody: "Slow down a little — you're muddling me.")
      muddle - спутать, перепутать (to confuse one person or thing with another: "I muddled the dates and arrived a week early.", "They look so alike, I always get them muddled up.", "He got all muddled up about what went where."), see also: mix sth <-> up
      muddled - запутанный (badly organized or confusing: "a muddled legal situation", "a muddled (= badly organized) attempt to rescue the situation")
      muddled - сбитый с толку (confused: "This is the result of muddled thinking.", "He gets muddled when the teacher starts shouting.")
relatable, heartfelt
relatability
decommission
housing estate - an area in which a large number of houses or flats/apartments are planned and built together at the same time: "They live on a housing estate."
share the same taste: "Unsurprisingly, people expressed that they liked a new person better when finding that they shared the same musical taste"
chair a meeting - to act as the chairman or chairwoman of a meeting: "Who's chairing the meeting?", "Would you like to chair tomorrow's meeting?"
make a concerted effort - done in a planned and determined way, especially by more than one person, government, country, etc.
civil servant
aversive, aversion
C1/?? spacious
TODO arrangement, see also: disposition
healthcare - the service of providing medical care: "the costs of health care for the elderly", "health care workers/professionals"
capstone
lead - свинец
leaded / unleaded
mastery
drive sb up the wall
your gues
fluff - пух
(TODO link with convincing) persuasive - убедительный (able to persuade somebody to do or believe something: "persuasive arguments", "the persuasive power of advertising", "He can be very persuasive.")
do more harm than good - приносить больше вреда, чем пользы (to be damaging and not helpful: "Getting involved at this stage would do more harm than good.")
thereof (law or formal) - of the thing mentioned: "Is the property or any part thereof used for commercial activity?", "Please refer to the Regulations and in particular Articles 99 and 100 thereof."
thereon (law or formal) - on the thing mentioned: "a meeting to discuss the annual accounts and the auditors’ report thereon", "It applies to web pages and photographs posted thereon."
calculated risk - a risk that you consider worth taking because the result, if it is successful, will be so good: "The director took a calculated risk in giving the film's main role to an unknown actor."
be held responsible for - to be blamed for someone or something: "He held me personally responsible whenever anything went wrong in the project."
resurgence, revival, upsurge, upturn
C2/C1 consensus
overrun
enshroud (literary) - окутывать, обволакивать (to cover something so that it cannot be seen clearly: "The planet Venus is enshrouded in thick clouds.", "The island was enshrouded in mist.")
enshroud (literary) - окутывать (to make something difficult to know or understand: "The whole affair was enshrouded in secrecy.", "Secrecy enshrouded the Party’s central committee.")
recess
collected - собранный
strafe
spearhead - возглавлять (to lead something such as an attack or a course of action: "British troops spearheaded the invasion.", "Joe Walker will be spearheading our new marketing initiative.", "He is spearheading a campaign for a new stadium in the town.")
spearhead - лидер, остриё, авангард (a person or group that leads something such as an attack or a course of action: "Moran was the spearhead of the valley's conservation movement.", "American troops formed the spearhead of the attack.", "The tight ranks wavered and melted before the driving spearhead, even though it was now sadly deformed and its speed slackened.")
slacken
connect-the-dots
connect/join the dots - связать воедино, увидеть общую картину (to bring together information from different places in order to understand something as a whole or how different things affect each other: "We fail to connect the dots between the way we live today and the needs of tomorrow.", "No one knew all the information and no one connected all the dots.")
C2/C1 twist - поворот, перепетии (an unexpected change or development in a story or situation: "the twists and turns of his political career", "By a curious twist of fate we met again only a week or so later.", "But for a cruel twist of fate/fortune, he could now be running his own business.", "The story has taken another twist.", "The disappearance of a vital witness added a new twist to the case."), C2 turn of events - поворот (a change in a situation: "an unexpected/strange/dramatic turn of events")
TODO twist
setback
mortarboard - чёрная шапка с квадратным верхом, который надевают на вручение дипломов в западных универах, regalia - мантия к нему
outreach
bevy
not a cloud in the sky - there are no longer any problems, or all the bad things have gone away.
in retrospect - thinking about a past event or situation, often with a different opinion of it from the one you had at the time: "In retrospect, I think that I was wrong.", "The decision seems extremely odd, in retrospect.", see also: looking back?
off the beaten road
juror - присяжный
gross motor skill
fine motor skills, dexterity
sentient
scantily
legit
ancillary
abreast
turpitude
straight to the point
assetive = confident?
pushy/mousey, ...
dicey = risky
grist
gristle - хрящ (a solid white substance in meat that comes from near the bone and is hard to chew), cartilage - хрящ ((a piece of) a type of strong tissue found in humans in the joints  and other places such as the nose, throat, and ears: "He has a torn cartilage in his knee.", "I’ve damaged the cartilage in my knee.")
gristly - хрящеватый (full of gristle: "The meat was tough, gristly and fatty.", "This looked delicious on the package until I took a bite and found chunks of gristly chicken meat.")
lope
pummel
incision - разрез
discern (formal) - различать, замечать, понимать (to know, recognize or understand something, especially something that is not obvious: "It is possible to discern a number of different techniques in her work.", "He discerned a certain coldness in their welcome.", "It is often difficult to discern how widespread public support is.", "I quickly discerned that something was wrong."), see also: detect, distinguish, recognize, spot
discern (formal) - различить, разглядеть, расслышать (to see or hear something, usually with difficulty: "We could just discern the house in the distance.", "She could clearly discern a figure walking up towards the house."), see also: make out
discerning (formal approving) - взыскательный, искушенный (able to show good judgement about the quality of somebody/something: "a discerning customer", "The discerning customer will recognize this as a high-quality product.", "To the discerning eye, the quality may seem quite poor.")
discernment (formal approving) - проницательность (the ability to show good judgement about the quality of somebody/something: "It's clear that you are a person of discernment.", "He shows great discernment in his choice of friends.", "She is a woman of the highest taste and discernment."), see also: keenness, discrimination
discernible (formal) - различимый, видимый, заметный (that can be recognized or understood: "There is often no discernible difference between rival brands.", "The influence of Rodin is discernible in the younger artist.", "There is no discernible reason why this should be the case."), see also: perceptible, visible
discernible (formal) - различимый, видимый (that can be seen or heard, but not very clearly: "His face was barely discernible in the gloom."), see also: visible
discernibly (formal) - различимо, заметно (in a way that is able to be seen or noticed: "This one tastes discernibly different.", "He has been discernibly more relaxed recently than usual.")
perceptible (formal) - ощутимый (great enough for you to notice it: ""), see also: noticeable, visible / imperceptible (formal) - незаметный (very small and therefore unable to be seen or felt: "imperceptible changes in temperature", "There was an almost imperceptible pause as she gathered her breath to speak.", "The slight change in the taste was imperceptible to most people.", "The differences were imperceptible to all but the most trained eye."), see also: invisible, inaudible
perceptible (specialist) - воспринимаемый (that you can notice or feel with your senses: "the perceptible world")
wreak (formal) - нанести, принести ("Their policies would wreak havoc on the economy.", "The recent storms have wreaked havoc on crops.", "He swore to wreak vengeance on those who had betrayed him.", "She was determined to wreak revenge/vengeance on both him and his family."), see also: bring, cause, inflict
turpentine - скипидар
postulate (formal) - постулировать (to suggest a theory, idea, etc. as a basic principle from which a further idea is formed or developed: "It was the Greek astronomer, Ptolemy, who postulated that the earth was at the centre of the universe.", "They postulated a 500-year lifespan for a plastic container."), posit (formal) - постулировать (to suggest something as a basic fact or principle from which a further idea is formed or developed: "Most religions posit the existence of life after death.", "She posits that ideas of gender are socially constructed.", "They were forced to modify the political premises on which the regime was posited.", "If we posit that wage rises cause inflation, it follows that we should try to minimize them.")
postulate (formal) - постулат (an idea that is suggested or accepted as a basic principle before a further idea is formed or developed from it: "Work done in the laboratory showed that his postulates were probably correct.")
discrepancy (formal) - несоответствие (a difference between two things that should be the same: "There is some discrepancy between the two accounts.", "The committee is reportedly unhappy about the discrepancy in numbers.")
discrepant (formal) - противоречивый (showing a difference between two things that should be the same: "discrepant figures", "Discrepant results have been described by one group of scientists.", "These findings are discrepant with data from several other studies.")
aerate
nozzle - сопло, насадка (a narrow piece that is attached to the end of a pipe or tube to direct the stream of liquid, air or gas passing through: "Attach the nozzle to the hose before turning on the water.")
confectioner - кондитер или ондитерская компания
confectionery - кондитерские изделия
flaky - хлопьевидный, шелушащийся (tending to break into small, thin pieces: "dry, flaky skin", "a flaky scalp", "flaky pastry" - слоёное тесто)
townsfolk
repose - покой, отдых
repose - лежать, отдыхать
livelihood
unmatched
flatly refused
+573115920203 - Maria from Lingoda
disused - неиспользуемый?
hungry, ravenous, famished (informal), starving (informal)
bedding - постельное бельё?
flooring, floorboards
cutting/chopping board
boggart - домовой (от Лены, из Гарри Поттера, в словарях нет)
handbill
to those unused to travelling
they can also vail themselves of long-standing relationships
surcharge
purport
purported
purportedly, see also: allegedly, supposedly
perturb - беспокоить (to make somebody worried or anxious: "I was perturbed by his lack of interest.", "Her sudden appearance did not seem to perturb him in the least.", "News of the arrest perturbed her greatly."), see also: distress, trouble, alarm, unsettle
perturbed (formal) / unperturbed
perturbation
hapless [only before noun] (formal) - бедный, несчастный (not lucky; experiencing extreme bad luck: "the hapless victims of exploitation", "Often the hapless victims have no warning that the flood is on its way.", "Many children are hapless victims of this war."), see also: poor, wretched
haphazard (disapproving)
haphazardly (disapproving)
confluence (specialized (GEOGRAPHY)) - слияние (the place where two rivers flow together and become one: "the confluence of the Blue Nile and the White Nile")
confluence - стечение, совокупность (a situation in which two things join or come together: "The change has been brought on by a confluence of factors.", "A confluence of events is pushing nuclear policy into the national spotlight."), see also: conflate
C1/C1 seemingly
from time immemorial
least worst option, lesser of two evils
bereft (formal) - потерянный, подавленный ((of a person) sad and lonely because you have lost something): "He was utterly bereft when his wife died.", "The shock of his departure had left her feeling alone and bereft.", "After the last of their children had left home the couple felt utterly bereft.", see also: grieving, bereaved
bereft of something (formal) - лишён(ный) (completely without something; having lost something: "bereft of ideas/hope", "Alone now and almost penniless, he was bereft of hope.")
imperishable
brisk
interstellar passageway
drawing card (US), drawcard (Australian English, New Zealand English) - "лицо", "визитная карточка" (a person or thing that attracts people to a place, event, product, etc.)
earflap - ухо шапки
glade (literary) = clearing - поляна (a small area of grass without trees in a forest: "We made camp that night in a clearing in the woods.")
C1/C1 turnover - оборот (the amount of business that a company does in a period of time: "a fast turnover of stock", "a fall in turnover", "The business has an annual turnover of £50,000.", "Large supermarkets have high turnovers (= their goods sell very quickly).")
C2/C1 turnover - текучка кадров (the rate at which employees leave a company and are replaced by other people: "a high turnover of staff", "The large number of temporary contracts resulted in a high turnover of staff.")
on the skint one
bow out
relapse (formal) - взяться за старое, заболеть повторно
relapse (formal) - рецидив
stooge - марионетка
census - перепись
uptake - усвоение, охват (scope?)
frankincense and myrrh - ладан и мирра, see also: incense
incense - ладан, благовоние (a substance that produces a pleasant smell when you burn it, used particularly in religious ceremonies: "Incense burned in a corner of the room.")
incense - возмущать (to make somebody very angry: "The decision incensed the workforce."), see also: anger, infuriate, exasperate
incensed - возмущённый
glazed - глазированный
glazed - засетклённый, single/double glazed windows
jangle - звякнуть, звенеть, бряцать (to make a noise like metal hitting metal: "He jangled his keys in his pocket.", "The wind-chimes jangled gently in the tree above us.", "The shop bell jangled loudly.")
jangle sb's nerves - нервировать, действовать на нервы (to make someone feel annoyed or nervous: "The constant whine of the machinery jangled his nerves.", "She was suddenly wide awake, her nerves jangling.")
moggie (also moggy) - (UK informal) кошак (a cat, especially an ordinary one of no particular breed)
sweeping - широкий, обширный
unwind = relax?
off kilter
out of kilter
wanky
tough luck
security clearance - проверка благонадёжности
bare with me, give me a moment
do you mind if I jump in?
in over your head - to become involved in a situation that is too difficult for you to be in
I have to admit, this is a little beyond me
sorry, I'm afraid I don't follow you
sorry! that went straight over my head
I'm not well-versed in this topic
I think we've got our wires crossed
I'd rather not talk about this if that's okay?
This topic hits close to home. It's tough for me to talk about. ("close to home" - a remark that upsets you because it's related to personal problems)
To be honest, I don't feel like talking about this right now.
We need to agree to disgree and move on.
I understand that everyone is entitled to their own opinion which is why I prefer to steer clear of these topics.
Anyone feeling a little hot under the collar?
watch out for = be cautious of
make up your mind = decide
keep an eye on = watch
take a shot at = try / attempt
blunder
placid(ly, ness), see also: imperturbable
protrusion
protrude
scarlet - алый (bright red)
crimson - having a dark, deep red colour
vermilion (also vermillion) - a bright red colour
sickle - серп
impregnate - оплодотворить
unscathed
vantage point (also formal vantage) - точка обзора
attendant
heady heights - головокружительные высоты
habitability
treacherous - вероломный, see also: deceitful
treacherous - ненадёжный
Life is - some might argue - a series of endeavour upon which we embark with the best of intentions
in a third person - в 3м лице
egoist (also egotist)
procreate, reproduce - плодиться, размножаться
eatery (informal) - забегаловка
waistline - талия?
overhaul (verb)
you can tinker in all different area
alarmist
Injecting money into the space program might… Rather than ‘injection’
Teemed with fanatics. Correct word form here is teeming with fanatics.
Thought leaders
wrangle
encumber (formal)
tangent - касательная
collate
circumnavigate
ingenuity - изобретательность
breeding ground - места размножения (a place where animals breed and produce their babies: "These animals always return to the same breeding ground.", "Some birds fly south to find good breeding grounds.", "The estuary is a breeding ground for birds and marine life.")
breeding ground - рассадник (a place where something develops easily, especially something unpleasant: "Poor housing conditions are breeding grounds for crime.", "This area of the city has become a breeding ground for violent crime.")
brace yourself
covet - жаждать
covetable (UK formal) - желанный (used to refer to something that people want to have)
covetous - алчный?
tycoon - олигарх, mogul, magnate - магнат: "movie/media/industry moguls", "a well-known shipping magnate"
belay
digestible / indigestible
tarnish - тускнеть
tarnish - делать тусклым
tarnish - замарать, подпортить (имидж, репутацию)
tarnished
octogenarian - 80-летний
nuanced -  (with very slight differences in meaning or expression: "As her career progressed, her work became more complex and nuanced.", "Most of the important decisions we make are highly nuanced, and very few are black and white.", "His London accent is very slightly nuanced by an occasional Russian pronunciation.")
scholastically - in a way that relates to school and education: "Though only average scholastically, I was good at sports.", "The new school will be more scholastically focused."
scholastic - школьный, учебный, образовательный (connected with schools and education: "Laura’s scholastic achievements won her acceptance into Harvard.")
scholastic - схоластичный (connected with scholasticism)
scholasticism - схоластика
messiness, untidiness
hew | hewed | hewed or hewn
hotspot
immolation
dilapidation
derision (formal) - насмешка, презрение (the situation in which someone or something is laughed at and considered stupid or of no value: "He became an object of universal derision.", "They treated his suggestion with derision.", "Her speech was met/greeted with hoots/howls of derision."), see also: contempt
derisive (also less frequent: derisory) (formal) - издевательский (unkind and showing that you think somebody/something is silly: "derisive laughter", "a derisive comment/remark", "She gave a short, derisive laugh.", "His voice was savagely derisive"), mocking
derisive (also: derisory) (formal) - смехотворный (too small or of too little value to be considered seriously: "They offered us a derisory £50 a week"), laughable
derisively - издевательски, насмешливо (in an unkind way that shows you think somebody/something is silly: "He speaks derisively about modern pop music.", "Letters sent in the post are now derisively called 'snail mail'.")
derisively - издевательски ("The regular salary cheque had always seemd derisively small, but now it was like lost riches")
unsolicited - непрошенный (not asked for and sometimes not wanted: "unsolicited advice", "The record company receives dozens of unsolicited demo tapes each week.")
abreast
incisive / anodyne
incisively
incisiveness
crony (informal, often disapproving) - дружок, подельник, приспешник ("He was playing cards with his cronies.", "The general and his cronies are now awaiting trial for drug smuggling.") see also: be in cahoots (with somebody)
cronyism, nepotism - кумовство
flagship - флагман
C2/-- contestant - участник, конкурсант
--/C1 contender - претендент
surveillance
castigate
outdoor
industrial action - забастовка?
strictly speaking - строго говоря
rivet
part with
wand (also magic wand)
B2/-- cut sth <-> back (also cut back (on something) - сократить (to spend less, do less, or use less of something: "to cut back on spending", "If exercise is causing you pain, you should cut back.", "If we don't sell more we'll have to cut back production.", "The government has announced plans to cut back on defence spending by 10 percent next year."), see also: restrict
B2/-- cut sth <-> back - подрезать, обрезать (to make a bush, etc. smaller by cutting branches off: "to cut back a rose bush"), see also: prune
C1/-- cutback (in sth) - сокращение (a reduction in something: "There have been substantial staff cutbacks in order to save money.", "Schools and hospitals will need to be prepared for sharp cutbacks in public spending.")
cut something <-> down (to...), cut down (on something) - урезать, сократить (to reduce the size, amount or number of something: "We need to cut the article down to 1 000 words.", "I'm trying to cut down on fatty foods.", "The doctor told him to cut down on his drinking.", "I won't have a coffee thanks—I'm trying to cut down (= drink less coffee).", "She used to work 50 hours a week, but recently she's cut down.")
cut somebody <-> down - (formal) сразить, убить (to kill somebody: "He was cut down by an assassin's bullet.")
cut something <-> down - срубить (to make something fall down by cutting it at the base: "Some trees had been cut down.")
cut somebody down to size - вернуть с небес на землю (to show someone that they are not as clever or important as they think: "Someone should cut that man down to size!")
cut-down (only before noun) - урезанный, сокращённый (​reduced in length, size or range: "a cut-down version of the program")
wastage
prohibition (formal) - запрет (the act of stopping something being done or used, especially by law: "the prohibition of smoking in public areas")
prohibition (against/on something) (formal) - запрет (a law or a rule that stops something being done or used: "a prohibition against selling alcohol to people under the age of 18", "prohibitions on the possession of dangerous weapons")
Prohibition - сухой закон в Штатах (the period of time from 1920 to 1933 when it was illegal to make and sell alcoholic drinks)
counting = including: "There'll be eifht for dinner, counint ourselves."
serendipitous - неожиданный и при этом удачный, удивительный (happening by chance in an interesting or pleasant way: "serendipitous discoveries", "Reading should be an adventure, a personal experience full of serendipitous surprises.", "A team of researchers has made a serendipitous discovery that could help in the struggle to cure obesity."), see also: unanticipated, fortunate
serendipitously - неожиданно, по счастливой случайности ("Scientists serendipitously discovered an enzyme that has evolved to digest PET plastic, a product which is often used in the produstion of plastic bottles, food containers and even fibres in clothes.")
serendipity - счастливая случайность (the fact of something interesting or pleasant happening by chance: "Meeting her like that, and there of all places, was true serendipity!")
mesh
medicinal
retardant
ascribe to, see also: attribute
(take) pot luck - на удачу (when you take pot luck, you choose something or go somewhere without knowing very much about it, but hope that it will be good, pleasant, etc.: "It's pot luck whether you get good advice or not.", "You're welcome to stay to supper, but you'll have to take pot luck (= eat whatever is available).", "We had no idea which hotel would be best, so we just took pot luck with the first one on the list.", "Mary's welcome to stay for dinner if she doesn't mind taking pot luck (= having whatever is available).")
by dint of something/of doing something (formal) - путём, посредством, за счёт (by means of something: "He succeeded by dint of hard work.", "She became an honorary member by dint of winning the championship.", "She got what she wanted by dint of pleading and threatening.")
sunbathe - загорать (​to sit or lie in the sun, especially in order to go brown (get a suntan): "We spent the day sunbathing and swimming.", "I like to sunbathe in the morning when the sun is not so hot."), sun yourself - загорать (to lie or sit somewhere where there is a lot of sun, especially in order to make your skin darker: "I sat on the balcony sunning myself.")


replace "for example" and "for instance" on IELTS:
  "Such as (= for example) yesterday, I spent two hours burning the midnight oil reviewing my notes for the speaking section."

20 Advanced (C2) English Verbs | Vocabulary (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HqiLoPKSAJ4&ab_channel=EnglishwithMax):
dawdle - тормозить, возиться, копаться
strut (disapproving) - вышагивать (to walk in a proud way trying to look important: "The manager's son struted around the office as if he pwned the place")
backfire - 1. (of an engine) to make a sudden, loud sound because it is not working properly
           2. (of plans or actions) to have the opposite effect of the one intended: "He tried to make himself more desirable to his girlfriend by flirting with other people but the plan backfired and she dumped him."

rampage - неиствовствовать, буянить (to go through an area making a lot of noise and causing damage: "a herd of rampaging elephants", "Several villages were destroyed by rampaging soldiers.", "Several thousand demonstrators rampaged through the centre of the city.", The demonstrators rampaged through the town, smashing windows and setting fire to cars.)
rampage - неистовство, разрушительные беспорядки (a sudden period of wild and violent behaviour, often causing damage and destruction, see also: riot: "Rioters went on a/the rampage through the city.", "Gangs of youths went on the rampage in the city yesterday.", "A state of emergency was declared following overnight rampages by student demonstrators.")
rampant - необузданный, свирепствующий, безудержный, неконтролируемый ((of something bad) getting worse quickly and in an uncontrolled way: "rampant inflation/corruption", "Unemployment is now rampant in most of Europe.", "Disease is rampant in the overcrowded city."), unchecked, uncontrolled
rampantly - необузданно (in a way that exists or spreads everywhere and cannot be controlled: "a rampantly consumerist society")
rampantly - необузданно (used to describe plants growing thickly and very fast in a way that cannot be controlled) "Ivy climbed rampantly up the stone walls."
run amok - взбеситься, разбушеваться, разбуяниться (to suddenly become very angry or excited and start behaving violently, especially in a public place: "The two dogs ran amok in a school playground.", "Some drunken students had run amok in the college car park.", "The soldiers ran amok after one of their senior officers was killed.")

tenet (formal) - доктрина, принцип (one of the principles or beliefs that a theory or larger set of beliefs is based on), see also: dogma, principle: "one of the basic/central tenets of Christianity"
precept (formal) - заповедь, принцип (a rule about how to behave or what to think), see also: dogma, principle: "moral precepts"
dogma (often disapproving) - догма (a belief or set of beliefs held by a group or organization that others are expected to accept without argument), see also: tenet, precept, pinciple: "political/religious/party dogma", "She has caused a storm by calling into question one of the central dogmas of the Church."
doctrine
school(s) of thought - доктрина, мнение, точка зрения (a way of thinking that a number of people share): "There are two schools of thought about how this illness should be treated.", "He belongs to the school of thought that says that competition can be very stimulating for children.", "There are several schools of thought about how the universe began."

forefront: "At the forefront of potential problems that this may cause are environmental, social and economic sustainability.", "Berlin is at the forefront of this debate."
The buses from city to city are interconnected
No sooner had he arrived than he set his suitcase on the floor

Lucy:
it's not unheard of (effect (verb) = to achieve or produce)
but here we're getting down to the nitty-gritty

Emma:
angst
backlash
shunned
social circle
Messing with what is socially acceptable can be brutal!
C2 be at odds (with somebody) (over/on something) - спорить, расходиться во мнениях (to disagree: "They're at odds over the funding of the project.", "He's always at odds with his father over politics.")
C2 be at odds (with something) - противоречить, расходиться (to be different from something, when the two things should be the same: "Her version of events was at odds with (= very different from) the police report.", "These findings are at odds with what is going on in the rest of the country."), see also: conflict
the done thing (устоявшаяся вещь?), it's not the norm
don't want to lug around a notebook or a dictionary..

martyr
slowness, sluggishness, tardiness
медлительный = slow, sluggish,
неторопливый = leisurely, unhurried, B2/B1 relaxed, B2/A2 lazy - расслабленный
thimble
durable, durables, durability
plaintiff - истец
abiding - прочный, see also: sturdy
treacle - патока, treacly - слащавый
filial (formal) - сыновний/дочерний
prosthesis - протез, prosthetic
untapped - неиспользованный (available but not yet used)

astrology: astrology is the study of the stars in the belief that they influence people’s lives. "Jack, who studies astrology, believes that the stars can predict the future."
astronomy: astronomy is the study of the stars and planets. "Harold loved watching the stars, so he decided to study astronomy."
archeological: When something is archeological, it relates to archeology. "They found archeological evidence that proved an ancient species of man."
archeology: archeology is the study of ancient people through their artifacts. "He studied archeology to learn more about ancient Egyptian culture."
chemistry: chemistry is the study of and reaction to substances. "In chemistry class, the professor taught us about chemical reactions."
chemical: A chemical is something that scientists use in chemistry. ""The scientist mixed the chemicals.
physics: physics is a science that deals with energy and how it affects things. "In physics class, we used Newton's Cradle to learn about energy."
geography:  geography is the study of where things are. "I had to draw a map for geography class."

experiment: An experiment is a test that you do to see what will happen. "The student did an experiment in science class."
kill: To kill someone or something is to make them die. "I killed the fly with a fly swatter."
laboratory: A laboratory is a room where a scientist works. "My mother works in a laboratory."
loud: If a sound is loud, it is strong and very easy to hear. "The man's voice was so loud that we all could hear him."
noise: A noise is an unpleasant sound. "The crying baby made a loud noise."
project: A project is a type of work that you do for school or a job. "His afternoon work project was to paint the room green."
secret: A secret is something that you do not tell other people. "The two boys were sharing a secret."
shout: To shout is to say something loudly. "My boss shouted at me because I was late for work."
smell: To smell something means to use your nose to sense it. "The two friends smelled the flower."
terrible: If something is terrible, it is very bad. "The way he treated his classmate was terrible."
worse: If something is worse, it is of poorer quality than another thing. "Business was worse this month than last month."
alien: An alien is a creature from a different world. "The alien came in peace."
cloud: A cloud is a group of water drops in the sky. "The sky was filled with white clouds."
describe: To describe is to say or write what someone or something is like. "They described their tree as colorful with gold ribbon and a star."
friendly: friendly is behaving in a pleasant, kind way toward someone. "The friendly animals came up to the girl."
library: A library is a place where you go to read books. "The library at school is full of books."
planet: A planet is a large round thing in space. "Saturn is the planet with the ring around it."
report: A report is something students write for school. "Karen had trouble writing her report."
several: several is more than two but not many. "He had to read several books for class."
suppose: To suppose is to guess. "I suppose I should go home now."
habit: A habit is a thing that you do often. "Smoking is a bad habit that can kill you."
instruct: To instruct is to teach. "My teacher instructs us in several subjects."
patient: If a person is patient, they don't become angry or upset easily. "I had to be patient and wait until 5 o'clock to leave."
village: A village is a very small town. "There are only a few houses in my village."
belong: If something belongs to you, you own it. "The blue suit belongs to Paul."
continue: To continue something is to keep doing it. "She stood under her umbrella as the rain continued to fall."
field:A field is a big area of land. "The field of flowers looked so pretty."
relax: To relax is to rest. "The frog relaxed in the warm sun."
visible: If something is visible, it can be seen. "The moon and stars were visible in the night sky."
wild: If something is wild, it is found in nature. "You should be careful around a fox, because it is a wild animal."
choice: A choice is the act or possibility of picking something. "I had my choice of five doors to open."
community: A community is a group of people who live together. "The kids from my community usually play together."
dead: To be dead is to not be alive. "A dead person is usually buried in the ground."
distance: The distance between two things is how far it is between them. "The distance between the Earth and the Moon is 384,400 kilometers."
individual: An individual is one person. "Only one individual could win the bicycle race."
voice: A voice is the sound a person makes when they talk or sing. "He used a microphone, so everyone could hear his voice."
weather: The weather is the condition of the air: hot, rainy, windy, etc. "The weather can be sunny, rainy, or cold."
divide: To divide something is to make it into smaller parts. "We divided the pizza."
expert: An expert is someone who is very good at doing something. "The wizard was an expert at magic."
lay: To lay means to put or place in a horizontal or flat position. "Don't lay your socks on the floor."
peace: peace is a time without war. "A white dove is a symbol for peace."
prince: A prince is the son of a king. "The prince and the princess were married."
balance: To balance something is to keep it from falling. "We saw an elephant balance itself on a ball."
beach: The beach is a sandy or rocky place by the ocean. "The little girl built a sandcastle on the beach."
emotion: An emotion is how you feel. "Anger is a common emotion that we all feel."
island: An island is land in the middle of water. "Japan is a group of islands."
ocean: The ocean is all of the salt water that surrounds land. "The ocean can make powerful waves."
remain: To remain somewhere is to stay there. "My sister had to remain home since she was sick."
rest: To rest is to stop being active while the body gets back its strength. "I rested on the couch after work."
berry: A berry is a small round fruit that grows on certain plants and trees. "The berry looked delicious."
creature: A creature is any living thing. "The creature we saw today was either a dolphin or a porpoise."
introduce: To introduce someone or something is to say who they are. "I introduced myself to our newest co-worker today."
apartment: An apartment is a set of rooms in a building where people live. "She has a nice apartment in the city."
article: An article is a story in a newspaper or magazine. "Did you read the article in the newspaper about the soccer game?"
artist: An artist is a person who paints, draws, or makes sculptures. "He went to Paris to become an artist."
profit: A profit is the extra money you make when you sell something. "I made a small profit from selling my old clothes."
blood: blood is the red liquid in your body. "I cut my finger and got blood on my shirt."
entire, whole: When you talk about an entire thing, you are talking about the whole thing. "He was so hungry that he ate the entire pizza by himself."
			   whole means all of something. "I ate the whole pie. We don't have any more."
coach: A coach is a person who teaches sports. "My coach gets very excited during games."
exam: An exam is a test. "I did some practice questions for the math exam on the board."
mail: mail is letters and other things sent to people. "I get a lot of mail because I have friends all over the world."
sheet: A sheet is a thin flat piece of paper. "I only needed a single sheet of paper to do my homework."
store: A store is a place where you can buy things. "I picked up a few things at the grocery store."
technology: technology is new things made by using science. "He loves technology such as laptop computers."
exist: To exist is to be real. "Do you really think that unicorns ever existed?"
bright: If something is bright, it shows a lot of light. "The bright light from the explosion hurt my eyes."
celebrate: To celebrate is to do something to show that an event is special. "We all celebrated when we heard the great news."
else: If you talk about something else, you talk about something different. "I wanted a bike for my birthday, but I got something else."
solution, --/B2 fix (informal): A solution is a way to solve a problem. "There are many problems. We need solutions."
fresh: If something is fresh, it is new. "I just bought these oranges. They are very fresh."
social: If something is social, it is about many people in a community. "People should come together and fix the world's social problems."
wood: wood is the thing that trees are made of. "I put the pieces of wood in a pile."
vegetable: A vegetable is a plant used as food. "Carrots are my favorite vegetable."
war: A war is a big fight between two groups of people. "Many young men died in the war."
brain: The brain is the organ in your head that lets you think. "You must use your brain to solve the problem."
clerk: A clerk is a type of worker. clerks in a store help customers. "The clerk added up her bill for the groceries."
hero: A hero is a brave person who does things to help others. "To children, the man in the blue and red costume was a real hero."
pain: pain is the feeling that you have when you are hurt. "His head was full of pain."
gate: A gate is a type of door. gates are usually made of metal or wood. "We want to put up a wooden gate around our house."
course: A course is a class in school. "I took a P.E. course in school this year."
passenger: A passenger is a person who rides in a car, train, or airplane. "One passenger was standing in the subway train."
swim: To swim is to move through water. "I love to swim in the ocean."
critic: A critic is someone who give their opinions about movies, books, plays... "The wine critic tasted the wine so he could give his opinion."
friendship: friendship is the relationship between people who are friends. "Michael and Lisa have a very strong friendship with each other."
member: A member is a person who is part of a group. "Julie is the newest member of our team."
factory: A factory is a building where things are made or put together. "We have only one factory in our town."
society: society is people and the way that they live. "society expects people to be good and honest."
earthquake: An earthquake is a shaking movement of the ground. "The building shook during the earthquake."
band: A band is a group of people who play music. "My brother is in a rock band."
list: A list is a record of information printed with an item on each line. "My mom makes a list of groceries to buy."
magic, magical: magic is the power to do impossible things. "The magician used magic to pull a rabbit out of his hat."
				magical describes a quality that makes someone or something special. "The fireworks made the night sky look so magical."
progress: progress is the act of getting closer to doing or finishing something. "Our company made financial progress this year."
monster: A monster is any imaginary frightening creature that looks strange. "The monster scared everyone in the village."
northern: If something is northern, it is in the direction of north. "It is much colder in northern countries than it is here."
southern: If something is southern, it is in the direction of south. "Taegu is located in the southern part of the Korean peninsula."
bush: A bush is a plant with many thin branches. It is smaller than a tree. "My dad and I planted some small bushes around the house."
destination: A destination is the place where someone or something is going to. "The destination of this plane is Munich, Germany."
valley: A valley is a low area of land between two mountains or hills. "We looked at the valley below from the top of the mountain."
slave: A slave is a person who is not free and must work for someone else. "The slave worked very hard all day long."
citizen: A citizen is someone who lives in a certain town or city. "Carlos was born in Spain. He is a Spanish citizen."
dinosaur: A dinosaur is a very big animal that lived millions of years ago. "I like to see the dinosaur bones at the museum."
tattoo: A tattoo is a design that is drawn permanently on the skin with needles. "The surfer had tattoos on both his arms."
candle: A candle is a stick of wax that is lit on fire for light or heat. "When the lights went out, we lit some candles."
billion: A billion is a very large number: 1,000,000,000. "There are billions of stars in outer space."
calculate: To calculate is to find an answer using math. "I calculated how much money I would need to buy the car."
cartoon: A cartoon is a funny drawing. "Sometimes, people draw cartoons for the newspaper."
underground: When something is underground, it is below the surface of the Earth. "Subway trains travel underground."
bath: A bath is water in a tub. People take a bath to get clean. "After playing in the dirt, the boy took a bath."
flag: A flag is a piece of colored cloth that represents something. "Our country has a beautiful flag."
electronic: When something is electronic, it uses electricity to do something. "I like having electronic devices such as an MP3 player."
furniture: furniture is the things used in a house such as tables and chairs.
wheel: A wheel is a round thing on a vehicle that turns when it moves. "A car has four wheels."
client: A client is a person or business that pays another to do a service. "She has many clients who enjoy coming to her salon."
spice: A spice is a flavor for food and drinks. "Two common spices found in many homes are salt and pepper."
pirate: A pirate is a sailor who steals things from other boats. "pirates are very scary characters."
worm: A worm is a small animal with a long, thin body. "worms are often used to help catch fish."
dwarf: A dwarf is a creature from stories that often looks like a short, hairy man. "The dwarf had a pleasant look on his face."
chef: A chef is a person who cooks in a restaurant. "Tom is a chef at the restaurant near my house."
blonde: If someone is a blonde, they have light-colored hair. "My cousin is different from me. She is a blonde with blue eyes."
bomb: A bomb is an object that explodes and destroys large areas. "A bomb is an object that explodes and destroys large areas."
cyberspace: cyberspace is the imaginary place of the internet where activities occur. "I didn't receive your email. It probably got lost in cyberspace."
essay: An essay is a short piece of writing on a certain subject. "She had to write a two-page essay for her English class."
folk, the populace: folk are common or average people. "I've invited all the folks from our street to a gathering at my place."
pudding: A pudding is a sweet dessert.  "Would you like some chocolate pudding and coffee for dessert?"
geology: geology is the study of the Earth’s natural structures and how they change. "Because he studied geology, he knew how the mountains were formed."
physiology: physiology is the study of the various parts of living things. "His work in physiology helped him understand how the human body works."
sociology: sociology is the study of human society, its organizations, and problems. "sociology teaches that people’s problems are a result of their society."
anthropology: anthropology is the study of people, society, and culture. "In anthropology class, I learned about simple tools that ancient cultures used."
Braille: Braille is a system of raised patterns on paper that allows the blind to read. "The boy enjoyed reading his favorite books written in Braille."
Renaissance: The Renaissance was a period between the 14th and 17th centuries. "Leonardo Da Vinci was a popular artist of the Renaissance."
brainstorm: To brainstorm is to have a lot of ideas about a certain topic. "The students met after school to brainstorm ideas for their assignment."
secondhand: When something is secondhand, it has been owned by someone else. "Her secondhand jeans were a bit faded in the front."
TODO input - contribution; contribute = bring sth to the party/table: input is information that is put into a computer. "Type the input into the computer program."
																	  To contribute to something means to do something to make it successful. "We decided to contribute money to the new hospital."
																	  see also: donate, gift
magnet: A magnet is a piece of iron or other material which attracts iron toward it. "I used a magnet to pick up the nails that were scattered on the floor."
clone: A clone is an identical copy of a living creature. "Scientists recently made a clone of a sheep."
fantasy: A fantasy is a pleasant situation that people think about but is unlikely to happen. "Becoming an astronaut is a fantasy shared by many children."
pioneer: A pioneer is a person who is the first to discover or be involved in something. "He was a pioneer of computer programming."
decipher: To decipher writing is to figure out what it says. "My teacher complained that she couldn’t decipher my essay."
electromagnetic: If something is electromagnetic, it is related to electricity and magnetic fields. "Different colors of light come from different levels of electromagnetic energy."
freeway: A freeway is a road with no stops where cars travel at high speeds. "Once you get on the freeway, it only takes an hour to drive to my parent’s farm."
advent: An advent is the arrival or beginning of an important person, thing, or event. "During the advent of radio, very few programs actually played music."
personalize: To personalize something means to design it to meet a person’s unique needs. "He personalized the woman’s exercises to give her a better workout."
phoenix: A phoenix is an imaginary bird that burned to ashes and was reborn. "Some believe the phoenix is a symbol for rebirth and a new beginning."
photosynthesis: photosynthesis is the process in which plants change sunlight and air. "The chemical in plants that makes them green is used in photosynthesis."
censor(ship): To censor information means to remove it if it is rude or rebellious. "To protect innocent people, the location of the bomb was censored."
pathological: When a behavior is pathological, it is extreme, unacceptable, and uncontrollable. "The pathological liar could not even tell the truth about unimportant matters."
trance: A trance is a a state where people seem asleep and have no control of themselves. "The woman’s powerful eyes often put men in a trance."
delete: To delete something means to remove or erase written material. "Several lines had been deleted from her speech."
patriot: A patriot is someone who loves, supports, and defends their country. "Every year young patriots join their countries’ militaries."
concentric: When circles or rings are concentric, they have the same center. "The target was a series of concentric circles."
veteran: A veteran is someone who has a lot of experience doing something. "Hank was the team veteran and had played in more games than anyone else."
depot: A depot is a bus or train station. "He waited for his mother to arrive at the depot."
hectare: A hectare is a unit of measure equal to 10,000 square meters. "His family farm covered many hectares."
telescope, microscope, binoculars, compass: A telescope is a tool people use to look at the stars. "With a telescope, you can see the moon and stars easily."
											A microscope is a device that makes small objects look bigger. "Germs cannot be seen without a microscope."
                                			binoculars are a device used for seeing things that are far away. "He could see the ship on the horizon only if he used his binoculars."
                                			A compass is a device used to tell what direction one is going. "A compass is an important tool to have when you are travelling."
the outback: The outback is the wild inland region of Australia where very few people live. "Many Australian farmers use the outback to raise cattle."
supply: To supply something means to give people what they need or want. "The water heater supplied the house with warm water."
culture, counterculture, folklore, religion: culture is the music, art, and writings of a certain place or group of people. "Ancient Mexican culture is renowned for its architecture."
                                             folklore is the collection of beliefs and stories of a culture. "India’s folklore has stories written in long poems about great warriors."
                                             A religion is a belief in a god or gods. "Their religion taught that people should forgive their enemies."
per: per is used to mean “each” when giving a price, size, or amount. "It costs $8 per person to watch the baseball game."
teller: A teller is a person who works with a bank’s customers. "The teller at the bank helped Kelly put money into a savings account."
economy: An economy is the money and businesses of a country or region. "The factory was good for the economy because it brought jobs to the area."
hitchhike: To hitchhike means to travel by asking for rides from passing vehicles. "She didn’t have a car, so she hitchhiked several miles to her brother’s home."
evolve: To evolve is to change over time. (To develop; to come forth) "Many people think that humans evolved from animals."
hardy: If a person or plant is hardy, it is strong and can live though difficult conditions. "The farmer is a hardy man and doesn’t mind working outside."
species: A species is a type of plant or animal. "There are 21 different species of butterfly in this forest."
telegraph: A telegraph is a method of sending electric messages on wires. "In the 1900s, the telegraph was the fastest way to send a message."


ostensible, ostensibly
dystopia
stubble
hitch
misgiving - опасение, дурное предчуствие, qualm
imbroglio
legerdemain
uxoricide
ordinarily, commonly, normally
jurisdiction
purport, profess
loophole
incommunicado
personal characteristics: argumentative individualistic attention-seeking circuitous conscientious meticulous convoluted uncanny pensive presumptuous arduous? facetious hot-tempered
спустя - hence
whap - "бах"?
whoosh - "ух"?
pivot
pivotal - ключевой, решающий (crucial?)

integrity unity cohesion (cohesive)
(про)нестить, быстро перемещаться: speed, streak, zap, career, shoot, bolt, dash, race, flash, sweep, zoom, hurtle

овладеть вниманием: absorb, engross, grip, engage
суть: substance, essence, the gist, the thrust, bare(adj), the pith
тяжело тащить: grab?, drag, heave, haul
распад: ?decay, ?degrade, ?divide, breakdown
крепко держать: clasp, clutch, grip
mimic, simulate, emulate, imitate, duplicate, replicate

охвачен эмоциями:
  seethe - бурлить, кипеть (эмоционально)
 "I was suddenly seized by/with a feeling of great insecurity and loneliness.", "He was seized by curiosity." - он был охвачен любопытством, "Panic seized her." - паника охватила её
 "A tide of rage surged through her" - её охватила волна ярости
 "He abandoned himself to despair." - он предался отчаянию
 "Fear engulfed her." - её охватил (поглотил) страх
 "Sudden panic overtook her." - внезапная паника охватила её
 "Overcome with/by emotion, she found herself unable to speak for a few minutes." - будучи охвачена эмоциями, она обнаружила, что не может говорить в течение нескольких минут
 "Carolyn was consumed with guilt." - Кэролайн была поглощена чувством вины. "Rage consumed him." - ярость полготила/?охватила его
 "Memories of her childhood came flooding back." - нахлынули воспоминания; "A great sense of relief flooded over him." - его захлестнуло чувство облегчения, "The words flooded him with self-pity." - эти слова наполнили его жалостью к себе

C1/B2 abandon, forsake (literary) - покинуть, оставить (leave sb who needs or counts on you; leave in the lurch), renounce (formal) - отречься ("to renounce a claim/title/privilege/right, to renounce ideals/principles/beliefs, etc."), see also: concede, desert, yield, waive:
		To abandon something is to leave it forever or for a long time. "The old room had been abandoned years before."
C1/A2 ability, C1/C1 capability, C1/B2 capacity, powers, see also potential / C1/C1 inability, B2/B2 disability, handicap; B2/B2 disabled, lame​ - хромой (see also: stumble, stagger), cripple:
        ability is the quality of a person being able to do something well. "His swimming abilities let him cross the entire lake."
        The capacity of something is the amount of things that can be put in it. "The parking lot has reached its full capacity."
        A handicap is a condition that limits someone's mental or physical abilities. "Joe has a slight handicap, so he uses a walker to get around."
        When a person is disabled, they cannot do what a normal person can do. "The disabled man used a wheelchair to move around."
        If one is lame, they cannot walk properly due to an injury to the leg or foot. "The terrible accident left many people dead and several others lame."
C2/A2 able, B2/B2 capable:
        If someone or something is capable of something, they can do it. "The Olympic athlete is capable of lifting a lot of weight."
C1/-- abnormal(ly, ity), deviant, aberrant (formal); degenerate, извращенец - pervert, развратный - debauched, dissolute (literary), dissipated (formal disapproving), immoral, amoral, dishonourable
        If something is abnormal, it is strange or not normal. "Her idea of art is a bit too abnormal for me."
        When something or someone is immoral, they are evil or do bad things. "Stealing money from one's mother is an immoral act."
C1/-- aboard = B2/B2 on board, C2/-- overboard - за борт(ом): When someone is aboard a ship or plane, they are on or in it. "They climbed aboard the kayak and paddled through the river."
                                                              When something is overboard, it is over the side of a boat and in the water. "Tom and Gary slipped on the wet floor and fell overboard."
B2/C1 abolish (see also: reverse, withdraw, overturn, scrap, lift (TODO)), B2/C1 cease, B1/B1 quit, --/C1 terminate, --/C1 halt, discontinue (formal), raise (to end the limits on sb/sth), see also: put a stop to sth:
		To abolish something means to put an end to it, such as a system or law. "President Lincoln abolished slavery in the US."
        To cease means to stop. "After about an hour, the rain ceased, and a rainbow appeared."
        To quit something means to stop doing it. "I quit running because I got tired."
        To terminate something means to stop or end it. "The trip was terminated after the car broke down."
        To halt is to stop moving. "The criminal halted when he saw the police coming."
C1/C1 abortion, miscarriage, stillbirth; abort
C2/-- abrupt(ly, ness) - резкий, внезапный, sudden(ly, ness), C1/-- drastic(ally), precipitous(ly) - крутой, стремительный (об изменении), sharply, ses also: extreme(ly), radical:
        When something is sudden, it happens very quickly. "He felt a sudden pain in his chest."
        If something happens suddenly, it happens quickly and unexpectedly. "I was suddenly surprised by the cake my friends brought me."
        When something is drastic, it is extreme or major. "She made a drastic decision to get her long hair cut short."
C2/-- abrupt(ly, ness) - отрывистый, brusque(ly, ness), curt(ly), see also (compare): terse(ly, ness)
B1/C1 absent (from)
B2/B2 absorb - впитывать (liquid, gas, other substances), take sth <-> in: To absorb a liquid means to take it inside. "He used a sponge to absorb the water on the floor."
B2/B2 absorb - поглощать (heat, light, energy, sound, etc.)
--/C1 absorb - поглощать (to reduce the effect of a physical force, shock, or change)
      absorb - поглощать время, покрывать расходы, осваивать средства
--/C1 absorb - поглотить (to make something smaller become part of something larger)
C1/C1 absorb - усваивать (инфу), assimilate, --/C1 digest - переварить, усвоить (инфу), take sth <-> in, see also: sink in
B2/С1 absorb, C2/C1 grip, engross, C1/-- fascinate, enchant(er, ment), intrigue, enthral (US enthrall), bewitch, rivet, entrance, captivate - пленять (captivating - пленительный, чарующий), mesmerize (UK usually mesmerise) - очаровывать, гипнотизировать, beguile, charm, make sb's heart flutter, see also: engage:
        To fascinate someone is tsinko make them really like something. "The kitten was fascinated by the ball of yarn."
        To enchant someone is to make them feel very interested or happy. "The beautiful woman enchanted everybody in the room."
		To intrigue means to cause an interest in something or someone. "Her mysterious past intrigued her new friend."
        To charm someone is to please them with your personality. "Gail charmed everyone with her humorous stories."
B2/C1 absurd(ly, ity), B2/B2 ridiculous(ly), ludicrous(ly, ness), nonsensical, preposterous (formal); :
		If something or someone is absurd, they are ridiculous. "That group of people making animal noises sounds completely absurd."
        If something is ridiculous, it is silly or strange. "Steve looked ridiculous with those huge blue sunglasses."
--/C1 abundance (formal) - (изо)билие, множество
      abundant(ly) - обилный, ample, plentiful(ly) (also literary plenteous)
C2/C1 abuse - злоупотреблять (чем-то вредным для здоровья)
--/C1 abuse - злоупотреблять (властью, доверием и т.д.), C1/-- misuse, misapply, overspend
B2/C1 abuse - злоупотребление (властью, доверием и т.д.), C1/-- misuse, misapplication
--/C1 abuse - издеваться, подвергать насилию, torment, see also: persecute, pick on sb: To abuse someone or something means to hurt them on purpose. "The mean man abused his dog when it barked too loudly."
B2/C1 abuse - издевательство, насилие, жестокость, violence TODO (move here): violence is forceful action that is meant to injure or kill people. "The boy hit his brother in an act of violence."
--/C1 abuse - оскорблять, B2/C1 insult, TODO (move here)
C2/C1 abuse - оскорбление, B2/C1 insult, TODO (move here)

B2/C1 insult - оскорблять, C2/C1 defy (unruly(-iness, see also: disorder(ly)) (see also: violate), disobedient - непокорный, insubordinate), --/C1 breach, B2/B1 break (law/promise/word), B2/B2 offend, transgress(ion), slur, affront (formal); contravene, infringe, defile (literary) - портить, осквернять:
        To insult someone is to say things that will hurt their feelings. "The girls insulted each other all afternoon."
        To defy someone is to work against them or refuse to do what they say. "The students got into trouble for defying their teacher’s rules."
        When someone is disobedient, they do not follow the rules or instructions. "The disobedient children didn’t listen to their mother and had an accident."
        To violate a law, rule, or agreement means to break it. " I was given a ticket because the policeman said I violated the speed limit."
        To offend someone means to make them angry or upset. "They were both offended by what they had said to each other."
B2/C1 insult - оскорбление, infringement, infraction (formal), B2/B2 offence (US offense), B1/A2 crime (see also: violation), contravention, see also: commission
        An offense is behavior that is wrong or breaks a law. "Stealing a car is a very serious offense."
        An offense is an action that breaks the law and requires punishment. "He was put in jail for two days for the offense."
        A crime is something bad that a person does that can be punished by law. "Police quickly arrived at the scene of the crime."
      insulting(ly) - оскорбительный (rude or offensive: "insulting remarks", "She was really insulting to me.", "You can't offer such a low salary to someone who is so highly skilled - it's insulting."), derogatory (UK also derogative) - унизительный, уничижительный, оскорбительный (showing strong disapproval and not showing respect: "He made some derogatory comment/remark about her appearance.", "She indicated by her tone that this was only her private opinion and in no way derogatory of Colonel Ferguson."), disparaging (formal) - пренебрежительный (suggesting that somebody/something is not important or valuable: "disparaging remarks", "She was rather disparaging about her boss.")
TODO separate crime and insult

??/?? academic, scholarly - научный
C2/B1 academic, scholarly, studious (прилежный), diligent, sedulous (прилежный, старательный), assiduous (усердный), C1/-- conscientious (добросовестный, сознательный, see also: sympathy, considerate), attentive(ly, ness); C2/-- industrious(ly, ness), hard-working; painstaking (кропотливый), punctilious (дотошный), see also: scrupulous:
        If someone is diligent, they work hard and are careful. "Craig has always been a very diligent person at work."
        If you are attentive, you are careful and you pay attention. "He is a good student because he is attentive to every detail on his work."
        If someone is industrious, they work hard. "Dennis was very industrious, so he never had problems finding a job."
--/C1 academy: An academy is a special type of school. "There are many courses taught at the academy that I go to."
C2/C1 accelerate(-ion) / decelerate(-ion): To accelerate means to increase in speed. "When he stepped on the gas pedal, the motorcycle accelerated."
C2/C1 accessible; B2/B1 access: access is the right to enter or use something. "The manager was the only person with access to the password."
--/C1 accommodate - разместить (приютить), lodge
--/C1 accommodate - вместить, B1/B1 hold: To accommodate is to have enough room. "The meeting room can accommodate nine people."
--/C1 accommodate (formal) - учесть (мнения, возражения), удовлетворить (нуждам, потребностям)
--/C1 accommodate (formal) - помочь, посодействовать, oblige
      accommodate (sth/yourself) to sth (formal) - приспособить, see also: adapt, tailor
С1/B2 accomplish, C1/C1 attain, B1/B1 achieve(ment) - достичь, C1/B2 realize, B1/B1 reach, A2/A1 arrive (see also: draw up); B2/B2 secure, (с трудом) --/C1 forge, carve sth (out), to arrive at (an agreement/a decision/a conclusion/the truth/...), see also: win, scramble:
        To accomplish something means to finish it. "He accomplished his goal of running ten miles."
        To attain something means to gain or achieve it, often after a lot of effort. "In two more years, I will attain my high school diploma."
        To achieve something is to successfully do it after trying hard. "I was happy that I could achieve my goal"
        To secure something means to get it after a lot of effort. "I was able deserveto secure a good grade on my test after weeks of studying."
        To forge is to make or produce, especially with difficulty. "Stacy and Heather forged their friendship when they were teenagers."
        To reach means to arrive at a place. "I was happy to finally reach my destination."
        To arrive is to get to or reach some place. "The bus always arrives at the corner of my street at 4:00."
--/C1 accomplishment
C1/C1 accordance (in accordance with sth)
--/C1 accordingly - соответственно, в соответствии: If someone acts accordingly, they act in a way that is suitable. "He feels like he did a good job, and his boss should pay him accordingly."
--/C1 accordingly - соответственно, таким образом, C1/C1 thereby, C1/B2 hence, B2/B2 thus, B1/B1 therefore, hereby (formal), herewith (formal):
		If something happens thereby an action, then it is the result of that action. "He didn’t score a goal, thereby ending his chance at setting a record."
        thus means as a result or for that reason. "The sun was shining. Thus, I wore my sunglasses."
        therefore means for this reason. "He is fat. Therefore, he will go on a diet."
        If something happens hence, then it happens as a result of something. "John forgot the key. hence, we couldn’t open the door."
C2/C1 accountable
--/C1 accountability
C1/-- accustom(ed), wont, habituated, C1/-- customary - обычный (customarily - привычно), A2/A2 normal(ly), A2/A2 usual(ly), habitual(ly), see also: mainstream, characteristic, staple, pathological(?):
		When you become accustomed to something, you are in the habit of it. "Grandfather is accustomed to reading the newspaper every morning."
		When something is habitual, it is a behavior that a person usually does or has. "The man was a habitual liar who was incapable of being honest with the police."
B2/C1 acid: An acid is a chemical that can burn or dissolve other substances. "In chemistry class, we mixed two acids together and watched the reaction."
C1/B2 acknowledge(-ment), C2/B2 recognition, C1/C1 acceptance, C1/A2 realize, C2/C1 appreciate(-ion), see also: dawn on sb:
        If you acknowledge something, you accept that it is true or that it exists. "The teacher acknowledged that the young student was hungry."
        recognition is getting praise from other people. "The hero got recognition for his brave deed."
        To realize is to suddenly understand. "After I left my house, I realized that I left the light on."
      acquaint sb/yourself with sth (formal), C2/-- familiarize (UK usually familiarise) yourself with sth, see also: have a passing/slight/nodding acquaintance with sb/sth:
        To acquaint is to get to know something or someone. "Nancy acquainted herself with the new computer."
C1/-- acquaintance - знакомый
      acquaintance/acquaintanceship (with sb/sth, formal) - знакомство (с кем-л./с чем-л.), B2/C1 companion, see idiom: have a passing/slight/nodding acquaintance with sb/sth
		A companion is a person that someone spends a lot of time with. "I always walk to school with my companion` Frank."
      acquainted (with sb/sth, formal) - знакомый (с кем-л./с чем-л.), conversant (with sb/sth, formal) - знакомый (с кем-л./с чем-л.), B1/B1 familiar(ity), see also: conscious:
      	If someone or something is familiar to you, you know them well. "The two friends were very familiar with each other."
C2/C1 acre - акр; acreage
C1/C1 active(-ation, -ist) /  inactive(-ity), B2/C1 passive(ly), dormant(-cy), apathy(-etic(ally)), extinct, see also: sedentary, indifferent, disengaged:
		If a person is passive, they do not take action to solve problems. "Marcie is so passive that she never solves her own problems."
A1/A1 address - адрес
C1/-- address - речь, обращение, B2/A2 speech, B2/A2 talk, --/C1 discourse (on/upon), B1/A1 lecture, sermon (проповедь):
		A lecture is a long, educational speech. "His lecture on world hunger was very informative."
		A speech is something said to a group of people. "She gave a speech to the class."
C2/-- address (formal) - обращаться к кому-л.
C1/B2 address (formal) - учитывать, затрагивать, разбираться, решать, удовлетворять (to think about a problem or a situation and decide how you are going to deal with it), see also: cater, fulfil, tackle
C2/-- address [often passive] - адресовать (адресовано)
--/C1 adhere (adhesive, TODO glue) - прилипать, приклеиваться, see also: stick, fix: An adhesive is a substance used for sticking things together. "The carpenter used an adhesive to hold the two pieces of wood together."
      adhere - придерживаться, следовать, see also: comply, stick: To adhere means to act in the way that a rule or agreement says is right. "If the new employees wish to succeed, they must adhere to the boss’s rules."
      adjoin, abut, border: To adjoin something means to be next to or attached to something else. "She can listen to her brother’s conversations because her room adjoins his."
C2/-- adjacent, adjoining (see also: communicate, "adjoining rooms = communicating rooms"), contiguous, bordering: If something is adjoining, it is next to or joined with a building, or room. "I couldn’t sleep because the people in the adjoining room were loud."
B2/B2 adjust - приспосабливаться, C2/C1 amend(ment), C1/C1 modification, C1/B2 alteration, B2/B2 adapt, suit to, see also: accommodate, tailor: To adapt means to change in order to deal with a new situation or addition. "When he went to the new town, he had to adapt to all the weather changes."
B2/B2 adjust - регулировать, подстраивать, C2/C1 amend, C1/B2 modify, B2/B2 alter, B2/B2 edit, B2/B1 revise, A2/A1 change, tune, mutation, see also: swing:
        To adjust something means to change it so it is better. "He adjusted the old guitar to make it sound better."
        To amend something means to change it to improve or make it accurate. "The countries were in agreement that the treaty needed to be amended."
        To modify something is to change it a little bit. "I modified my outfit by adding a belt to it."
        To alter something means to make a small change to it. "I altered the color of my nails to match my hair."
        To edit means to correct a piece of writing so that it is suitable to be published. "She asked her brother to edit her paper before she submitted it to her teacher."
        To revise something means to change or update it to make it better. "When the editor discovered certain facts were wrong, he revised the book."
      adjust - поправить (to arrange your clothing to make yourself look tidy): "She adjusted her skirt, took a deep breath, and walked into the room.", "He smoothed his hair and adjusted his tie."
C1/C1 adjustment, C1/C1 adaptation
--/C1 administer - управлять (UK also administrate), C2/B2 administration, administrative, administrator, see also: rule, monitor
        To administer means to take responsibility for organizing something. "The teacher’s assistant will administer the test."
        An administration is the group of people who manage a company or organization. "She hoped she could be promoted to a job in the administration."
        An administrator is a person who controls a business, company, or organization. "Everyone in the store did whatever the administrator asked them to do."
        administrative describes anything related to managing a company or organization. "I work as an administrative assistant to the owner of the company."
--/C1 administer - вершить (to make sure that something is done fairly and in the correct way): "to administer justice/the law"
--/C1 administer (formal) - проводить, применять, налагать, оказывать (to give or to provide something, especially in a formal way): "The teacher has the authority to administer punishment." "A taxi driver administered first aid to the victims." "The priest was called to administer the last rites."
--/C1 administer (formal) - давать, вводить и т.д. лекарство, препарат, яд и т.д.: "Police believe his wife could not have administered the poison." "The dose was administered to the child intravenously."
      administer - наносить, see also: inflict: "He administered a severe blow to his opponent's head."
C2/C1 adolescent, A2/A1 teenager; C1/C1 youngster, minor, tween (between 10 and 12): An adolescent is a young person or a teenager. "The adolescent was excited about getting a skateboard for his birthday.fv"
B2/C1 adoption
C2/C1 advocate (advocacy), C2/C1 ally, B2/B1 support(er), champion, C2/-- protagonist, see also: agree; proponent, see also: constituency / B2/B2 opponent, C1/B2 rival (unrivalled - непревзойдённый, rivalry - соперничество), B1/B1 competitor, --/C1 contender, B2/B1 enemy (enmity – вражда, ненависть: "He had earned their lasting enmity.", see also: hatred), B2/B1 candidate, claimer, antagonist, challenger, foe:
        To advocate a plan or idea is to support or suggest it in public. "The group advocated increased spending on education and schools."
        advocacy is the act of supporting or recommending something. "Janine’s strong advocacy for the event made people want to attend."
        An ally is someone who agrees to help or support you. "I was happy to find many allies who shared the same opinion as me."
        To support something is to like it and help it be successful. "Everyone at work supports the new plan."
        A proponent is a person who supports an idea or a plan. "He was a proponent of using environmentally friendly products."
        An opponent is someone who fights against you. "On the field, our opponents were too good for us."
        A rival is someone that is trying to keep you from getting what you want. "The three rivals were all competing for the same job."
        A foe is an enemy or opponent. "It was hard to believe that anyone could be his foe."
        An enemy is a country that is fighting another country during a war. "The enemy prepared to attack the kingdom."
        A candidate is a person who is competing to win something such as a job. "Alice is the best candidate for the job."
--/C1 aesthetic (US also esthetic): If something is aesthetic, then it is concerned with a love of beauty. "The dresses were noteworthy for their aesthetic design."
C1/B2 agency (relief agency - гуманитарная организация), social services - социльные службы (a system that is organized by the local government to help people who have financial or family problems: "the local social services department", "a leaflet on the range of social services available"):
        An agency is a business or service set up to act for others. "I went to a travel agency to help me arrange a flight home."
--/C1 agricultural, agrarian; B2/B2 agriculture; B2/-- gardening, horticulture: agriculture is the growing of food and animals. "The farmer studied agriculture in college."
C2/A1 agree, concur, subscribe to sth (formal) = believe in sth, see also: concede, advocate, resign oneself to sth:
        To agree is to say “yes” or to think the same way. "The food is very good in that restaurant. B: I agree with you."
        To subscribe to something is to agree or to concur with it. "She subscribed to the view that musical education should be kept in schools."
C2/A1 agree, C2/B2 match(ing) (see also: complement), B2/C1 correspond(ing), tally, cohere (formal) - согласоваться (cause to form a united, orderly, and consistent whole: "Two antagonistic values may cohere in the same object."), see also: respective, bring sb/sth, come, get, fall, etc. into line (with sb/sth):
		To match is to be the same or similar. "The two shoes matched. They looked the same."
        To correspond is to match or to be similar to something. "The boy’s story didn’t correspond with his mother’s version."
C2/B1 ahead - впереди (= лучше)
B1/B1 ahead - впереди, перед, in front of: If something is ahead of something else, it is in front of it. "The blue car drove an ahead of us."
--/B1 ahead - заранее, beforehand, in advance / A2/B2 afterwards (US usually afterward), after, later, see also: since, thereafter, subsequent(ly): If something is done beforehand, then it is done in advance. "He packed his luggage beforehand, so he was able to leave right away."
C1/C1 aid(e), B1/B1 assist: To aid someone is to help them when they need something. "The doctor aided the boy after his accident."
                            To assist someone is to help them. "Andrew assisted me with my homework."
C1/C1 alert - TODO, C1/-- beware, B1/B1 warn: To alert someone is to tell or warn them about something. "The fire alarm alerted us that there was a problem."
                                       		  To beware means to be careful of something or someone that is dangerous. "You should beware of driving fast on wet roads."
                                       		  To warn someone is to make them know of possible danger in the future. "The lifeguard warned people to stay away from the rough ocean."
C1/C1 alert - бдительный, настороженный, watchful, vigilant (vigil - бдение): A vigil is a period of watchful attention at night for a specific purpose. "He had a vigil in front of the tomb for three days."
--/C1 alien
--/C1 align(ment)
TODO align - привести в соответствие, see also: bring somebody/something into line (with somebody/something)
C2/A2 alive: If someone or something is alive, they are not dead. "My grandparents are still alive even though they are over 90."
C2/C1 allege(-ation, dly), see also: testify, plead, state: To allege something is to say that it is true without offering proof. "The little girl had alleged that her older brother hid her favorite doll."
C2/C1 alliance, --/C1 coalition, league: An alliance is a group of people who work together. "The junior executives formed an alliance with each other."
								 		 A coalition is a group of people or organizations working for a common purpose. "The companies formed a coalition to make trade less expensive."
C1/C1 allocate(-ion), allot(ment), apportion(ment), dispense(r), B2/B2 distribute (hand sth <-> out; handout - раздаточный материал; подачка, милосытня), B2 put sth <-> aside - откладывать:
		To allocate something means to put it aside for a certain purpose or person. "The government allocated $100 million to aid the disaster relief effort."
        To allot something means to give it to someone. "The coach allotted each team five minutes to prepare a strategy."
        To distribute something is to give it to a number of people. "The teacher distributed crayons and markers to his students."
C1/C1 allowance
C2/A2 alone: If someone is alone, they are not with another person. "The boy wanted to be alone to think."
C1/B2 alongside - рядом, see also: close
        If something is alongside another thing, then it is next to it. "We work alongside each other in the office."
      alongside - наряду, togeter with, see also: on a level/par with sb/sth: "I find it difficult to cope with this illness alongside all my other problems."
C1/-- alternate - чередовать: To alternate means to switch back and forth between two things. "The best exercise alternates muscle and heart strengthening."
B2/B1 alternative, B1/A2 option; B2/B1 alternatively, A2/A2 instead, B2 in place of sb/sth: An alternative is something that you can choose instead of your first choice. "Her first plan to make extra money seemed weak, so she chose an alternative."
                                                                                            An option is a choice between two or more things. "The children were given the option of three houses to pick from."
                                                                                            instead means in place of. "He ate the carrot instead of the ice cream."
B2/C1 aluminium, С2/B1 tin - олово (pewter - оловянный), B2/С1 copper - медь, B1/B1 iron, B1/A2 metal, B2/B2 steel, zinc, brass - латунь, nickel - никель, tungsten - вольфрам, sodium - натрий, mercury - ртуть, chlorine - хлор:
        tin is a cheap white metal. "Soup is a common food that is often sold in tin cans."
        copper is a red-brown metal often used in electric wire and pipes. "Ancient hunters melted copper to make knives and spears."
        iron is a strong metal that is used to make many objects. "The horse had shoes made of iron."
        metal is a strong material people use to build things. "Steel is a common metal that is used to build buildings."
        steel is a shiny gray metal. "The new apartment building was made with steel."
        brass is a metal that is used to make musical instruments and ornaments. "brass is used to make musical instruments like trumpets."
        sodium is an element that can be used to make substances such as salt. "sodium and chloride combine to make table salt."
B2/C1 ambassador (B1/C1 embassy - посольство, consulate - консульство), B2/C1 diplomat:
		An ambassador is a government worker who works in another country. "The ambassador from Korea was in charge of the conference."
        An embassy is where government officials work in a foreign country. "If you lose your passport, you should contact the embassy."
        A diplomat is a representative of a country who works with another country. "The Spanish diplomat discussed trade issues with officials in Peru."
C2/-- ambiguous(ly) - неоднозначный, двусмысленный (that can be understood in more than one way; having different meanings), ambivalent, equivocal(formal), see also: circumlocutory / unambiguous, unequivocal (formal) - однозначный, недвусмысленный (clear in meaning; that can only be understood in one way), see also: lucid, clear
C1/C1 amid, C1/A2 among: If something is amid something else, then it is in the middle of it. "The bee was busily flying amid the flowers in the garden."
                         If you are among certain things, they are all around you. "There was a red apple among green ones."
C1/-- analytical(ly) (formal analytic, UK), B2/B1 analysis: If something is analytic, it is related to logic and reasoning. "The analytic article criticized the new plan and presented one of its own."
C2/C1 analogy(-ous), B1/C1 alike, B1/A1 similar (B2/B1 similarity, C1/B1 similarly, C2/B2 likewise - аналогично: так же (formal); тоже (formal); така же фигня (informal)), homogeneous (однородный), see also: equivalent / B2/B2 diverse (C1/B2 diversity), A1/A2 different(ly), B2/B2 differ, A2/B1 various (B1/B1 variety, B2/B2 vary), variant, B1/-- dissimilar, heterogeneous (неоднородный), disparate (formal: несравнимый, разрозренный, разнородный), miscellaneous:
        An analogy is a connection made between things to show that they are similar. "The doctor made an analogy between the human heart and a water pump."
        If something is analogous to another thing, then it is like it in certain ways. "The relationship with his teacher was analogous to that of a son and mother."
        If two things or people are alike, they are similar in some way. "People often think my sister and I look alike."
        If someone does something likewise, they do the same thing as someone else. "If Joe is staying away from school to go swimming, I want to do likewise."
        If something is homogeneous, it is made up of things which are all the same. "All of the houses on Victor’s block were boring and homogeneous."
        When a group of things is diverse, it is made up of a wide variety of things. "Big cities have diverse populations with people of different races and ages."
        different describes someone or something that is not the same as others. "Each of my sisters has a different hair style from one another."
        If something is various, there are many types of it. "She owned shoes of various styles."
        A variety of something is a group of many different kinds of it. "There are a variety of flowers at the shop."
        To differ is to not be the same as another person or thing. "I differ from my brother: he is short, while I am tall."
        To vary means to be different from another thing in size or amount. "The heights of the people in my class vary by a large amount."
C2/C1 anchor: An anchor is a heavy object dropped from a boat to make it stay in one place. "When the ship reached its destination, the crew dropped the anchor."
B1/C1 angel
C1/B2 angle - угол между прямыми, --/C1 sphere, hemisphere - полушарие (в т.ч. планеты, мозга и т.д.), prism, cylinder, pyramid, rectangle, cube, oval, shape, see also: globe:
		A sphere is a three-dimensional round shape, like a ball. "The balloons were inflated into a variety of colorful spheres."
		A hemisphere is one half of the earth. "In the northern hemisphere, the weather is usually warmest in July and August."
		A cube is a solid object with six square surfaces that are all the same size. "Please get me some ice cubes to put in my soda."
		A shape is a simple form like a square or circle. "The triangle is my favorite shape."
C1/B2 angle - угол обзора, --/C1 viewpoint (US overlook): An angle is the direction from which you look at something. "The giraffe turned its head to see from another angle."
TODO angle
C2/C1 anonymous
C1/B2 anticipate(d), B2/A2 expect(ed(ly)), C1/-- foresee, --/C1 await, B2/A2 wait, see also: envisage / C1/-- unforeseen, unanticipated, B2/B2 unexpected(ly), B1/A2 predict; B2/B2 predictable / B2/-- unpredictable(-ly, unpredictability), see also: serendipitous:
        To anticipate something is to think that it will happen. "Carrie anticipated the arrival of her baby."
        If you expect something to happen, you believe it will happen. "I expect the bus to be here very soon."
        To foresee something is to know about it before it happens. "The teacher didn’t foresee any problems with her large class."
        To await something means to wait for it. "The players awaited the judge’s decision."
        To predict something is to say that it will happen. "She predicted that I would get married next year."
C1/B2 anticipate, forestall, B1/A2 prevent(able)
C2/-- apologetic (B1/B2 apology, see also: guilty) - извиняющийся; B1/B2 forgive - прощать: To forgive someone is to stop being angry with them. "Sandra forgave Peter after he said he was sorry."
        If someone is apologetic, they are sorry about something. "The boy felt apologetic after losing his sister’s favorite toy."
        An apology is something someone says to show that they are sorry. "After arguing with her teacher, the girl wrote the teacher an apology."
C1/C1 appeal(ing), B1/B1 attract(ive) / C2/-- disgust(ing(ly), ed(ly)), averse(-ion), distaste, antipathy, unappealing, repel (often figurative), repulse (often physical), gross (informal), see also: foul:
        To appeal to someone is to be interesting or attractive to them. "Sleeping all day appeals to me, but I have to go to school."
        To attract means to make a person or thing come closer or be interested. "The magnet attracted the metal."
        disgust is a feeling of distaste and anger caused by something rude or unpleasant. "He felt disgust toward his date because she had such terrible eating habits."
        If something is gross, then it is disgusting. "The food was so gross that the dog couldn’t eat it without feeling sick."
C2/C1 appetite (appetising (US: appetizing) / unappetising), zest - пикантность, изюминка; вкус, интерес, запал, энергия
        Your appetite is your hunger for food. "Tom has a big appetite. He eats all the time."
        When food is appetizing, it looks and smells very good. "The appetizing plate of cookies was gone in half an hour."
C1/-- appliance, --/C1 apparatus, B2/A2 device, C1/B2 mechanism (как в машинах, так и у живых), contraption, gadget, widget (informal) - штуковина:
        An appliance is a piece of equipment used for jobs in the home. "Many homes have appliances like ovens, toasters and refrigerators."
        An apparatus is a device used for a particular purpose. "The campers had an apparatus that showed them their exact location."
        A device is an object or a machine. "A thermometer is a device that tells temperature."
        A mechanism is a part of a machine that performs a certain function. "I can’t open my car door because the locking mechanism is broke."
--/C1 applicable
C1/B2 apply - применять, использовать, use (see also: employ), --/C1 exert (sth) = to use power or influence to affect sb/sth, exertion, see also: put your foot down: "The moon exerts a force on the earth that causes the tides.", "He exerted all his authority to make them accept the plan."
B2/B2 apply - применяться, относиться (be relevant)
      apply - прикладывать (давление и т.д.)
B1/A2 apply - обратиться, подать заявление (--/B2 applicant): An applicant is someone who writes a request to be considered for a job or prize. "Lots of applicants came into the store when the job position became available."
--/B2 apply - наносить (клей, краску, крем, макияж и т.д.): To apply something means to put it on. "She always applies makeup to her face before going outside."
C2/-- apply yourself = work hard (see also strive)
      arc: An arc is a curved shape. "A rainbow has the shape of an arc."
C2/-- arch - изгибать(ся), B2/B1 bend, B2/B2 curve, bow, warp, see also: distort, winding: An arch is a curved opening formed under a structure such as a bridge or doorway. "The arch of the bridge was not high enough for the tall boat to pass underneath."
                                                                                           To bend is to move something so it is not straight. "Lee bend(d)t over and picked up the paper on the ground."
                                                                                           To curve is to move in a line that bends and does not go straight. "The road curves to the left and to the right."
                                                                                           To warp means to become bent into the wrong shape. "The woman put the clock above the fireplace, and the heat warped it."
      arch - нависать, склоняться
C2/-- arch - арка, свод, дуга; spiral (death/downward spiral), helix, coil, reel (UK) = spool (US) - катушка, моток; --/C1 loop - петля:
		A spiral is a shape which winds round and round in a larger and larger circle. "A strand of DNA looks like two interlocking spirals."
        A loop is a line made into shape of a circle. "He made a loop with the rope and placed it over the post."
      arch - подъём ноги
      arch(ly) - самодовольный
B1/C1 architect(ure(-al)): An architect is a person who designs buildings. "The plans for building the new home were drawn by a famous architect."
                           architecture is the style or way a building is made. "The architecture of the church is amazing."
--/C1 archive(-al)
--/C1 arena, B2/B1 stadium, rink: An arena is a building where people can watch sports and concerts. "The new arena was all set to hold the championship match."
--/C1 arguable(-y) - спорный; возможный
C2/-- arid, C2/B2 drought: If a place is arid, then it is hot and dry and gets very little or no rain. "Not many plants grow in the arid desert."
                           A drought is a long period of time in which little or no rain falls. "After three months of drought, the vegetation and trees started dying."
C1/B2 arise, C2/C1 originate: To arise is to happen. "Difficulties arose with his computer because it was old."
C2/C1 arm / disarm
??/?? arm, B2/B1 weapon, sword, spear: A weapon is an object that can be used to hurt people. "Swords have been used as weapons for thousands of years."
                                       A sword is a long sharp weapon. "They used to use swords in battles in ancient times."
                                       A spear is a long stick with a blade on one end that is used as a weapon. "The soldier was holding a spear in his hand."
TODO arm
B2/B2 armed (B2 armed to the teeth) / unarmed: If you are armed, you are carrying a weapon. "The robber was armed with a gun."
C2/-- arouse
--/C1 array
--/C1 articulate - (formal) разъяснить, сформулировать, выразить (to express or explain your thoughts or feelings clearly in words: "She struggled to articulate her thoughts.", "It is the school’s duty to articulate its practices to parents.", "I found myself unable to articulate my feelings.", "Many people are opposed to the new law, but have had no opportunity to articulate their opposition."), see also: formulate, elaborate, express, enunciate
--/C1 articulate - (formal) произносить (ясно/отчётливо), выговорить, проговаривать (to speak, pronounce or play something in a clear way: "Every note was carefully articulated.", "He was too drunk to articulate properly.", "She spoke slowly, articulating each word clearly.", "When children first learn to talk, there are some sounds that they find difficult to articulate."), see also: enunciate
      articulate - соединяться, сочленяться, учитывать, иметь связь (to be related to something so that together the two parts form a whole: "These courses are designed to articulate with university degrees.")
      articulate - соединять(ся), сочленять(ся) ((specialist) to be joined to sth else by a joint, so that movement is possible; to join sth in this way: "bones that articulate with others", "a robot with articulated limbs")
      articulate - разборчивый, членораздельный ((of speech) clearly expressed or pronounced: "She gave a witty, entertaining, and articulate speech.", "All we could hear were loud sobs, but no articulate words."), see also: legible / inarticulate - невнятный ((of speech) not using clear words; not expressed clearly: "an inarticulate reply"), incoherent, see also: vague, unintelligible
      articulate - красноречивый ((of a person) good at expressing ideas or feelings clearly in words: "an intelligent and highly articulate young woman", "He was unusually articulate for a ten-year-old.", "She is the most articulate critic of government policy.", "The teachers help the children to be more articulate about their strengths and weaknesses."), see also: eloquent / inarticulate - некрасноречивый (​(of people) not able to express ideas or feelings clearly or easily)
      articulately - чётко, внятно, членораздельно (in a way that expresses thoughts and feelings easily and clearly: "He spoke articulately about each of the paintings.", "They were able to clearly and articulately address the issues.") / inarticulately
      articulateness (also articulacy, UK) - красноречие, выразительность (the ability to express thoughts and feelings easily and clearly: "I was impressed with the articulateness of the speakers.", "The governor has never lacked vision or articulateness.") / inarticulacy (also inarticulateness, UK) - невнятность (the state of being unable to express feelings or ideas clearly, or of being expressed in a way that is difficult to understand: "His inarticulacy is taken for stupidity.", "Some people believe this inarticulacy is intentional.")
C2/B2 artificial(ly, ity), synthetic, factitious (formal) - искусственный, надуманный (artificial rather than natural: "The excitement was largely factitious and confined to the media."), see also: contrived:
		If something is artificial, it is made to look like something natural. "That soccer field has artificial grass, but it looks real."
        If something is synthetic, then it is made to be like something natural. "Clothing made out of synthetic fabrics is very effective at keeping people warm."
--/C1 ash - пепел, B1/B1 dust, B1/B1 powder, soot - сажа: ash is the grey or black powder created when something is burned. "The end of his cigar was full of ashs."
                                                          dust is very tiny pieces of dirt or other matter. "In the old house, the dust was thick on the floor and chairs."
B2/C1 aside (from) - кроме, B2/B1 apart (from); A2/B1 except (for), B2/B2 exception: When people or things are apart, they are not close together. "The couple decided to live apart from each other."
                                                                    				 You use except to talk about the only thing that a statement does not apply to. "Everyone had fun on the trip except Jim, who felt ill the whole time."
																					 An exception is someone or something not conforming to a rule. "Most students thought the test was hard, but Tim was the exception."
B2/B2 aside, C2/-- sideways: If someone stands aside, they are on or to one side. "The man stood aside and opened the door for me."
                             If something moves sideways, then it moves to or from the side. "Jim turned sideways in order to slow down and stop his snowboard."
B2/B2 (put/set sth) aside - откладывать, копить
--/C1 assassin(ate, ation)
C1/B2 asset - актив, ценность, имущество
C1/B2 asset - ценное качество, преимущество, B2/B1 benefit, B1/A2 advantage, avail - польза (see also: use(ful), utility), see also: virtue / C1/-- liability (see also: trial, nuisance), C1/-- drawback, B1/B1 disadvantage; C2 at a disadvantage:
       An asset is a skill or quality that is useful or valuable. "The coach realized the boy’s speed was an asset to the team."
       A benefit is a good thing. "Being able to fly is a good benefit to birds."
       An advantage is something that helps you. "Being tall is an advantage to a basketball player."
       avail is help. It is often used in the achievement of a goal. "His studying was to no avail because he failed the test."
       A drawback is a disadvantage. "The drawback of having a car is that it is very expensive to maintain."
       A disadvantage is a situation where someone is likely to lose. "Mike had a disadvantage in the race since he hurt his knee."
C1/B2 associate(d, -ion), see also: connect: To associate means to connect something with a person or thing. "Most people associate birthday parties with having fun."
C2/-- associate (with sb), B2/B2 mix (with sb), B2/-- socialize (with sb) - общаться, { C1/-- mingle, circulate } - тусить, общаться с разными людьми на мероприятии, see also: engage (with sb/sth)
        To socialize is to have a good time with people. "I like to socialize with my classmates after school."
C2/B2 assume, C1/C1 suppose(d(ly)), C1/C1 presume, B2/C1 presumably = “by reasonable assumption”, suggest:
        To assume something is to think that it is true, even with no proof. "I assume you are both familiar with this plan."
        To presume is to believe something is true without being certain. "Since he raised his hand, the teacher presumed he knew the answer."
C1/B2 assumption, supposition, C1/-- presumption, preconception, --/C1 premise - предпосылка (a statement that is held to be true: "Success, real success, comes to the jack of all trades, a major premise handed down from pioneer days"):
		An assumption is something that you believe is true but cannot prove. "I went to the cafeteria on the assumption that everyone would be there."
		A premise is an idea on which something is based. "The premise of the movie that Bobbi and I watched was unrealistic."
C1/C1 assurance, B2/B2 insurance; B1/B2 assure, B2/B2 ensure, insure: To assure someone is to tell them something is true to make them less worried. "He assure the boss that the building would be done on time."
                                                                      To ensure is to make certain that something happens. "Eating good food ensures that we stay healthy."
--/C1 atrocity, C2/C1 outrage; C2/C1 massacre, C2/-- slaughter, carnage, bloodbath, bloodshed, bloodletting (также кровопускание), butchery; (US slaughterhouse, UK abattoir)
C1/C1 attendance, B1/A2 attend: To attend something is to go to it. "My sister and I attend the same school."
      attributable (to sth) - приписываемый, вызванный, связанный с (probably caused by the thing mentioned: "Their illnesses are attributable to a poor diet.", "Do you think that these higher-than-average temperatures are attributable to global warming?"), see also: ascribable
      attribution (of sth) (to sth) - приписывание (the act of saying or believing that sth is the result of a particular thing: "incorrect attribution of the cause of death"), see also: ascription
      attribution (of sth) (to sb) - приписывание (the act of saying or believing that sb is responsible for doing sth, especially for saying, writing or painting sth: "The attribution of this painting to Rembrandt has never been questioned.", The usual attribution of the work to Leonardo is now disputed by several experts.", "None of the texts contained author attributions." - ни один из этих текстов не содержал указаний на автора), see also: ascription
      attribution (of sth) (to sth) - приписывание (the act of regarding a quality or feature as belonging to sb/sth: "the attribution of human emotions to animals"), see also: ascription
      attribution - принятие, признание ("the attribution of legal responsiblity"), see also: ascription
C2/C1 attribute - атрибут, качество (a quality or characteristic that sb or sth has: "The most basic attribute of all animals is consciousness.", "Organizational ability is an essential attribute for a good manager.", "Patience is one of the most important attributes in a teacher."), see also: signature, strain
C2/C1 attribute (sth to sth) - приписывать (что-л. чему-л.), связывать (что-л. с чем-л.) (to say or believe that sth is the result of a particular thing: "She attributes her success to hard work and a little luck.", "The power failure was attributed to the recent storms and high winds."), see also: ascribe
C2/C1 attribute (sth to sb) - приписывать (что-л. кому-л.) (to say or believe that sb is responsible for doing sth, especially for saying, writing or painting something: "a quote that has often been falsely attributed to George Patton", "This play is usually attributed to Shakespeare."), see also: ascribe
C2/C1 attribute (sth to sth) - приписывать (что-л. чему-л.), связывать (что-л. с чем-л.) (to say or believe that sth is the result of a particular thing: "To what do you attribute this delay?", "The doctors have attributed the cause of the illness to an unknown virus.", "She attributes her success to hard work and a little luck.", "The power failure was attributed to the recent storms and high winds."), see also: ascribe
C2/C1 attribute (sth to sb) - (to regard a quality or feature as belonging to somebody/something: "Ancient peoples attributed magical properties to the stones.", "The goals commonly attributed to management are status, power, salary and security."), see also: ascribe
--/C1 attribute (sth) - принять, признать ("The committee refused to attribute blame without further information."), see also: ascribe
--/C1 audit (see also: review): To audit means to inspect financial records from a person or business. "The government usually audits companies that report lower than usual incomes."
C1/C1 authentic(ally), C1/B2 genuine(ly, ness), B2/B1 original(ly, ity), B2/A1 real(ly), B2/B2 actual(ly), B1/A1 true:
        When something is authentic, it is not false or a copy of the original. "We ate authentic Italian food on our vacation to Rome."
        When something is genuine, it is true or real. "After the painting was determined to be genuine, it sold for a million dollars."
        If something is original, it is the first one of that thing. "This is the original painting of the Mona Lisa."
        If something is real, it actually exists. "The handbag has a stamp on it, so it's real."
        actual means that something is real or true. "This is the actual sword that the King owned, not a fake one."
        actually means in fact or really. "My dad looks a little mean, but actually he's very kind."
C2/B1 authority: authority is the power that someone has because of their position. "The policeman has authority on the streets."
      authoritative, see also: definitive: If something is authoritative, it uses the best information available. "This book is an authoritative source on Ancient Egypt’s Queen Nefertiti."
--/C1 auto
B2/C1 availability, A2/A2 available: If something is available, it means you can get it. "There were many seats available in the room."
C2/-- awe - трепет, благоговение (a feeling of great respect sometimes mixed with fear or surprise: "awe and respect", "awe and wonder", "He speaks of her with awe.", "‘It's magnificent,’ she whispered in awe.", "As children we were rather in awe of our grandfather.", "I've always held musicians in awe.")
      awe - внушать трепет и благоговение (​to fill somebody with awe: "I was awed but not frightened by the huge gorilla.", "Her paintings have awed and amazed the public for half a century.", "The audience was awed into silence by her stunning performance.", "She seemed awed by the presence of so many famous people."), see also: stagger
      awed - поражённый, благоговейный (showing or feeling respect and slight fear; extremely impressed by somebody/something: "We watched in awed silence.", "'How does she manage to run so fast at her age?' he asked in awed tones."), see also: stun(ned)
C2/B2 awkward(ly, ness), B2/-- clumsy, C2/C1 embarrass(ment); B1/B1 embarrassed, B1/B1 embarrassing(ly), C1/B2 shame; B1/B2 ashamed / unashamed(ly), B2/-- disgrace(ful(ly), see also: infamy:
        If something is awkward, it is embarrassing and uncomfortable. "After dropping his coffee cup, Robbie felt awkward."
        If someone is clumsy, then they are awkward in handling things. "The businessman was clumsy and dropped his work files."
        To embarrass someone is to make them feel ashamed or foolish. "He was embarrassed when he couldn't remember her name."
        shame is a bad feeling about things you have done wrong. "The boy felt shame about misplacing his clothes."
        To be ashamed is to feel upset because you did something wrong or bad. "He was ashamed when he found out that I knew about his past."
        disgrace is a feeling of shame. "He felt a sense of disgrace after failing his big exam."
C2/-- back and forth, to and fro - туда-сюда: If something moves to and fro, it moves backward and forward or side to side. "Her long hair went to and fro as she swung on the swing."
C2/C1 backing
B2/C1 backup
C2/-- backward, retarded
C2/-- baggage - опыт (the beliefs and attitudes that somebody has as a result of their past experiences)
B1/-- baggage - багаж, A2/-- luggage: baggage is the set of bags that people take with them when they travel. "I'm taking several pieces of baggage with me on vacation."
--/C1 bail - залог (money that sb agrees to pay if a person accused of a crime does not appear at their trial. When bail has been arranged, the accused person is allowed to go free until the trial. "Can anyone put up bail for you?", "Her parents have agreed to put up/stand (US also post) (= pay) bail for her.", "She was released on £2 000 bail.", "Bail was set at $1 million.", "The judge granted/refused bail.", "Because of a previous conviction, the judge refused to grant bail (= allow the accused person to be released).", "He committed another offence while he was out on bail (= after bail had been agreed).", "He was released/remanded on bail (of $100,000)."), jump/skip bail - скрыться из под залога (to fail to appear at your trial after you have paid money to be allowed to go free until the trial: "He skipped bail and went on the run for two weeks."), see also: bond
      bail (UK also bale) - отпустить под залог (to release sb on bail: "He was bailed on a minor drugs charge.", "She was yesterday bailed for three weeks on drink-driving offences.", "He was bailed to appear in court on 15 March.")
      bail (UK also bale) - вычерпывать воду из лодки (to remove water from a boat using a container: "The boat's sinking! Start bailing quickly!", "The boat will sink unless we bail out.", "He had to stop rowing to bail water out of the boat.")
      bail out (UK also bale out) (of sth) - покинуть самолёт, катапультироваться (to jump out of a plane that is going to crash: "The pilot bailed out and parachuted into the sea.", "The plane's engine failed and the pilot was forced to bail out.")
      bail out (mainly US) - уйти, вырваться, выбраться (to escape from a situation that you no longer want to be involved in: "The actor has bailed out of the film after only three weeks' shooting.", "I'd understand if you wanted to bail out of this relationship.")
      bail out | bale sb <-> out (UK also bale out, bale sth <-> out) - внести залог за кого-л. (to pay somebody’s bail for them)
      bail sb/sth <-> out (of sth) (UK also bale sb/sth <-> out (of sth)) - выручить (to help a person or organization that is in difficulty, usually by giving or lending them money: "She keeps running up huge debts and asking friends to bail her out."), see also: rescue
      bailout - финансовая помощь (an act of giving money to a company, a foreign country, etc. that has very serious financial problems: "Three years of huge losses forced the bank to seek a government bailout.", The airline was saved by a government bailout.", "The administration assembled the $50 billion emergency bailout package to ease a financial crisis in Mexico."), see also: subsidy
--/C1 ballot
--/C1 banner
C1/-- bankrupt(-cy), see also: insolvent (-cy), go bust: If someone is bankrupt, then they are unable to pay their debts. "The store had few customers and soon went bankrupt."
      bankrupt (formal, disapproving) - несостоятельный, лишённый (not having any good qualities: "a government bankrupt of new ideas", "He believes that modern society is morally bankrupt."
      bankruptcy - банкротство (a situation in which a business or a person becomes bankrupt: "The company was forced into bankruptcy.", "The toll of bankruptcies was rising daily.", "There could be further bankruptcies among small farmers."), see also: insolvency
      bankruptcy - несостоятельность (the fact of good qualities being completely absent: "moral/political bankruptcy")
C2/C1 bare: When something is bare, it is plain. It has no covering. "He likes to walk around in his bare feet." - босой, босиком. "We took off our shoes and socks and walked barefoot along the beach."
С2/-- bark - орать (отрывисто выкрикивать приказы, вопросы и т.д.), B2/C1 yell, визжать, B1/B2 scream, screech, squeal (informal: настучать), see also: shrill:
        To yell is to say something very loudly. "The coach yelled at his team for their poor performance."
        To scream means to make a loud noise with your mouth. "The girl saw a spider and screamed."
B2/-- bark - лаять: When a dog barks, it makes a short, loud noise. "The dog barked loudly and frighteningly."
      bark - лай
      bark - кора дерева, crust - земная кора, корка хлеба/пирога/пиццы, корочка льда (crust(ed) - застывать в виде корки или покрывать(ся) коркой), skin - кожица, rind - кожура, peel - кожура, zest - цедра, see also: husk:
        crust is the tough outer part of a loaf of bread. "The little boy never ate the crust of his pizza."
--/C1 barrel - бочка; дуло: A barrel is a round thing that you can keep liquids in. "There was an empty barrel outside the house."
C2/B1 base, A1/A2 bottom: The base is the bottom of something. "The base of the table has three legs."
						  The bottom is the lowest part. "The bottom of my shoe has a hole in it."
C1/B1 basis: To do something on time's basis is how often you do it. "My grandfather gets his hearing checked on a yearly basis."
--/C1 bass
B1/C1 bat
--/C1 battlefield
C1/-- beak, bill - клюв: A beak is the hard curved part of a bird's mouth. "The bird used her beak to dig a small hole in the ground."
--/C1 beast: A beast is a large, dangerous animal. "A lion is one of the fiercest beasts on Earth."
C1/B2 beat, C1/C1 pulse: A pulse is the beat of the heart. "The doctor checked the patient's pulse by feeling his wrist."
TODO (unite vs blend) C1/B2 beat, see also: stir, C2/C1 blend, C2/C1 merge, --/C1 whip, B2/B1 combine (see also: compile), B1/A1 join (see also: integrate, connect, bind), C2/-- mingle, A2/B1 mix, whisk, intermingle, conflate (see also: confluence), fuse (сплавлять(ся), сливать(ся)), weld ((с/при)варить; сплотить), B2/B2 melt, meld, amalgamate, coalesce (formal), bring sb/sth together, see also: scramble:
        To blend is to mix two or more things together so that they become one thing. "My wife blended together all of the ingredients to make a delicious stew."
        To merge two things is to combine them into one whole thing. "The storm clouds merged into one large menacing cloud that filled the sky."
        To combine is to join together to make a single thing or group. "Mina combined peanut butter and jelly to make a sandwich."
        A mix is different things put together. "The green mix we made in science class spilled onto the table."
        To melt means to turn from a solid to a liquid. "The snowman that we made yesterday melted in the sun."
TODO beat, see also: win

B2/C1 behalf: If something is done on one’s behalf, it is done for that person by another. "The original speaker was sick, so his son gave the speech on his behalf."
C1/A1 behind; B1/B2 beyond, C2/B1 above, B2/A1 over, overhead; B2/C1 beneath, B1/A1 below, B2/B2 under, B1/-- underneath:
        behind means to be at the back of something. "The little girl was hiding behind a tree."
        If A is beyond B, A is farther away. "John's house is beyond that lake."
        If something is above, it is at a higher level than something else. "He straightened the sign that was above the crowd."
		If something is overhead, it is located above you. "As we sat on top of the hill, a plane flew overhead."
        If something is beneath something else, it is under it. "The largest part of an iceberg lies beneath the waterline."
        When something is underneath something else, it is below or lower than it. "The roots of a tree are located underneath the ground."
--/C1 beloved, ??/?? valentine: When something is beloved, it is very special and you like it very much. "The boy took a nap next to his beloved cat."
								A valentine is someone you love or admire with great affection. "Harry wanted Molly to be his valentine."
B2/C1 bench, stool: A bench is a long seat for two or more people. "Most parks have benches for citizens to relax upon."
                    A stool is a seat with legs but no support for a person’s arms and back. "I don’t find stools very comfortable to sit on."
--/C1 benchmark
--/C1 beneficiary
B2/C1 betray(al, er), treachery (formal), traitor - предатель, изменник, treason - (госудаственная) измена, traitorous (formal disapproving):
		To betray someone means to treat them in a dishonest way. "The man betrayed his country when he gave away national secrets."
        treachery is a behavior in which a person betrays a country or a person. "The man ran away to escape from the treachery of his wife."
C2/B2 bid, see also: attempt, foray: A bid to do something is an attempt to do it. "He made a bid to become the university’s next president."
TODO bid
C1/-- bilingual, trilingual, multilingual, monolingual; linguist(ic), A1/A1 dictionary, Mandarin, see also: dialect:
        If someone is bilingual, then they can speak two languages. "Since you already know English, after learning French you’ll be bilingual."
        A linguist is someone who studies languages. "Tony is a good linguist and speaks four different languages."
        If someone is monolingual, then they speak only one language. "In today’s global economy, being monolingual limits your opportunities."
        If something is linguistic, then it is concerned with language. "A linguistic way of studying culture focuses on words within that culture."
		If someone is fluent in a language, then they are able to speak it very well. "She was so fluent in German that you’d have thought she was from Germany."
		A dictionary is a book that tells you what words mean. "I use the dictionary to learn new words."
        Mandarin is one of the two main Chinese languages. "Although John’s parents both spoke Mandarin, he could only speak English."
C2/C1 bind, see also: connect, join, integrate: To bind is to bring people together. "The victims of the flood were bound by their need to help each other."
B1/C1 biography; autobiography; life history; life story: A biography is an account of someone’s life that is written by someone else. "We read a biography about Charles Darwin in science class."
                                                          An autobiography is a true story of a person’s life written by that person. "I read an autobiography about my favorite entertainer."
--/C1 bishop
B2/C1 blade
C2/-- bland(ly, ness) - пресный, anodyne (formal)
      bland(ly, ness) - невзрачный, see also: hollow
B1/A2 blank - пустой, чистый (see also: empty), see also: a blank canvas/slate: When something is blank, it does not have anything on it. "She got a blank paper to draw on."
C2/-- blank - пустой, застывший, неподвижный, ничего не выражающий, see also: vacant: "a blank stare/expression", "blank incomprehension", "I asked several people about it and just got blank stares in return.", "Steve looked blank and said he had no idea what I was talking about."
      blank - полный, абсолютный, see also: utter, sound
--/A2 blank - пустое поле формы (документа): "If you can't answer the question, leave a blank."
      blank - пустота, пробел (an absence of information, memories, ideas, facts, etc.), see also: draw a blank: "The shock has left a few blanks in his memory.", "When he asked me the question my mind was a blank."
      blank - холостой патрон (also blank cartridge): "The troops fired blanks in the air."
      blank out - опустеть (to suddenly become empty): "The screen blanked out."
      blank sth <-> out - скрыть, затереть (​to cover sth completely so that it cannot be seen): "All the names in the letter had been blanked out."
      blank sth <-> out - вычеркнуть из памяти (​to deliberately forget something unpleasant), see also: wipe, blot sth <-> out: "She had tried to blank out the whole experience.", "There may be a traumatic incident in your past that you have blanked out."
B1/C1 bleed: To bleed is to lose blood. "If you are not careful, you will cut your finger and bleed."
--/C1 bless(ing): To bless is to ask God for protection or help. "The angel blessed the newborn baby to keep it safe."
C2/B1 block; blockage: A block is a solid piece of wood, stone or ice. "I saw a block of ice on the floor."
C2/B2 blow, see also: waft: To blow means to move air or move something through the air, as in the wind. "The wind is blowing very hard today. We should stay inside."
C1/B2 board - совет, правление, B2/B2 council, B2/B2 committee: A council is a group of people who run a city or town. "The council met to discuss the new laws for the city."
																A committee is a group of people who meet together to make decisions. "The school's committee agreed on a new dress code for students."
C2/C1 boast - может похвастаться (to have or own something to be proud of)
B2/C1 boast - хвастаться, crow (disapproving), brag (informal disapproving), flaunt (выставлять напоказ), B2 show off, see also: ostentatious:
        To boast is to talk about how good you are. "We all became tired of listening to him boast about himself all day."
        To brag means to talk of one's abilities or achievements in a proud way. "He had strong muscles and bragged about it to the entire class."
      boast - хвастовство
C2/-- bond - привязывать(ся) (to develop a close connection or strong relationship with someone, or to make someone do this: "The aim was to bond the group into a closely knit team.", "The hospital gives mothers no quiet private time in which to bond with their babies.", "Mothers who are depressed sometimes fail to bond with their children."), see also: connect
        To bond with someone is to become friends with them. "The women bonded after several hours of conversation."
      bond - приклеивать (to stick materials together, especially using glue, or to be stuck together like this: "This new glue bonds a variety of surfaces in seconds.", "This new adhesive can bond metal to glass.")
      bond - связывать(ся) (to hold atoms together in a molecule by a chemical bond, or to be held together like this: "The atoms bond together to form a molecule.", "One Br atom bonds to each carbon atom.", "Molecules of these compounds consist of atoms of different elements chemically bonded together.")
B2/B2 bond - связь, узы (a close connection joining two or more people: "the bond(s) of friendship/love", "the bond that links us", "In societies with strong family bonds (= relationships), people tend to live longer.", "the special bond between mother and child", "There has been a close bond between them ever since she saved him from drowning.", "A bond of friendship had been forged between them.", " The students formed strong bonds with each other."), see also: ties (TODO)
      bond - связь (the force holding atoms together in a molecule: "Carbon atoms can form bonds not only with themselves but with the atoms of oxygen and nitrogen.")
      bond - сцепление, место склейки (a place where single parts of sth are joined together, especially with glue, or the type of join made: "a strong/weak/permanent bond", "a firm bond between the two surfaces", "When the glue has set, the bond formed is watertight.")
      bond - обязательство, гарантия (a written agreement or promise: "They have entered into a solemn bond.", "You can believe me when I say I'll help you. My word is my bond. [=I always do what I promise to do]"), see also: guarantee, assurance (PROMISE), pledge, undertaking (PROMISE) formal, word (PROMISE), commitment, vow, oath (PROMISE), promise (SAY CERTAINLY)
      bond - облигация (an agreement by a government or a company to pay you interest on the money you have lent; a document containing this agreement: "government bonds", "I invested some money in savings bonds.")
      bond - залог (an amount of money that is paid to formally promise that someone accused of a crime and being kept in prison will appear for trial if released: "He was released on $5000 bond.", "The judge ordered that he post a $10000 bond pending his appeal of the verdict."), see also: bail
      bonds (literary) - узы, оковы (the ropes or chains keeping somebody prisoner; anything that stops you from being free to do what you want: "to release somebody from their bonds", "the bonds of oppression/injustice", "Loose his bonds and set him free.")
B2/C1 bonus
C1/A2 borrow, C1/B2 loan, mortgage, collateral, B2/B2 debt (indebted) - долг, liabilities - финансовые обязательства, see also: lend:
		To borrow something is to take it and then give it back later. "Can I borrow a pencil to use today? I'll give it back to you tomorrow."
        To lend something is to give it to someone for a short time. "My sister lost her pen, so I will lend her mine."
        A loan is the act of lending something, usually money. "I got a loan from the bank."
        A mortgage is a loan for property, especially homes and businesses. "When they bought their new home, the married couple had to sign a mortgage."
		A debt is an amount of money that a person owes. "I have not paid my gas bill. I owe a debt to the gas company."
C2/C1 bounce, rebound, ricochet: To bounce is to move something up and away from a surface after hitting it. "Owen bounced the ball on the ground."
C1/C1 boundary, C2/-- frontier, B1/B2 border: A boundary is the line where one area of land stops, and another begins. "This fence shows the boundary between our yard and yours."
											  A frontier is a border between two regions or countries. "A fence was built along the frontier where the river curved."
B2/B2 bound (for sth / to do sth) - склонный, обречённый (certain or extremely likely to happen), see also: liable, likely
--/B2 bound (with rope, cord, string, etc.) - связанный, привязанный
--/C1 bound (by law, duty or a particular situation) - связан: "We are not bound by the decision.", "You are bound by the contract to pay before the end of the month."
C1/-- bound (for sth) - направляющийся: "a plane bound for Dublin" "homeward bound (= going home)", "Paris-bound", "northbound/southbound/eastbound/westbound"
      bound - прыжок (see also: spring)
      bound - скакать, нестись большими прыжками (see also: spring)
      bounds - рамки, see also: scope, constrain(t)
--/C1 bow - поклон, curtsy (also curtsey) - реверанс
--/C1 bow (to/before, your head) - поклониться, curtsy (also curtsey) - присесть в реверансе
B2/-- bow - лук, crossbow; B2/B2 arrow: A bow is a weapon made of curved wood and string that shoots arrows. "He went hunting with a bow and arrow."
										An arrow is a thin, straight stick shot from a bow. "The arrow flew through the air and hit the target."
B2/-- bow - бантик, C2/-- knot - узел: A knot is made when you tie the ends of rope or cord together. "He tied a knot in his shoelaces, so they wouldn’t come off during the race."
C2/-- bow - смычок
B2/C1 breakdown - поломка, malfunction: A breakdown is a failure to work correctly. "Her car had a breakdown, and she wasn’t sure how to fix it."
B2/C1 breakdown - крах, срыв, провал (a failure of a relationship, discussion or system), downfall - крах, провал, see also: collapse: "marriage breakdown", "Both sides blamed each other for the breakdown of talks.", "The only ground for divorce is the irretrievable breakdown of the marriage.", see also: collapse, demise
C2/C1 breakdown - разбивка, детализация (detailed information that you get by studying a set of figures): "First, let's look at a breakdown of the costs.", "Please provide us with a breakdown of expenditure by department."
C2/-- breakdown - распад (a division of something into smaller parts), see also: decay (TODO), division (TODO): "the breakdown of proteins in the digestive system", "The rate of breakdown of muscle protein was assessed."
B2/-- breakdown (also nervous breakdown) - нервый срыв (a period of mental illness in which sb becomes very depressed, anxious and tired, and cannot deal with normal life): "He suffered a nervous breakdown in his twenties.", "She's still recovering from her breakdown."
B2/C1 breakthrough - прорыв (an important development that may lead to an agreement or achievement): "to make/achieve a breakthrough", "a significant breakthrough in negotiations", "a major breakthrough in cancer research", "Scientists are hoping for a breakthrough in the search for a cure for cancer."
C2/C1 breed: A breed is a group of animals within a species. "I like small dog breeds, such as terriers."
C2/A2 bridge: A bridge is something that is built over a river so people can cross it. "The old bridge fell into the river."
B2/C1 broadband
B2/C1 browse(r)
--/C1 buddy, A2/A2 guy: A guy is an informal way to call a man. "The guy at the flower shop was really helpful today."
--/C1 buffer
C1/C1 bulk(y), cumbersome, see also: clunky: The bulk of something is its great size. "The large elephant moved its bulk with legs as strong as tree trunks."
C1/-- bully: A bully is a person who is mean to others. "The two bullies always picked on the smaller, weaker kids."
C1/-- bump, B2/-- bruise: A bump is a small raised area on a surface. "The monkey got a bump on his head because he was hit by a rock."
                          A bruise is a dark mark caused by being hit by something. "She got a bruise on her knee from falling down."
C2/-- bundle (see also: bale), B1/B2 bunch, sheaf, --/C1 cluster (скопление); clump: A bunch is a group of the same things. "She was hungry, so she ate the entire bunch of grapes."
                                                                                     A bundle is a number of things that are tied together. "I was shocked when he showed me a bundle of money."
                                                                                     A cluster of things is a small group of them placed close together. "She held a large cluster of grapes in her hand."
C1/C1 burden - бремя, обуза (the burden of proof (law), beast of burden - вьючное животное):
      A burden is a serious or difficult responsibility. Something that is carried; a source of stress or worry. "Children who do not behave are a burden to their parents."
      burden - обременять, нагружать, oppress - подавлять, угнетать, гнести, weigh sb <-> down, persecute (see also: harass, abuse, pick on sb), weigh sb <-> down / unburden oneself to sb - излить душу кому-л.:
        To oppress someone means to rule over them in a cruel and unfair way. "Free speech had been oppressed in his country."
        To persecute means to treat someone badly. "Dan felt persecuted because he was smaller than the other boys at school."
      burdensome - обеременительный, taxing, onerous (formal), see also: arduous, demanding, heavy lifting
C2/C1 bureaucracy
C2/B1 bury: To bury someone or something means to put them in the ground. "They buried their grandfather under his favorite tree after he died."
C2/C1 burial
C2/-- buzz
C2/B2 cabin, B1/B1 cottage, B1/-- hut, shack, hovel, shanty - лачуга, lodge, tepee (also teepee) = wigwam:
		A cabin is a small house made of wood. "My grandfather owns a small cabin in the country."
        A cottage is a small, old house in the countryside. "My aunt lives in a pretty cottage in the mountains."
        A hut is a house made of wood, grass, or mud that has only one or two rooms. "We all went into the hut to sleep."
        A lodge is a house in the mountains, used by people who hunt or fish. "During our ski trip, we stayed at a lodge."
B2/C1 calculation
C1/B1 campaign, crusade
--/C1 canvas
C2/C1 capitalism (capitalist) / communism / socialism: capitalism is an economic system where private companies make goods for profit. "Most industries in the world today are based on capitalism."
                                                       A capitalist is a business person who invests in trade and industry for profit. "The capitalist invested in a factory that made wheat into cereal."
C1/B2 capture, B2/B2 trap, apprehend (apprehension), round sb <-> up: To capture someone or something is to catch them. "James tried to capture the bubbles in his hands."
                                                                      To trap people or animals is to capture them so they cannot get away. "We trapped butterflies in a net."
C2/C1 cargo, B2/B2 load, payload, shipment, consignment, freight: cargo is the items carried by a ship or airplane. "The cargo of the ship got wet when it started raining."
                                                                  To load is to put objects into something. "The man loaded the boxes into a truck."
                                                                  freight is a set of items carried on a train, boat, or airplane. "Trade ships only carried valuable freight like silk and spices."
C2/A2 care
TODO care - заботиться, tend (formal)
C2/-- carefree - беззаботный, nonchalant, insouciant (literary - беззаботный), happy-go-lucky (беззаботный), devil-may-care (бесшабашный)
C2/C1 carriage - экипаж, коляска: A carriage is a vehicle pulled by a horse. "We took a carriage ride in the park."
C1/C1 carriage (UK) - вагон (also coach) (US: car)
--/C1 casino
C2/B2 cast, C2/A2 throw: C2/C1 toss (see aslo: flip) hurl fling chuck lob bowl pitch (https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/hurl?q=hurl), sling-slung-slung:
        cast - the actors and actresses in a play, movie, or television show. To cast something means to throw it. "The fisherman cast his line into the water."
        To throw something is to use your hand to make it go through the air. "The pitcher can throw the baseball very fast."
        If you toss something, you throw it softly. "He tossed a coin into the air."
        hurl - to throw something/somebody violently in a particular direction (hurl abuse, insults, brickbat, etc. at sb - бросаться оскорблениями)
C2/B2 casual, C2/B2 plain(ly), B2/A2 simple, spare, --/C1 stark, austere,... :
		If something is casual, it is relaxed or simple. "You can wear casual clothes to the party like jeans."
        If something is simple, it is plain and not decorated. "He bought a pair of plain white shoes over the weekend."
TODO casual, C2/-- laid-back, B1/-- easy-going, see also: mellow, relaxed
C2/C1 casualty, B2/B1 victim: A casualty is a person killed or injured in a war or an accident. "The only casualty in the car accident was a woman who broke her arm."
                              A victim is a person that had something bad happen to them. "I was a victim of a robbery."
B2/C1 catalogue
C1/C1 cater sth - обслуживать, обеспечивать (мероприятие), готовить (для)
C1/-- cater for sth - удовлетворять, быть ориентированным на (нужды, потребности): "The class caters for all ability ranges.", "The club caters for children between the ages of four and twelve.", "Schools often fail to cater for the needs of gifted children."
      cater to sth - удовлетворять, обслуживать, обеспечивать, быть ориентированным на (нужды, потребности), see also: address, fulfil, tackle:
      	To cater to someone means to provide them with all the things needed or wanted. "Bill was too sick to get out of bed, so his nurse catered to his needs."
C1/-- cater to sth - удовлетворять, потакать (often disapproving): "Why should you cater to his every whim?", "This legislation simply caters to racism." "They only publish novels which cater to the mass market."
      catering, C1/-- self-catering - самообслуживание
C2/B2 catch
B1/C1 cattle, poultry: cattle are cows and bulls, especially on a farm. "The rancher's cattle were eating the grass in the field."
					   poultry is a bird, such as a chicken, that is used for meat and eggs. "He raises poultry and sells their meat for extra money."
B1/C1 cave - пещера (cavern, grotto, see also: cavity), burrow - нора, lair - логово, den - логово, берлога, hive - улей: A den is a living space for some types of animals, such as lions. "The mother lion left her babies in the den."
C2/B1 ceiling: The ceiling is the top of a room. "He painted the ceiling with a special roller."
C2/B2 challenge, B1/B2 contest, B1/B2 tournament - турнир, B1/B2 championship - чемпионат, see also: ordeal:
		A challenge is something difficult to complete. "It was a challenge to climb to the top of the mountain."
		A contest is a game or a race. To challenge. "The girls had a contest to see who could jump higher."
		A tournament is a competition, usually with many people participating. "My dad is playing in a golf tournament tomorrow."
--/C1 chamber: A chamber is an old word for a bedroom. "The girl was tired. She went to her chamber for a nap."
B2/C1 chaos (C1/-- chaotic(ally)), B2/B2 confusion (B2/B1 confused), C2/B2 disorder(ly) (see also: unruly), B2/B1 mess(y(-ly)), C2/-- turmoil (see also: crisis), tumult(uous) - смятение, суматоха (see also: uproar), {pandemonium, bedlam} = chaos, disarray (formal), tangle, see also: muddle, clutter:
        chaos is a situation that is confusing and not ordered. "His presentation was in chaos. I couldn’t understand what he meant."
        When something is chaotic, it is crazy, confused, and hectic. "The first day of school can be chaotic for a new student."
        disorder is a lack of order, or a complete mess. "The teacher's desk had many papers in disorder."
        A mess is a condition that is not clean or neat. "Heather's room was a complete mess."
        A tumult is a loud and confused noise made by a large crowd of people. "She couldn’t hear her friend over the tumult of the other excited guests."
C1/A1 changeable (2nd entry (TODO)), changing, mutable, inconstant (literary), unsteady(-ily), unstable, volatile, see also: fluid / changeless (literary), unchanging, immutable (formal), invariant (formal), C2/B2 constant (see also: eternal), ever-present, C1 never-ending, B2/C1 endless, ceaseless, incessant (usually disapproving) - непрекращающийся, unceasing, unremitting, perpetual, interminable
        When something is volatile, it is likely to change suddenly and unexpectedly. "The volatile volcano might explode at any moment."
        When an event or action is constant, it happens a lot or all the time. "The television at home is in constant use."
C2/B2 characteristic, B1/A2 typical (B2/B2 classic, C2/A2 classical), B1/B1 common(ly), B2/B2 general(ly), A2/A2 normal(ly), A2/A2 usual(ly), see also: accustom(ed), mainstream, staple / uncharacteristic, atypical, untypical:
        If something is typical, it is normal for a certain type of thing. "Barking is typical behavior for dogs."
        If something is classic, it is typical. "The athlete made a classic mistake - he started running too soon."
        If something is common, it happens often or there is much of it. "It is common for snow to fall in the winter."
B2/B2 charge - обвинить (официально, выдвинуть обвинания), bring/press/lay/prefer charges against sb, incriminate
      charge - обвинить (публично), C2/C1 accuse(d, -ation), C2/B2 blame, C2/B2 implicate:
        To accuse someone of something is to blame them for doing it. "She accused her brother of breaking her computer."
        To blame someone for something bad is to say they did it. "My mom blamed me for something I didn't do."
        To implicate someone is to show that they have done a crime or something bad. "The man was implicated in the theft at the store."
C1/B2 charge - обвинение (официальное)
--/B2 charge - обвинение (в чём-то плохом), C1/C1 allegation - (голосновное) обвинение, C1/C1 accusation
B1/B1 charge - взимать, устанавливать плату
B1/B1 charge - плата, C1/B2 price, see also: cost: A charge is the price to pay for something. "The charge for the shirts was $15.00."
												   The price of something is how much it costs. "What is the price of this item?"
B2/B1 charge - ответственность, B2/B1 responsibility, C1/-- liability
      charge - поручить (usually passive), C1/C1 appoint(ment), C2/B2 assign(ment), --/C1 designate; entrust, see also: commission, contract, employ, engage:
        To assign something to someone is to tell them to do it. "I assigned the worker an important task."
        To appoint someone to a job means to give the job to them. "Two students were appointed to help the scientists with their research."
      charge - задача, приказ, обязанность, B2/A2 task, errand - поручение, командировка: A task is a piece of work to be done that is usually difficult. "My task for the weekend was to clean the entire back yard."
                                                        								  A task is work that someone has to do. "Who has the task of building the brick wall?"
																						  An errand is a trip taken to do a specific activity. "He couldn’t go to practice because he had several errands to do."
      charge - заряд (explosive; "depth charge"), C2/C1 explosive, C1/B1 explosion, B1/B1 explode (C2/C1 explosive), C2/C1 burst (outburst - вспышка (эмоций / активности или явления), see also: flare-up, outbreak), --/C1 boom--, /C1 blast (see also: pop), gust; B2/-- bang (see also: smack), B2/C1 slam, ram, B2/-- bump, rupture - (раз/про)рыв (rupture yourself - надорваться):
        An explosion is a violent burst, usually with a loud sound. "A nuclear explosion can cause great damage."
        To burst is to suddenly break open or apart. "The bomb bursted over the city."
        When something explodes, it blows up. "My new radio exploded when I plugged it in."
        A blast is a loud noise made by something that explodes. "There was a loud blast when the police officer fired the gun."
        To boom means to make a loud, deep sound. "The firecrackers made a loud boom when they exploded."
        To bang is to hit something to make a noise. "The drummer banged on his drum as he marched in the parade."
        To slam is to close something hard. "She slammed the book shut after she finished reading it."
        To rupture means to tear or burst open. "Sarah put too much water into the balloon, and it ruptured."
      charge - заряд (emotional)
      charge - заряд (electricity: a positive/negative charge)
      charge - зарядка (процесс заряжания)
B2/B1 charge - заряжать (electricity)
      charge - зарядить (literary: with strong feeling or emotion, usually passive): "The room was charged with hatred."
      charge - рвануться, ринуться, броситься (The children charged down the stairs.), see also: race, zap
      charge - атаковать, рвануться, броситься
      charge - атака, рывок, бросок; C2/C1 assault, B1/A2 attack, B1/B2 strike, assail, offensive, see also: foray: To attack is to try to fight or to hurt. "The man with the sword attacked the other man first."
        {assault} physical (mostly), military, figurative: "Loud rock music assaulted our ears."
        {attack}  physical,          military, figurative: "a disease that attacks the brain" "The vines were attacked by mildew.",       by words: "a newspaper article attacking the England football manager"
        {assail}  physical (rarely),           figurative: "A vile smell assailed my nostrils." "to be assailed by worries/doubts/fears", by words: "He was assailed with insults and abuse as he left the court."
        assailant (formal), attacker, aggressor (assume violent attacks)
C2/C1 charm - амулет
--/C1 charter - хартия, указ, see also: proclaim, law, ordain
--/C1 charter - устав, constitution: A constitution is a document of principles for a government. "The country’s constitution said a prime minister could only serve three terms."
                                     A charter is a document that describes the rights of an organization or group. "The company charter explained that all employees had to pay a tax."
C2/B2 chase, C1/B2 pursue (C2/B2 pursuit), B2/C1 haunt (also: prey on sb’s mind), B1/B1 hunt, stalk, hound, harry - изводить, hassle - досаждать, besiege - досаждать, осадить, окружить, за#бать (harass, as with questions or requests: "He can't trot down the street without being besieged by paparazzi"), harass (see also: persecute, abuse):
		To chase someone or something is to follow them in order to catch them. "I was chased by an angry native."
        To pursue someone or something is to chase or follow them. "The mother pursued her young child down the hill."
        A pursuit is a chase. "The dinosaur was in pursuit of the caveman."
        To haunt is to cause problems or negative thoughts over a long period of time. "His thoughts about his scary dream haunted him for weeks."
        To hunt is to look for or search for an animal to kill. "Long ago, people hunted with bows and arrows."
        To harass someone means to annoy or trouble them. "The children harassed their mother because they wanted her attention."
C2/B2 cheer(ful(ly, ness))), B1/C1 encourage(ment, -ing(ly)), --/C1 foster, nurture - кормить (see also: nourish), взращивать, воспитывать, растить (see also: raise), buoy sb (up), buoyant - бодрый, оживлённый, в приподнятом настроении, excite(d), A2/B2 glad, B2/B2 delight(ed(ly)), B2/B2 joy(ful(ly, ness)), overjoyed, rejoice - радоваться, glee, C2/-- elated, hearty, ecstatic, enraptured, rapture(-ous(ly)), hearten(ed, ing), embolden (formal), merry, jolly, jovial, jocund (literary), festive, celebratory ("celebratory drink/dinner") / B2/B2 discourage(-ing(ly)), daunt(ing, less), dishearten, intimidate(d, -ing, -ion);
        To cheer is to give a loud shout of approval or encouragement. "The crowd all cheered when the home team won."
        To foster a feeling or a skill means to help it develop. "She helped foster a sense of calm in the little boy."
		To nurture something means to care for it as it grows or develops. "Robert nurtured his plants, and that is why they grow so well."
        To excite someone means to make them happy and interested. "I heard about the school dance on Friday. This excited me."
		If you are glad, you are happy. "I am glad you came to my party."
        joy is a feeling you get when you are really happy. "I love baseball. I feel joy when I play."
        delight is a feeling of being very happy with something. "He felt such delight after getting a promotion at work."
        If someone is overjoyed, then they are extremely happy. "He was overjoyed by the news of his promotion."
        If someone or something is hearty, then they are loud and happy. "The grandmother ended her story with a hearty laugh that pleased her grandchild."
        If someone is cheerful, they are happy or feel good. "The children were cheerful because they didn't have to go to school."
        If someone is merry, they are very happy. "They felt merry because the weather was great."
        When someone is jolly, they are cheerful and happy. "My grandmother’s jolly attitude always made me smile."
        When something is festive, it is happy and related to a party or celebration. "Dean’s favorite part of Christmas is the festive clothing that people wear."
        To discourage someone is to make them feel less excited about something. "Mr. Perry discouraged the students from quitting school."
        To intimidate means to frighten others. "My dad intimidates my friends whenever they visit."
      cheerless(ness), B2/C1 grief (grievous), C2/-- sorrow(ful(ly)), C2/B2 depress(ed, ing(ly)), C1/B2 low (SAD), B2/A1 down (UNHAPPY), B1/B2 miserable(-ly, -iness) (UNHAPPY), A1/A1 sad(ly, ness), A2/A2 unhappy(-ly, -iness), despondent(ly, -cy), devastated, heartbroken, B2/-- despair(ing(ly)), low-spirited, dejected(ly, dejection), dispirited, dolorous (literary), downcast (UNHAPPY), doleful(ly), downhearted, sullen, morose, gloomy, glum, mournful, C2 (down) in the dumps, C2 blue (informal), see also: frustrate(d, -ing, -ion)
        grief is the feeling of deep sadness, usually when a person dies. "The grief caused by losing her parents was very difficult for her."
        sorrow is a very sad feeling. "The girl felt sorrow after her best friend moved away."
        To depress someone is to make them sad. "The bad news from work depressed the man."
        If someone is miserable, they are very unhappy. "He was miserable after his dog died."
        despair is the complete loss of hope. "After the other company won the account, our salespeople were filled with despair."
C2/-- chill, B1/A1 cool, B2/B1 freeze, B2/-- frost(y, ily), frigid(ly, ity), refrigerate; hoar_frost; dew - роса:
		A chill is a feeling of cold. "The chill from the cold wind made Bill shiver."
        If the weather is cool, it is a little bit cold. "The weather is cool in the fall."
        To freeze is to become very cold. "If you don't wear your coat in winter, you will freeze."
        frost is a white layer of ice that forms during very cold weather. "In the morning, the trees were all covered with frost."
		When something is frigid, it is extremely cold. "We decided not to go on the hike because the weather was too frigid."
		To refrigerate something means to make it cold. "Grocery stores refrigerate fruit to make it last long."
        dew is the drops of water that form on the ground outside during the night. "When we woke up, we saw that the grass was covered in dew."
C1/-- cholesterol: cholesterol is a substance in fat, tissues, and blood of all animals. "When people have too much cholesterol, they are at a high risk for heart problems."
C1/-- chore, drudgery, grind (informal): A chore is a job that you have to do but don't like. "It's Nikki's chore to do the dishes every Tuesday and Wednesday night."
C2/C1 chronic(ally) / acute(ly, ness), exquisite(ly, ness): (especially of a disease) lasting for a long time; difficult to cure or get rid of. "chronic bronchitis/arthritis/asthma", "the country’s chronic unemployment problem", "a chronic shortage of housing in rural areas"
        When something is chronic, it happens over and over again over time. "He had chronic pain in his chest and needed to see a doctor."
C2/B2 circuit - (электрическая) цепь/схема: A circuit is a piece of an electronic device that allows electricity to flow. "Be very careful not to shock yourself when fixing an electrical circuit."
C2/B2 circuit - трасса, круг (вокруг чего-л.), путь по кругу
C2/B2 circuit - тур, цикл
      circuit - (LAW) судебный округ (a particular area containing different courts that a judge visits)
B2/-- circular - круглый, в форме круга
B2/-- circular - круговой, see also: rotary
С2/-- circular (circularity) - закольцованный, "порочный круг" ((of an argument or a theory) using an idea or a statement to prove something that is then used to prove the idea or statement at the beginning)
--/C1 circulate - циркулировать
--/C1 circulate - распространять, B2/B2 distribute, B2/B2 spread, disseminate, broadcast, propagate (formal: распространять(ся), размножать(ся)), proliferate(-ion), multiply - размножать(ся):
        To circulate something is to spread it quickly. "The fan helped to circulate cool air through the room."
        To spread is to move quickly to more places. "I like to spread butter on my toast."
        To disseminate information or knowledge means to distribute it. "The organization disseminates information about the dangers of smoking."
--/C1 civic - городской, C1/C1 municipal, B2/B2 urban, metropolitan - столичный, capital / B2/B2 rural, rustic, countrified (деревенский):
		If something is civic, then it is related to a town or city, especially its government. "Most of the important civic buildings are located downtown."
		When something is urban, it is related to the city. "Subways are an important form of urban transportation."
        If something is metropolitan, it relates to a large city. "All of the metropolitan excitement of New York City made Rufus nervous."
        A capital is an important city where a country's leaders live and work. "We will visit the capital to learn about our government."
		If a place is rural, it is in the countryside instead of the city. "I want to live in a small house in a rural area."
C2/C1 civilian, C1/B2 civil / B2/B2 military(-ly); C1/B2 the military, C2/A2 army: A civilian is someone who is not in the military. "It was Todd’s job to keep civilians from entering the army facility."
                                                                    			   When an event is civil, it happens inside a country. "The country was torn apart by a terrible civil war."
                                                                    			   The military is the armed forces of a country. "I joined the military after I finished high school."
                                                                    			   An army is a large group of people who fight in wars. "The army protects all the people in the country."
C2/-- clap - удар, грохот, раскат (грома), grumble - урчание (урчать) - в т.ч. о животе, ворчание (ворчать), рокот(ать); rumble - гул, раскат, рокот(ать), грохот(ать), громыхание (громыхать, греметь), ропот (figurative), smash (грохот, удар), clatter - грохот(ать), соударяться, din - грохот (informal: racket), --/C1 clash - звон металла, see also: rumble, whirr, roll, see also: murmur
        A din is loud, unpleasant, and extended noise. "The din of the rusty machinery made the factory a horrible place to work."
      clap - шлепок, хлопок, C2/-- slap - шлепок, хлопок, плесканье и т.д., spank, smack
      clap - шлёпнуть, хлопнуть, B2/C1 slap - шлёпнуть, хлопнуть (ладонью), spank, smack (see also: bang; crash; thump, pop):
        To slap someone means to hit them with the palm of the hand. "Out of anger, Helen slapped Eunice on the face."
      clap - хлопать, аплодировать, C2/C1 applaud(-se): To clap means to hit one’s hands together to express pleasure or get attention. "After the speech, everyone in the crowd clapped their hands for the speaker."
                                                        To applaud means to clap in order to show approval. "Everyone cheered and applauded Manny’s efforts."
                                                        applause is the noise made when people clap hands to show approval. "At the end of his speech, everyone gave applause."
C1/B2 classify, B1/B1 sort, triage - разгребать, сортировать, segregate, see also: dispose, sequence:
        To classify things is to put them into groups based on their type. "The biologist classified the plant as a completely new species."
        To sort means to separate things into different groups or classes. "He sorted his clothes by colors and sizes."
        To segregate something means to place it in a group apart from other things. "In gym class, the children were segregated into two groups: boys and girls."
C2/B2 climate, B1/B1 atmosphere, ambience (also ambiance), B2/B1 setting, B2/-- surroundings, B2/B1 environment (see also: ecology), milieu
B1/A2 climate, B2/B1 atmosphere, B2/B1 environment, sleet - мокрый снег, drizzle - морось, моросить, B1/-- breeze; --/B1 hurricane, A2/A2 storm, blizzard = snowstorm, gale - штормовой ветер (a strong wing moving 45-90 knots: "The gale was accompanied, as usual, by incessant rain and thick weather, and a heavy confused sea kept our decks always flooded"), thunderstorm - гроза, tempest (literary), avalanche, tornado, typhoon, cyclone, see also: squall, hail:
		A climate is the usual weather in a place. "The climate in the desert is very hot."
		The atmosphere is the air around the Earth where weather conditions form. "Scientists worry that harmful substances are hurting the atmosphere."
		The environment is the place where people work or live. "Keeping our environment clean is important to our health."
        hail is ice that falls from the sky when rain freezes. "The hail from the storm was the size of golf balls."
        A breeze is a soft wind. "The breeze caused the leaves to fall off the tree."
        A hurricane is a bad storm that happens over the ocean. "The wind from the hurricane bent the palm tree."
        A storm is very bad weather. There is a lot of rain or snow. "Did that storm wake you up last night?"
        A blizzard is a severe snow storm with strong winds. "We did not dare to go outside during the terrible blizzard."
        An avalanche is a large amount of snow, ice, and rock falling off a mountain. "The avalanche destroyed the mountain village."
        A tornado is a tube-shaped formation of air that spins very quickly. "During a tornado, the safest place to be is underground."
        A typhoon is a large tropical storm that moves in circles. "Thousands of people lost electricity after a typhoon hit Australia."
		A cyclone is a large storm with heavy rain and winds that spin in a circle. "Hundreds of homes were damaged by the cyclone."
      closeness - духота
C1/-- closeness - близость (к кому-л.), proximity
C1/-- closeness - близость (в пространстве или по времени), nearness, C2/-- proximity (proximate cause (LAW) - возможная причина), propinquity (formal):
        proximity is closeness in time, space, or relationships. " All the trees in the proximity of the beach had been cut down."
A2/B2 close, B1/A2 shut: To shut something means to close it tightly. "Please shut the door; the air outside is cold."
C2/B2 close - пристальный, внимательный, see also: careful(ly)
B1/B1 close - близкий (кому-л.) по духу, родству, симпатиям и т.д., C2/C1 intimate, confidant – задушевный друг, доверенная фигура ("He is a trusted confidant of the president."): When a relationship is intimate, the two things are very closely connected. "I only tell my secrets to my most intimate friends."
A1/A1 close - близкий (в пространстве или по времени), A2/B2 beside, B1/A2 near, A2 next to, see also: alongside:
        When someone or something is beside you, they are next to you. "The two brothers stood beside each other."
C2/B1 close - близкий, трудноразличимый (close resemblance between them, "This movie is about as close to perfect as you could wish for.", "The youngest boys are so close in age they look like twins.")
--/B2 close - близкий, почти достигший ("The airline is close to collapse.", "He was close to tears.", "We are close to signing the agreement." "I think there are close on three million unemployed at present.")
      close - душный, душно, stuffy
      close - замкнутый, закрытый, B1/B1 shy(ly, ness), sheepish(ly, ness), ununsociable, secretive, reticent (formal), retiring (formal), see also: timid, humble, withdrawn / sociable, gregarious, outgoing:
        When people are shy, they are nervous around people strange to them. "The girl was too shy to try out for the play."
        When someone is sociable, they are friendly. "Many of my good friends are sociable, but I am shy."
      close - короткий (cut very short, near to the skin: "a close haircut/shave")
      close - тесный, плотный (with little or no space in between: "over 1 000 pages of close print", "The soldiers advanced in close formation."), B2/C1 dense, B2/A2 thick, stiff, condensed, see also: tight, snug:
        If something is dense, it has a lot of things close together. "I easily became lost in the dense forest."
        If something is thick, it is wide and solid. "The fog was so thick that I couldn't see through it."
        When a liquid is condensed, it is made thicker. "One way to make a dessert thick and sweet is to use condensed milk."
      close - на грани ("it was close!" - прошлись по краю)
TODO close
C1/B2 closely - тщательно, внимательно, скрупулёзно (carefully and paying attention to details: "Pollution levels are closely monitored.", "He looked again more closely at the marks.", "We will be closely monitoring the situation."), attentive(ly, ness), careful(ly, ness), see also: thorough(ly, ness)
C1/B2 closely - близко, тесно, плотно (near in space or time: "closely spaced rows of seats", "streets of closely packed terraced houses", "He walked into the room, closely followed by the rest of the family.", "The Swiss boat is in the lead, followed closely by the French."), see also: tightly, snugly
B2/B2 closely - близко, тесно, плотно (in a way that is directly connected or has a strong relationship: "The two species are closely related.", "English and German are closely related.", "We are working closely with the police.", "The two events are closely connected.", "The country's economy remains closely tied to oil.", "Both politicians have been closely associated with the movement for some time.")
--/B2 closely - близко (without a big difference between two people, groups, or things: "She closely resembled her mother at the same age.", "The two teams are closely matched.", "It was a closely contested/fought election.")
C2/C1 closure
C1/B1 coal, charcoal: coal is a hard black rock that you burn for heat. "Many power stations burn coal to produce energy."
                      charcoal is a black material that is used as fuel for fire. "There was burnt charcoal left on the ground from an old fire."
C2/-- coherent(ly, -ce)
C2/C1 coincide, C2/C1 clash, concur: If two things coincide, they happen at the same time. "My birthday coincides with Christmas."
B2/C1 coincidence
C1/C1 collaborate, B2/C1 cooperate: To collaborate means to work together on something. "When they collaborated, they managed to finish their chores early."
                                    To cooperate is to work together to do something. "The students cooperated to clean up the classroom."
B2/B2 collapse - рухнуть, C2/C1 plunge (see also: dive), plummet, fall, drop, nosedive, C2 give way, tumble:
		To collapse is to fall down suddenly. "The tree collapsed right in front of our house."
        To plunge means to move down into something very quickly. "The water in the pool was very cold, but the boy plunged in anyway."
		To tumble means to fall, often in a rolling way. "He lost his balance while snowboarding and tumbled to the ground."
B2/B2 collapse - коллапс, крах, срыв, провал (a sudden failure of sth, such as an institution, a business or a course of action: "the collapse of the Soviet Union", "the collapse of law and order in the area", "The articles they published led to the collapse of the trial.", "The peace talks were on the verge of collapse.", see also: breakdown, demise)
B2/-- collapse (of prices/currencies), C1/C1 plunge, plummet, slump, fall, drop
B2/B2 collapse (of sick person), fall, drop, crumple
C2/-- collapse (fail), B2 break down
      collapse (relax), slump (рухнуть/опуститься обессиленно), drop
      collapse (fold), B1/B2 fold, unfurl, see also: roll / C2/B2 unfold, unwrap, see also: unroll: To fold is to bend something like paper or cloth so that it takes up less space. "I folded the paper and put it in my pocket."
--/C1 collective - коллективный (done or shared by all members of a group of people; involving a whole group or society): "collective leadership/decision-making/responsibility/effort", "collective memory (= things that a group of people or a community know or remember, that are often passed from parents to children)"
      collective - общий (used to refer to all members of a group): "The collective name for mast, boom and sails on a boat is the ‘rig’."
      collective - коллектив (a group of people who own a business or a farm and run it together; the business that they run): "an independent collective making films for television"
      collectivity - единение, "чувство локтя" (the experience or feeling of sharing responsibilities, experiences, activities, etc.), see also: unity: "the spirit of collectivity", "It simply doesn't make sense to talk about individuality if you don't have a sense of collectivity."
--/C1 collision (collide), accident, crash (see also: smack), smash: A collision is the act of two things hitting into each another. "The collision between the two cars created a loud noise."
                                                                     To collide with something means to hit into it while moving. "The two cars collided with each other because their drivers were not careful."
C2/C1 combat, C2/B2 battle, B2/A2 fight, B2/B2 struggle, wrestle, grapple; --/B2 martial - боевой, see also: scrap, scramble, fray:
		combat is fighting between two people or groups. "The two warriors were locked in combat."
        A battle is a fight between two armies during a war. "The battle lasted for many days."
        To struggle is to fight against someone or something. "The kids struggled with each other for the toy."
        To wrestle is to play a game where you try to push someone to the floor. "My dad loved to wrestle when he was in high school."
        If something is martial, it is related to fighting or war. "Karate is a martial art that began many years ago in Japan."
C2/B2 comfort, solace (literary), console (consolation), soothe; C1/C1 reassure - обнадёжить:
        To comfort someone means to make them feel better. "I wanted to comfort my friend after I heard the bad news."
        To console someone who is sad means to make them comforted. "When my dog ran away, my dad consoled me."
        To soothe means to calm someone who is angry or upset. "The mother soothed her crying baby by rocking him in her arms."
C2/B2 comfort, consolation
C1/B2 comfort (creature comforts), amenities (basic amenities)
B1/B2 comfort, B2/B2 convenience / C1/-- inconvenience: convenience is a state of being able to do something with little effort. "The Internet allows consumers to shop at their own convenience."
B2/A2 comfortable(-ly), B2/B1 convenient(ly), B1/-- cosy (US: cozy), see also: snug / C1/B1 uncomfortable(-ly), B2/-- inconvenient(ly):
        When something is convenient, it is easy to do and does not take a lot of work. "The bus is a convenient way to get to school."
        If something is cozy, then it is comfortable, warm, and relaxing. "The thick blanket made the bed very cozy."
C2/-- commemorate
C2/C1 commence, C1/C1 launch, C2/C1 initiate, start, begin, get underway, embark on/upon, inaugurate; C2/C1 outbreak - вспышка (see also: outburst, flare-up), onset, C2/-- at/from the outset (of sth); --/C1 epidemic, pandemic, see also: mount:
        To commence something means to begin it. "His speech commenced with a “thank you” to all who had helped him succeed."
        To launch something means to make it go into motion. "The boat launched from the dock and floated down the river."
        The onset of something unpleasant is the beginning of it. "At the onset of the battle, the enemy wasn’t prepared for such a large attack."
        An epidemic is an outbreak of a disease that spreads quickly. "It was difficult to stop the flu epidemic."
C1/C1 commodity, B2/B1 resource: resources are a person or country's money and materials that they can use. "The poor man didn't have the resources to feed himself."
C1/C1 commodity, B1/A1 product, by-product, --/B1 goods, merchandise: A commodity is something that can be bought or sold. "Fran’s uncle made most of his money trading commodities."
                                                                      merchandise is goods ready to be purchased or sold. "The store added moremerchandise because there were more shoppers."
                                                                      goods are anything that can be bought or sold. "Shoes, hats, dresses and purses were the goods she wanted to buy."
C1/-- commute, C1/-- shuttle: To commute is to travel a long distance to get to work. "I usually commute to work on the train."
C1/-- compatible(-ly, -ility) / incompatible: When things are compatible, they work well or exist together successfully. "Jan and Fred are too different. They will never be compatible."
--/C1 compel (compulsion - принуждение, давление), C2/B1 force, see also: pressurize, pressure; --/C1 induce, C1/C1 trigger, C2/C1 initiate, C2/A2 cause (see also: factor), C2/C1 spark (sth (off)), C2/B2 prompt (sb to do sth), bring sth <-> about, (see also: precipitate, provoke, stir sh <-> up), coerce, impel (formal) - побуждать, толкать, гнать, bludgeon sb (into sth / into doing sth), startle into, bring sth <-> on, put/set sth in motion
        To initiate something means to start it. "You have to turn the switch on to initiate the computer system."
        To cause is to make something happen. "The cold weather caused her to get sick."
        To compel someone to do something means to force them to do it. "Traffic signs compel drivers to drive safely."
        To induce something means to make it happen. "Running without good shoes may induce leg pain."
        impel - cause to move forward with force: "Some power beyond his comrehension was impelling him toward the neighboring city"
--/C1 compelling - убедительный, неопровержимый, C2/-- conclusive (see also: decisive), C1/-- undeniable - неоспоримый, C2/-- indisputable, unquestionable, unarguable (formal), irrefutable (formal) / inconclusive, C2/-- questionable, deniable - спорный disputable, arguable (formal), debatable
--/C1 compelling - непреодолимый, C2/-- compulsive(ly, ness), inveterate - заядлый, закоренелый, неудержимый, see also: avid
--/C1 compelling, C1/-- gripping, C2/-- compulsive(ly, ness), B2/B1 fascinating, absorbing, engrossing, riveting, enchanting, enthralling, bewitching - захватывающий, увлекательный, завораживающий:
      dismember - расчленять (to cut or tear the dead body of a person or an animal into pieces: "Police say the body had been dismembered.")
      dismember - (literary or formal) расчленять (to divide a country, an organization, etc. into smaller parts: "The UN protested at the dismembering of Bosnia.", "The British railway network has gradually been dismembered."), see also: disassemble, dissect, divide (TODO)
C1/C1 compile, C2/C1 assemble (see also: convene, summon, round sb/sth <-> up), congregate, B2/B2 compose, see also: combine / disassemble, dismantle, see also: dismember:
		To compile things means to collect a variety of them into a group. "She compiled a list of people who she wanted to attend her birthday party."
        To assemble means to get together in one place. "The parents assembled to discuss ways to improve their children’s education."
        To compose something is to make it from smaller parts. "Tonya composed her report using many sources of information."
      compilation, C2/C1 composition, B2/B2 combination, --/C1 synthesis, hybrid, see also: mixture: A synthesis is a combination of different ideas or styles. "The band’s music was a synthesis of many different musical genres."
                                                                                  					 A hybrid is a mixture of different things or styles. "In Greek mythology, a centaur is a hybrid of a man and a horse."
C2/-- compliment (complimentary, flattering / uncomplimentary, unflattering - (лестный/нелестный), see also: endorse, favourable), C1/B2 praise, C1/B2 honour (US honor), homage, esteem, glorify, laud(able, ably, atory), extol (formal) - восхвалять, exalt ("Some exalt themselves by anonymously posting their own laudatory reviews"), flatter, commend, C2 pay tribute to sb/sth (отдать дань уважения; почтить память), see also: dignify, respect, respected:
        To praise is to show that you like someone or something. "The coach praised both athletes after a good practice."
        To compliment is to say a nice thing about someone or something. "Her co-worker complimented her for doing a good job."
        To flatter people means to praise them in an effort to please them. "He was just flattering me when he said that my new dress looked gorgeous."
        When you honor people or things, you show respect for them. "I honor my science teacher by working hard in class."
--/C1 compliance, submission, obedience, , conformance = conformity (соответствие, согласованность)
C1/C1 comply, C2/B2 submit, B2/B2 obey, B1/A1 follow(OBEY), conform, heed, abide by sth, see also: adhere, stick:
		To submit to someone is to agree to do what they tell you to do. "She submitted to her mother's wishes and did her homework."
        To obey means to follow what a law or a person says you must do. "My little sister did not obey my mother. Now she is in trouble."
        To conform to rules or laws is to obey them. "The new student had to conform to the school’s dress code."
        To heed something means to obey or follow it. "You should heed the advice on the sign and not drive so fast."
        To abide by something, like a rule, means to obey it. "If you want to play the game with us, you must be willing to abide by our rules."
C1/B2 component: A component is a part of a larger machine. "Computers have many different components, so they are complicated to build."
B2/C1 compromise - компромис
B2/C1 compromise - идти на компромис (в т.ч. со правилами, принципами и т.д.): To compromise is to agree to something that is not exactly what you want. "We both compromised about the game we decided to play."
C2/C1 compromise - ставить под угрозу, see also: jeopardize
C2/C1 compromise - компрометировать
C2/C1 conceal (скрывать), concealed (скрытый, сокровенный), C2/C1 underlying (underlie, see also: inward), B1/A2 hide (B2/B2 hidden), veil, mask?; припрятывать, заначка: stash, hoard, cache, see also withhold:
        To conceal something means to hide it. "You sould conceal your money so no one can take it from you."
        A cache is a hiding place for valuable things. "The pirates kept their jewelry in a cache hidden in a cave."
        When something is underlying, it is a hidden cause of something else. "Her underlying fear or flying reduced her traveling options."
        To hide is to try not to let others see you. "The other children will hide while you count to 100."
		    hidden means to be not easily noticed or too hard to find. "The hidden camera recorded everything in the parking lot."
      concealment - сокрытие, утаивание (: "the concealment of crime/evidence/facts/weapons", "Many animals rely on concealment for protection.")
C2/C1 concede, B2/B2 approve, acquiesce - соглашаться молча, see also: agree, resign oneself to sth, accede - соглашаться (yield to another's wish or opinion: "Therefore he made up his mind to accede to his uncle's desire") (formal) / B2/-- disapprove:
        To approve of something means you like it or are happy about it. "Her co-workers approved her new plan."
        To disapprove of something is to think that it is wrong. "Alex disapproved of his son's behavior."
C2/C1 concede, B1/C1 admit, --/C1 admission, avowal, see also: yield, succumb, abandon, acknowledge, recognize; B2/C1 confess(ion); hand in<->sth (to sb); B2 admittedly - (неохотно) на самом деле, действительно, see also: truth be told:
        To concede is to admit that something is true against your wish. "The student conceded that he had cheated on the test."
        To admit something means to say that it is true. "I had to admit that I stole his idea."
        admission is the act of allowing to enter a place."The admission ticket to the movie was $5."
        To confess something is to say that you did it. "He confessed that he was responsible for choosing the winning story."
C2/C1 concession - уступка, льгота, exemption, see also: incentive
C2/C1 concession - признание поражения
C1/B1 concentrate, C1/A2 focus, see also: keep your eye on the ball: To concentrate on someone or something is to give your full attention. "I could not concentrate on my homework because the room was so loud."
                                                                     To focus on something is to think about it and pay attention to it. "My mom always helps me to focus on my school work."
C2/C1 conceive (C2/C1 conception - концепция) - вообразить, B2/A2 imagine, visualize, envision, fancy (literary, "I fancied (that) I saw something moving in the corner."), see also: contrive, envisage:
        To conceive something means to be able to imagine or believe it. "The child could not conceive the actual size of the Earth."
        To imagine something is to think of it in your mind. "Sally imagined herself winning lots of money."
        To envision something means to imagine that it may happen. "I can envision my mom's face when I give her this present!"
C2/C1 conceive (C2/C1 conception - концепция) - задумать, C2/C1 devise, B2/A2 invent, think sth <-> up, B2 come up with sth, see also: contrive:
        To devise something means to have an idea or plan about it in the mind (To find an original way to make an object or a plan). "The thieves devised a plan to steal the diamonds."
        To invent something is to create something that never existed before. "My grandfather has invented some interesting things."
C2/C1 conceive (C2/C1 conception - зачатие) - зачать
C1/B1 conclude, C2/B2 infer (inference, inferential), C2/-- deduce: To conclude is to arrive at a logical end by looking at evidence. "I saw crumbs on my dog's face, so I concluded that he ate my cookie."
                                                                    To infer something is to decide it is true based on other information one has. "By the position of the sun in the sky, she inferred that it was noon."
C2/B1 conclusion, C1/B1 conclude: The conclusion of something is the final part of it. "At the conclusion for the race, the spectators cheered for the winner."
C1/B2 concrete / B2/B2 abstract: If ideas are abstract, they are based on general ways of thinking. "The idea of beauty is abstract and changes over time."
      concussion
C2/C1 condemn (see also: denounce), berate, reprimand, scold, chide, rebuke - упрёк (an act or expression of criticism and censure: "Afterward, the leaders fought court orders to release records showing what they had done, drawing an uncommonly sharp rebuke from a federal judge"), reprove, admonish, lambast(e), tell sb off:
        To scold means to criticize one angrily because they have done wrong. "Jesse was scolded by the teacher for not paying attention."
        To admonish someone is to tell them you disapprove of their behavior. "The teacher admonished Mark because he was chewing gum in class."
C2/C1 condemn, C2 tear sb/sth apart, decry (formal), excoriate (formal), B2/B2 criticize (B2/B2 criticism: bile, vitriol, invective (formal)), assail; C2/-- doom (гибель, п****ц), doomed (обречён); B2/B2 sentence;
        To criticize is to say you do not like someone or something. "He criticized his wife for spending too much money."
        criticism is the act of saying that you don't like or approve of something. "She had a lot of criticism about their new plan."
        If someone or something is doomed, they are going to fail or be destroyed. "Since I spent all my money, my date with Jane is doomed."
        A sentence is punishment given to someone who didn't follow the law. "The sentence for stealing a car is much worse than for stealing candy."
--/C1 condemn (sb to sth) - обречь, see also: doom: To condemn someone means to give them a specific punishment. "The judge condemned the criminal to five years in prison."
      conduct - вести, провожать, сопровождать, B1/-- walk, B1/B2 accompany, see also: escort: To accompany other people means to join them or go with them. "My brothers accompanied me to the movie."
                                                                                               To escort people means to safely accompany them to a place. "Her bodyguards escorted her to the movie theater."
      conduct - вести, проводить (экскурсии, людей), guide, show: A guide is someone who shows you where to go. "We followed a guide at the park."
B2/B2 conduct - вести, проводить (мароприятия - experiment/inquiry/investigation/test/research/interview/business/life/survey/poll/study/review/trial/..)
B2/B2 conduct - вести (хор), дирижировать (оркестром)
      conduct - проводить ток/тепло
C2/-- conduct onself - вести себя, B1/A2 behave (вести себя в определённой ситуации (act) / вести себя прилично)  / C1/-- misbehave
		To behave is to act in a particular way, especially to be good. "She always behaves well when her father is around."
--/B2 conduct - поведение, B1/A1 behaviour (US behavior): conduct is the way that someone acts. "She was punished for her bad conduct."
                                                          Your behavior is the way you act. "Their behavior was good this semester. They didn't cause trouble."
      conduct - (про)ведение (войны/бизнеса/следствия/...)
B2/C1 congratulate: To congratulate someone is to tell them that you are happy for them. "Bill and Angela congratulated each other on a job well done."
--/C1 confer - обсуждать, A2/A2 discuss, converse (A1/A1 conversation), see also: debate: To confer with someone means to discuss something with them to make a decision. "I will have to confer with my wife before I can purchase a new car."
																						  A conversation is a talk between people. "There were two conversations going on at once."
--/C1 confer - вручать, bestow: "He bestowed public buildings and river improvements in return for votes"
C1/-- confidential(ly), confidence, secrecy, secret: secrecy is the behavior of keeping things secret. "The secrecy of the big organization made the government nervous."
													 If something is confidential, it must be kept secret. "The information from the meeting is confidential."
C2/C1 confine, --/C1 detain; B2/B1 arrest, apprehend, see also: capture, round sb <-> up: To confine something is to keep it in one place. "The elephant is confined to a cage in the zoo."
                                                                                          To arrest someone means to catch them for doing something bad. "The man was arrested for breaking the law."
B2/C1 confirmation (B2/B1 confirm), verification (C1/C1 verify), ascertain (formal): To confirm is to make sure something is correct. "Winning the game confirmed that James was a good player."
                                                                                     To verify means to find out if something is true. "Julian called the movie theater to verify that the movie started at nine."
C2/C1 confront(ation), B2/C1 tackle, C2/B1 face, B2/B2 approach, B1/B1 deal with sth, contend with sth, see also: address, cater, fulfil:
		To confront a hard situation or person is to deal with it. "The couple has to confront each other about their problems."
        If you face a problem, you deal with it. "My sister and I have to find a better way to face our differences."
        To tackle something means to deal with it in a determined and efficient way. "Such social problems need to be tackled right away."
        To contend with something means to struggle to overcome it. "Stacy had to contend with a learning disability throughout high school."
B1/A2 connect - соединять, B2/A2 link, liaise - устанавливать/поддерживать, see also: join, bind, integrate: To connect two things means to join them together. "I connected the mouse to my laptop computer."
C2/B1 connect - ассоциировать, B2/A2 link, see also: associate
      connect - привязываться, see also: bond
C2/C1 conscience: Your conscience is your inner sense of what is right and wrong. "I recycle everything I can, so my conscience is clear!"
C1/C1 conscious(ly, ness), C1/B2 aware(ness), C1/B2 realize?, cognizant witting; subconscious(ly), subliminal (подсознательный), see also: acquainted / C2/B2 unconscious(ly, ness) - безсознательный, неосознаваемый, C2/C1 ignorant(ly, -ce), B2/-- unaware, unknowing, unwitting, oblivious(ly, ness, oblivion), unbeknownst (formal) - без ведома:
        If someone is conscious of something, then they are aware of it. "The new student was conscious of the other students staring at her."
        If you are aware of something, you know about it. "I was not aware of the ringing phone."
        When something is subconscious, it is done without thinking about it. "Breathing is one of the subconscious things that the body does."
        If someone is ignorant about something, they have no knowledge about it. "I'm a bit ignorant about his theories. Can you explain them to me?"
        ignorance of something is lack of knowledge about it. "When he failed the test, his ignorance of math was obvious."
        If someone is oblivious of something, they are unaware of it. "I was late to school because I was oblivious of the time."
C2/C1 conscious(ly, ness), B2/B2 deliberate(ly), intentional(ly) (TODO seems duplicate), premeditated, advertent(ly) / C2/B2 unconscious(ly, ness), unintentional(ly), inadvertent(ly), accidental(ly), unpremeditated:
          When an action is inadvertent, it is done without realizing what you are doing. "She made an inadvertent error when she knocked over the nail polish."
C1/C1 consent, B2/B1 agreement, assent (formal), see also: concord, sanction
C2/C1 consent - согласие, соглашаться; C1/C1 authorise (US authorize), authorisation (US authorization), C1/B2 permit (-ssion), B1/A2 allow - разрешать, B2/B2 grant (see also: offer), B2/C1 entitle (often passive) - давать право, see also: admission, sanction:
        consent is permission to do something. "Their mother gave the children consent to go outside and play."
        To authorize something means to give permission for it. "The mayor authorized the construction of a new statue in the park."
        To permit something is to let someone do it. "I was sick, so my mother permitted me to stay home from school."
        Permission means the act of allowing the doing of something. "I have permission to drive my mom's car."
        To allow something to happen means to let it happen. "Having a ticket will allow you to enter the show."
        To grant something is to allow someone to have it. "The teacher granted us a break after studying hard all day."
        To entitle someone means to give them the rights to have or do something. "His golden ticket entitled him to sit in the front row at the concert."
C2/A2 consider, C2/C1 deem, C2/B1 judge, account, hold, view, see also: regard: To consider something means to think about it. "Pete didn't like his job. He considered getting a new one."
TODO consider
C2/B2 consistent(ly) / inconsistent(ly):
		consistent: If a person is consistent, they keep the same behavior or attitude. "Sara comes in every day and is our most consistent worker."
--/C1 consistency - последовательность ((approving) the quality of always behaving in the same way or of having the same opinions, standard, etc.; the quality of being consistent) / inconsistency
        consistency is the state of always behaving in the same way. "Her consistency in archery meant that our team had a chance to win."
--/C1 consistency - консистенция (the consistency of a mixture or a liquid substance is how thick, smooth, etc. it is), see also: texture
--/C1 consolidate - укреплять(ся) (to become, or cause sth to become, stronger, and more certain): "She hoped that marriage would consolidate their relationship.", Italy consolidated their lead with a second goal."
--/C1 consolidate - объединять(ся) (to join things together into one; to be joined into one): "consolidated accounts", "All the debts have been consolidated.", "The two companies consolidated for greater efficiency."
      consolidation
--/C1 constituency - избирательный округ, избиратели (a district that elects its own representative to parliament; the people who live in and vote in a particular district: "constituency opinion", "Unemployment is high in her constituency.")
      constituency - поддержка, сторонники (a particular group of people in society who are likely to support a person, an idea or a product: "There is a strong constituency of support for his proposal.", "There is a large constituency in favour of income-tax reductions."), see also: advocacy
      constituent - избиратель (a person who lives in and can vote in a constituency: "The MP worked hard, always talking to his constituents and listening to their problems.")
      constituent - составляющий (forming or helping to make a whole: "to break something up into its constituent parts/elements", "the country’s constituent republics", "The process of breaking down food into its constituent elements begins.")
      constituent - составляющая (one of the parts of sth that combine to form the whole: "What are the basic constituents of the mixture?", "Silicon and oxygen are the fundamental constituents of rocks in the earth’s crust.", "Tar is a harmful constituent of tobacco smoke.")
C1/C1 constitute (formal) - являться, представлять собой, B1/B1 form, B2/B2 represent (BE)
C1/C1 constitute (formal) - составлять, make sth <-> up, see also: comprise, account for
      constitute (formal) - учреждать, B1/B1 form - сформировать, set sth <-> up, see also: establish
C2/C1 constrain(t), C1/C1 restrain(t), C1/C1 restrict(ion, ive(ly)), C2/-- curb, curtail(ment), C2/-- contain (сдерживать (эмоции (see also: suppress) / распространение болезни, насилия и т.д.)), B2/B1 limit(ation), B1/A2 prevent(able), (see also: deter, deterrent), dissuade, cap, see also: foil, undermine, frustrate, disrupt, strangle; C2/-- hinder (hindrance), hamper, obstruct(ion), impede, hobble, B2/C1 interfere (мешать), --/C1 inhibit (сдерживать, тормозить, мешать, препятствовать), stunt, cramp, keep sb from sth, put sb off sth/sb, see also: bounds, stem
        "I felt the CONSTRAINS of a modest society breaking against my bare flesh as I walked naked through the supermarket before the security guard decided to RESTRAIN me and call the police."
        To constrain something means to limit its development. "Jim cannot join us because he is constrained by previous plans."
        To restrain someone or something means to use physical strength to stop them. "Mike restrained Allen from reaching the door."
        To restrict is to limit something and prevent it from getting bigger. "The club restricted the amount of members."
        To curb something means to prevent it from happening or increasing. "She curbed her anger by listening to a relaxing song."
        A limit is the largest or smallest amount of something that you allow. "My mother put a limit on how much I could use the phone."
        To prevent something is to stop it from happening. "The handcuffs prevented me from moving my hands."
        To hinder is to keep someone or something from doing something. "All the traffic hindered me from getting to work on time."
        To impede something means to keep it from moving or going forward. "The barrier impeded our ability to get closer to the building."
        To interfere is to cause problems and keep something from happening. "My little sister always interferes when I'm trying to study."; to get involved in and try to influence a situation that does not concern you, in a way that annoys other people. (C2 intrude, meddle(r, -ing))
C1/-- constructive / --/C1 destructive, see also: adverse
C1/B1 consume (consumption - ((у)портебление), take sth <-> in (--/C1 intake - приём (пищи, студентов и т.д.), sharp intake of breath - резкий вдох), --/C1 digest - переварить, усвоить (пищу), ingest (medical) - поглощать, употреблять внутрь, devour - пожирать, жадно поглощать, gobble (informal), see also: bolt:
        To consume something means to eat or drink it. "Jack consumed a whole plate of spaghetti."
        The consumption of food or drink is the act of eating or drinking it. "These apples are too rotten for consumption."
        Your intake of food is the amount of food you take into your body. "The doctor said I needed to increase my intake of fruits and vegetables."
        To digest means to swallow food and pass it through the body. "Allow some time for food to be digested before going swimming."
C1/C1 consumption - потребление (the act of buying and using products)
B1/A2 communicate - общаться, сообщить, передать (to share information with others by speaking, writing, moving your body, or using other signals), see also: contact, deliver
B2/-- communicate - общаться, поддерживать отошения (to have a good relationship because you are able to understand and talk about your own and other people’s thoughts, feelings, etc.)
      communicate - передавать заразу (to pass a disease from one person, animal, etc. to another), see also: infect, contract: "The disease is communicated through dirty drinking water."
      communicate - сообщаться (If one room communicates with another, it connects with it through a door): "a communicating door (= one that connects two rooms)", "The bedroom communicates with both bathroom and hall.", "communicating rooms = adjoining rooms"
C1/B1 contact, B2/C1 interact, see also: communicate: To contact someone is to speak or write to them. "I contacted Sue about my party."
                                  				  To communicate is to give information by talking, writing, etc. "I communicated with Paul about his new ideas."
                                  				  To interact is to talk to or do something with another person. "The kids began to interact when the adults left the room."
C2/C1 contempt(uous(ly)), scorn(ful(ly)), see also: disrespect; despise, derision, formal: disdain(ful(ly)): contempt is the feeling of having no respect for something. "The judge had contempt for the wicked criminal."
                                                                             					   To scorn someone means to behave without respect toward them. "The criminal was scorned by everyone in the community."
--/C1 contend (be in/out of contention for sth - (не)иметь шансы на победу), B2/A2 compete (B2/B1 competition), --/B2 contest, vie (formal), see also: scramble:
		To compete is to try to be better than someone. "He will compete with very good athletes."
        A competition is a contest to see who is the best at something. "He won the running competition over the weekend."
        To vie for something means to compete against others for it. "The three boys vied for the prize in the chemistry contest."
      contentious - спорный, дискуссионный (causing , involving, or likely to cause disagreement and argument: "a contentious decision/policy/issue/topic/subject", "Try to avoid any contentious wording.", "She has some very contentious views on education.")
      contentiousness - противоречивость, неоднозначность (the fact of being contentious (= causing or likely to cause disagreement): "The debate highlights the contentiousness of the plan.", "The book's contentiousness is part of the reason why it's such a great read.")
      contentiousness - разнгласия, противоречия (disagreement and argument: "There has been increasing contentiousness between the two politicians.", "The contentiousness began brewing in January 2012."), see also: contradiction, discord, feud
C2/A2 context, B2/B2 circumstance(s), see also: condition: context is the situations that form the background of an event. "They studied the context of the battle before giving their presentation."
                                      					   A circumstance is an event that makes a situation what it is. "There were many circumstances behind their success like hard work."
C2/A2 continent(al), --/C1 mainland: A continent is one of the seven large areas of land on the Earth. "Asia is the largest continent."
C1/C1 continual(ly), B1/A2 continue, B2/B1 continuous(ly), continuance / sporadic
B1/B2 contract - контракт: A contract is a written agreement between two people. "The woman signed a contract when she bought the house."
--/B2 contract (sth) - сжимать(ся), see also shrink, reduce, condense (information) / expand (see also: rise), dilate - расширяться (nostrils, pupils, vessels): To expand is to become bigger in size. "A balloon will expand as you blow air into it."
C2/-- contract (sth) - заразиться (formal), see also: infect, foul, see also: communicate
C2/-- contract (sth) - заключить котракт, see also: commission, employ, charge, engage.
--/C1 contractor
C2/C1 contradict(ory, ion), discrepant(-cy - расхождение, разница, противоречие), B2/B2 disagreement, dissonance, dissent (formal), be/run/seem contrary to; B2/B2 tension, see also: conflict, faction, discord, controversy, contentiousness
        To contradict means to state the opposite of what someone else has. "Ken was always fighting with his little sister because she kept contradicting him."
C2/B1 contrast, B1/B1 difference, juxtapose (juxtaposition), dichotomy (formal) - дихотомия (a difference between two completely opposite ideas or things: "There is often a dichotomy between what politicians say and what they do."), see also: duality, gap, discriminate:
		A contrast is the sharp difference between two things. "The contrast between my parents is very noticeable."
		A difference is a way that something is not like other things. "The biggest difference between the birds is the color of their feathers."
C1/B2 controversy, B2/B2 controversial(ly), see also: strife, contradiction: A controversy is a dispute about something that affects many people. "There has been a lot of controversy over the judge’s decision."
C1/B2 convention - соглашение: A convention is behavior that is considered to be common or polite. "In the US, a popular convention is to shake hands when you meet someone."
--/C1 convention - конвенция, C2/C1 treaty, C2/-- pact, B2/B1 agreement, compact (formal), accord, covenant
C1/B2 convention - съезд, see also: summit
C1/B2 conventional / unconventional(ly) - (не)традиционный
C1/B2 convey, C2/C1 portray (B2/B2 portrait), C2/C1 depict (depiction), C1/C1 embody - воплощать, олицетворять, see also: profile, represent, express:
        To convey is to communicate or make ideas known. "That picture of a crying child conveys a feeling of sadness."
        To portray something means to describe it or show it in a picture. "Her picture portrayed the house she grew up in when she was little."
        A portrait is a painting or photograph of someone. "I saw many religious portraits when I went to the museum."
        To depict something means to show or portray it, often using art. "The statue’s face depicted the general’s determination and courage."
      convey - передавать, перемещать, перевозить, see also: relay, impart
C2/B2 convert (C2/C1 conversion), C2/-- translate, C1/B2 interpret, see also: render: To convert something means to change it into something else. "The man converted his messy field into a garden of flowers."
                                                                    				  conversion is the act of changing something into a different state or form. "The city discussed the conversion of the parking lot into a skateboard park."
                                                                    				  To interpret is to explain what something means. "The woman interpreted what her co-worker was trying to say."B2/C1 cooperative, obliging / uncooperative, disobliging (formal)
C2/C1 convict - осудить, see also: indict / acquit - оправдать
        To convict someone means to prove that they did a bad thing. "He was convicted of the crime and sent to jail."
C2/C1 conviction - обвинительный приговор / acquittal - оправдание
C2/C1 conviction - убеждение, взгляды, воззрения, C1/B2 notion, C2/C1 conception, B2/B2 concept, --/C1 ideology, B2/B2 faith, B2/B1 belief (see also perception), B1/A2 thought, B2/A1 idea, construct (formal) / C1/C1 stereotype, misconception, delusion:
        A notion is an idea or belief about something; A fanciful impulse. "I have a notion that this route would get us to the beach."
        A concept is an idea about something. "I learned some concepts of molecules before working in the science lab."
        When people have faith in something, they believe in it and trust it. "The sick girl had faith in doctors. She knew they would make her better."
        A belief is a strong feeling that something is correct or true. "A preacher or priest should have a strong belief in God."
        A stereotype is a general but often incorrect idea about a person or thing. "There’s a stereotype that pigs are dirty animals. But they are rather clean."
        A misconception is a wrong idea about something. "People once believed the misconception that the Earth is flat."
C2/C1 conviction - убеждённость, уверенность (в голосе), C2/B2 certainty (A2/A2 certainly, B2/A2 certain, surefire), C2/B2 confidence (B1/B1 confident), A2/A2 sure / tentative(ly, ness), B2/B2 hesitate, hesitant(ly), vacillating (vacillate), waver(ing):
        If you are certain about something, you know it is true. "I am certain that zebras have stripes."
        If you have confidence about something, you are sure of it. "I have confidence that I did well on the test."
        confident means that one believes they can do something without failing. "She was confident she could climb the mountain due to her training"
		To hesitate is to wait for a short time before doing something. "He hesitated for a moment before he decided which choice to make."
        To waver is to be unable to decide between two choices. "I wavered between eating the apple or the cake for a snack."
        If someone is hesitant, then they are not sure or slow in acting or speaking. "Though he knew the answer, he was hesitant to say it because he might be wrong."
--/C1 coordinate: To coordinate things is to make different parts work together. "Each skating team had to coordinate their movements for the show."
C2/-- coral, reef: coral is the hard, colorful material formed by the shells of animals. "The diver admired the beautiful coral under the water."
                   A reef is a group of rocks or coral that rise to or near the ocean. "He walked along the reef and looked at the water below."
C2/B2 core - основной, C2/B2 fundamental(ly), B2/B2 essential(ly), B1/B1 basic(ally), C2/-- ultimate(ly), C2/B1 central, B2/B1 key, cardinal, primal, see also: substantial, paramount, principal:
        If something is fundamental, it is a basic part of something. "The fundamental rules of basketball are easy."
        If something is basic, it is very simple or easy. "I learned some basic English skills in school today."
        If a rule or quality is cardinal, then it is the most important one. "Raising your hand in the classroom before you speak is a cardinal rule."
C2/B2 core - центральный, ключевой, B2/B2 essential(ly), B2/B2 crucial, B2/B2 vital, C2/-- indispensable, C2/-- imperative, B1/B2 urgent, momentous(ly, ness), historic, all-important, see also: decisive / dispensable:
        If something is essential, it is very important and necessary. "It is essential to have oxygen when you scuba dive."
        If something is crucial, it is extremely important to another thing. "Clean air is crucial to the survival of humans, plants, and animals."
        When something is vital, it is necessary for life. "The heart is a vital organ."
        When something is imperative, it is extremely important and must be done. "It was imperative for him to find a job."
        If something is urgent, it is important and needs to be done now. "He had to leave now; it was urgent."
C2/-- core - ядрышко, семечко
      core - ядро, центр, nucleus, A2/A1 centre (US center), C2/-- particle (molecule, atom), electron, quantum:
        The core is the center of something. "The rings of a tree start forming at its core."
        The nucleus is the central part of an atom or cell. "The nucleus is made up of many tiny particles."
        The center of something is the middle of it. "The center of a dart board is the most important spot."
        A particle is a very small piece of something. "The bottles of wine were covered in a layer of dust particles."
        A molecule is the smallest basic unit that makes up a physical substance. "A tiny drop of water is made up of thousands of molecules of water."
        An atom is the smallest unit of a substance. "A molecule consists of a combination of two or more atoms."
        An electron is a particle in all atoms that has a negative electric charge. "The number of electrons in an atom determines the substance the atoms make."
        When something is quantum, it relates to the behavior of atomic particles. "The physics student studied quantum mechanics."
C1/B2 corporate: If something is corporate, it is related to a large business. "Tom enjoys working in the corporate world."
C2/-- corpse - труп, remains - останки, cadaver (MEDICAL); carcass - туша: A corpse is a dead body of a human. "After the accident, the corpse was taken to the hospital."
B2/A1 correct, B1/B1 proper (propriety - correct behavior: "I felt a trifle doubt about the propriety of taking a short cut across private grounds, as said as much"), A1/A1 right, B2/B2 appropriate(ly, ness), B2/B1 suitable(-y), apt(ly, ness); B2/B2 valid(ly, ity) / improper (impropriety); C1/C1 inappropriate, misguided - ошибочный, заблуждающийся, ill-conceived, B2/-- unsuitable(-y), inapt; B1/B2 incorrect, invalid(ly, ity), see also: erroneous(ly):
        To be correct is to be right. "All of my answers on the test were correct."
        If something is proper, it is right. "It is not proper to throw your garbage on the road."
        When a thing is appropriate, it is right or normal. "It's appropriate to wear a suit when you go to the office."
        When something is valid, it is correct or based on good reasoning. "The expert's opinion on the subject was more valid than others."
        When something is misguided, it is based on bad judgment or wrong beliefs. "The snake bit Molly during her misguided attempt to grab it."
        If something is invalid, it is not correct. "The way to winning debates is to avoid invalid arguments."
C1/C1 corrupt, debase, debauch, deprave, pervert
C1/C1 corrupt: If someone is corrupt, they break the law for money or fame. "The corrupt policemen didn’t arrest the man because he gave them money."
C1/C1 corrupt, C1/-- bribe (подкупать, давать взятку), grease sb's palm: To bribe someone means to illegally persuade them for a favor with money. "The judge was bribed so that she would set the suspect free."
C1/C1 corruption, C1/-- bribe (подкуп, взятка)
С1/-- cosmopolitan, C1/B2 ethnic(ity, ally), C1/B1 race (B2/B2 racial), nationality, multicultural, see also: international:
		When a place is cosmopolitan, it is full of people from many different places. "There are dozens of different types of restaurants in a cosmopolitan city."
        If something is ethnic, then it is related to a group with a similar culture. "Many sections of the city are home to different ethnic communities."
        When something is multicultural, it relates to many different cultures. "Everyone was welcomed to attend the multicultural celebration."
		If something is racial, then it is related to a race or races. "The differences between racial groups are physical characteristics and culture."
        nationality is an identity based on the nation from which you come. "His nationality is German, but he speaks French, Spanish, and Korean."
C2/C1 counsel(ling, lor), B1/B1 advise (C1/-- adviser (also advisor)), B1/C1 guide(-ance) / C1/B2 consult (B2/B2 consultant):
		To advise someone is to tell them what to do. "My mother often advises people about their money.":
        To counsel someone is to listen and give advice about a problem. "The teacher counseled the girl about her troubles."
		To consult someone means to ask them for help. "I will consult my accountant to find a way to pay for my bills." (https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/consult?q=consult)
B1/A2 count - считать (to say numbers in the correct order, to calculate the total number of people, things, etc. in a particular group)
B2/B1 count - считаться, иметь значение (to have value or importance), see also: matter
B2/B2 count - считаться, засчитываться (to be officially accepted; to accept something officially)
C2/-- count - считать(ся), рассматривать(ся) (to consider or be considered as): "I count myself lucky to have known him.", "For tax purposes that money counts/is counted as income."
C2/B1 count - подсчёт, количество (the act of counting, or the total number of things counted), C2 lose count - потерять счёт (to not be able to remember how many times something has happened):
		"If the election result is close, there will be a second count."
      count - пункт в дискуссии (a point made during a discussion or an argument): "I disagree with you on both counts."
      count - пункт/эпизод обвинения, эпизод преступления (a particular crime that a person is accused of): "The prisoner was found guilty on two counts of murder."
      count - граф, see also: earl: "Count Tolstoy"
C2/-- counter - фишка (в настольных играх)
B2/B2 counter - прилавок, see also: stall
      counter - кухонная стойка, столешница (US: countertop, kitchen counter, UK: worktop, work surface)
      counter - счётчик
      counter - противодействие
--/C1 counter - парировать, возражать, see also: parry, object
--/C1 counter - парировать, противодействовать, противостоять, counteract, see also: oppose: To counteract something means to act against it in order to reduce or stop it. "Medicine is supposed to counteract illnesses."
C2/-- counter - в противовес (to run counter - противоречить)
C1/C1 counterpart, opposite number: A counterpart is something that is very similar to something else in what it does. "Our manager will meet our rival company’s counterpart later today."
C1/A1 course
C2/-- courteous(ly), considerate(ly), helpful, caring, selfless, altruistic, B1/A2 polite(ly), gracious(ly, ness), benevolent(ly, -ce), attentive(ly, ness), B1/A2 helpful(ly, ness), B1/B1 kind(ly, ness), amicable, amiable (see also: affable), solicitous(ly, solicitude), well mannered, benign(ly) - see also: harmless, thoughtful(ly, ness), conscientious
        When someone is considerate, they pay attention to the needs of others. "The considerate boy gave a present to his girlfriend on Valentine’s Day."
        When someone is courteous, they are polite and respectful. "The mother asked her family to be courteous to their guests."
        When someone is polite, they are acting in a thoughtful way. "The boy was very polite: he behaved very thoughtfully."
        If someone is gracious, then they are kind and helpful to those who need it. "The operator was gracious enough to help me find his number."
        If people do something kindly, they do it in a nice way. "The stranger kindly cared for the hurt man."
        If something or someone is benign, they do not hurt anyone. "Many spiders look scary, but most are actually benign."
C2/C1 credibility
--/C1 credible, C2/-- plausible(-y), plausibility, believable, see also: viable, legitimate / B2/-- unbelievable(-y), B2/B1 incredible(-y), implausible(-y), implausibility:
        If something or someone is credible, they can be believed or trusted. "Dick gave a credible reason for being late and didn’t get in any trouble."
        If something is plausible, it is reasonable or possible. "It is plausible that Jack isn’t here today because he is sick."
        If someone or something is incredible, it is hard to believe they are true. "I have an incredible story to tell you about my vacation."
C2/-- crisp(ly, ness): When food is crisp, it is hard or has a hard surface in a way that is pleasant. "My favorite snack is a bag of crisp, delicious potato chips."
TODO crisp
C1/B2 criterion (pl. criteria), C2/B2 measure, C2/B1 standard, touchstone, yardstick(standard): A standard is what people consider normal or good. "This older model TV is below our store's standards."
                                                                                                criteria are factors on which a person judges or decides something. "Before she got the job, she had to meet all the necessary criteria."
B1/-- crossing - пересечение, переход, брод, переправа, --/C1 junction - перекрёсток, intersect(ion) - пересечение, перекрёсток, crossroad(s) - пересечение, перепутье (also figuratively)
C1/-- crossing - пересечение большой воды (a journey across a large area of water, from one side to the other)
--/C1 crude - сырой, необработанный, B2/B2 raw(ness): If a material is raw, it is natural and has not been processed. "The company dumped raw sewage into the river."
C2/C1 crude(ly, ness) - грубый, вульгарный, оскорбительный, B2/A2 rude(ly, ness), C1/B1 unpleasant(ly, ness), gross, vulgar, see also: mean / B1/B1 pleasant(ly, ness), --/C1 engaging(ly) - приятный, привлекательный, очаровательный, обаятельный:
        When someone is rude, they are mean and not polite. "The children at the bus stop were very rude."
        If something or someone is vulgar, then they are rude or lacking in style. "Her vulgar behavior got her into trouble with her parents."
        If something is pleasant, you enjoy it. "The character had a pleasant look on its face."
C2/-- crude(ly, ness) - грубый, небрежный, сделанный на скорую руку, приблизительный, в общих чертах (see also: diagrammatic(ally)), C1/-- primitive:
        When something is crude, it is not exact or detailed, but it can still be useful. "She drew crude hearts on the ground to show how much she loved him."
        If something is primitive, then it is simple, basic, and not very developed. "The computers of the 1980s are primitive compared to those of todays."
C2/-- crumble - рушить(ся), крошить(ся); crumb - крошка, крупица; breadcrumbs - панировочные сухари; a crumb of hope/comfort:
          To crumble means to break or fall apart into small pieces. "The old house’s walls crumbled into a pile of rock and wood."
C2/C1 cultivate (see also: crop), C2/-- fertile (fertilize - оплодотворять, удобрять; irrigate - орошать); prolific - плодородный, плодовитый (в т.ч. figurative) / infertile, sterile, barren - бесплодный: "We drove through a barren, rocky landscape." "She became very depressed during the barren years when she was unable to paint.":
		To cultivate plants is to care for them and help them grow. "A research company is cultivateing new kinds of rice to aid poor countries."
        If land is fertile, it is able to produce good crops and plants. "The farmer grew many vegetables in the fertile soil."
        To irrigate means to supply water to land so that crops can grow. "In dry climates, it is important to irrigate fields of crops."
        If land is barren, it has no plants growing on it. "People cannot farm in barren lands."
C2/-- cunning(ly) - хитрый, коварный, wily - лукавый, crafty - коварный, sly(ly, ness) - хитрый, conniving - коварный, вероломный (connivance - попустительство, молчаливаое согласие, connive at/in sth - потворствовать, connive (with sb) (to do sth) - сговариваться, see also: plot, conspire, be in cahoots (with somebody)):
        If someone is cunning, they are good at tricking people. "The cunning child fooled his parents into thinking that he was kind."
        If a person or animal is sly, they are sneaky or good at tricking people. "The sly fox stole the eggs from the nest."
C2/-- cunning - хитроумный, ingenious - находчивый, clever, also keen: If someone is ingenious, then they are very smart. "Charles was the only person ingenious enough to repair the plane’s engines."
																	   When someone is clever, they can solve a hard puzzle or problem. "The clever boy thought of a good idea."
C2/-- cunning - хитрость, коварство, craftiness
C1/-- cure - to solve a problem
B2/B2 cure - вылечить (болезнь/больного), B2/B1 treat - лечить, see also: heal: To cure means to cause an illness or injury to end or disappear. "My dentist cured me of my toothache."
      cure - to treat food, tobacco, etc. with smoke, salt, etc. in order to preserve it
B2/B2 cure (for sth) - лекарство, средство, B2/C1 remedy (formal): A remedy is a cure for a disease, argument, or problem. "A goodremedy for a headache is an aspirin and a glass of water."
      cure - процесс исцеления/выздоровления, B2/B2 treatment - лечение
C2/-- cushion, B1/-- pillow: A pillow is something that you put your head on when you sleep. "When I travel, I usually take along my favorite pillow."
C2/C1 custody (US usually custodian, C2/-- janitor, UK usually caretaker (see also: superintendent)); B1/B2 defend (B1/B2 defence (US defense), C1/-- shield, B1/A2 protect, B2/B1 guard (guardian, sentry, sentinel(literary)), safeguard
        A janitor is a person who makes repairs and takes care of a building. "The school janitor cleaned up the messy cafeteria."
        To shield something is to protect it. "She shielded her eyes from the sun with sunglasses."
        To defend someone or something is to protect them from attack. "The soldiers defended the town from the invaders."
        A defense is something that is done to protect another thing. "The airforce works in defense of its country."
        To guard something is to take care of it. "The police officer will guard us from any harm."
        A guardian is someone who protects somebody or something. "The librarians are the guardians of the books."
        To protect someone is to stop them from getting hurt. "Firemen protect us from fires."
C1/C1 dawn - рассвет; сумерки: dusk (see also: gloom), twilight, nightfall, закат: sundown, sunset: dawn is the time of day when the sun rises. "At dawn, the sun gently rose over the farm."
                                                                                                    dusk is the time in the evening when it begins to get dark. "After dusk, Hannah would catch fireflies in the park."
C2/-- dazzle - ослеплять (в прямом смысле), blind
C2/-- dazzle - ослеплять, поражать, восхищать
C2/-- dazzling - ослепительный (в прямом смысле), blinding
C2/-- dazzling - ослепительный, восхитительный, C2/-- exquisite(ly, ness) - изысканный, утончённый, прекрасный, B2/B2 stunning(ly) - сногсшибательный, B1/B2 gorgeous(ly, ness), A2/A2 lovely, ravish(ing(ly)), allure - притягательность, alluring - притягательный:
        When something is exquisite, it is very beautiful or pleasant. "The artist made exquisite watercolor paintings."
        When something is gorgeous, it is very pleasing and attractive. "The girl picked out a gorgeous dress to wear to the dance."
        If people or things are lovely, they are good-looking or beautiful. "The trees look lovely in the fall."
--/C1 debris, rubble, detritus: debris is the small pieces scattered from something wrecked or destroyed. "The debris from the cube scattered on the floor."
                                rubble is piles of broken stone and wood created after a building is destroyed. "There was rubble all over the city after the earthquake."
C2/-- decept(ion, ive(ly)), deceit(ful(ly, ness)), dissimulation; delude, B2/-- deceive, C2/B1 lie, B2/B1 trick, B2/B1 cheat, hoax, fix (informal), see also: distort, rig, forge:
        deception is the act of lying or tricking someone. "The magic looked very real, but it was only deception."
        To deceive someone is to make them believe something that is not true. "He tried to deceive his friends as they were playing a game."
		To lie is to say or write something untrue to deceive someone. "Whenever Pinocchio lied to his father, his nose grew."
        To cheat is to be dishonest so that you can win or do well. "They cheated on the test by sharing answers."
C2/-- deceptive, B2/C1 misleading: When something is deceptive, it encourages one to believe something that is false. "The scary-looking man’s appearance is deceptive, but he is actually very nice."
С2/A1 decide
C2/C1 dedicate(d), --/B2 devote(d) sth/yourself to sth/sb, devote sth to sth/sb; C1/C1 dedication, devotion, B2/B2 commitment, C2/A2 purpose, B2/B2 determination, allegiance (formal):
        To devote time to something means to spend a lot of time doing it. "She devotes two hours a day to playing the piano."
        To dedicate oneself to something means to put a lot of time and effort into it. "The nun dedicated herself to helping people in need."
--/C1 deed (formal, literary) - поступок, подвиг, дело (a thing that somebody does that is usually very good or very bad)
      deed - документ, see also: licence
        A deed is a certificate that proves that someone owns something. "When she bought the car, she was given a deed to show the car was hers."
С2/-- definitive(ly) - окончательный (​final; not able to be changed)
      definitive(ly) - наиболее полный подробный, исчерпывающий, авторитетный, see also: authoritative: If something is definitive, then it is the most official. "This library has the definitive collection of books on ancient Egypt."
C2/C1 delicate (delicacy - хрупкость, изящество, деликатес, осторожность, нежность), see also: tender
TODO delicate, see also: fluid
TODO delicate, see also: fragile
C1/B1 deliver: To deliver something is to take it from one place to another. "The man delivered Chinese food to my house."
C2/-- demolish
--/C1 denounce - доносить, сдавать (to tell the police, the authorities, etc. about somebody’s illegal political activities)
--/C1 denounce - осуждать, порицать, выступать против (to strongly criticize somebody/something that you think is wrong, illegal, etc.), see also: condemn
      denunciation - публичное осужение, порицание (an act of criticizing sb/sth strongly in public), see also: disapproval
C2/C1 dependence, B2/B2 dependent, B1/A2 depend, C2/-- reliant (reliance) / --/C1 autonomy, --/C1 sovereign, B2/B2 independence, B2/B2 independent, unaffiliated, see also: discrete:
        dependence is a situation in which somebody relies on something else. "Young children have a dependence on their parents."
        To depend on someone or something is to need them. "Children depend on their parents for many things."
        independence is the state of being free from the control of others. "After leaving home, Sophia had a great feeling of independence."
        If something is independent, it is not controlled by something else. "She chose to live an independent life in the country."
C2/C1 dependence (also dependency), dependent, B2/B2 addict(ive, ed): A dependency is a strong need for someone or something. "The child still has a dependency on her mother."
                                                                      An addict is a person who cannot stop doing or having something. "She was a coffee addict. She had more than three cups each day."
C2/C1 deposit, B2/B2 invest(or, ment): To deposit something is to put it into a place or another thing. "I deposited the money into my bank account."
									   To invest means to use money in a way that will bring a profit later. "I invested money in a new building that should bring me a profit."
C2/-- deprivation, B2/C1 deprive, see also: forfeit: To deprive someone of something means to not let them have it. "Because the child was bad, she was deprived of her dessert after dinner."
C1/-- deprived, disadvantaged
C1/C1 deputy - заместитель, представитель: A deputy is the second-highest-ranking person in a business or government. "While the sheriff was ill, the deputy took over his duties."
C2/-- descendant, C2/-- heir / B2/B2 ancestor (ancestral - наследственный, ancestry - родословная, происхождение, lineage - род, родословная, descent - происхождение, antecedent - предок (formal), forebear - предок (formal), C2/C1 heritage - наследие, корни; C2/C1 legacy - наследие; наследство; C2/-- inheritance - наследство, наследственные характеристики, наследование:
        An heir is a person who receives money or property of someone who dies. "The princess was the heir to the king and queen’s throne."
        An ancestor is a family member from the past. "My ancestors came from Germany."
        A person’s ancestry is the series of people from whom a person descended. "We studied our ancestry and found out that we are related to royalty."
        heritage is the collection of features of a society, such as language and religion. "Teepees are part of the heritage of the American Indians of the plains."
        A legacy is an effect that exists because of a person or thing in the past. "The legacy of the ancient Egyptians can be seen in their monuments."
B2/C1 descend (--/C1 descent); condescend(ing(ly), condescension) - снизойти (usually humorous), deign (disapproving) / ascend (ascent):
		To descend is to go downward. "I descended the stairs to get out of the building."
        A descent is a movement downwards. "During the space shuttle’s descent, the Earth became larger and larger."
C1/C1 decisive(ly) - решительный, see also: tenacious, resolute: If someone is decisive, they make decisions quickly. "Our boss is very decisive, so it did not take long to organize the project." / indecisive - нерешительный ((of a person) unable to make decisions: "a weak and indecisive man", "Some blame indecisive leadership for the party’s failure at the polls.")
B2/C1 decisive(ly, ness) - решающий, see also: core, conclusive
C1/-- destiny, B2/C1 fate, superstition (superstitious(ly)), coincidence, fortune, luck, charm, amulet, talisman, mascot, see also: portent:
        A destiny is all the things that happen or will happen to a person in their life. "It was his destiny to become a great singer."
        fate is a power that causes some things to happen. "Some people believe that a person's hand can tell their fate."
        A superstition is something magical that people believe is real. "It is a superstition that Friday the 13th is an unlucky day."
      deter - сдерживать, удерживать (to make sb decide not to do sth or continue doing sth, especially by making them understand the difficulties and unpleasant results of their actions: "These measures are designed to deter an enemy attack.", "High prices are deterring many young people from buying houses.", "I told him I wasn't interested, but he wasn't deterred.", "The high price of the service could deter people from seeking advice."), see also: constrain, dissuade, discourage, TODO (prevent? hinder? impede? inhibit?) / encourage (TODO)
        To deter means to prevent or discourage someone from doing something. "Icy roads deter people from driving their cars."
      deterrence - сдерживание (the fact of making sb less likely to do sth: "They believed in the principle of nuclear deterrence.", "His view is that prison sentences must be long enough to satisfy the requirements both of retribution and deterrence.")
      deterrent - сдерживающий (making sb less likely to do sth: "They were arguing about the deterrent effect of nuclear weapons.")
C2/-- deterrent - сдерживающий фактор (sth that makes sb less likely to do sth (= that deters them): "a nuclear deterrent", "a deterrent against cheating", "Tougher prison sentences may act/serve as a deterrent to other would-be offenders."): constraint, impediment, obstacle, snag, check (LIMIT)
C1/B1 determine; (B2/B1 determined, B2/B2 determination, purposeful(ly, ness) - целеустремлённый), B1/A2 decision, decisiveness, C2/B2 resolve (see also: settle), C2/B2 resolution, headstrong, resolute, see also: decisive, tenacious / irresolute:
        To determine means to choose or make a decision. "She tried to determine which one to eat first.
        A decision is a choice. "He made the wrong decision."
        To resolve something means to find a solution. "She resolved the problem with her children by giving them both a toy."
        A resolution is a personal decision. "At New Year, I made a list of resolutions to help me have a better year."
C1/C1 devastate(d), B2/C1 smash(ing) (разбить вдребезги), --/C1 shatter, C1/B2 crash, C2/-- wreck, C2/B2 ruin(s), C2/C1 crush, B1/A2 destroy, B1/B1 damage, B2/B2 harm(ful(ly, ness), B1/B2 spoil, less(ly, ness)), devour (literary), see also: level, mangle:
        To devastate something means to completely destroy it. "The entire wall was devastated."
        To crash means to hit and break something. "There was a loud noise when the car crashed into the tree."
        To smash something is to break it into many small pieces. "Jacob smashed the window with a rock."
        To shatter something means to break it suddenly into many tiny pieces. "When the ball hit the window, the glass shattered."
        To wreck something means to destroy or ruin it. "The teenagers wrecked the house for no reason at all."
        To ruin something means to harm or damage it greatly. "Our walk in the park was ruined by the sudden rain."
        ruins are old buildings that are not used anymore. "I visited some interesting ruins in Greece."
        To crush something is to press it together so its shape is destroyed. "Selena's new car was crushed when something fell on top of it."
        To destroy means to damage something so badly that it cannot be used. "The glass was destroyed."
        To damage something is to break it. "The car was damaged in the accident."
        harm is hurt or problems caused to someone or something. "A hot iron can cause great harm if you are not careful."
      devastation, depredation (formal), desolation (EMPTINESS), B2/B2 destruction, C2/B2 ruin; havoc, mayhem, see also: blight:
        destruction is damage to something so bad that it can't be fixed. "After the big fire, there was much destruction in the city."
С2/A2 develop: seizure - a very sudden attack of an illness in which someone becomes unconscious or develops violent movements
C2/C1 devil, see also: spirit: The devil is a powerful evil spirit in some religions. "The church promised protection from the devil."
C2/C1 diagnose - диагностировать: To diagnose someone means to identify the medical condition they have. "Several of the children were diagnosed with the flu."
C2/-- dialect, B1/B2 accent, see also: bilingual: A dialect is a regional variety of language showing where you are from. "People from U.K. have a different dialect of English from those in the U.S.A."
                                                  An accent is a certain way of speaking that shows where a person is from. "The new teacher’s accent was clearly a German one."
C2/-- dice (на кубики), C2/C1 carve (see also: inscribe, engrave, etc.), B2/B1 slice (на пластинки), B2/B2 chop (нарубить), cleave:
        To carve means to cut into something. "My father usually carves the turkey for Thanksgiving."
        To engrave means to cut a design or words into the surface of something. "The couple engraved their names onto the old pine tree."
        To chop something means to cut it into pieces with a tool. "Mom chopped some vegetables to put into the stew."
C2/-- dice (кубик, в т.ч. игральный), C1/B2 portion, --/C1 chunk, hunk, B2/B1 slice, B1/B1 section, A2/A1 piece, fragment, shard, splinter, sliver (see also: pinch, touch, dash); C2/B2 fraction, speckle, speck, fleck, mote, see also: scrap, chip, pellet; C2/-- lump (see also: clot, mass); benign/malignant tumour (US tumor):
        A portion of something is a part of it. "I only ate a small portion of the pizza."
        A chunk is a thick, solid piece of something. "When they broke open the rock, they saw it was filled with chunks of gold."
        A slice is a piece from something larger, such as a cake. "The girl enjoyed a slice of cake at her birthday party."
        A section is a part of something larger. "The green section of the graph is the most important part."
        A fragment is a small part of something. "After the light broke, there were fragments of glass to clean up."
        A fraction is a small part of something. "Only a fraction of the cake was gone."
        A lump is a small piece of something that is solid. "The artist took a lump of clay and turned it into a beautiful pot."
        A speck is a very small mark or amount. "A speck of blood appeared where the mosquito bit him."
C1/C1 dictate: To dictate something is to read it aloud so it can be written down. "He dictated his speech so his secretary could write it down."
--/C1 dictator(ial(ly), ship), despot(ic(ally), ism), autocrat(ic(ally), -cy), tyrant(-nical, -ny, -nize):
		A tyranny is a cruel and unfair government in which one person has power. "His tyranny was impossible to live under."
        A tyrant is someone who treats people in a cruel, harsh, and unfair way. "Our boss is a tyrant. He makes us work long hours for little pay."
C2/C1 dignity, dignified, B2/B2 decent(ly) - достояный, приличный, порядочный, see also: genteel, noble, B2/C1 courtesy, C1/?? self-respect, C1/?? self-esteem / indecent - непристойный:
        dignity is the ability to be calm and worthy of respect. "When his company went out of business, he faced it with dignity."
        When something is decent, it is OK or good enough. "Eric did a decent job painting the fence."
        courtesy is the excellence of manners or social conduct. "Jenna always behaves with great courtesy when people visit her home."
      dignify - удостаивать, отметить, почтить (to cause sth to be respected and considered important), see also: honor: "The mayor was there to dignify the celebrations."
      dignify - удостаивать ('m not even going to dignify that stupid question with an answer.)
C2/-- dim(ly, ness) - not giving or having much light (тусклый; полутёмный, мрачный): When something is dim, it does not give out much light. "Working in a dim room is bad for your eyes."
C2/-- dim(ly, ness) - смутный, нечёткий, расплывчатый (формы, очертания), C1/-- vague(ly, ness), indistinct(ly), hazy (hazily), see also: murk(y), inarticulate(ly)
C2/-- dim(ly, ness) - смутный, нечёткий, расплывчатый (воспоминания), C2/C1 vague(ly, ness): vague notion - смутное представление, indistinct(ly), hazy (hazily)
        If something is vague, it is not clear, and it gives very few details. "I asked him about his mother’s health, but he was very vague about it."
      dim(ly, ness) - слабый (о зрении)
      dim (of light, feelings, etc) - гаснуть, гасить, приглушить
B2/C1 dimension, B2/B2 aspect, nuance, nicety (niceties - тонкости), intricacy, see also: shade, subtlety, the ins and outs, the nuts and bolts (of sth): "They spent a lot of time arguing about legal niceties.", "We don't bother with all the social niceties here.":
		An aspect is one part or feature of something. "I thought about the different aspects of owning two dogs."
B2/A2 disaster, C2/-- catastrophe, B2/B2 tragedy, B1/B1 emergency, B2/B2 crisis, calamity, cataclysm (formal), on the edge of a precipice, see also: blow, trouble, misfortune, chaos, see also: distress:
        A disaster is a really bad thing that happens. "When the car crashed, it was a disaster."
        A catastrophe is an unexpected event that causes great suffering or damage. "It was a catastrophe for my family when my dad lost his job."
        A tragedy is a very sad event. "It was a tragedy when his house was struck by lightning and burned."
        An emergency is a time when someone needs help right away. "There is a huge fire in my house! This is an emergency!"
		A crisis is a situation that is extremely stressful or dangerous. "The airport workers’ strike led to a crisis at the airport."
C1/C1 disastrous, catastrophic, C2/B2 tragic(ally), B2/C1 fatal (also C2/C1 lethal, mortal), C2/-- devastating
        When something is tragic, it is connected with death and suffering. "The airplane crashed in a tragic accident."
        If something is fatal, it causes death. "They passed away in a fatal car crash."
--/C1 discharge - увольнять (из армии, полиции)
--/C1 discharge - выписать (из больницы, госпиталя): To discharge someone is to allow them to leave from a place, usually a hospital. "I was discharged from the hospital after three days."
      discharge - освободить (из тюрьмы)
      discharge - сброс, выброс
      discharge - сбрасывать, C2/-- emit (C1/B2 emission) - излучать, испускать, выделять, издавать, radiate - излучать, сиять, лучиться, spew - изрыгвть, give off sth - испускать, выделять, give sth <-> out
        To radiate means to send out energy or heat. "The heat from the fireplace radiated throughout the room."
TODO discharge
C2/-- discipline - дисциплина (предмет), see also: subject
B2/B2 discipline - дисциплина (поведение) / indiscipline, delinquency: discipline is training that helps people follow the rules. "One of the teacher’s jobs is to teach her students discipline."
C2/C1 disclose, see also: reveal, manifest
--/C1 disclosure (formal) - раскрытие, разглашение (the act of making something known or public that was previously secret or private), see also: revelation: "the newspaper’s disclosure of defence secrets", "The bank will need full disclosure of your financial situation and assets."
--/C1 disclosure (formal) - раскрытие, разглашение (information or a fact that is made known or public that was previously secret or private), see also: revelation: "startling disclosures about his private life", "The newspaper made damaging disclosures of management incompetence."

TODO:
C1/C1 frustrate(d, -ing, -ion) - расстраивать, огорчать, B2/B2 bitter(ly), B2/B1 upset, B1/B2 disappoint(ed), dissatisfied, disgruntled, see also: crestfallen
        To frustrate is to prevent someone from fulfilling their desire. "The machine frustrated me because I could not fix it."
        When a person is bitter, they are upset with someone or a situation. "He was extremely bitter when his computer crashed."
        To be upset is to be unhappy about something. "She was upset because she broke her toy."
        To disappoint is to make one feel sad or unsatisfied. "I do not want to disappoint my family, so I try to do well at school."
        If you are dissatisfied, you are not happy with something. "I was dissatisfied with their decision to work on Sunday."
        To dissatisfy someone means to fail to please them. "He was dissatisfied with his meal."
      frustrate - расстраивать, срывать (планы и т.д.), see also: foil, prevent, undermine, disrupt
C1/-- discontent, B2/-- dissatisfaction; B2/-- dissatisfied, disgruntled

      discrete(ly) - отдельный, see also: separate, independent
С2/-- discreet(ly) - осмотрительный, рассудительный, сдержанный (marked by prudence or modesty and wise self-restraint), circumspect (formal), C2/-- tact(ful(ly)) - тактичный, restrained - сдержанный (not showy or obtrusive), restraint - сдержанный, see also: sound / indiscreet, tactless, C1/-- insensitive:
        tact is the ability to avoid offending people when dealing with problems. "Since both sides would not agree, it required someone with tact to make peace."
C2/C1 discretion - осмотрительность (at sb’s discretion - на усмотрение кого-л.; discretion is the better part of valour (saying) - нормальные герои всегда идут в обход), see also: caution / indiscretion
--/C1 discretion - свобода выбора
C2/-- discriminate, C2/C1 differentiate, B2/B2 distinguish(able), B1/B2 compare, see also: gap, contrast:
        To distinguish is to recognize differences between things. "The twins look exactly the same. It is hard to distinguish between them."
        To differentiate things or people is to show the difference between them. "It was hard to differentiate between the identical twins."
        To discriminate means to judge people according to their looks. "They discriminated against her because she was different."
		To compare means to say how two things are the same and different. "If you compare cats and dogs, you'll see that they're both good pets."
C1/C1 discrimination - дискриминация (the practice of treating somebody or a particular group in society less fairly than others: "age/racial/gender/sex discrimination", "discrimination against the elderly", "discrimination in favour of the young", "to prohibit/outlaw/ban discrimination on the basis/grounds of race, gender or sexual orientation", "They alleged discrimination by the authorities."), favouritism
      discrimination (approving) - проницательность (the ability to judge what is good, true, etc.: "He showed great discrimination in his choice of friends."), see also: discernment
C2/-- disguise, camouflage: A disguise is something you wear so people cannot tell who you are. "Everyone knew that it was Dad in the Santa disguise."
                            camouflage is something used to hide people and things. "The green and brown camouflage was best used for hiding in forests and jungles."
--/B2 dismiss(al) - отбросить/выкинуть (из головы) страхи/мысли/..
C1/B2 dismiss(al) - отвергать, wave sth <-> aside/away - отмахнуться, C1/C1 dismissal - отвергание, игнорирование, spurn - отвергать (с презрением), see also: disprove, refute, overturn, reject:
        To dismiss something is to say it is not important. "He quickly dismissed my idea about a new project."
C1/C1 dismiss - уволить, отпустить, B2/B1 fire (US), B2/C1 sack (UK), C1/C1 dismissal - увольнение
C1/C1 displace - заменить (to take the place of sb/sth: "Gradually factory workers have been displaced by machines.", "Contemporary technoscience has largely displaced these early thermodynamic principles."), see also: replace
C1/C1 displace - вытеснить, сместить (to force something out of its usual or original position): "The blow displaced the woman's eardrum and left her partially deaf.", supplant (formal)
--/C1 displace - вытеснить, переместить, переселить, see also: exile, uproot: "Around 10 000 people have been displaced by the fighting.", " If the dam is built it will displace 100 000 people."
B2/C1 disposal - избавление, утилизация
B2/-- disposal (at sb's disposal - в чьём-л. распоряжении)
--/C1 dispose - расположить (to arrange things or people in a particular way or position), see also: sequence, dispose, classify
      dispose - распололагать, склонять (лекартсво распололает/склоняет ко сну; располагать дружелюбно к кому-л. и т.д.)
C1/C1 dispose of sb/sth - избавиться, C1/B2 rid, C2/B2 dump, see also: scrap, ditch: To dispose of something means to get rid of it. (to kill): "He disposed of the can by throwing it into the recycle bin."
                                                                                     To rid is to make a place free from something or someone. "We rid our home of mice by using traps."
                                                                                     To dump something means to throw it away or get rid of it. "She dumped the garbage into the trash can."
C2/-- ​disposed (to do sth) - быть расположенным/склонным к чему-либо, see also: partial
      disposed to/towards sb/sth - относиться к .. (хорошо, плохо и т.д.)
C2/-- disposition, temperament, see also: attitude
      disposition (formal) - склонность, предрасположенность (a natural tendency to do sth, or to have or develop sth: "to have/show a disposition towards violence", "a disposition to deceive", "Do people have a natural disposition to be good?"), see also: partiality
      disposition - расположение, сочетание, организация (the way something is placed or arranged: "a cheerful disposition of colors and textures", "a convoy oriented into a north-south disposition."), see also: arrangement (TODO)
C2/C1 dissolve - растворять, dilute = water down - разбавлять (в т.ч. figurative): To dissolve something is to mix it into a liquid and disappear. "I dissolved the pill in a glass of water."
--/C1 distort - искажать, искривлять, деформировать, contort(ed, ion) - искажать, deform(ed, ation), misshapen = deformed, skew, see also twist, warp, see also: mangle
        To deform something means to change it from its correct or original shape. "The computer program deformed the building’s picture into an unreal sight."
        If something is deformed, it is not shaped normally and may appear ugly. "Even though the carrot was deformed, it was still safe to eat."
--/C1 distort - искажать, перевирать, --/C1 manipulate, fix (informal), see also: deceive, rig, forge
        To distort something means to lie about it. "His lawyer distorted the facts so that he would be set free."
        To manipulate something means to skillfully or unfairly control or affect it. "The Dr. manipulated the data to make it look like the cure was working."
C2/C1 distress - стресс, расстройство, эмоциональное страдание, B2/B1 worry (A2/A2 worried), fret(ful(ly)) - беспокоиться, волноваться, preoccupation; B2/B2 panic, unsettle, fret, distraught, see also: nerves, perturb, trouble, alarm:
		distress is the feeling of being upset or worried. "Failing a class caused the student a lot of distress."
        To panic is to feel so nervous or afraid that you cannot think clearly. "Everyone panicked when the house caught on fire."
        To unsettle someone means to make them anxious or worried. "The dark clouds in the sky unsettled Beth."
C2/C1 distress - трудности, тяготы, лишения, C1/-- hardship, see also: plight
C2/C1 distress - бедствие, C2/-- dismay, C2/B2 alarm, consternation, see also: emergency
        An alarm is something that warns people of danger. "When the students heard the fire alarm, they left the building."
C1/C1 disrupt - срывать, прерывать, rupture, B2/B2 interrupt(ion), see also: prevent, foil, undermine, frustrate:
        To disrupt something or someone is to prevent them from working. "The loud crash disrupted the class lecture."
        To interrupt is to briefly stop someone when they are doing something. "My mother interrupted me when I was trying to listen to music."
C1/C1 disruption - неудобство, нарушение, сбой, перебои (a situation in which it is difficult for sth to continue in the normal way; the act of stopping sth from continuing in the normal way: "disruptions to rail services", "The strike caused serious disruptions.", "The accident brought widespread disruption on the roads.")
C2/C1 disruptive(ly) - разрушительный (causing problems, noise, etc. so that sth cannot continue normally: "She had a disruptive influence on the rest of the class.", "His teacher described him as a noisy, disruptive influence in class.")
      disruptive(ly) - прорывной, революционный (new and original, in a way that causes major changes to how something is done: "Printing in 3D is a disruptive technology which may transform manufacturing.", "Innovative and disruptive companies are changing the service economy."), see also: groundbreaking
C2/C1 disturbing, B2/-- worrying, B2/-- distressing, B1/-- troubling, C1/-- alarming / C1/-- reassuring(ly) - обнадёживающий
      diverge - отклоняться ( to be or become different from what is expected, planned, etc.: "to diverge from the norm", "He diverged from established procedure.")
      diverge - отклоняться (to separate and go in different direction: "Many species have diverged from a single ancestor.", "The coastal road diverges from the freeway just north of Santa Monica."), see also: stray
      diverge - расходиться (to separate and go in different directions: "It is thought that the two species diverged about 130 million years ago.", "We went through school and college together, but then our paths diverged.", ), bifurcate (formal) - разделяться (​(of roads, rivers, etc.) to divide into two separate parts: "A sample of water was taken from the point where the river bifurcates.")
      diverge - расходиться, отличаться ((of opinions, views, etc.) to be different: "Opinions diverge greatly on this issue.", "This country’s interests diverge considerably from those of other countries."), see also: differ
C2/C1 divert - отклонить, перенаправить, stray - отклониться, сбиться (с пути), отбиться (от группы), deviate, see also: distract, diverge:
        To stray means to go in a wrong direction and often become lost. "He found himself lost because he had strayed from the tour group."
--/C1 divine (божественный), deity, heavenly (небесный, heavenly bodies = the sun, moon, stars and planets), celestial (небесный, неземной, божественный), terrestrial (земной, наземный, сухопутный; lunar, solar), extraterrestrial (внеземной), aerial (воздушный, see also: airborne):
        When something is divine, it is related to gods. "Legends say that music was given to men as a divine gift from the gods."
        If something is celestial, it is related to the sky or to outer space. "Comets are celestial objects that are rarely seen."
        If something is terrestrial, it relates to Earth. "There are billions of terrestrial life forms."
        If something is lunar, then it is related to the moon. "During a lunar eclipse, Earth’s shadow darkens the moon’s surface."
        If something is solar, it is related to the sun. "Using solar energy is good for the environment."
        When something is aerial, it relates to being in the air or flying. "The aerial photographer took pictures from the air balloon."
B2/B2 dominate (C2/C1 dominance, C1/B2 dominant) - доминировать: To dominate someone or something is to control them. "The loud man dominated the conversation."
                                                                 The dominance of a person is their state of being more powerful than others. "Large gorillas hit their chests to express their dominance over others."
                                                                 When someone or something is dominant, they are stronger than others. "The gorilla is one of the dominant animals in the jungle."
C1/B2 dominate (C2/C1 dominance, C1/B2 dominant) - преобладать, predominate (C2/C1 predominant); C2/-- paramount (formal), C2/C1 prevail(ing) (see also overwhelm), preponderant (-ce, preponderate), overriding (override), --/C1 prevalent(-ce), rife (see also: teeming (with), infest), see also essential, substantial, principal; C1/C1 triumph:
        If something is predominant, then it is the most important, common or strongest. "Before cars were invented, horses were the predominant method of travel."
        When something is paramount, it is more important than anything else. "The safety of passengers must be paramount when designing a car."
        To prevail means to be accepted or very common. "Unfortunately, injustice still prevails in the country’s court system."
        When something is prevalent, it is common. "Growing a beard is more prevalent behavior in men than women."
        If a place is rife with something bad, it is very common in that place. "This part of the country is rife with disease."
        triumph is what you feel when you win or finish something. "He raised the award in triumph at the end of his speech."
C1/B1 donate, see also: contribute, gift: To donate is to give something to a charity or organization. "We donate money to Christmas charities every year."
C2/C1 donor - даритель, benefactor, benefactress: A benefactor is a person who gives money to help someone. "The student's benefactor gave him money to spend on his studies."
C2/C1 donor - донор: A donor is somebody who gives something to an organization. "He was proud to be a blood donor."
B2/C1 dose: A dose is a certain amount of medicine that you take at one time. "My mother gave me a dose of medicine before I went to bed."
C2/C1 drain, C2/C1 leak: A drain is a pipe that carries away water from a building, such as in a kitchen. "The water in the sink goes down the drain as you wash your hands."
                         To leak is to let a liquid or gas pass through a flaw. "The pipe leaks from many places."
C2/A2 draw(ing)
TODO draw
C2/C1 drift, C2/B2 wander (wanderer - скиталец, wanderlust - жажда путешествий), ramble (rambler - бродяга), roam (roaming), rove (rover (literary) - скиталец), slog (informal), stray, tramp, plod, see also: trudge:
        To drift means to be moved slowly by wind or water. "The large chunk of ice drifted in the water."
        To wander is to walk without going to a certain place. "The boys like to wander in the woods and look at birds."
        To roam means to move around without a plan or purpose. "All day the cows roamed around the field eating grass."
TODO drift, waft (see also: blow?)?, permeate?
C2/-- drive - приводить в движение, propel (propulsion - тяга), : To propel something means to push or move it somewhere. "The strong wind propelled the leaf through the air and across the street."
                                  		 						propulsion is the force that moves something forward. "The propulsion lifted the rocket into the sky."
TODO drive
C1/B1 drop, drip (dribble), bead (капля, бусина); beads (бусики), necklace (ожерелье), pendant (кулон):
        To drop is to fall or allow something to fall. "A small amount of water dropped from the bottle."
        When a liquid drips, just a little bit falls at a time. "I heard water dripping from the faucet."
        A bead is a drop of liquid. "beads of water collected outside the glass."
        A necklace is a piece of jewelry that people wear around their necks. "Joyce received a lovely pearl necklace for her wedding anniversary."
B2/C1 drown, drowning: To drown is to die from not being able to breathe underwater. "He would have drowned if the sailors would not have rescued him."
--/C1 dub - прозвать, окрестить
--/C1 dub - продублировать (фильм)
C2/-- due - owed as a debt or as a right, C2/B2 owe: To owe is to have to pay or give back something received from another. "I owed him twenty dollars, so I paid him back."
C1/-- due - be due (for) sth = expect to receive it, because you deserve it: "I'm still due 15 days' leave.", "She's due for promotion soon."
B1/B2 due - expected (in due course (formal) - в должное время (at the right time and not before): "You will receive notification of the results in due course."):
		When something is due, it is expected to happen or be done at that time. "The papers were due on the 19th."
B1/B1 due - caused by (also: because of, as a result of, on account of, stems from): "The team's success was largely due to her efforts."
C1/C1 dumb - онемевший (see also: mute); тупой (глупый), B1/B2 blind; (as) blind as a bat; B1/-- deaf (deafen - оглушать):
		If someone is dumb, they are unable to speak. "She did not share the secret. She remained silent as if she were dumb."
        When people are blind, they cannot see. "The blind man didn't see the hole and almost fell in."
        When someone is deaf, they cannot hear. "Susan was born deaf."
C2/C1 dynamic, B2/C1 intensive(ly), B2/-- energetic, boisterous, vigorous(ly), B2/B2 vital (C2/-- vitally), C2/-- vivacious(ly, vivacity), C2/-- animated(ly), B1/B2 lively(-iness), exuberant(-ce), C1/-- hectic, see also: vibrant(ly, -cy), see also: talkative / lethargic, listless(ly, ness), torpid(ly), languorous(ly) (literary), languor - приятственная ленивость
        When people are dynamic, they are lively and have creative ideas. "The new, dynamic employee came up with a good way to juggle his work load."
        If something or someone is vigorous, they use a lot of energy. "Henry uses vigorous exercise to keep himself in shape."
        If someone is vivacious, they are talkative and cheerful. "Everyone at the party was very vivacious and having a good time."
        If someone is lively, they have a lot of energy. "Jennifer is very lively: she’s always running and playing."
      dynamics - динамика: The dynamics of a situation are the way that parts of it affect each other. "A good psychologist needs to know a lot about the dynamics of brain disorders."
C2/A2 earn (B2/C1 earnings), B1/B2 deserve: To earn means to get money for the work you do. "He earns his living as a chef in a great restaurant."
                                            To deserve is to be worthy of something as a result of one's actions. "The dog deserved a bone for behaving very well."
B2/C1 earnings, B1/A2 salary, B1/A2 pay, B1/B2 wage, remuneration, B2/B2 income, C1/B2 revenue, ​receipts (поступления), see also: the bottom line:
        A salary is how much money a person makes at his or her job. "He got a new job with a better salary."
        A wage is the money that a person gets for doing a job. "The wages I receive from my job are really great!"
        income is how much money a person or business makes. "Her company pays her a fairly good income."
        revenue is the income made by a company. "The new products really increased the business’s monthly revenue."
C2/C1 echo, reverberate (раскатисто звучать, "вибрировать"; отражаться, в т.ч. в переносном смысле - сказываться, иметь долгий и/или обширный эффект):
        To echo means that a sound repeats itself because it bounced off an object. "The child yelled over the canyon, and the wall echoed the sound."
C1/-- ecology, ecosystem, the biosphere, see also: environment: ecology is the study of the environment and living things. "We study ecology to learn how to help improve the Earth."
																An ecosystem is a group of plants and animals in an area. "The river's ecosystem not only includes fish but other insects and plants."
																The biosphere is the earth’s surface and atmosphere where there are living things. "Birds, trees, and worms all thrive in the biosphere."
B2/-- economical(ly) - экономичный (using no more of something than is necessary: "an economical car to run (= one that does not use too much petrol)", "an economical use of space", "What's the most economical way of heating this building?"), see also: efficient(ly) / uneconomical, see also: inefficient(ly)
B2/-- economical(ly) - бережливый, экономный (not spending more money than necessary: "He was economical in all areas of his life."), sparing(ly), frugal(ly) - бережливый, экономный
C1/-- edible, eatable / C1/-- inedible, uneatable: If something is edible, you can eat it. "We learn about edible plants when we go camping."
C1/C1 effectiveness, B2/C1 efficiency, efficacy (formal) - эффективность, действенность (the ability, especially of a medicine or a method of achieving something, to produce the intended result: "to evaluate the efficacy and safety of the treatment", "They recently ran a series of tests to measure the efficacy of the drug.", "The clinical report shows results of almost 95% efficacy for the vaccine.") / inefficientness, inefficiency
C2/B1 effective(ly), B1/B2 efficient(ly), see also: economical(ly) / C1/-- inefficient(ly), see also: uneconomical:
		If something is effective, it works well. "Swimming is an effective way to stay healthy."
        If something or someone is efficient, they do not waste energy. "My car is very efficient. I rarely have to buy gas."
--/C1 ego - самолюбие: An ego is a person’s sense of their own worth. "Kelly’s ego made her think that she was some kind of a superhero."
--/C1 ego - эго (PSYCHOLOGY)
C2/C1 elaborate, C1/B2 clarify, A2/A1 explain, elucidate, expound (formal), expatiate (formal dissaproving), see also: articulate / obscure (obscurity - неясность; темнота), obfuscate (formal), confused
        To clarify means to make something easier to understand by explaining it. "Drew tried to clarify all the functions of Michelle’s new computer."
C2/C1 elaborate(ly), intricate(ly) - замысловатый, запутанный, витиеватый, ornate - витиеватый:
        When something is elaborate, it contains a lot of details. "She gave the teacher an elaborate explanation of her project."
        When something is intricate, it has many small parts or details. "The intricate painting on the quilt was very lovely."
        If something is ornate, it is decorated with a lot of fancy things. "Kim’s prom dress was very expensive since it was so ornate."
C2/B2 elder(ly): An elder is a person who is older than the people around them. "Uncle Ray is my elder so I always try to be respectful."
--/C1 elevate, B1/A2 raise (see aslo: nurture), B1/A2 lift, hoist: To elevate something is to put it at a higher level. "The man elevated the picture so he could see it better."
                                                             	   To raise something is to lift it up. "We had to work together to raise the last piece."
                                                             	   To lift something is to move it higher. "The man tried to lift the box."
C1/C1 eligible (eligibility) / ineligible (ineligibility) : If someone is eligible, then they are permitted to do or have something. "Only people who bought tickets were eligible to win a prize."
C1/B2 eliminate - устранить, TODO remove, dispose etc: To eliminate something that is unwanted means to completely remove it. "Wearing a seatbelt eliminates some of the dangers of driving a car."
C1/C1 eliminate - исключить из рассмотрения (подозреваемых, причины и т.д.)
C1/C1 eliminate - выбить из соревнований, knock sb <-> out (of sth)
--/C1 embark(ation), B1/B1 board / disembark(ation), see also: alight: A board is a flat piece of wood. "The sign was made of a few wooden boards."
C2/B2 embrace, B1/-- hug, cuddle, enclose (figurative), enfold (literary): To embrace is to hug. "When they saw each other again, the happy couple embraced."
C2/B2 embrace, B2/A2 accept: To accept something that is offered is to take it. "I accepted the girl's very nice gift."
C1/B2 emerge - появиться, стать известным ((of facts, ideas, etc.) to become known), see also: transpire
B2/B2 emerge - появиться, всплыть, выйти, resurface, see also: manifest, appear / B2/C1 dip, submerge (submersion), immerse (immersion), see also: sink:
        To emerge from something means to come out of it. "The hand suddenly emerged from the grave."
        To dip something is to put part of it into a liquid for a short time. "Laurel dipped her strawberry into the chocolate."
        To sink into something is to slowly fall into it. "The boat had a hole in it, and it sank into the ocean."
        To submerge something means to put it below the surface of a liquid. "The whale submerged its huge body into the ocean."
B2/B2 emerge - пройти (выйти из) трудный период (to come to the end of a difficult period or experience): "The Prince emerged unscathed from the scandal."
C1/-- emperor, empress; monarch; pharaoh, see also: realm: An emperor is the leader of a group of countries. "The emperor Julius Caesar was in control of ancient Rome."
                                                           The monarch of a country is the king, queen, emperor, or empress. "The monarch lived in a beautiful palace with a grand gate."
                                                           A pharaoh was a king in ancient Egypt. "The pharaohs ruled Egypt for thousands of years."
TODO C1/B2 employ, see also: apply?
B1/A2 employ - нанимать, C1/B2 recruit, B2/B2 hire, see also: commission, contract, charge, engage: To employ someone means to give work to them. "The bookstore employed two full-time clerks."
                                                                                                    To recruit people means to select them to join or work for an organization. "We successfully recruited someone to be the new manager."
                                                                                                    To hire someone is to pay them money to work for you. "We hired a man to paint our house."
--/C1 enact(ment) - ввести, принять (закон, санкции, решение и т.д.): To enact something means to make it into a law. "The council enacted a law that would only allow buses to drive downtown."
      enact(ment) - to perform; re-enact(ment) - воссоздать, реконструировать
      enact (be enacted) - разыграться (to take place), play sth <-> out: "They seemed unaware of the drama being enacted a few feet away from them."
C1/-- enclose - окружать, огораживать, B1/B2 surround(ing), B2/B2 wrap, fringe, envelop (literary), enfold (literary):
        To enclose something is to contain it. "The cows in the field were enclosed by a fence."
        To surround something is to close in on it from all sides. "We surrounded the suspect on all four sides."
        To wrap is to cover something on all sides. "I wrapped his gift and put a bow on it."
C1/-- enclose - прилагать, включать, B1/B1 attach
C2/C1 endorse(ment), see also: compliment, favourable
C2/-- endurance, C1/-- stamina, staying power - выносливость, запас сил
      disengage - освободить(ся), вывести/выйти из сцепления (to become physically separated from sth, or to make two things become physically separated):
        "to disengage the clutch",
        "We saw the booster rockets disengage and fall into the sea.",
        "The door was disengaged from one of its hinges."
        "She gently disengaged herself from her sleeping son."
      disengage - отключить (to switch off the control of sth): "The autopilot had been disengaged."
      disengage - прекратить боевые действия, отвести войска (if an army disengages or somebody disengages it, it stops fighting and moves away), see also: withdraw
      disengaged - (formal) отстранённый, безрасличный, безучастный, не принимающий участие (not involved with sb/sth or not interested in them/it):
        "disengaged students",
        "Her father was emotionally disengaged.",
        "The electorate is becoming increasingly disengaged from politics.",
        "People are becoming disengaged from the democratic process."
      disengagement - разведение сил, вывод войск (the act of stopping fighting and moving away), see also: withdrawal: "the disengagement of forces from the region", "The new president is thought likely to pursue military disengagement."
      disengagement - отстранение, непричастность (the fact of no longer being involved with sb/sth or interested in them/it): "Young people's disengagement from politics is part of a wider trend."
B2/B2 engage - (formal, mainly UK) нанимать, привлекать, пользоваться услугами (to employ someone), see also: commission: "I have engaged a secretary to deal with all my paperwork.", "We will have to engage the services of a translator.", " He was immediately engaged as a consultant.", "Karl Böhm engaged her to sing in Vienna."
C1/B2 engage - (formal) привлечь, захватить и удерживать внимание (to succeed in attracting and keeping somebody’s attention and interest), see also: absorb: "to engage the public/audience/viewer/reader", "The debate about food safety has engaged the whole nation.", "If a book doesn't engage my interest in the first few pages, I don't usually continue reading it.", "It is a movie that engages both the mind and the eye.", "Their pleas failed to engage any sympathy."
      engage (with sth/sb) - (formal) взаимодействовать, контактировать, находить общий язык, see also: associate: "She has the ability to engage with young minds.", "Just stay out of his way as much as possible, and don't engage with him.", "She's an intelligent child but in class she doesn't really engage."
      engage - входить в сцепление (to make one part of a machine fit into and move together with another part of a machine) / disengage: "When the large gear wheel engages (with the smaller one), the mill stone will start to go round.", "One cogwheel engages with the next.", "Engage the clutch before selecting a gear."
      engage - атаковать, вступить в бой (to attack or begin to fight sb): "Enemy planes engaged the troops as they advanced into the mountains.", "He ordered his men to engage the enemy.", "The fleet sailed out of Cadiz to engage with the enemy."
C2/B2 engage in sth | engage sb in sth - (formal) вовлечь, занять(ся), принимать участие (to take part in sth; to make sb take part in sth), see also: participate, involve: "Even in prison, he continued to engage in criminal activities.", "She tried desperately to engage him in conversation.", "The two governments have agreed to engage in a comprehensive dialogue to resolve the problem."
B1/B1 engaged - обручённые (having formally agreed to marry): "They're engaged to be married in June.", "Debbie and Christa have just got engaged.", "She was engaged to some guy in the army.", "She's engaged to Peter."
--/B2 engaged - занятый, увлечённый (чем-л.) (busy doing something; involved with sb/sth in an active and interested way): To engage in something means to do it. "Dad was engaged in sawing a piece of wood in half."
                                                                                                                           "to be engaged in dialogue/discussion/debate"
                                                                                                                           "They were engaged in conversation."
                                                                                                                           "They are engaged in talks with the Irish government."
                                                                                                                           "They've been engaged in a legal battle with the council for several months."
                                                                                                                           "I can't come to dinner on Tuesday—I'm otherwise engaged (= I have already arranged to do something else)."
                                                                                                                           "I'd come to the meeting on Tuesday but I'm afraid I'm otherwise engaged (= doing something else)."
                                                                                                                           "She is actively engaged on several projects."
                                                                                                                           "She's part of a team of scientists who are engaged on/upon cancer research."
                                                                                                                           "Mrs Scott is engaged with a customer at the moment."
B1/-- engaged - занятый (if a phone or public toilet is engaged, someone is already using it): "the engaged tone/signal"
                                                                                               "I've been trying to call him all evening, but I keep getting the engaged tone."
                                                                                               "Every time I call her, she/the phone/the number is engaged."
                                                                                               "I couldn't get through — the line's engaged."
                                                                                               "I phoned earlier but you were engaged (= using your phone)."
                                                                                               "The sign on the toilet door said "Engaged"."

C1/B2 engage, --/C1 engagement:
C2/-- engage in sth | engage sb in sth: "She tried desperately to engage him in conversation.", "Even in prison, he continued to engage in criminal activities."
--/B2 engaged - занимающийся (involved in sth), see also: busy, occupied: To engage in something means to do it. "Dad was engaged in sawing a piece of wood in half."
      engaged (UK) - занятый (If a phone or public toilet is engaged, someone is already using it), see also: busy (US), occupied: "the engaged tone/signal", "I've been trying to call him all evening, but I keep getting the engaged tone.", "Every time I call her, she/the phone/the number is engaged.", "I phoned earlier but you were engaged (= using your phone).", "I couldn't get through—the line's engaged.", "The sign on the toilet door said "Engaged"."
C2/B2 enjoy(able, ment), C2/-- relish, savour (US savor), B2/B1 appreciate, B1/B1 pleasure, luxuriate in, lap sth up, see also: revel in / depreciate:
        To appreciate something is to understand its good qualities. "I can appreciate the lovely scenery."
        pleasure is a feeling of happiness. "The student smiled with pleasure when she received the prize."
C1/-- enrich(ment)
B1/C1 encourage, C1/B2 urge, B1/B1 convince, B1/B1 persuade (persuasion), C2/-- spur, see also: incentivize, reason with sb, exhort:
        To encourage someone is to make them want to do something. "My football coach will encourage us when we are losing."
		To urge someone is to try very hard to get them to do something. "He urged them to believe his story."
        To convince someone means to make them sure of something.  "She convinced me to buy the house."
        To persuade someone is to make them agree to do something. "The children persuaded their parents to buy them gifts."
        persuasion is the act of making someone do or believe something. "The persuasion of his argument convinced the customer to buy the laptop."
        To spur someone means to urge them into action. "The coach’s speech spurred her team into playing the best game of their lives."
C1/C1 enterprise - предприятие: An enterprise is a company or business. "My father owns an advertising enterprise."
C1/C1 enterprise - (рискованное, сложное) предприятие, проект, начинание, C2/C1 venture - (то же, что и enterprise, see also: endeavor), C2/-- undertaking - (the same)
C1/C1 enterprise - предприимчивость, C1/B2 initiative - предприимчивость, инициативность
C1/C1 enterprise - предпринимательство
C2/C1 entity
C2/B1 entrance (C1/B1 enter): An entrance is a place where someone can enter an area. "The gate was locked, so Bill had to find a different entrance."
                              To enter a place is to go into it. "Two guards greeted me as I entered the front door."
TODO entrance
C1/C1 entitle (usually passive) - озаглавить
C1/-- envisage (formal) - представлять (to imagine or expect something in the future, especially something good: "Train fare increases of 15 percent are envisaged for the next year.", "It's envisaged that building will start at the end of this year."), see also: anticipate
      envisage (formal) - представлять (to form a mental picture of something or someone you have never seen: "He wasn't what I'd expected - I'd envisaged someone much taller."), see also: conceive, contrive
B1/B1 equal, B2/B2 identical, selfsame, see also: level: To be equal is to be the same. "Both students are equal in age."
                                        To be identical is to be the same as someone or something else. "James and John are identical twins."
C2/-- equate - приравнивать, отождествлять: To equate one thing with another is to compare them and consider them very similar. "She equated the man’s messy appearance with a lack of responsibility."
C1/C1 equation - приравнивание, уравнивание
C1/C1 equation - уравнение (math), C1/C1 formula: An equation is a math operation to determine the value of something. "I used the Pythagorean theorem to solve the equation."
                                                  A formula is a set mathematical way or method of solving a problem. "I learned a new formula that may help us with our problem."
B2/C1 equality - равенство, see also: equity, just(ice, ly) / C2/C1 inequality - неравенство, inequity (formal) - несправедливость, disparity (formal), see also: injustice
      equity (formal) - справедливость, impartiality, parity, fairness, see also: equality, just(ice, ly)
TODO equity
      equator (usually the equator): The equator is an imaginary line that splits the Earth into north and south. "The equator crosses the northern part of South America."
C1/B2 equivalent - эквивалентный, tantamount to sth (formal), see also: analogous
C1/-- equivalent - эквивалент: An equivalent is an amount or value that is the same as another amount or value. "I worked the equivalent of sixty hours this week."
      equivalence
      equilibrium: equilibrium is the balance between different forces. "The sudden drop in prices upset the equilibrium of the economy."
C2/-- eradicate(-ion) - искоренять, истреблять, exterminate - уничтожать, истреблять, wipe out, see also: uproot
--/C1 erect - поставить, поднять
--/C1 erect - возвигнуть, B2/B2 construct: To erect something means to build it. "The king erected two towers on the north and south sides of his castle."
                                           To construct something means to make or build it. "The men used wood and metal to construct a house."
C2/-- erode (C1/-- erosion) - разрушать(ся), изнашивать(ся), wear sth <-> away, see also: deteriorate: erosion is the destruction of rock or soil due to flowing water or weather. "Canyons are formed because rivers of fast-moving water caused erosion."
C2/-- erode (C2/-- erosion) - разрушать(ся), уменьшать(ся), подрывать, подтачивать, see also: nibble (away) at sth
C2/C1 erupt(ion) - извергаться, volcano, lava: To erupt is for a volcano or something to shoot a hot substance. "The volcano erupted for the first time in ten years."
                                        	   A volcano is a mountain with a hole on top where hot liquid comes out. "When the volcano erupted, smoke and heat filled the air."
                                        	   lava is the hot substance made of melted rock that shoots from volcanoes. "The red hot lava poured from the volcano."
--/C1 erupt(ion), break out - разразиться, вспыхнуть
C1/B1 escape - побег. "They had a narrow escape (= only just avoided injury or death) when their car crashed."
B1/B1 escape - сбежать, C1/C1 flee, fly, evade, B2/A2 avoid, shun, elude (C2/-- elusive(ly, ness)), avert, see also: bolt; dodge, shirk, see also: slip, give sb the slip:
        To escape is to run away from something bad. "The butterfly could not escape from the cage."
        To flee means to run away from trouble or danger. "The crowd of men tried to flee from the danger."
        To avoid something is to stay away from it. "avoid the broken bottle on the floor."
        To elude means to avoid being caught by something. "The rabbit eluded the wolf by hiding in a bush."
        If something or someone is elusive, they are hard to find. "The elusive fish only came out at night."
C1/B2 establish, C2/B2 found(er, ation), B2/B2 institute, see also: constitute: To establish something means to create it. "He wanted to establish a club for people to help the Earth."
                                                          						To found a company or organization means to start it. "The pilgrims founded one of the first colonies in the United States."
                                                          						To found means to bring something into existence. "The pastor founded his church in the countryside."
                                                          						An institute is an organization that is interested in research or teaching. "I am going to a lecture about ancient Rome at the Historical institute."
C1/C1 establishment - истеблишмент (usually the Establishment): "the medical/military/political, etc. establishment", "young people rebelling against the Establishment"
C1/C1 establishment - учреждение, создание
C1/C1 establishment - учреждение, организация, C1/-- premises, B2/C1 institution(al), C1/B2 infrastructure(-al), B1/B2 facilities, compound:
        An institution is an organization that works to help a city or group of people. "Banks are vital institutions that businesses and people use every day."
        An infrastructure is a collection of services needed to run a society or business. "Power lines are important parts of a city’sinfrastructure."
        A facility is a building that exists for a particular purpose. "There are many educational facilities in big cities."
        A compound is an enclosed area such as a prison or factory. "The workers waited outside the compound for the gates to the factory to open."
--/C1 evacuate, empty, see also: leave: To evacuate means to leave a place of danger to a place of safety. "During the flood, many families were evacuated to higher ground."
C1/B2 evaluate(-ion, -ive), C2/B1 measure, C2/B1 judge, B2/B2 assess(ment), appraise(-al). B2/B2 estimate, gauge:
        To evaluate something means to study it, so a decision can be made. "Joe and Ken evaluated the plan and agreed that it would work."
        To measure something means to find out the quality, value, or effect of it. "The scientists carefully measured the amount of chemicals in the tubes."
        To judge something is to say if it is good or bad. "The boy was going to judge how his mother's turkey tasted."
        To assess something means to judge the structure, purpose, or quality of it. "She assessed the condition of the toy car before buying it."
        To estimate something means to make a guess about it. "The boy estimated that he was one meter tall."
C1/B2 even TODO
      even(ly): When something happens evenly, it happens at the same rate of level. "The food was handed out evenly among the hungry people."
      even, C2/A2 flat, B2/B1 / C2/-- uneven: flat describes something that is level and smooth with no curved parts. "My parents bought a new flat screen TV over the weekend."
TODO even / C2/-- uneven
C2/B1 eventual(ly), C2/B2 ultimate(ly), A2/A1 final(ly), C1/B1 after all (в конце концов), B1/-- at (long) last:
		If something is eventual, it will happen at the end of a series of events. "The constant training and planning led the team to an eventual victory."
        When something is ultimate, it is the final result or aim of a long series of events. "By trying hard in school, I will reach my ultimate goal of becoming a doctor."
        If something is final, it is the last part. "In the final part of the film, the man and the woman got married."
        If something happens finally, it happens after a long time or at the end. "He finally crossed the finish line after five hours of running."
C2/B1 ever
TODO ever, B2/B1 forever: ever means at any time. "Going skiing last winter was the most fun I've ever had."
                          If something lasts forever, it means it lasts for all time. "The young couple promised that they would love each other forever."
C1/C1 exaggerate, C1/-- overestimate, magnify, inflate, foreground, overstate, overplay / B2/-- underestimate, understate, downplay:
        To exaggerate is to say that something is bigger or better than it really is. "Jimmy wasn't exaggerateing about the seriousness of his injury."
        To underestimate something or someone means to think they are not important. "We lost the game because we underestimated the other team’s skill."
C1/B2 exceed, C2/-- surpass, outperform, outstrip, outdistance, outdo, see also: outnumber, overwhelm, overtake: To exceed is to be more than something. "Since I exceeded my limit, I decided to get rid of my credit cards."
C2/-- excel; C2 excel yourself, tower above/over sb/sth: To excel at a subject or activity means to be very good at it. "Jenny excels at playing the piano."
--/C1 excellence
B2/C1 exceptional, B1/A1 special(ly), A2/A2 especial(ly) (formal), C1/B1 particular(ly), B1 above all (прежде всего):
        We use specially to talk about the specific purpose of something: "This kitchen was specially designed to make it easy for a disabled person to use." "He has his shirts made specially for him by a tailor in London."
        Especially means ‘particularly’ or ‘above all’: "She loves flowers, especially roses." "I am especially grateful to all my family and friends who supported me."
        Especially can also be used to mean ‘for a particular purpose’: "I bought these (e)specially for you."
C2/-- exclaim: To exclaim is to say something loudly, usually due to being excited. "Look at her dress!" Sara exclaimed.
C2/C1 execute - казнить, B1/B1 punish(ment), penalize (B2/B2 penalty), ground (punish youngsters), punitive - карательный, compensatory:
		To execute someone means to kill them as a legal punishment. "Some people are executed for serious crimes.":
        To punish means to make someone suffer for breaking the rules or laws. "To punish me, my teacher had me stand in the corner."
        A punishment is something that one must endure for any wrongdoing. "He was given a punishment for being rude to the teacher."
        To penalize someone means to punish him or her. "The team was penalized when they broke the rules."
        A penalty is a punishment, given when someone breaks a rule or law. "I had to pay a $ 100 penalty for parking in the wrong spot.":
C2/C1 execute - выполнять, see also: fulfil
C1/B2 executive - руководитель, --/B2 chairman (chairwoman) - председатель, B2/B2 chief(ly), A2/A2 boss:
         An executive is the top manager of a business. "After twenty years at the company, he finally became the executive."
         A chief is the leader of a group of people. "The chief led the people through the mountains."
         A boss is a person in charge of other people at work. "My boss is a nice person."
C1/B2 executive - управленческий, управляющий, руководящий (see also administrative etc)
C1/B2 executive - исполнительный (совет, комитет т.д.)
C1/-- executive - представительский (роскошный), C2/C1 premium, C1/-- luxury(-ious(ly)), C2/-- lavish(ly, ness), B2/C1 exclusive, sumptuous(ly), deluxe, opulent, grand
        A premium is a payment that is higher than average. "Tony paid for premium gas because it made his car run the best."
        A luxury is an expensive thing that you do not need. "We stayed at a luxury resort for our honeymoon."
        If something is exclusive, it is expensive and only for rich people. "The golf course was so exclusive that most people hadn’t even heard of it."
C2/A1 exercise, B1/C1 workout (B2/A1 work out): To exercise is to run or play sports so that you can be healthy. "You should exercise every day."
                                                A workout is an exercise routine that helps improve health. "She doesn’t do her workout on the weekends."
C1/-- exhaust(ing, ion, -ive), deplete, C2/-- tire(d(ness)), B1/-- tiring, C2/-- weary(-ily, -iness), see also: debilitate, wearisome, impoverish; B2/B2 thorough (= exhaustive), fatigue(d- ing), see also: grueling; fatigues - нестроевой наряд:
        To exhaust someone is to make them tired. "John exhausted himself by swimming all day."
		To deplete an amount of something means to use up all of it. "All the driving he was doing was depleting his car’s fuel supply."
        If someone is weary, then they are tired. "Jane was weary after a long day of work."
        fatigue is a feeling of extreme tiredness. "After three days with little sleep, she was feeling a lot of fatigue."
C1/B2 exhibit(ion): An exhibit is a display of interesting things. "There was an animal exhibit at the fair."
B1/A2 exist - существовать, быть реальным, coexist: To coexist with something means to exist with it in the same time and place. "Our pets coexist at our home with little or no problems."
C1/-- exist - существовать, выживать, subsist, see also: survive, sustenance, live off sb/sth: To subsist means to have the food, water, and money needed to stay alive. "Some people are forced to subsist on only a few dollars a month."
C2/C1 expenditure, B2/B2 expense(-ive): An expense is the money that people spend on something. "She wrote down all the expenses for her trip."
C2/C1 expire - истечь (полномочия, документ и т.д.), run out: To expire is to no longer be effective because its use has come to an end. "The man’s driver’s license was going to expire in two days."
      expire - усопнуть (literary), A1/A2 die, perish: To perish means to die, usually because of bad conditions or bad events. "Many people perish in wars."
      expire - выдохнуть, see also: exhale
С2/C1 explicit - явный, чёткий, B2/C1 straightforward(ly) (TODO see also: facilitate), TODO (оторвал от prominent) C1/C1 distinct(ly, ive, ion), C2/C1 prominent(ly, -ce) - видный, заметный, C1/-- noticeable (see also: perceptible), --/C1 stark, C1/B1 clear(ly) (see also: lucid, unambiguous), --/C1 pronounced, B2/B1 definite(ly), B2/C1 striking(ly), marked, ostentatious(ly, ostentation) - показной, демонстративный (disapproving), showy(-ily, -iness) - броский, эффектный (disapproving), obtrusive(ly, ness) - бросающийся в глаза, навязчивый, see also: boast / unobtrusive - ненавязчивый
        If something is explicit, it is very clear, open, and truthful. "The man gave a very explicit account of the car accident."
        If something is distinct, it is easily noticed or different from other things. "That girl has distinct pink hair."
        If something is definite, it is certain or sure to be true. "There is a definite connection between hard work and success."
        If a contrast is stark, then the things being compared are utterly different. "There is a stark contrast between their test scores."
        When something is straightforward, it is good because it is easy to understand. "The teacher’s grading system was straightforward and fair."
С2/C1 explicit - откровенный, B2/C1 straightforward, B2/C1 frank(ly, ness), C1/B2 sincere, C1/B2 genuine(ly, ness), B2/B2 honest(ly, y), C1/B1 direct, C2/-- blunt(ly, ness), earnest, forthright(ly, ness), outspoken, candid (candour (US: candor) – откровенность, прямота: "You ought to treat this matter with candor."), B2/C1 frank(ly, ness), principled, see also: scrupulous, straight:
        If you are frank, you are being very honest. "The teacher had a frank discussion with her students."
        When people are sincere, they tell the truth. "He sounded sincere when he apologized to me."
        honesty means the quality of being truthful or honest. "A courtroom should be a place of honesty."
        If someone is earnest, then they are honest. "The child was very earnest when she told her mother how she broke the dish."
        If someone is outspoken, then they are not afraid to say what they think. "She was an outspoken critic about the new banking laws."
        If someone is dishonest, they do not tell the truth. "She was being dishonest when she copied the answers from his test."
--/C1 exploitation
B2/B2 exploit, --/C1 utilize (formal), harness, B2 make use of sth, take advantage of sb/sth, milk (disapproving), milk/suck sb/sth dry:
        To exploit something is to use it for greedy reasons rather than good reasons. To take advantage of. "The company exploits their workers and makes them stay 12 hours a day."
        To utilize something means to use it for a specific purpose. "They utilized a pair of scissors to cut the ribbon."
        To harness something means to control and use it, usually to make energy. "The sails harness the wind in order to move."
      exploit, C2/C1 feat, --/C1 coup - неожиданный успех: A feat is an impressive or difficult achievement or action. "The elephant’s standing up on one leg was a feat."
B2/C1 extension, annexe (US annex), see also: wing: An extension is a part added to something to give it more time or space. "My parents decided to add an extension to our house for the new baby."
B2/B2 extend, see also: lengthen
C1/-- extinct(ion), B2 die out / B2/B1 survive, B2/B2 survival, B2/B2 survivor (see also: exist); B2/B1 living, surviving, extant
		If plants or animals are extinct, there are none left. "There used to be dinosaurs all over the world, but now they are extinct."
		To survive is to stay alive (despite some danger or illness). "My dog survived her fall into the water."
C2/-- extravagant(ly, -ce) - расточительный, see also: prodigal, generous
TODO extravagant
C1/B2 fabric, B2/B1 cloth, B1/B1 material, B1/B1 cotton, textile, denim - джинсовая ткань, B1/-- tissue (human/plant/brain/lung/muscle/fat tissue), B2/-- napkin, B1/-- handkerchief, serviette, doily - кружевная салфетка (под чашку, вазу); A2/B1 leather:
		fabric is cloth used to make clothes, furniture, etc. "The towels were made from a soft fabric."
        cloth is material used to make clothes. "His shirt is made of a very soft type of cloth."
		cotton is a cloth made from the fibers of the cotton plant. "I like to wear clothes made from cotton in the summer."
        textile is cloth that has been woven or knitted. "The blue textile was going to be used to make blouses."
        A tissue is a soft piece of paper people use to wipe their noses. "There was a box of tissue on the table."
		leather is a material made from animal skin that is used to make clothing. "He got a new leather jacket for his birthday."
C2/-- facial: If something is facial, it is related to a person's face. "I could tell from his facial features that he was angry."
--/C1 faction - фракция (a dissenting clique: "One faction declared it would begin an armed struggle against the government of the United States")
      faction - распря, раздор, противоречие, see also: contradict(ory, ion), discord, contentiousness
B2/C1 fade, wilt, see also: sink: If something fades, it gets quieter or darker. "The piece of cloth I found was old and faded."
A2/A1 fast(ness) - быстрый, C2/-- swift(ly, ness), B2/B2 rapid(ly, ity), A2/A1 quick(ly, ness), fleet, speedy(-ly, -ness), expeditious(ly), like (greased) lightning, see also: fleet:
        If something is swift, it is fast. "The swift horse easily jumped over the hurdle."
        When something is rapid, it moves or changes very quickly. "His mother was surprised by her son's rapid growth."
        When something happens rapidly, it happens very fast. "The train moved rapidly on the tracks."
A1/-- fast (о часах) - спешат
C2/-- fast - крепко, надёжно и т.д. (firmly fixed) TODO stiff?
      fast - устойчивый (цвет ткани по отношению к стирке)
TODO (join with extreme(ly)) fast - полностью, C1/C1 sheer, C2/C1 utter(ly), B2/B2 altogether, outright, stark - абсолютно (C1/B2 comprehensive(ly, ness) - see also: informative, complete(ly), total(ly) or extreme(ly)), B2/B2 absolute(ly), B1/B2 extremely, grossly, exceedingly (formal), B2/-- stiff (informal), sorely (formal), see also: blank, sound(ly), abrupt, (up) to the hilt:
        If you describe something as sheer, it is complete and very strong. "I was impressed by her sheer dedication to jogging."
        If something is utterly a way, it is completely that way. "When the sun was blocked by the moon, it was utterly dark outside."
		If something happens altogether, it happens completely. "The company stopped using sugar altogether in its food."
        When something is outright, it is open and direct. "Everyone knew that the boy’s story was an outright lie."
        If something is absolute, it is total or complete. "My presentation was an absolute disaster! It was terrible!"
		If something is comprehensive, it has all the details about something else. "The teacher gave us a comprehensive review for the exam."
      fast - поститься, голод|ать/ание, C1/B2 hunger, C2/-- famine, C1/B2 starve, malnutrition - недоедание; C2/A1 thirst(y, ily), lust:
        To fast means to go without food or drink for a period of time. "In her religion, they fast for five days and then have a big feast."
        hunger is the feeling that you get when you need to eat. "After playing all day long, he was filled with hunger."
        A famine is a long time with littarnishtle or no food. "The farmers couldn't grow any food on the dry soil, so there was a famine."
        If a person starves, they do not get enough to eat and sometimes die. "During the war, many people starved."
        malnutrition is the condition of not getting enough nutrients. "After eating only a meager amount of food, she suffered from malnutrition."
C2/-- faultless, C2/-- flawless, immaculate, impeccable, unblemished, A2/B1 perfect(ly, ion) (WITHOUT FAULT), untarnished (REPUTATION), B2/B2 ideal, unsullied (formal) - безупречный, see also: pristine
        If something is perfect, then it is without any mistakes. "She got all the questions right, so her score was perfect."
        If something is ideal, it is the best that it can possibly be. "This house is an ideal place for my family. It has everything we need."
C1/B2 favour (US favor): A favor is something you do for someone to help them. "Can you do me a favor and turn off the lights?"
B2/C1 favourable - положительный, одобрительный ("Reviews of the book have been favourable."), see also: endorse, compliment
B2/C1 favourable - положительный (expressing your agreement; giving permission): "Their demands received a favourable response."
B2/C1 favourable - благоприятный (in a favourable light, a favourable impression)
C2/C1 favourable - благоприятный, выгодный (giving you an advantage or more chance of success), B2/B2 beneficial - благотворный (helpful, useful, or good), advantageous(ly), opportune(ly), see also: constructive / C2/C1 adverse(ly) - неблагоприятный (contrary to your interests or welfare: "High doses can have adverse effects and even cause death"), disadvantageous, B2/B2 harmful(ly, ness), --/C1 damaging, formal: C2/-- detrimental, deleterious, prejudicial, injurious, insidious(ly, ness) - коварный, see also: destructive:
        If something is adverse, then it is harmful. "Not eating healthy foods can have an adverse effect on your health."
C1/-- feast, banquet, spread: A feast is a large meal for many people. "At Thanksgiving, I enjoy a wonderful feast with my family."
                              A banquet is a grand formal dinner. "Both families brought a lot of food for the wedding banquet."
C2/-- feeble(-y), B2/B1 weak, lame​ (of an excuse, explanation, etc.), see also: frail: If someone is feeble, they are small or weak. "The boy was too feeble to carry the object very far."
C1/C1 feed(ing), nourish(ing, ment), see also: nurture: To feed is to give food. "Mother feeds my baby brother everyday."
									                    To nourish something is to give it food that it needs to live. "A good mother will nourish her baby every day."
C1/B2 federal: If something is federal, it comes from the government of a country. "Sometimes federal laws are different from state laws."
C1/-- federation, --/B2 colony: A federation is a group of states or businesses working for a common cause. "The United Nations is a federation designed to prevent war, disease, and famine."
								A colony is a country controlled by another country. "The USA was at one time a colony of Great Britain."
C1/-- federation, B1/B2 league
C2/B2 fever; hay fever - сенная лихорадка: A fever is a high body temperature that people get when they are sick. "Lydia had a high fever so she didn't go to school."
C1/A2 fiction, C1/B2 legend, B2/B2 myth(ology), fable, B2/B2 lyric(s), B1/B1 poem, epic:
	  fiction is a story that is not true. "I enjoy reading works of fiction because they are very entertaining."
    A legend is a story from the past. "There is a well-known legend about a king and his queen."
    A myth is a traditional story that explains a culture’s history and beliefs. "In Greece, there was a myth about a woman who had snakes for hair."
    mythology is a group of stories from a particular country or region. "Egyptian mythology was the basis for a religion."
    A fable is a short story that teaches a lesson. "In the fable about the tortoise and the hare, the lesson is consistency."
    When a poem is considered lyric, it is written in a simple and direct style. "I enjoy reading and creating my own lyric poetry."
    A poem is a short kind of writing. "William Shakespeare wrote many poems."
    An epic is a long book, poem, or movie about a period of time or a great event. "The poet wrote an epic about the great discoveries of the past thousand years."
C1/-- filthy(-ness), squalid(squalor), sordid(ly, ness)
C2/B2 fix, A2/B1 repair, C1/-- rectify (rectification), B2/A2 correct, B1/-- mend, overhaul - переработка, реконструкция, капитальный ремонт (+ глагол), remediate (remediation), remedy (formal), redress (formal):
        To fix something is to make it work. "My dad has many tools to help him fix broken things."
        To repair something is to fix it. "I repaired the flat tire on my car."
        To rectify something means to correct it. "I quickly rectified the spelling mistakes that I had on my essay."
        To mend something means to fix it when it is broken or damaged. "Mother mended the rip in my pants with a piece of cloth."
C2/B2 fix, B1/B1 fasten, B2/-- zip/unzip, lock - приклеить(ся), застрять, lodge, rig - установить, оснастить (rig sth <-> up - собрать по-быстрому на коленках, из говна и палок), see also: stick, adhere / unfasten:
        To fasten something is to close it or put it in the correct place. "Elizabeth fastened her seat belt."
		To zip something means to close it with a zipper. "She zipped her backpack closed after putting her books inside it."
--/C1 fixture; fitting
C2/C1 fine
C2/-- fireplace - камин, hearth - пол под и перед камином, literary: домашний очаг, furnace - печь: A furnace is a place where heat is made. "Mr. Jones came to fix the furnace."
C2/B2 firm(ly, ness), C2/-- committed, C2/C1 loyal(ty), C2/C1 dedicated, C2/-- faithful(ly, ness), C2/A1 true(ly), B2/-- devoted(ly), stalwart(ly), staunch(ly, ness) / disloyal(ty):
        To be loyal to something or someone is to agree to always help them. "The three friends are very loyal to each other."
C2/B2 firm(ly, ness), C2/B2 stable, B2/B2 secure(ly), B2/B2 steady(-ily), steadfast(ly, ness), unswerving, unfaltering, unwavering (непокобелимый), adamant(ly) -  непреклонный, intransigent(ly) (formal disapproving) - непокобелимый, непримиримый (unwilling to change their opinions or behaviour in a way that would be helpful to others), see also: robust:
        When something is stable, it will not fall over. "The chair is stable. Its legs are strong."
        When someone or something is steady, they are under control. "The problem was hard but she remained steady and solved it."
C2/B2 firm(ly, ness), C2/B1 solid, C2/B2 stiff(ly, ness), C2/-- rigid, see also: robust: When something is firm, it is solid but not too hard. "He sleeps better on a firm bed."
                                                                       					 If something is solid, it is made of firm material. "The safe looked to be quite solid."
                                                                       					 When something is stiff, it is hard to move. "The bird was standing on the tree's stiff branch."
C2/B2 flavour (US flavor), B2/A2 taste: A flavor is the taste of food or drinks. "The flavor of the ice cream was very good."
										A taste is the flavor something makes in your mouth. "The taste of the fruit was sweet."
C1/C1 flaw(ed), C1/C1 defect, B2/B2 fault, A2/B2 mistake, B2/A2 error (trial and error - метод проб и ошибок; see, realize, etc. the error of your ways - осознать свои ошибки), imperfection, C1/-- shortcoming - недостаток (a fault in somebody’s character, a plan, a system, etc.: "She made me aware of my own shortcomings.", "Despite a number of shortcomings, the project will still go ahead.", "Like any political system, it has its shortcomings.", "Whatever his shortcomings as a husband, he was a good father to his children."); v: flaw, blemish, deface, disfigure - изуродовать, cripple - калека, калечить (see also: mangle), maim:
        A flaw is a mistake in something that causes it to be less effective or correct. "We discovered a major flaw in the metal chain."
        A defect is a part of something that is wrong or missing. "All these bottles have a defect and must be sent back to the warehouse."
        A fault is a mistake. "It is my fault that the cat ran away. I left the door open."
        A mistake is something you do wrong. "My boss always yells at me when I make a mistake."
        An error is something you do wrong. "I made an error on my report, so my boss was angry."
C1/C1 fleet - флот: A fleet is a group of ships. "The fleet of ships spent a few days at the dock."
C1/-- fleet - парк (a number of buses, aircraft, etc. under the control of one person or organization): "He owns a fleet of taxis."
      fleet (literary) - проворный (able to run fast), see also: fast: "fleet-footed", "fleet of foot" - быстроногий, "She was slight and fleet of foot/fleet-footed."
      fleeting(ly) - скоротечный (​lasting only a short time), brief (SHORT IN TIME), ephemeral, momentary, short-lived, transient (formal), fugitive (formal), evanescent (formal), transitory (formal), see also: passing
      fleetness (literary) - быстрота (the ability to run or move quickly): "They relied on their excellent eyesight and fleetness of foot.", "He was saved only by the fleetness of his team."
C2/C1 flexible(flexibly, flexiblility), supple, obedient - покорный, submissive, pliable, pliant, malleable, amenable, docile, compliant, pushover, meek(ly, ness) - кроткий, покорный, accommodating, ductile (specialized) - податливый, пластичный, гибкий; impressionable;
        If something is flexible, then it can bend easily without breaking. "The tree branch was so flexible it could be bent into a circle and not break."
B1/B1 flood - наводнение: A flood is an event in which water covers an area which is usually dry. "After three days of rain, threre was a flood in the city."
C2/B2 flood - наплыв, поток (a large amount or number of something), see also: spillover
B1/B1 flood - затоплять(ся)
B1/B1 flood - выходить из берегов, разливаться
B2/B2 flood - литься, наводнять, нахлынуть, B1/B2 pour - литься, наводнять, (of rain) teem - лить как из ведра, C2/-- influx, inflow, --/C1 descent - наплыв, приток, saturate(d) - насытить, заполнить, наводнить, awash - залитый водой, наводнённый (наполненный) чем-либо, replete (formal) - изобилует, заполнен, полон (в т.ч. едой - "сыт по горло"), throng - столпиться, наводнить, be teeming with (кишеть, быть переполненным, see also: rife, infest, seethe) / outflow - отток, утечка
B2/-- flood - (на)хлынуть, (за)лить(ся) - чувства, румянец свет и т.д.: "She looked away as the colour flooded her cheeks.", "The room was flooded with evening light.", "She drew the curtains and the sunlight flooded in.", "A great sense of relief flooded over him."
C2/C1 fluid - жидкость, B1/B1 liquid(ity): A liquid is a substance that is neither solid nor gas. "Water is the most important liquid for life."
C2/-- fluid - текучий, плавный, грациозный, flowing, C2/C1 grace(ful(ly)) - изящный, грациозный; C1/-- elegance, B2/B2 elegant(ly) - изящный, элегантный, see also: fragile, delicate, fluent, fluency:
        If something is fluid, it is smooth and moves gracefully. "Boris was a famous ballet dancer because people admired his fluid movements."
        grace is a quality of moving in a smooth, relaxed and attractive way. "The ballerina danced with grace."
        If something is elegant, it is very fancy and pleasing. "In Japan, women wear elegant kimonos on special occasions."
      fluid - текучий, жидкий
      fluid - нестабильный, see also: changeable
C2/C1 filter
C1/-- filth(y, ily, iness)
C1/C1 fit, befit (formal): If something fits, it is small enough or the right size to go there. "The colorful eggs fit into the box."
TODO fit, muscular: When someone is muscular, they are very fit and strong. "He exercised regularly so that his body could become muscular."
TODO fit, convuls(e, ion, ive(ly)), see also: rock, swing, ripple
C2/C1 flesh, A1/A1 meat: flesh is the skin, muscle and fat on your body. "The zebra's flesh has black and white stripes."
						 meat is food made of animals. "This piece of meat I'm eating tastes very good."
A2/A1 flight: A flight is an act of flying, often in an airplane. "The airplane made a flight around the world."
C2/-- flight - лестничный пролёт, see also: stairway
C2/-- floppy
C2/C1 flourish(ing), C1/C1 thrive, C1/C1 prosper(ity, ous) - процветать, flowering - расцвет; burgeon (literary) - разрастаться; B2/B2 wealth(y), C1/-- affluent, C1/-- well off, A2/A1 rich, opulent (formal), moneyed (formal), C2/A2 comfortable, (multi)millionaire, billionaire, see also: richness:
        flourish - grow vigorously: "His business had been all along steadity flourishing, his patrons had been of great social position, some most illustrious, others actually royal"
        To thrive means to do well and be successful, healthy, or strong. "He may be an old man, but he continues to thrive."
        To prosper is to be successful or make a lot of money. "Frank's new business finally prosper after many years of hard work."
        wealth is a large amount of money. "One of the most important things to some people is wealth."
        If someone is affluent, they are wealthy. "People in the city are usually more affluent than people in the country."
        If you are rich, you have a lot of money. "He's rich. He can buy anything he wants."
		A millionaire is a person who has at least a million dollars. "He bacame a millionaire because he was smart with his money."
		A billionaire is someone who has at least one billion dollars. "The sale of his inventions made the inventor a billionaire."
C2/A1 follow, --/C1 ensue, B1/B1 result:  To follow means to go behind someone and go where they go. "The little boy followed his mother home."
										 To ensue means to happen after something. "After a few minutes of lightening, thunder ensued."
B1/A2 following, C1/B2 subsequent(ly), see also: since, thereafter, afterwards / B1/B1 previous - предыдущий, предшествующий (formal: antecedent), preceding, C1/B2 prior (предварительный), C1/C1 preliminary (предварительный; вступление, подготовительное мероприятие, see also: interim); premature (преждевременный, недоношенный), untimely (death) - безвременная (кончина), ill-timed (несвоевременный), inopportune(ly) / well timed (своевременный), timely, opportune(ly):
        If something is subsequent, then it comes after something else in time. "The flood and thesubsequent rescue of those caught in the flood were on TV."
        If something is previous, then it happened earlier in time or order. "He turned back to the previous page to read the paragraph again."
        preliminary describes something that happens before a more important event. "The runners must do well in the preliminary races to qualify for the final race."
        If something is premature, then it is done too early or before the proper time. "Mark’s celebration was premature because the ball hadn’t fallen in the hole."
B2/A2 following = after ("The weeks following the riots were extremely tense.", "Following the dinner, there will be a dance.") / C1/B2 prior to = before:
        When something happened prior to something else, it happened earlier. "Ron had to wait since he arrived prior to the scheduled meeting time."
      following - последователи (a group of supporters): "The band has a huge following in Italy.", "The series enjoys a cult following among young people."
      "the following:" = "следующее:"
      following wind - попутный ветер ("With a generous following wind, we sped across the lake.", "(figurative) With a bit of luck and a following wind, the project will be completed on schedule.")
C2/-- foreign to sb/sth - чуждый (not typical of sb/sth; not known to sb/sth and therefore seeming strange), devoid (of sth) - лишённый (чего-л.):
		When something or someone is devoid of a thing, they are missing it. "The movie was devoid of any violence, so it was a perfect movie for the family."
B2/C1 foreigner
C2/-- foremost - ведущий, передовой (the most important or famous), B2/B1 leading - ведущий, передовой: "I'd like to introduce you to the world's foremost authority on the subject.", "This is one of the country's foremost arts centres.", "a leading expert/authority/figure/member"
C2/-- foremost - в первых рядах, на первом плане, в первую очередь (in a position at the front), B2/B1 leading - ведущий, лидирующий, see also: first and foremost: "This question has been foremost in our minds recently.", "The Prime Minister was foremost among those who condemned the violence.", "She started the last lap just behind the leading group.", "These are the leading first-round scores."
--/C1 forge, C2/B2 fake, counterfeit, C1/-- imitate(-ion, -ive), emulate, phony, mimic(ry); imitator, impersonator (подражатель), copycat, see also: rig, distort, deceive:
        To imitate someone is to do exactly what they do. "He imitated his favorite superhero by putting on a costume."
        To emulate people means to imitate them because they are greatly admired. "As a small boy, he always tried to emulate his big brother."
        To mimic something means to copy the way it sounds or moves. "The hunter mimicked a duck’s call and shot the two ducks that called back."
--/C1 forge - подделывать (C2 fake); выковывать (в т.ч. в переносном смысле - выковывать устойчивые связи, добиваться чего-то с трудом); кузница, кузнечный горн; пробиваться (сквозь толпу), выбиваться (в лидеры)
C2/-- forgery - подделка, фальсификация (the crime of copying money, documents, etc. in order to cheat people: "He increased his income by forgery.")
C2/-- forgery - подделка, фальшивка (an illegal copy of a document, painting, etc.: "These banknotes are forgeries.", "Experts are dismissing claims that the painting is a forgery.", "If the signature on the deed is a forgery, the whole legal position changes."), see also: fake
C1/A2 formal / B2/A2 informal, colloquial, conversational:
        If something is formal, it is done in an official way. "It was a formal dinner, so we wore our best clothes."
        When something is informal, it is not official. "They had an informal meeting to talk about their experiences."
        colloquial describes informal words that are more suitable for speech than writing. "I find it difficult to understand people if they use colloquial language."
С2/C1 formulate, phrase, word, see also: articulate, enunciate
C2/-- foul, B1/-- disgusting, vile, revolting, loathsome - отвратительный, тошнотворный, омерзительный, ... see alos: disgusting, gross
        If something is foul, then it is not pleasant or enjoyable. "He wouldn’t let his dog drink from the water because it had a foul smell."
        If something is disgusting, it is very unpleasant. "After running all day, Greg's feet had a disgusting odor."
      foul - загадить, загрязнить, B2/-- pollute(-ion), contaminate(-ion); adulterate(-ion) - подмешивать, загрязнять, see also: infect, contract / decontaminate(-ion):
        To pollute means to make air, water, or land dirty, unclean, or foul. "The careless factory polluted the river with chemicals."
        To contaminate something means to put dirty or harmful chemicals into it. "The lake was contaminated when pollutants entered into the water."
TODO foul
C1/B2 foundation - фонд, C1/B2 fund, C1/C1 subsidy (subsidize), B2/B2 finance - финансировать, B2/B2 budget, see also: bailout:
        A foundation is a group that provides money for research. "The foundation raised money to give scholarships to students."
        A fund is an amount of money that people have. "We all put money into our club's fund."
        A subsidy is money given by the government to companies to assist them. "The official gave the company a subsidy, so it could open two new factories."
        To finance someone or something means to provide money for them. "The government financed the scientist’s experiments with new weapons."
        A budget is the amount of money available to spend on something. "His budget for food was very tight."
--/B2 foundation - основание, B2/-- basics, the rudiments - основы, fundamentals, warp and woof, see also: spine
--/С1 foundations - фундамент; B2/B2 basement - подвал, цокольный этаж, B2/-- cellar - подвал, погреб, B2/-- attic - чердак, garret (literary) - чердак (a very small, uncomfortable room at the top of a house: "a room, often a small dark unpleasant one, at the top of a house, especially in the roof"), C2/-- loft (especially British English) - чердак ((especially British English) a space just below the roof of a house, often used for storing things and sometimes made into a room)
		A basement of a house or building is a room that is built underground. "They turned their basement into a game room."
		An attic is a room just below a house’s roof. "There were two windows in their attic."
C2/C1 fragile(-ity), C2/C1 vulnerable, tenuous(ly), brittle, dainty (-ily, -iness), see also: fluid, delicate / C2/B2 tough(ness, en); C2/B2 strict(ly, ness), rigor(ous) / lax:
        When people or things are fragile, they are not strong and can be damaged easily. "The fragile glassware was carefully packed into boxes."
        If something or someone is delicate, they are easy to break or harm. "You should hold the baby carefully because she's very delicate."
        When someone is vulnerable, they are weak and without protection. "He felt very vulnerable when he was stranded in the desert."
C2/-- frail - слабый, хрупкий ((especially of an old person) physically weak and thin: "a frail old lady", "Mother was becoming too frail to live alone."), see also: feeble, decrepit
C2/-- frail - слабый, хрупкий (weak; easily damaged or broken: "the frail stems of the flowers", "the country's frail economy", "Human nature is frail.")
      frailty - слабость, немощь (weakness and lack of health or strength: "Though ill for most of her life, physical frailty never stopped her from working.", "Increasing frailty meant that she was more and more confined to bed."), see also: debility
      frailty - слабость характера/морали (weakness in a person’s character or moral standards: "We are all subject to the frailties of human nature.", "Tolerant of human frailty in whatever form, she almost never judged people.", "Most of the characters in the novel exhibit those common human frailties - ignorance and greed.")
C2/-- fragrant(ly, -ce), B2/-- scent(ed), A2/-- perfume(d), aroma(tic), literary: redolent (redolence) - благоухающий / pungent(ly), fetid (formal), malodorous (formal), putrid, smelly, rank; C2/-- odour (US odor), stench (see also: miasma); odourless (US odorless) - без запаха:
        When something is fragrant, it has a pleasant smell. "The girl picked delicious berries and fragrant flowers."
        A scent is a smell. "Julie enjoyed the scent of the flowers."
        perfume is a good-smelling liquid that girls wear. "When she wore her perfume, everyone said she smelled great."
        An aroma is a scent or smell. "I love the aroma of coffee in the morning."
        An odor is a very distinct smell. "He knew there was a leak when he noticed the strong odor of natural gas."
--/B2 framework - каркас (здания, сооружения и т.д.); hull - корпус/основание судна (bow(s) - нос корабля, stern - корма, keel - киль, bottom - днище):
        The hull of a boat or tank is the main body of it. "After the wreck at sea, the ship’s hull was the last part to sink."
C2/B2 framework - каркас, рамки, основа: A framework is a set of rules or ideas that people use to solve problems. "His ideas fit into the framework of a successful business plan."
C2/B2 framework - структура, C2/B2 structure, C2/B2 formation - формирование: A formation is the way that something is made. "The formation of ice happens when water freezes."
C1/-- frantic - неистовый, C1/-- hectic, frenetic - бурный, frenzied - бешеный -> от спешки к безумию (see next line), see also: fussy
C1/-- frantic - безумный, manic - безумный, be beside yourself (with) - быть вне себя (от): If people or things are frantic, they behave in a wild way because they are frightened. "The cat became frantic when I tried to give it a bath."
C2/B2 fraud, defraud, (fraudulent(ly), fraudulence), swindle, con (informal), scam (informal) - афера, see also: crook: fraud is the crime of gaining money by lying or by tricking people. "Experts say that credit card fraud increases around the holidays."
C2/-- fringe - край, окраина, граница, C2/-- brink, C2/B2 margin, B1/B1 edge, B1/B2 border, B2/B1 frame, periphery, see also: verge, brim:
        The edge of something is the part of it that is farthest from the center. "He ran to the edge of the cliff."
        A border is the edge of an area. "The postcard had a pretty green border of pine needles."
        A frame is a border for a picture or mirror. "I have to get a frame for my friend's picture."
        The verge is the point at which something is about to happen. "Joan was on the verge of leaving her house when the phone rang."
        The periphery of an area, place, or thing is the edge of it. "A beautiful floral pattern is on the periphery of the stationery."
C2/-- fringe - чёлка (US: bangs)
      fringe - бахрома
      fringe - граничить (to form a border around sth: "The river is fringed with wild flowers.", "The beach was fringed by coconut palms.", "Her eyes were grey, fringed by long dark lashes.")
C1/B2 fulfil (US: fulfill), fulfilling, fulfilled - исполнять (мечту, желание, обязанности), удовлетворять (требованиям, критериям, потребностям, амбициям), оправдывать (ожидания)
C2/B2 fulfil (US: fulfill) - выполнять (функцию, обещания, условия контракта), B1/A2 carry sth <-> out - проводить, выполнять, исполнить (приказы, обязанности, угрозу, обещание и т.д.), see also: execute:
		To fulfill something means to achieve or finish it. "The professor did not fulfill his promise not to miss a single class."
C2/B2 fulfil (US: fulfill) - удовлетворять, C1/B2 satisfy(-action), B2/C1 content(ion, ment), A2/A2 pleased, gratify, ravish = give sb a great pleasure (literary), see also: address, cater, tackle / rape (old use or literary):
        To be content is to be happy and not want more. "The baby looked very content sitting on the floor."
        To satisfy someone means to make them happy. "It will satisfy my teacher if I finish all my homework."
        satisfaction is a feeling you get when you do or receive something good. "Brad was filled with satisfaction when he saw what was for dinner."
        When someone is pleased, they are happy. "She was pleased with the phone call she received."
        To gratify someone means to please them. "Bonnie was gratified after receiving her gift from her parents."
C1/-- fumes: fumes are unhealthy smoke and gases that are made by fires or chemicals. "The engine put unpleasant, black fumes into the air."
B2/C1 funeral, obsequies (formal) - погребени, похороны (​ceremonies (things that are formally said and done) at a funeral: "A vast congregation filled the cathedral for the final obsequies."): A funeral is a ceremony that takes place after a person dies. "They had a funeral for the soldier who died during the war."
C2/B1 further(ance), B2/B2 advance: further is used to say something is from a distance or time. "The escalator is further along than I thought."
                                    To advance is to go forward. "He advanced up the ladder slowly."
C2/-- fussy - требовательный, разборчивый, привередливый, see also: particular
      fussy - суетливый, дёрганый, bustling - суетливый, see also: frantic
C1/B2 gain, C2/C1 accumulate (C2/C1 accumulation, formal: accrual), B1/A2 collect, C1/B1 gather, garner (formal), accrue (accrual), amass, hoard, muster, build up (see also: mount up); glean, cull sth from sth
        If you gain something, you get more of it. "I gained some weight over the summer."
        To accumulate something is to collect a lot of it over time. "The mail accumulated in their mailbox while they were on vacation."
        To collect things is to group them together all in one place. "I collected shells when I was younger."
        To gather is to collect several things usually from different places. "Sam gathered some flowers for his mother."
B2/C1 regain - вернуть, восстановить (to get back something you no longer have, especially an ability or a quality), see also: replenish
        To regain something means to get it back. "The battery regained its power after being recharged."
      regain (literary) - вернуться (to reach or return to a place, especially after difficulty or danger): "They finally managed to regain the beach.", "The swimmers struggled to regain the shore."
B2/B2 acquire, see also: gain
B2/C1 acquisition
      acquisitive (formal, disapproving or business) - жадный, стяжательский (wanting very much to buy or get new possessions: "It is an acquisitive company looking for ways to expand.", "We live in an acquisitive society that views success primarily in terms of material possessions."), see also: greedy
      acquisitiveness (formal, disapproving) - стяжательство (the fact of wanting very much to buy or get new possessions: "We rejected the acquisitiveness of our parents’ generation.", "He was known for his acquisitiveness, buying any work of art that caught his eye."), see also: greed
C1/B2 gain, B1/A2 collect, buy (PAY FOR), get (OBTAIN), obtain (GET), purchase (formal), pick sth up, see also: acquire:
        To acquire something is to gain possession of it. "Tina acquired a strange package yesterday."
        An acquisition is something that a person buys or gets in some way. "Marty was happy with his new acquisition: a very fast bicycle."
        To obtain is to get something you want or need. "After I passed the test, I obtained my driver's license."
        To purchase something is to buy it. "I recently purchased a new car."
TODO gain - достижение, новый рубеж
C1/-- gather, B2/B2 reckon, B1/A2 suppose, A2/A1 believe, think
C2/-- gasp, puff, pant; puff and pant: A puff is a little bit of smoke or steam. "A puff of smoke came from the burnt match."
                					   To gasp means to make a noise by quickly breathing in when surprised. "John always gasps when watching a scary movie."
C2/C1 gaze, B2/B2 stare, C2/B1 view, C2/B2 observe(-able, -ably), gape (at sb/sth); C2/C1 glimpse, B1/C1 glance; C2/-- glare, C2/-- frown, scowl, glower - to stare at someone or something with your mouth open because you are shocked or surprised, ​regard (formal), see also: peer:
        To gaze at something means to look at it for a long time. "We used a telescope to gaze at the stars for over an hour."
        To view is to look at something. "Michael likes to view himself in the mirror."
        To observe something is to watch it. "Brian observed the sun rising over the mountains."
        To glimpse something is to see it for a short time. "She glimpsed outside the window as the plane was about to land."
        To frown is to make an unhappy look with your face. "Melissa frowned when she found out that the party had been cancelled."
        To stare at something is to look at it for a long time. "The young couple stared into each other's eyes."
        To glance at something means to look at it quickly. "She glanced behind her to see if he was looking at her."
B2/C1 gear
C1/B1 generous (ly, generosity, bounty), lavish, unstinting(ly, see also: stint), munificent (formal), magnanimous(ly, magnanimity) - великодушный; C2/A2 charity, charitable, benevolent(ly, -ce) - доброжелательный; philanthrop(y, ist, ic(ally)), philanthropy, see also: prodigal, extravagant / ungenerous:
        When someone is generous, they like to give things to people. "The generous man donated several new computers to our school."
        charity is an act of giving help, usually money, to those who need it. "Thanks to his friends’ charity, he had enough money to pay the rent."
        When someone is charitable, they help people who are in need. "My sister was charitable enough to help me buy my first house."
        If someone is benevolent, they are kind and generous. "My father was a benevolent man and gave lots of money to charity."
        philanthropy is the act of helping others, without wanting anything in return. "The wealthy business owner is well known for his acts of philanthropy."
C1/B2 genetic(ally, s), genome, biotechnology:	If something is genetic, it is related to the genes in one’s body. "The color of one’s eyes is genetic."
											  	A genome is the collection of all the genes in a living thing. "Understanding the human genome may help cure many diseases."
												biotechnology is the use of living parts, such as cells, in industry and technology. "Researchers at the biotechnology company use bacteria to make medicine."
C1/B2 gift - дар, C1/C1 faculty, C2/-- flair, B1/B1 talent, aptitude; B2/C1 craft, B1/A1 skill, workmanship, craftsmanship, knack, bent, trick, facility:
        A faculty is a mental or physical ability. "The boy’s mental faculties impressed all of his teachers."
        If someone has a talent, they are naturally able to do it well. "Maria has a talent for playing the piano."
        aptitude is a natural ability or skill. "He has a natuarl aptitude for water skiing."
        A skill is the knowledge and ability that allows you to do something well. "A snowboarder must have the right skills to do well."
A2/A2 gift- подарок, A2/A1 present, offering - дар, подношение, пожертвование:  A gift is something you give someone. "Dave received many gifts for Christmas."
      gift, B1/A2 offer (--/C1 offering - предложение), B2/B2 present, endow - furnish with a capital fund ("The grammar school here, founded in 1533, is liberally endowed, with scholarships and exhibitions") (also: C2 be endowed with sth - быть наделённым), see also: grant, donate:
      	To offer is to present someone with something. "He offered me the keys to his car."
C2/-- giggle
C2/-- glare (glaring(ly)), C2/-- glow, C2/B1 shine, C2/C1 spark, gleam, sparkle, glitter, radiant(-ce, see also: vivid, vibrant, brilliant (TODO)), lustre (US luster), lustrous, sheen, gloss, see also: ray:
        To glow is to make a soft light. "The small flame glowed softly."
        To shine is to make a bright light. "The candles are shining the dark room."
        A spark is a small, quick flash of fire. "As he welded the two pieces of metal together, sparks flew everywhere."
        To sparkle means to shine brightly with quick flashes of light. "The stars sparkled in the winter night’s sky."
C2/B2 globe - земной шар (the globe - the world): The globe refers to the Earth. "Water covers most of the globe."
      globe - шар, see also: sphere
      globe - глобус
C1/B2 grade: A grade is a score or mark given to someone's work. "I managed to get good grades on my report card."
C2/B1 grain, C2/B1 seed, C1/-- cereal, A1/A1 bean: grain is food crops such as wheat, corn, rice or oats. "The farmer planted two fields of grain this year."
                                                   A seed is the hard part of a plant or fruit that trees grow from. "I planted the seed in the dirt hoping that it would grow into a tree."
                                                   cereal is a food that you mix with milk and eat for breakfst. "cereal is a fast and common breakfast food enjoyed in the U.S."
                                                   A bean is a plant seed that is good to eat. "There are many different kinds of beans to eat."
C1/C1 grasp, C1/A1 understand, comprehend (formal), fathom - постигать (come to understand: "But after flying so many years, the idea of hanging up his sparkling wings is hard for him to fathom"), see also: comprehensible:
		To comprehend something is to understand it. "Henry could not comprehend the message."
C2/C1 grasp, C2/C1 grip, C2/C1 seize, B2/B2 grab, C2/-- snatch, C2/-- clutch, clasp, usurp(er, ation), hog (informal) - заграбастать единолично:
        To grasp something means to hold it. "He grasped the bag of money tightly."
        To seize something means to grab it quickly or strongly. "The man seized as much money as he could before anyone could see him."
        To grab is to take a hold of someone or something suddenly. "I grabbed a pear from the tree."
        To snatch something means to take it away with a quick motion. "He was so hungry that he snatched an apple from a tree."
        To grip something is to hold it very tightly. "I was scared, so I gripped my older sister's hand."
B1/C1 grave - могила, B2/-- tomb; coffin (US also casket); B2/C1 cemetery, graveyard, burial ground, necropolis; mortuary (US morgue)
        A grave is the place where a dead person is buried. "We visit our grandfather's grave each year."
        A tomb is a grave where a dead person is buried. "Their whole family is buried inside the tomb."
        A coffin is a box used to bury dead people. "When a person passes away, they are usually buried inside of a coffin."
        A cemetery is where people are buried when they die. "Some people are scared of cemeteries."
B1/C1 grave (often the grave, usually literary) - могила, смерть (a way of referring to death or a person’s death: "He followed her to the grave (= died soon after her).", "Is there life beyond the grave (= life after death)?", "She smoked herself into an early grave (= died young as a result of smoking)."), see also: decease, demise
--/C1 grave - серьёзный, суровый, угрожающий ((of situations, feelings, etc.) very serious and important; giving you a reason to feel worried: "a grave situation", "I fear you are making a very grave mistake.", "We were in grave danger.", "The consequences will be very grave if nothing is done.", "The police have expressed grave concern about the missing child's safety."), see also: severe
--/C1 grave - серьёзный ((of people) serious in manner, as if something sad or important has just happened: "He looked very grave as he entered the room."), see also: serious, sober, solemn
      gravely - серьёзно, тяжело (in a very serious and important way; in a way that gives you a reason to feel worried: "She is gravely ill.", "Local people are gravely concerned."), A2/A2 badly, see also: seriously, severely:
        badly means in a severe or harmful way. "He hurt his arm badly playing with friends."
      gravely - серьёзно (in a way that is serious in manner, as if sth sad or important has just happened: "He nodded gravely as I poured out my troubles.", "Hassan glanced at his watch, pursed his lips, and nodded gravely."), see also: seriously, soberly, solemnly
--/C1 gravity (formal) - тяжесть, серьёзность (extreme importance and a cause for worry: "I don't think you realise the gravity of the situation.", "Punishment varies according to the gravity of the offence."), se also: seriousness, severity
--/C1 gravity - сила тяжести, гравитация (the force that attracts objects towards one another, especially the force that makes things fall to the ground: "Newton’s law of gravity"), see also: gravitation
        gravity is the force that makes things fall to Earth. "There is no gravity in space."
      gravity (formal) - серьёзность (serious behaviour, speech or appearance:"They were asked to behave with the gravity that was appropriate in a court of law.")
      gravitation - гравитация (in science, the force that attracts all objects towards one another: "Particles are attracted to each other by gravitation."), see also: gravity
      gravitation - тяга, влечение (an occasion when sb or sth moves or is attracted in the direction of a particular thing or person: "The gravitation of country people to/towards the capital began in the 1920s.")
      gravitational - гравитационный (connected with or caused by the force of gravity: "a gravitational field", "the gravitational pull of the moon")
C1/-- greed; greedy(-ly, -ness), алчный: covetous, rapacious, grasping, cupidity (алчность, formal), avarice (formal) – жадность, алчность ("Avarice makes rich people want to become even richer."), avaricious (алчный), завистливый: envious; begrudge - завидовать; жадничать, жопить (жалеть "ему жалко", also grudge), see also: acquisitive:
        greed is a desire to have more than the things that you need. "She ate all the cookies out of her greed."
--/C1 grid - сетка (в т.ч. координатная), решётка; lattice(work) - решётка; grate - решётка в камине; grating - металлическая решётка (на окне, на люке и т.д.); trellis - деревянная решётка для живой изгороди; grill = barbecue
        A grid is a pattern of squares with numbers and letters to find places on a map. "We located our town using the grid."
--/C1 grid - сеть газо/электроснабжения
      grid = network (grid computing - распределённые вычисления)
C2/C1 grin, smirk (disapproving) - ухмыляться, simper - жеманно или глубо улыбаться: To grin means to smile broadly. "That joke makes me grin every time I hear it."
--/C1 grind - молоть, перемалывать, растирать, измельчать (food/flour/coffee/corn/etc.): To grind something means to break it into very small pieces or powder. "She wanted to grind the beans, so she could brew some coffee."
      grind (UK mince) - делать фарш
      grind (UK mince) - фарш
      grind - точить, шлифовать, see also: refine
      grind - втереть(ся), въесться
      grind - скрежетать (grind your teeth = to make a noise by rubbing your teeth together: "She grinds her teeth in her sleep."): "Parts of the machine were grinding together noisily."
C2/-- groan, C2/-- moan, wail - завывать, рыдать (see also: squall, shrill, yell), whimper - хныкать: To moan is to make a low sound when feeling pain or sadness. "The sick man moaned from his bed."
														                                              To wail is to show sadness by crying loudly. "The baby wailed because it was hungry."
C2/A2 ground
C2/-- grump (grumpy, informal), grouch (grouchy, informal), B2/-- bad-tempered, ill-tempered (formal), crabby (informal)
B2/C1 guidance - руководство, наставление (help or advice that is given to somebody, especially by somebody older or with more experience): "Activities all take place under the guidance of an experienced tutor."
      guidance - наведение (the process of controlling the direction of a rocket, etc., using electronic equipment): "a missile guidance system"
C1/B2 guideline, B2/-- manual, handbook: A guideline is a rule about how to do something. "Before they began the project, the teacher gave them some guidelines."
										 A handbook is an item that gives specific information or instructions. "If you look at the handbook, it will tell you which wires to connect to the TV."
C2/-- gulf - пропасть (DIFFERENCE), B2/B1 gap, see also: discriminate, contrast: A gulf is a gap between people who do not understand each other. "There has been a gulf between James and Tony since their parents died."
      gulf - пропасть (бездна), abyss, chasm, canyon, gorge, C1/C1 slot, B2/B2 crack (see also: chip), --/C1 breach, B1/A2 hole, cavity (see also: cave), fracture (перелом, трещина), chink, cleft, crater, cranny (расщелина), crevice (расщелина), crevasse (расселина), fissure (трещина), interstice (formal):
        A slot is a narrow opening in a machine or container. "To operate the machine, put your coins into the slot."
        A canyon is a narrow valley with steep walls through which a river often flows. "The canyon was so deep that the ground inside was covered in shadow."
        A crack is a narrow space between the parts of something broken. "The old window was covered with cracks."
        A hole is an opening in something. "The man was going to jump into the hole in the ice."
        A cavity is a hole or space in something. "There was a small cavity in the wall of the cave where an animal lived."
        A fracture is a crack or break in something. "Don’t stand on that teg because there is a fracture. It might get worse."
        A crater is a large hole in a planet’s or moon’s surface. "They could clearly see the big crater on the moon through the telescope."
      gulf - залив (морской), inlet - узкий залив, B1/C1 bay - бухта, cove = bay, strait - пролив, cape - мыс, delta, C1/-- dock, B1/B2 harbour (US harbor), B1/B1 port, seaport, waterfront - портовый район, seafront (oceanfront) - приморская часть города, wharf, pier - пирс, причал, berth, marina - пристань для яхт:
        A bay is an area near the ocean where the land goes inward. "The Golden Gate Bridge crosses San Francisco bay."
        A cove is a part of land where it curves inward around the sea. "They hid the boat in a small cove on the south side of the island."
        A delta is flat area where a river splits into smaller rivers that flow into the sea. "The archeologists found many ancient materials in the delta of the Nile River."
        A dock is an enclosed area where ships go to be loaded, unloaded, and repaired. "The huge ship pulled into the dock, and the crew unloaded the cargo."
        A harbor is an area of water along a shore where boats land. "There were a few small boats in the harbor."
        A port is a place where ships stop to load and unload things. "The ship was being loaded with materials at the port."
        A pier is a structure that extends into a body of water. "If you want to catch bigger fish, then go to the far end of the pier."
--/C1 gut - живот, A2/A2 stomach, abdomen(abdominal), belly (informal), tummy ("животик"): The belly is the stomach of a person or animal. "His belly was full because he ate a lot of food."
--/C1 gut - кишка, bowel, intestine (intestinal)
      gut - выпотрошить, disembowel, eviscerate (formal)
      gutted - опустошён (выжжен и т.д.)
C2/C1 guts - кишки, требуха, bowels, intestines, entrails - внутренности (also figurative), innards (informal), viscera (anatomy) - внутренние органы, visceral (anatome, literary - интуитиыный, глубокий (о чувствах и эмоциях)):
		The guts are all the organs inside a person or animal. "The doctor can tell you every process that happens in one’s guts."
        intestines are tubes through which food passes after it leaves the stomach. "Whatever you eat goes into your intestines."
C1/B2 habitat - среда обитания (the natural environment in which an animal or plant usually lives): A habitat is the natural home of animals or plants. "Frogs are often found in a wet habitat, such as near a lake, river, or pond."
C2/-- hail - град (small balls of ice that fall like rain); a hail of sth: "a hail of arrows/bullets" - град стрел/пуль, "a hail of abuse" - поток оскорблений, "The prime minister was greeted with a hail of insults as she arrived at the university.", see also: squall
C2/-- hail - when it hails, small balls of ice fall like rain from the sky
C2/-- hail - вызвать, "голосовать" (to signal to a taxi or a bus, in order to get the driver to stop): "Shall we hail a taxi/cab?"
C2/-- hail - (literary) позвать, окликнуть (to call to sb in order to say hello to them or attract their attention): "A voice hailed us from the other side of the street.", "I tried to hail her from across the room.", "We soon came within hailing distance of (= fairly close to) the others."
C2/C1 hail - отмечать, признавать, провозглашать (to describe sb/sth as being very good or special, especially in newspapers, etc.): "She's been hailed as one of the best young dancers today.", "The film was hailed as a masterpiece in its day.", "The expedition was widely hailed as a success.", "An ordinary priest, he was hailed by thousands as the new messiah."
C1/B2 handful - пригоршня (букв.), горстка (перен) людей/предметов, armful - охапка
C2/B2 handle, C1/-- knob, see also: shaft: A handle is the part of an object people hold while using it. "The pot is very hot. So pick it up by the handle."
C2/C1 handy (informal; come in handy - пригодиться (to be useful)), be/work to your advantage - идти на пользу, A2/A1 useful; B2/B2 beneficial, see also: avail / B1/B2 useless(ly, ness), good-for-nothing:
        If something is handy, it is useful. "An eraser is handy if you make a lot of mistakes."
        If something is beneficial, it is good for you. "Drinking milk everyday is beneficial to your bones."
C1/A1 happen: If someone happens to do something, they do it by chance. "I happen to meet some new friends at school today."
B2/C1 harvest (see also: crop), reap (reap what you have sown), просеивать, отсеивать: sift (sth <-> out), winnow (sth/sb out), see also: sieve:
        A harvest is the act of collecting food from farming. "They had a lot of wheat from the last harvest."
        To sift something means to remove all the large pieces. "The baker sifted the flour into a large bowl."
C1/B1 hate,   C2/-- loathe,            detest,                  abominate(formal), abhor,             C2/-- disgust,        repulse,   C2/-- revolt         execrate
C1/C1 hatred, C2/-- loathing (formal), detestation (formal),    abomination,       abhorrence,        C2/-- disgust,        repulsion,       revulsion,                   odium (formal),  repugnance (formal), see also: enmity
      hated,        loathsome,         detestable(ly) (formal), abominable(ly),    abhorrent(formal), B1/-- disgusting(ly), repulsive,       revolting(ly), execrable(-ly) odious (formal), repugnant (formal), C1/-- foul
        hatred is a strong feeling of not liking someone or something. "I have a hatred for the taste of medicine."
C1/C1 hazard, menace, jeopardy, peril: A hazard is something that could be dangerous to a person’s health or safety. "Smoking cigarettes poses many health hazards."
C2/-- heap - груда, куча, mound, B1/B2 pile, stack, bale - кипа, тюк (a large amount of a light material pressed tightly together and tied up: "bales of hay/straw/cotton/wool"), see also: bundle:
        A heap of things is a large pile of them. "After the building was torn down, all that was left was a heap of bricks."
        A pile is a large group of things on top of one another. "The pile of cups was beginning to tilt."
        A stack is a pile of different things. "There was a stack of paperwork on his desk to complete."
        A mound of something is a large pile of it. "There was a mound of clothes on the messy teenager’s floor."
      heap - сваливать в кучу
C1/B2 hilarious, B1/B1 comic - смешной, комедийный; comical - комичный: When something is comic, it is funny. "The comic actor was famous for his jokes."
TODO hild, see also: occupy
C2/B2 hollow, A2/A2 empty (see also: blank): When something is hollow, it has an empty space inside. "Straws are hollow, so liquid can flow through them."
                        					 If something is empty, it does not have anything in it. "My gas tank was almost empty, so I couldn't drive my car very long."
C2/-- hollow, C1/B2 empty, deceitful, insincere, dishonest(ly, y), C2/-- unscrupulous, unprincipled
C2/-- hollow, vapid(ity) (formal) - банальный, безвкусный, бессодержательный, C2/-- mediocre (ordinary) - заурядный, посредственный; C2/-- mediocrity (ordinariness) - заурядность, посредственность, second-rate, indifferent, B1/A2 ordinary(-iness), banal(ity), trite(ly, ness), clichéd, hackneyed - избитый, шаблонный, unimpressive, forgettable, C1/-- mundane (see also: tedious), workaday, unremarkable, quotidian, day-to-day (TODO move here dull and stuff), see also: bland, commonplace, platitudinous:
        If someone or something is ordinary, they are not special in any way. "Today was just an ordinary day. Nothing unusual happened."
        When something is mundane, it is boring, common, or ordinary. "The man had the mundane chore of raking thousands of leaves into piles."
      hollow (sound) - гулкий, глухой
C2/C1 horizon, C1/-- horizontal(ly), C1/B2 vertical(ly), upright, C2/B2 parallel, perpendicular(ly): The horizon is where the sky looks like it meets the ground. "The sun dipped below the horizon."
                                                                                     				 When something is horizontal, it is flat and level with the ground. "The Russian flag has three horizontal stripes of white, blue, and red."
                                                                            		 				 If something is upright, it is standing up straight. "Meerkats can’t walk like humans, but they can stand upright."
                                                                            		 				 If two things are parallel, they are the same distance away from each other. "There are two yellow parallel lines dividing both sides of traffic."
C1/C1 horn - рог
C2/-- horn - горн, bugle
B2/C1 horn - клаксон, foghorn - сирена: A horn is a device that makes a loud noise. "The boy honked his horn while he rode his bicycle past the house."
C2/-- horrifying, A2/B1 horrible, С2/-- horrified, B2/-- petrified, horrendous, horrific, horror-struck, aghast, appalled, C1/-- appalling(ly), shocking, B1/-- terrified, A2/A1 terrible, A2/A2 awful, C2/-- wretched, atrocious, abysmal, abominable, ghastly(-iness), very ugly: { hideous(ly, ness), grotesque }, revolting(ly), nauseating(ly), dreadful(ly), gruesome(ly), grisly, macabre; ; C2/-- grim, dismal, see also: miserable, sombre(ly, ness) (US somber):
        If something is horrifying, it is frightening and very unpleasant. "There was a horrifying car accident today."
        If something is horrible, it is very bad. "The assignment was horrible. I hated it."
        If you are horrified, you are shocked and feel upset. "I was horrified when I read about the old lady who was attacked."
        If you are terrified, you are extremely scared. "When I saw the ghost, I was absolutely terrified!"
        When something is awful, it is very bad. "Her performance last night was awful."
B2/B1 horror, B2/B2 terror, C1/-- fright, B1/B1 fear, dread, A2/A1 afraid; B2/B1 nightmare, see also: anxiety, distress, strain:
        horror is a feeling of being very afraid or shocked. "The audience screamed in horror when the ghost appeared in the movie."
        When someone feels terror, they are scared. "I felt a sense of terror when the tiger chased me."
        Fright is the feeling of being scared. "She was filled with fright."
        fear is the feeling of being afraid. "I have a great fear of skateboarding."
		To dread is to be afraid of something that could, or is going to, happen. "I dread the idea that I will not get into college."
		When someone is afraid, they feel fear. "The woman was afraid of what she saw."
		A nightmare is a bad or scary dream. "The girl was scared to go back to sleep because she had a nightmare."
      horrify, appal (US appall), B2/B2 terrify(-ied), B2/B1 frighten, B2/B1 fear, C1/B2 scare(d), A2/A1 afraid, C2/-- dread (C2 dread to think), petrify, startle, terrorize, consternation:
        To appall means to horrify, shock, or disgust someone. "The boy was appalled when he saw the accident."
        To scare someone is to make them feel afraid. "My uncle was scared by what he saw in the room."
        To scare means to cause one to feel frightened. "I was scared by the sight of the monster."
        To startle means to scare someone suddenly. "The loud crash startled the sleeping woman."
C1/-- hospitality (C1/-- hospitable): hospitality is friendly behavior and entertainment given to guests or strangers. "The travelers were amazed at the hospitality given them by the hotel’s staff."
                                      If someone is hospitable, they are friendly to strangers. "At dinner, Dad was very hospitable to my friends."
C2/C1 hostage
C1/C1 hostile (C2/C1 hostility), hostilities - военные действия, B2/B2 aggressive (C1/C1 aggression), A2/A1 angry, belligerent(ly, belligerence) - воинственный, агрессивный, the belligerent countries/states/nations (formal: воюющие):
        If someone is hostile, they are angry and unfriendly. "We were happy to move away from our hostile neighbor."
        If someone is aggressive, then they constantly want to fight. "Nobody liked to play games with him because he was always too aggressive."
        aggression is behavior that is mean or violent to others. "The problem was only made worse by Mark’s aggression."
        When someone is angry, they may want to speak loudly or fight. "She didn’t do her homework, so her father is angry."
C1/B2 housing - жилище, жильё (buildings for people to live in: "rental/student housing", "temporary/permanent housing", "low-cost/cheap housing", "There's a shortage of cheap housing in the region.")
C1/B2 housing - жилищный ( the job of providing houses, flats, etc. for people to live in: "Tenants may only keep pets with the written consent of the housing department.", "They discussed how the council's housing policy could be changed to deal with the growing housing crisis.")
C1/C1 humanity - человечество, mankind; B2/B2 civilization: mankind is all of the world's people. "All of mankind has to work to make this a better world."
                                                            A civilization is an organized group of humans that have culture and government. "Most early civilizations in Central America didn’t use metal weapons."
C2/C1 humanity - человечность, гуманизм, humane(ly), C2/C1 mercy - милосердие, милость: If something is humane, then it is good and kind. "Helping build homes for poor people is very humane."
                                                                                        If you show mercy, you choose not to punish or harm someone. "He asked his boss for mercy and to not fire him."
C2/C1 humanity - человечность (the state of being a person rather than a god, an animal or a machine)
--/C1 humanities - гуманитарные дисциплины: humanities are subjects which analyze human ideas, such as history and literature. "Jennifer has always been more interested in humanities than science."
C2/C1 humanitarian - гуманитарный: If something is humanitarian, it is connected to helping people’s lives. "After the flood, several humanitarian organizations offered help."
      humanitarian - гуманист
C2/C1 humble - скромный, C1/B2 modest, B2/-- reserved - сдержанный, unassuming (approving) - непритязательный, coy(ly, ness) - застенчивая, bashful(ly, ness), self-effacing, see also: close, timid, withdrawn:
		People who are humble do not believe that they are better than other people. "Even though Bob is the smartest boy in his class, he is humble."
        If people are modest, they do not think that they are too important. "Derek is very modest for someone who is so rich."
C2/C1 humble - скромный, простой (низкого происхожения или служебного положения), lowly
      humble - скромный, простой (not large or special in any way), C2/B2 plain(ly), B2/A2 simple, spare, --/C1 stark, C2/-- bleak, austere,... TODO
      humble - унижать (humbling - унизительный), humiliate (humility - скромность, смирение), mortify (cause to feel shame: "Intensely morified at this humiliation, the king fell sick, and henceforth his health failed rapidly"), degrade, stigma(tise)	:
        To humiliate someone means to make them feel ashamed and embarrassed. "I was humiliated when I tripped and fell down in front of the whole school."
        To degrade someone means to cause people to have shame. "The teacher degraded Bob when she announced his poor performance to the class."
С1/-- hygiene - гигиена: hygiene is the conditions or methods needed for health and cleanliness. "People who brush their teeth at least twice a day are practicing good hygiene."
C2/-- hygienic - гигиенический, гигиеничный: If something is hygienic, then it is clean and unlikely to cause disease. "My sister works very hard to keep her entire home as hygienic as possible."
C2/-- hypocritical(ly, hypocrite), disingenuous (formal); duplicitous, two-faced; guile, chicanery (formal), trickery, see also: sanctimonious / guileless, C1/B2 sincere, ingenuous (formal)
C1/-- idle - неработающий, простаивающий без дела, C1/B1 unemployed - безработный, jobless: If you are idle, you are not doing anything. "She read a book to keep from being idle."
C2/-- idle - праздный: "idle chatter/gossip/speculation", "This is no idle threat."
C2/-- idle - ленивый, A2/A2 lazy: "He's a very able student, he's just bone idle (= very lazy).", lazybones (old-fashioned, informal) - бездельник, loafer - бездельник
      idle - свободный (о времени): "If you have an idle moment, call me."
      idle - ебланить (бездельничать), idle sth away: " They idled the days away, talking and watching television.", " They idled along by the river (= walked slowly and with no particular purpose)."
      idle - работать на холостом ходу: "She left the car idling at the roadside."
C2/C1 ignorant(ly, -ce), C2/-- illiterate(illiteracy), benighted, unenlightened / enlighten(ed, ment, ing)
C2/B2 illusion: An illusion is something that looks real, but doesn't actually exist. "Some pictures create an illusion for the eyes."
C1/B1 impact - воздействовать, влиять, B2/A2 affect, B1/B1 influence - влиять, sway: To affect someone or something is to have an influence over them. "The student’s poor attitude affected the other students in the class."
                                                                                     To influence someone or something is to have an effect over them. "My friend influenced my decision to attend Terrance University."
C2/B2 impact - воздействие, эффект,    C2/A2 effect; B1/B1 influence - влияние, sway: An impact is the effect someone or something has on another. A strong influence. "My grandmother had a great impact on my life."
                                                                                      An effect is a change made by something else. "The medicine had a good effect on the boy."
C2/A2 image, C1/B2 picture: The image of something is a picture of it. "The image of her eye was very clear."
--/C1 imagery
C1/-- imaginative (approach/policy/etc.), see also: ingenious
C1/-- imaginative(ly), C2/-- resourceful(ness) - изобретательный, C1/B2 innovative (innovation), groundbreaking, inventive(ly, ness), enterprising, resources, see also: ingenious, novel, disruptive(ly):
        When someone is resourceful, they are good at dealing with hard situations. "After his boat sunk, Matt was resourceful enough to build a raft."
        When someone is inventive, they are good at creating new things. "The inventive student built a robot to help her with her chores."
        If something or someone is innovative, they can think in creative ways. "Since Peter was so innovative, he was chosen to lead the science team."
        An innovation is a product or an idea that is new or very original. "Mrs. Johnson made a great innovation to the company’s business plan."
C1/C1 immense(ly), B2/C1 tremendous(ly), B2/B2 vast(ly, ness), B1/A2 enormous(ly, ness), B1/A2 huge(ly), C2/B1 giant, gigantic, B2/B2 massive, colossal, prodigious(ly), stupendous(ly), monstrous, astronomical, mammoth, gargantuan, humungous (US humongous), see also: mountainous:
        If something is immense, it is very large. "An immense amount of money was needed to buy such a large boat."
        When something is tremendous, it is very large. "The Earth's oceans are filled with a tremendous amount of water."
        If something is vast, it is very large. "The wealthy man bought a vast amount of land in the countryside."
        When people or things are enormous, they are very large. "My dog looks enormous next to yours."
        If something is huge, it is very big. "At work, my father drives a huge truck."
        When people or things are giant, they are very big. "The giant truck got in my way."
        If something is gigantic, then it is extremely large. "Some dinosaurs were so gigantic that they were the size of buildings."
        If something is massive, it is very big. "The wheels on his truck were massive."
        If something is astronomical, then it is extremely large. "It’s an astronomical distance between the Milky Way galaxy and the nearest galaxy."
C2/-- immortal - бессмертный (also figurative = famous) / mortal - смертный: When a person is mortal, they cannot live forever. "All people are mortal."
--/B2 immune (to sth): When someone is immune to a disease, they cannot be affected by it. "Children usually get shots to make them immune to certain diseases."
C2/C1 immune (to sth) - not affected by something, especially something that you might expect to be harmful ("You'll eventually become immune to criticism.")
--/C1 immune (from sth) - protected from something and therefore able to avoid it, exempt - освобождённый (освобождать), see also: exemption
C1/-- impersonal - безликий, обезличенный, inanimate - безжизненный, неодушевлённый, see also: dreary / animate: If something is impersonal, it is not friendly and makes people feel unimportant. "The boy felt scared on his first day at the big, impersonal high school."
                                                                                                                 When something is animate, it has life. "Rocks and machines are not animate things."
C2/B2 implication, B2/C1 involvement, involve (?), imputation, innuendo (инсинуация, порочащий намёк), see also: cue, allusion:
C2/B2 implication, C2/C1 hint, C1/B2 indication - sth that serves to suggest ("Authorities said an autopsy found no indications of foul play or obvious signs of trauma on Houston"), B1/B2 insinuation, connotation, intimation, see also: cue
      implicate - подразумевать, указывать (на причину чего-л. плохого), see also: imply
      implicate - уличить, впутать, вовлечь
C2/B2 imply, insinuate, connote, entail(?), B2/B2 suggest, see also: implicate: To imply something is to suggest it without saying it. "The man implied that he wanted the job, but he didn't say so."
C2/-- implicit(ly) - скрытый, подразумеваемый
C2/-- implicit(ly) - безоговорочный, B2/B2 absolute(ly) TODO join
C1/B2 impose - навязывать, вводить, налагать (to officially force a rule, tax, punishment, etc. to be obeyed or received):
C1/-- impose - навязывать (to force sb to accept something, especially a belief or way of living)
--/B2 impose - налагать, накладывать, обуславливать (to force sb/sth to have to deal with sth that is difficult or unpleasant)
      impose - навязываться, напрягать (humorous: inflict yourself/sb on sb): To impose means to interrupt or force your ideas on other people. "He imposes on his wife every morning by expecting her to make breakfast."
      imposing - внушительный (​impressive to look at; making a strong impression: "a grand and imposing building", "a tall imposing woman", "He was an imposing figure on stage.", "These buildings were grand and stylized with intricate details and a bit of an imposing presence"), statuesque - статная ((usually of a woman) tall and beautiful in an impressive way; like a statue), see also: impressive
C1/C1 imprison, --/B2 jail
C2/-- impulse, C2/B2 urge, C2/-- whim, caprice (literary) - каприз (a sudden desire: "Nobody is really in charge, and decision are made on whim and caprice"), admonish, compulsion:
		An impulse is a sudden thoughtless urge to do something. "Because of the scary noise, she had animpulse to run somewhere and hide."
C2/-- impulsive, B2/-- unpredictable(-ly, unpredictability), whimsical(ly), capricious (literary), volatile; C1/-- changeable (see entry)
C1/-- inclusive (of sth) - полный, включающий, включая, all-inclusive: "The fully inclusive fare for the trip is £52." "The rent is inclusive of water and heating." "My rent is $700 a month inclusive (of bills)."
      inclusive - включительно: "I'll be away from 20 to 31 May inclusive."
      inclusive - инклюзивный, открытый: If something is inclusive, then it is open to all groups and people in society. "A more inclusive event would have allowed children to attend."
C1/C1 inclusion (A2/A1 include), C2/B2 incorporate, C2/C1 embrace, --/C1 encompass (formal; all-encompassing - всеобъемлющий), C1/B2 comprise, B1/A2 contain, B1/B1 consist in sth; consist of sth, embody, harbour (US harbor), see also: constitute, account for / C2/C1 exile, expel (expulsion) - изгонять, исключать, banish(ment), C1/B2 exclude, evict - выселять, see also: displace, uproot:
        inclusion is the act of including someone or something in a group. "Her inclusion into the photo club was well received."
        To incorporate is to add something to another thing. "I decided to incorporate a new ingredient into my cake recipe."
        If something comprises something else, it consists of or is made up of it. "Our school’s football team is mostly comprised with seniors."
        To contain something is to have it inside. "The mailbox contained a letter."
        To include something means to have it as part of a group. "Does this meal include a soft drink?"
        To consist of is to be made of parts or things. "Today's choices for lunch consisted of pizza, hamburgers, and hot dogs."
        To expel someone means to force them to leave a place. "Since he would not follow the rules, the principal had to expel the student."
        To exclude someone means to not accept them into a group. "Carol was excluded from the contest because her friend was a judge."
C2/B1 indeed: indeed means truly or really. "The birthday party was indeed fun last night."
C1/B2 index: An index is a list of words at the end of a book that gives information. "If you look in the index, you'll find the right page number."
--/C1 index, C1/C1 ratio, quotient - "the cost-of-living index", "a wage/price index", "stock-market indices", "the Dow Jones Index", "the FTSE 100 Index"
--/С1 index - показатель, индикатор, C2/C1 indicator ("The number of new houses being built is a good index of a country's prosperity.", "These atmospheric waves are a reliable indicator of weather changes.")
      index - показатель степени (math)
TODO index
      indict (for sth) - обвинить (​to officially charge somebody with a crime), see also: convict: "The senator was indicted for murder.", "She was indicted on charges of corruption."
      indictable - подледжащий уголовному преледованию: "an indictable offence", "Many more indictable offenders are tried in magistrates courts."
      indictment - обвинение (act or formal statement of accusing someone): "The charges on the indictment include murder and attempted murder.", "He faces indictment for perjury.", "For all its problems, the War Requiem will probably survive as one of our time's most impassioned indictments of war and its heroic myth."
--/C1 indictment ((of/on sb/sth) - бич, порок (a sign that a system, society, etc. is very bad or very wrong): "The poverty in our cities is a damning indictment of modern society."
C2/C1 indulge (overindulge), C1/C1 spoil, pamper, cosset
C1/B2 inevitable(-y), ineluctable, inescapable, C1/-- unavoidable: When something is inevitable, it is certain to happen or cannot be avoided. "It is inevitable that the days will get longer in the summer."
C2/-- inexplicable(ly) / explicable(ly), unaccountable(ly), incomprehensible(-ly) / comprehensible(-ly), understandable(-ly), see also: grasp
C2/C1 infant - младенец, C2/-- toddler - a young child, especially one who is learning or has recently learned to walk: An infant is a baby. "The infant cried all night."
C2/C1 infect, see also: foul, contract, communicate
C1/C1 infect (C2/-- infectious), contagious; C1/-- germ, C1/B2 bacterium, B2/A2 virus (viral), microbe, B2/B2 bug (informal):
		To infect someone means to give them an illness. "The common cold infects hundreds of millions of people each year."
		If a disease is contagious, it is easily carried from one person to another. "You must wear protective clothing because the patient’s illness is contagious."
		A germ is something that makes you sick. "germs are on everything that you touch."
        When something is viral, it is a disease or infection that is caused by a virus. "The girl was in bed for a week when she had a viral infection."
        A microbe is a very small living thing that often makes people sick. "The first step in curing a disease is finding the microbe that causes the disease."
      infest - поражать, паразитировать, кишеть, see also: rife, teeming (with)
C2/-- infinite - бесконечный, безграничный, --/C1 eternal, limitless, unlimited, boundless, unbounded (formal), see also: constant / C2/-- finite, B2/B2 limited:
        If something is infinite, it has no limit or end. "Many scientists believe that the universe is infinite."
        If something is eternal, then it lasts forever. "She said that her love for him was eternal."
C1/-- informative, illuminating, instructive, pith(y, ily) - содержательный ((of speech or writing) expressing an idea cleverly in a few words): "a pithy remark", see also: comprehensive / uninformative:
        When something is informative, it provides a lot of information. "The travel guide had a lot of informative facts about the region."
C2/B2 inherit; heredity - наследственность, hereditary: To inherit it to get something from someone who has died. "She inherited her mother's gold earrings."
                                                        heredity is the process of passing on features from parents to children. "The boy’s face is similar to his father’s because of heredity."
                                                        If something is hereditary, it is a trait passed onto children from their parents. "The hereditary disease affected three generations of children."
--/C1 inmate, B2/B1 prisoner, captive, detainee: A captive is a prisoner. "The guards told the captive that there was no way he could escape the prison."
C2/C1 incentive - уступка, льгота, see also: C2/C1 concession
C2/B2 incentive - стимул, C2/C1 stimulus, C2/B2 motivation, inducement, / disincentive: An incentive is what makes a person want to do something. "The chance of winning a prize wasincentive to get people to play the game."
                                                                                        A stimulus is something that causes growth or activity. "Having a lot of money is a stimulus for people to buy more things."
      incentivize, B2/C1 stimulate, C1/B2 motivate, see also: encourage, exhort, reason with sb: To stimulate something means to cause or to increase activity in it. "Doctors sometimes use electric shock to stimulate a patient’s heartbeat."
C2/C1 inherent, C2/-- intrinsic, C1/C1 integral(ly), inbuilt (US usually built-in): When something is inherent, it is a natural part of something else. "Sweating is an inherent bodily function when exercising."
                                                                                	If something is intrinsic, then it is related to the basic nature of that thing. "Paper money has no intrinsic value. It is useful simply because society says it is."
C2/-- innate(ly), --/C1 indigenous, C2/B1 native, inborn, congenital; aborigine, see also: unique:
		When something is innate, it is something that one is born with, it is not learned. "He had the innate desire to please his teachers."
        When something is native, it is originating in a certain place or area. "Avocadoes are native fruits of Mexico."
        If something is indigenous, it is originally from, or native to, a place. "Tomatoes are indigenous to the Americas."
        An aborigine is a native of Australia before Europeans lived there. "The aborigines created beautiful artwork."
B2/B1 innocent(ly) - невиновный (C1/-- innocence) / B2/C1 guilt, B2/B1 guilty (see also: apologetic), culpable, formal: blameworthy:
        If people feel guilty, they feel bad for what they did. "I felt guilty for taking my sister's cookies."
        If someone is innocent, they are not guilty of a crime. "The judge said that the woman was innocent of the crime."
B2/B2 innocent(ly) - невинный, наивный (C1/-- innocence), C1/-- naive(ly), gullible, credulous(ly, credulity), see also: trust / incredulous(ly, incredulity; disbelief), see also: distrust, suspicious
        innocence is a lack of experience of difficult or complex things in life. "Everyone who met her found her innocence to be charming."
        If someone is incredulous about something, they do not believe that it is true. "She was incredulous that monkeys could ever drive a car."
C2/-- innocent(ly) - невинный (непричастный): "Several innocent bystanders were injured in the explosion."
C2/-- innocent(ly) - невинный, безобидный, безвредный, B2/-- harmless(ly, ness), innocuous(ly, ness), see also: benign(ly)
C2/-- inseparable - неразлучный: If two things are inseparable, they can’t be separated. "Denise and Diana have been inseparable since they first met."
C2/-- inseparable - неразделимый
C1/B2 insert, --/C1 embed - вставить, встроить, B2/C1 stab - пырнуть, (во)ткнуть (ножом, вилкой и т.д.), зарезать, всадить, lodge, spike, spear, pierce, prick, impale, jab, prod, poke, penetrate, see also: B2/B1 stick; shove, lunge - рывок, выпад, броситься, рвануться, сделать выпад, thrust - (за)сунуть, (за)пихнуть, выдвинуть вперёд, выпятить, воткнуть, сделать выпад, рвануться и быстро пронестить в направлении:
        To insert something means to put it in something else. "The mailman inserted the letter into the mailbox."
        To embed something means to place it firmly within a surrounding thing. "The logger embedded the ax into the wood after chopping several logs."
        To stab means to cut someone or something with a sharp object like a knife. "He stabbed the fork into the potato and passed it to his daughter."
        To pierce something means to make a hole in it using a sharp object. "The arrow pierced the target in the very center."
        To prod means to push someone or something with a finger or pointed object. "The bully prodded me in the chest with his finger."
        To poke something is to push it with your finger. "I poked my finger on a thumb tack."
        To thrust means to push or move something quickly with a lot of force. "The boxer thrust his fist into the punching bag.":
        To penetrate something means to enter into it. "The knife easily penetrated the surface of the orange."
C2/A2 inside, B1/B1 within / outside: inside means the inner part, space or side of something. "The inside of the box was empty."
                                      You use within to say that something is inside another thing. "within the box, there was a pizza."
C1/B2 insist(ent(ly)): To insist means to be firm in telling people what to do; insist on doing sth. "I insist that you try some of these cookies.
B2/C1 inspiration - вдохновение
C2/C1 inspiration - источник вдохновения, пример для подражания (C1/-- role model)
C2/C1 inspiration - озарение: "It came to me in a flash of inspiration.", see also: dawn on sb
B2/B2 inspire - вдохновлять: To inspire means to make person want to do something. "I was inspired to write a poem after watching the sunrise."
B2/-- inspire - внушить (to make someone have a particular strong feeling or reaction) - "внушить страх", "вдохнуть уверенность", "наполнить ужасом"
B2/B2 instant(ly), A2/A1 moment, B1/-- straightaway, A2/B1 now, A2/B1 immediate(ly), B2/-- prompt(ly), B1/B2 briefly, outright, C2 on the spot, C1 in (next to) no time, B1 at once, right(US)/straight(UK) away, momentarily, instantaneous(ly), split second, forthwith, directly (old-fashiond or formal)
        An instant is a very short amount of time. "A microwave oven cooks food in an instant."
        A moment is a second or a very short time. "I was only a few moments late for the meeting."
        If something is immediate, it happens quickly. "An immediate response came from the pizza place."
C2/C1 instinct: instinct is the natural way that people behave without thinking about it. "Cats hunt mice because of instinct."
C1/B2 instrument, tool: A tool is something that helps you do a task. "We used a tool to fix the window."
TODO instrument: An instrument is something designed to do a certain task like music. "My favorite musical instrument is the piano."
C1/C1 insufficient - недостаточный (not enough: "insufficient information/time", "I’m afraid we have insufficient evidence.", " His salary is insufficient to meet his needs.", "The plan was to refurbish the whole building but the funds raised were insufficient for the purpose."), see also: inadequate
С2/С1 intact, undamaged, unhurt, unharmed, unscathed, uninjured - невредимый, inviolate (formal) - нетронутый, девственный, see also: pristine, safe and sound:
		When something is intact, it is complete and not damaged. "Despite being over ten years old, my father’s model ship is still intact."
C1/B2 integrate, assimilate, see also: join, connect, bind / segregate: To integrate means to join, communicate and socialize. "Governments want immigrants to integrate with the population."
C2/C1 integrity - TODO, C1/B2 moral, B2/-- upright, upstanding, honourable, righteous(ly, ness): integrity is honesty and good morals. "The principal had a lot of integrity."
C2/C1 integrity - TODO, C1/B2 unity (C1/B2 unite, unify), cohere (formal) - сплотиться, C1/C1 solidarity, cohesion, see also: collectivity, pull together / disunite (disunity):
        unity is the state of people working together for a certain purpose. "The project was finished early, thanks to the unity of the workers."
        To unite is to get together to do something. "If we unite, we can finish our project faster."
        To unify means to bring people or things together. "With their good deeds, the children tried to unify the world."
        solidarity is a union formed from common responsibilities or interests. "All the citizens came together in a show of solidarity to create change."
C2/C1 intellectual, see also: genious: An intellectual is a very smart person. "We’ve always considered my Uncle Max the intellectual of the family."
B2/C1 intellectual, B2/B1 mental / B2/A2 physical: If something is mental, it has to do with your mind. "I made a mental picture of the room."
                               					   If something is physical, it is related to your body and not your mind. "Biking is good for your physical health."
C2/C1 interim, B2/B2 temporary(-ily), provisional(ly), tentative(ly, ness), see also: preliminary / B1/B2 permanent(ly, ce):
        If something is temporary, it exists for a short time. "This car is only temporary; I'll get a new one soon."
        If something is permanent, it lasts for a long time or forever. "We don't know if Aunt Mildred's visit will be a permanent one."
        The permanence of something is its ability to last forever. "Poor results will threaten the permanence of the new teaching system."
B2/C1 interior, B2/B2 internal, B2/B2 inner, inward (see also concealed) / C1/-- exterior, B2/B2 external(ly), B2/B2 outer:
        When something is internal, it exists or happens inside a person, object, or place. "We removed the outer case to reveal the computer’s internal wires."
        If a thought or feeling is inward, it is not expressed or shown to others. "She had an inward feeling of guilt when she lied to her mother."
        An exterior is the outside surface of something. "The exterior of the nut was hard and woody, but the inside was soft and delicious."
        When something is external, it is connected to an outer part. "It is warm inside my house, but the external temperature is freezing."
C2/B2 interval, see also: period: An interval is the time between two things happening. "Tony rested for brief intervals while he worked in the yard."
C2/-- intrude, obtrude - навязываться, делать(ся) слишком заметным, мешающим
C2/B2 invade, C2/C1 intervene, C1/C1 conquer (conquest), encroach, trespass, incursion, besiege (siege - an action of an armed force that surronds a fortified place: "Rebellion broke out, and finally the aged Caliph, after enduring a siege of several weeks, was murdered in hos own house"), see also: occupy:
		To invade is to take over a place by force. "The enemy forces tried to invade our country through the air."
        To intervene means to help stop a problem between two people or groups. "The students argued until the teacher intervened."
        To conquer a country means to attack and take control of it. "The soldiers were trying to conquer the world."
        A conquest is an event by which one country takes over another country. "After the conquest, the people of the small city had no freedom."
C2/B2 invasion: An invasion is an attack by a group from another country. "In Korea, walls were built around cities to protect them from invasions."
--/C1 invoke - ссылаться (to mention or use a law, rule, etc. as a reason for doing something)
--/C1 invoke - ссылаться, цитировать, see also: quote
      invoke - взывать, B2/B2 pray: To invoke something is to mention it to support an argument or ask for help. "Before going into battle, the soldier invoked the name of his god for protection."
                                    To pray means to talk to God. "When people go to church, they pray for their families and friends."
      invoke - вызывать (духов, демонов и т.д.)
      invoke - вызывать (воспоминания, чувства, и т.д.); --/C1 evoke, conjure sth <-> up, summon sth <-> up, see also: stir sth <-> up; C2/-- recollect(ion), B2/B2 recall, A2/A1 remember, B1/B1 remind; reminisce(nce(s)); B1/A2 memory:
        To recall something is to remember it. "She was trying to recall what she had told her friend."
        To remind someone is to tell them to remember to do something. "Nick's dad reminded him to do his homework."
        A memory is something you remember. "The memory of my first time in the city will always be the best."
        To evoke a memory or emotion means to make it occur. "The picture evoked memories of when grandmother was a girl."
      invoke - вызывать (программу, фунцию и т.д.)
C2/C1 irony, C2/-- sarcastic, C2/C1 cynic(al(ly), ism), wry, snide (ехидный), vitriolic (едкий), pungent(ly) - острый, резкий, едкий, scathing(ly); satire - witty language use to covey insults or scorn:
        When something is sarcastic, it is the opposite of what is actually meant. "She hurt her mother’s feelings with her constant sarcastic remarks."
        A satire is a work of art that uses humor and irony to make fun of something. "This book is a satire of what life was like in the army."
C2/C1 irony, sarcasm, cynicism
--/C1 irrelevant(ly), impertinent(ly) / B2/B2 relevant(ly), pertinent(ly), in terms of sth, B2 in respect of sth (also with respect to sth) = about/relating to (formal):
		When something is relevant, it is important to a certain person or situation. "The thirty-year-old book about politics is still relevant to our society today."
C2/-- irritable - раздражительный, peevish, petulant (dissaproving), testy, tetchy (informal), see also: temper, peevish: When someone is irritable, they become annoyed or angry very easily. "She is irritable when she doesn’t get enough sleep."
--/C1 isolate, C1/-- shield, insulate, see also: seclude: To insulate something means to protect it from heat, cold, or noise. "People can conserve energy by insulating their houses."
                                                          To isolate is to separate one person or thing from a group. "The teacher isolated the bad child from the class before talking with her."
C2/-- issue - выпускать (see also: yield)
      issuance
B1/B1 issue - важдый вопрос/темаж С2 at issue - "вопрос в том..": "The point at issue is what is best for the child.", "What is at issue is whether she was responsible for her actions."
        An issue is an important topic. "The men spoke about issue that were important to the people."
B1/B2 issue - вопрос, проблема
TODO issue
C1/-- jealousy - зависть, ревность, jealous(ly) - завистливый, ревнивый; B2/-- envy - зависть, завидовать, envious - завистливый:
        jealousy is a feeling of wanting something that somebody else has. "She felt a lot of jealousy when she saw Luke with two girls."
        If you are jealous, you think someone might take something from you. "Miriam was jealous because Sue was paying too much attention to Jim."
        To envy someone is to wish that you had something that they have. "Sally envied the happy couple."
        When someone is envious, they want something that another person has. "They were envious of their neighbor’s front yard."
C2/B2 journal(ist, ism), --/C1 columnist, magazine, A1/A1 newspaper, gazette (old-fashioned): A journal is a type of magazine that deals with an academic subject. "Mi-young was busy working on an article for an art journal."
                                                                                    		  journalism is the work of collecting the news to put in newspapers or on TV. "Before becoming a teacher, she worked in journalism."
                                                                                    		  A journalist is a person who writes news stories. "The journalist took notes for a story he was writing."
                                                                                    		  A columnist is a writer who creates articles about a particular subject. "The columnist won praise for his articles about life on the farm."
                                                                                    		  A magazine is a regular publication with news, stories, and articles. "She likes to read fashion magazines."
                                                                                    		  A gazette is a newspaper. "Alice wants to write for a gazette when she’s older."
C2/B1 judge
C2/B2 judgment, see also: outlook: judgment is the ability to form opinions or decisions. "It's good judgment to recycle your aluminum cans."
--/C1 judicial: If something is judicial, it is related to judges or courts of law. "The laws changed the way the judicial system was structured."
      judicious(ly) (formal, approving), see also: sound(ly) / injudicious(ly) (formal)
C1/-- junk - хлам, барахло, B1/B1 waste - отходы, B1/-- garbage (US), B1/-- trash (US), B1/A2 rubbish (UK), see also: litter:
		To waste means to carelessly use something all up. "Turn off the water so you don't waste it."
        garbage is waste material like unwanted or spoiled food, bottles, paper, etc. "The boy cleaned up the garbage around his house."
        rubbish is trash or waste. "The floor around the garbage can was covered with all kinds of rubbish."
        trash is waste material or unwanted or worthless things. "Please take out the trash; it smells bad"
C2/C1 just(ice, ly), C2/B1 fair(ly, ness), see also: equality, equity / unjust, C1/C1 injustice, see also: inequality:
        justice is fairness in the way that you treat other people. "People turn to the court system when they are seeking justice."
        If something is done justly, then it is fair. "We justly decided to give the prize to him."
        fair describes treating someone in a way that is reasonable or right. "He sold me his car for a fair price."
        injustice is a lack of fairness or justice. "Putting an innocent person in jail is an act of injustice."
C2/C1 justification (B2/B2 justify), A2/A1 reason (B2/B2 reasonable), C2/B2 grounds (основания (полагать)), warrant - требовать (делать необходимым) (unwarranted = unjustified = неоправданный, несправедливый, see also: undue), B1/B1 sense, B1/A2 explanation (A2/A1 explain), pardon, grounds, C1/B1 basis, B1/B2 excuse, B2/C1 motive, pretext, see also: plead: https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/reason_1?q=reason
     To justify something means to show or prove that it is necessary. "The government tried to justify its decision to bring the country into a war."
     A motive is the reason someone does something. "His motive for studying so hard is to get into a good college."
     To pardon is a way to ask someone to repeat what was said before. "pardon me teacher, but could you repeat what you just said?"
C2/-- juicy - сочный (detail, gossip, etc.)
B2/-- juicy - сочный (food), juiciness, succulent, succulence
B1/B1 keen(ly, ness) - жаждущий, C2/B2 desperate(ly, -ion), B2/C1 eager(ly, ness), B1/B2 willing(ly, ness), avid(ly, ity, see also: compelling, zealous), B2/B2 enthusiast(ic, see also: enthusiasm), A2/A2 pleased; C1/B2 desire, C2/-- crave, C2/-- yearn, C2 long (for sb/sth / to do sth / for sb to do sth), B2/-- ache (for sb/sth / to do sth); languish, pine for sth/sb - чахнуть, тосковать / C1/C1 reluctant(ly, -ce):
        When a person is eager about something, they are excited about it. "The man was eager to talk about the good news."
        To be enthusiastic about something is to be excited by or interested in it. "The man was enthusiastic about his job."
        To desire is to want something. "My sister desires a big house and lots of money."
        If someone is reluctant, they do not want to do something. "She was reluctant to eat the meager breakfast."
        reluctance is a feeling of not wanting to do something. "Jesse took out the trash with great reluctance."
        If you are desperate, you will try anything to do or change something. "I'm desperate to find a new job."
      keen(ly, ness) - проницательный, умный (also: ingenious), C2/B1 sharp(ly, ness), --/C1 acute(ly, ness), C1/B2 genius (see also: intellectual), C2/C1 profound, B2/B1 intelligent(-ce), C2/-- intellect, --/C1 cognitive, C1/B2 insight(ful (see also perception)), B2/A2 understanding (KNOWLEDGE), B1/B1 knowledge - знание, knowledgeable - образованный, эрудированный, intuitive, savvy (informal) - хватка, смекалка, see also: discernment, imaginative:
        If someone is keen, they are intelligent. "Only the keenest of students could have solved that math problem."
        A genius is a very smart person. "Since she was a genius, she easily passed all of her school exams."
        When something is profound, it is very intelligent. "For a little boy, Jeremy has some profound thoughts."
        intelligence is the ability to learn and understand things. "Because of his high intelligence, he finished school early."
        An intellect is a person’s ability to understand things easily. "She was known for her quick and strong intellect as well as her beauty."
        If something is cognitive, it is related to learning and knowing things. "After her physical examination, her cognitive strengths were tested."
        insight is a deep and accurate understanding of something. "The physics textbook gave the student newinsight about gravity."
        knowledge is information that you have about something. "A music teacher should have good knowledge of music."
        intuitive is knowing about something without naturally having support or proof. "Rhonda had an intuitive feeling that Shane wasn’t coming to school today."
C1/-- keen(ly, ness) - острый, обострённый, развитый, высокочувствительный, --/C1 acute(ly, ness), exquisite(ly, ness):
        When a bad thing is acute, it is very severe and intense. "When she fell out of the tree, the girl felt an acute pain in her arm."
      keen(ly, ness) - острый, C2/B1 sharp(ly, ness), --/B2 pointed(ly) / C2/-- blunt(ly, ness): When something is sharp, it has a thin edge that cuts things easily. "That knife is very sharp. Be careful not to hurt yourself."
C2/-- keep sth back (from sb) - утаивать, скрывать, withhold - удерживать, утаивать, скрывать, see also: conceal: To withhold something is to not give it to someone. "They withheld all information until she paid her fine."
      keep sth back - сдержать: "She was unable to keep back her tears.", restrain: "I restrained the urge to punch him.", "I was tempted to answer back, but I restrained myself."
      keep sth back - придержать (to continue to have a part of something), "He kept back half the money for himself."
      keep back - держаться в удалении: "Keep well back from the road."
--/C1 kidnap, abduct, C2/-- snatch, C2/C1 seize; ransom - выкуп: To kidnap someone is to take them illegally. "She was terrified to find out her son was kidnapped."
                                                                 A ransom is a sum of money paid to a kidnapper to set the person free. "He kidnapped the prince and demanded $1 million as ransom."
C2/B1 label, --/B2 tag: A label is a tag that tells about something. "The label on the back of your shirt will tell you what size it is."
C2/B2 labour (US: labor): labor is the act of doing or making something. "Building the house took a lot of labor."
--/C1 lad (old-fashioned or informal) - парень (a boy or young man: "lads and lasses (= boys and girls)")
C1/B2 ladder, C2/-- staircase, stairway (see also: flight) - лестничный пролёт, A2/A2 stair, handrail, banister(s):
		A ladder is an object that is used to climb up and down things. "He used a ladder to climb to the top of his tree house."
        A staircase is a set of stairs found inside a building. "The staircase leads directly into the kitchen."
        stairs are the things that are used to go up in a building. "You can take the stairs to the second floor."
C2/B2 land: To land means to come to the ground usually from a ship or aircraft. "The parachutist landed safely on the ground."
C1/C1 landmark - ориентир, buoy - буй (lifebuoy - спасательный круг): A landmark is an object that helps people find or remember a location. "The tall tree was used as a landmark for people to find the road to the inn."
                                                                      A buoy is a floating sign that warns boats of dangerous areas. "Don’t steer the boat near those buoys. There are rocks underneath the water."
C1/C1 landmark - достопримечательность, B1/B1 sculpture, monument, statue, fountain: A sculpture is a piece of art that is made from wood, clay, or stone. "We saw an old sculpture of Buddha at the museum."
																		   			 A monument is a structure that is built to remind people of a person or event. "A large monument was built to honor the brave soldiers."
                                                          				   			 A statue is an image of a person or animal made of stone or metal. "I saw a beautiful statue of a lion today."
                                                          				   			 A fountain is a source of water made by people. "There was a beautiful fountain in the middle of the park."
C2/C1 landmark - веха, важный этап, milestone, see also: stage
B2/B2 lane - просёлочная дорога (a narrow road in the country): A lane is a small road. "The lane passes directly in front of our house."
B2/B2 lane - улица, переулок, C1/-- avenue, alley, crescent, driveway: An avenue is a road, often a large one with buildings on each side. "Drive down this avenue and then turn left to go to the park."
                                                                       An alley is a narrow road behind houses or buildings. "The alley behind my house looks dirty."
                                                                       A driveway is a short private road that leads to a person's home. "The long driveway led us to their new house."
B2/B2 lane - полоса дороги
B2/C1 lane - дорожка (в спорт. состязаниях)
--/C1 lane - линия маршрута (sea lane - морская линия, фартватер; air lane - авиалиния). "one of the world’s busiest shipping/sea lanes".
B2/C1 lap - колени
B2/-- lap - круг (стадиона, трассы и .д.)
      lap - обогнать на круг (стадиона, трассы и .д.)
      lap - плескаться (о воде)
      lap - лакать (жидкость языком)
C1/A2 last (see also: linger), --/C1 span (C2/-- lifespan (B2/B2 lifetime, продолжительность жизни, C2/C1 lifelong - пожизненный), wingspan (размах крыльев)), C1/B2 duration, C2/-- elapse, C2/B1 pass, B2 go by:
        To last is to continue or go on for an amount of time. "The football match lasted for nearly two hours."
        To span a length of time is to last that long. "His work began in 1999. It has spaned many years since then."
        The duration of an event is the time during which it happens. "The girls watched television for the duration of the evening."
        To elapse means to pass, as in seconds, minutes, or hours. "A few seconds must elapse before you can take another picture."
C2/A1 late - покойный, departed (literary), see also: deceased:
A1/A1 late - поздно (поздний) / A1/A1 early - рано (ранний) / B1/A2 recent, latter - недавний: When something is recent, it happened a short time ago. "I did not know what caused his recent behavior."
A1/A1 late - опоздавший
B1/B2 lately, B2/B2 newly, B1/A2 recently, freshly, latterly (formal)
C2/A2 later: later means after the present, expected, or usual time. "She missed the train, so she'll arrive a little later than expected."
B2/C1 latter, B1/B2 former(ly), B1 previous(ly): latter describes something last in a series or the second choice of two things. "In the latter minutes of the game, the visitors scored the winning goal."
                                                 former describes something that used to be but is not any more. "The hotel, a former castle, was built over 200 years ago."
      B1/A1 laugh, --/A2 laughter: laugh is the sound made when someone is happy or a funny thing occurs. "The sound of their laugh filled the room."
    							   laughter is the sound produced by laughing about something funny. "Susan's joke made her classmates burst into laughter."
C2/B2 law, statute, decree (formal) - постановление, указ, fiat (formal) - декрет, указ, edict (formal) - указ, --/C1 warrant (for sth / to do sth) - ордер (на обыск, арест), see also: proclaim, charter, ordain:
		A law is a rule made by the legislative body. "The students learned about different laws during social studies class."
        A statute is a law that is official and has been written down. "The new statute made it illegal to walk dogs in the park."
C1/C1 lawn: A lawn is an area covered in grass. "My dad keeps the lawn in front of your house very neat."
C2/B2 leave, --/C1 exit, B1/B1 quit, B1/B2 depart(ure), vacate (formal) - leave behind empty, move out of ("Their number diminished sharply after Villaraigosa announced last week that he wanted protesters to vacate the grounds by Monday or be forcibly removed"), see also: evacuate:
		To leave means to go away from someone or something. "He packed his bag and was ready to leave for home."
        To exit means to leave. "The students exited through the front door."
        to leave some place so you can go to another place. "The plane departed for Italy at 3:00 this afternoon."
        To depart is to leave some place so you can go to another place. "The plane departed for Italy at 3:00 this afternoon."
        A departure is the act of leaving a place. "They were excited about their departure back home."
      leave out - пропустить, упустить, покинуть (to not include or mention somebody/something in something: "You left out the best parts of the story.", "She left out an ‘m’ in ‘accommodation’.", "He hadn't been asked to the party and was feeling very left out."), see also: omit, abandoned?
      leave out - избавить ("Leave me out of this quarrel, please."), see also: spare
TODO leave
      legislate - узаконивать, принимать законы: To legislate means to make laws. "Senators have to legislate fairly, so most people will enjoy the benefits."
C2/C1 legislation - законодательство; --/C1 legislature - законодательная власть; --/C1 legislative - законодательный; statutory - установленный, определённый законом
        A legislature is the section of a government that makes laws. "The senator had served ten years in the national legislature."
C2/C1 legitimate (legitimacy), B2/B1 legal(ity), licit(ly), lawful(ly, ness), see also: credible / illegitimate (illegitimacy), B2/-- illegal(ity), illicit(ly), unlawful(ly):
        If something is legitimate, then it is acceptable according to the law. "She found a legitimate plan to raise extra funds for her vacation."
        If something is legal, it is related to the law or allowed by the law. "It was not legal for him to drive untill he was eighteen years old."
B2/A2 lend - давать взаймы, see also: borrow
      lend (formal: to give a particular quality to a person or a situation) - придавать, see also: impart
C2/-- lend itself to sth - плдходить, поддаваться (​to be suitable for something): "The novel's complex, imaginative style does not lend itself to translation."
C1/-- lengthen, C1/-- prolong, protract, see also: extend: To prolong means to make something last for a longer time. "Sandy walked slowly across the beach, trying to prolong her lunch break."
C1/C1 lengthy, C1/-- prolonged, protracted, extended, drawn-out, C2 long
C2/-- lenient - мягкий, снисходительный / severe, stringent, draconian
      leniency (also less frequent lenience) - снисхождение, снисходительность (the fact of being less strict than expected when punishing somebody or when making sure that rules are obeyed: "She appealed to the judge for leniency.", "The defending lawyer asked for leniency on the grounds of her client's youth.", "But for the leniency of the referee, the player would have been sent off.")
C1/B2 level - уровень (rank in scale), tier - уровень, ярус: "These are subjects for discussion at management level."
B2/B1 level - уровень (the amount or number of something): "Inflation is going to rise two percent from its present level.":
		A level is a point on a scale that measures something. "Please check the level of the temperature."
B2/A2 level - уровень (высота), see also: height
--/A2 level - уровень (этаж), tier - ярус: "a multi-level parking lot"
A2/B1 level - уровень (standard, ability, etc.): "The hotel's level of service is consistently high." "The participants had different levels of education."
      level - уровень (восприятия): "On a more personal level, I would like to thank Jean for all the help she has given me." "At a conscious level, I was quite satisfied with my life."
B2/B1 level - ровный, плоский
--/B1 level - выровненный, на (одном / том же) уровне, see also: equal, even
      level(ly) - ровный, спокойный, уверенный, see also: even, calm
--/B2 level - выравнивать (make flat/equal)
      level - сровнять с землёй, raze (to the ground), see also: devastate
      level - приставить (прицелиться): "I had a gun levelled at my head.", see also: aim
C1/C1 liable,
C2/C1 liable, C2/C1 inclined, B2/B1 tend (tend = уход, забота (TODO)), C1/-- biased, see also: bound, likely, partial:
		To tend to do something is to be likely to do it or to do it often. "My mom tends to buy me the perfect gift each Christmas."
        If something is liable to happen, it is very likely that it will happen. "During the summer months, hikers in the forest are liable to see deer and elk."
C1/C1 liberal / illiberal, intolerant: When someone is liberal, they accept different ideas and people. "My grandparents aren’t as liberal as my parents."
B2/C1 liberty, B2/B2 freedom, leeway, latitude (formal) - freedom from normal restraints in conduct ("Great employees often get more latitude to bring up controversial subjects in a group setting because their performance allows greater freedom"):
		liberty is freedom to do what you want. "To many people, the Statue of liberty is a symbol of freedom."
--/C1 licence (US license), --/C1 patent, B1/B2 certificate (certify), credentials, diploma, B1/A2 document, see also: deed:
        A license is an official document that gives one permission to do something. "In the United States you need a driver's license to drive legally."
        A patent is a right to be the only person allowed to make or sell a new product. "He quickly established a patent for his brilliant invention."
        A certificate is a document that says that something is true or happened. "I was given a certificate after completing the computer course."
        To certify something means to confirm that its results are true. "The photograph on her passport certified that she was indeed Jolene Sawyer."
        credentials are the proof of someone’s experience or ability to do something. "The mechanic hung his credentials on his office wall."
        A diploma is a certificate proving that someone has completed their studies. "After four years of college, Mary finally had a diploma."
        A document is an official piece of writing. "He was given an official document proving he was a citizen."
C2/C1 likelihood, C1/B2 probability; C2 in all probability - "весьма вероятно"
C2/A2 likely (see also: liable), B2/B2 probable, B1/A1 possible; B2/B2 potential, susceptible; A2/A1 maybe, A2/A2 perhaps, --/C1 arguably / unlikely, impprobable, impossible:
        If something likely happens, it will probably happen. "I will likely stay at home and watch TV tonight."
        If something is probable, it is likely to happen. "It is probable that you will get a good grade if you study for the test."
        potential means capable of being but not yet in existence. "I've thought of some potential problems with your idea."
        maybe is used to show that something is possible or may be true. "If I focus hard enough, maybe I can come up with the right answer."
        perhaps is used when you say that something could happen. "perhaps I will eat an apple for lunch."
--/C1 limb - конечность; толстая ветка, B2/B1 branch - ветка, twig - веточка, bough (formal or literary): A limb is a large branch on a tree. "The monkey sat on the tree limb and enjoyed a piece of fruit."
                                                                                                          A branch is the part of a tree with leaves. "The monkey was hanging from a branch on the tree."
                                                                                                          A twig is a short and thin branch from a tree or bush. "They started the fire with a handful of dry twigs."
C2/B2 line
C2/-- linger, stay, see also: last: To linger is to last for a long time. "The smell of fresh cookies lingered in the bakery."
C2/-- literal(ly) / figurative(ly), metaphorical(ly)
C2/B1 local: If something is local, it is nearby. "The local market in my neighborhood sells all the food we need."
C1/C1 log: A log is a thick piece of wood that is cut from a tree. "The fire was too small, so we added another logto it."
C2/-- longevity (formal): longevity is the ability to live for a long time. "Sea turtles have an amazing longevity."
C2/C1 loom - надвигаться, вырисовываться (C2 loom large - вырисовываться, нависать, looming - надвигающийся), C2/C1 imminent(ly), C1/C1 upcoming, C1/C1 forthcoming, oncoming, coming, impending; pending:
        To loom is to seem very large and often scary. "The ominous clouds loomed over the school."
        If something is impending, it is going to happen soon. "The student was nervous about his impending test."
        When something is upcoming, that means it will happen in the near future. "The kids were worried about their upcoming exam."
        If something is forthcoming, then it is about to happen in the future. "Some economists predicted that the forthcoming world economy would be severe."
C2/C1 loom - нависать, вырисовываться (что-то большое и страшное), tower above/over sb/sth - возвышаться
      loom - ткацкий станок
C2/B2 loose(en), slack(en) / B2/C1 tight(en, ly), B1/B1 relax, taut, see also: snug, snugly, close, closely: When something is loose, it is not held in place well. "The bolt was loose, so I tightened it with the wrench."
                                                                	                                         When something is tight, it is fixed or fastened firmly in place. "The knots were too tight to untie."
C1/B1 loss: A loss means the act or an instance of losing something. "I suffered a big loss while I was gambling."
C2/-- lucrative (lucratively, lucrativeness)
C1/C1 machinery - оборудование
--/C1 magnitude - величина, важность, see also: scale, incidence, order of magnitude:
C2/C1 mainstream, C2/C1 norm(al(ly)), see also: accustom(ed), characteristic, staple: The mainstream is a group of ideas that are considered normal and accepted. "Before punk rock music became part of the mainstream, only a few people liked it."
                              	  							  				  		  A norm is a way of behaving that is considered normal in a particular society. "Wearing a heavy coat all summer is not considered a norm in the desert."
                              	  							  				  		  If something is normal, it is not strange nor surprising to you. "It is normal for me to bathe every night."
B2/C1 maintenance - содержание, уход, (тех.) обслуживание (the work needed to keep a road, building, machine, etc. in good condition: "car maintenance", "The school pays for heating and the maintenance of the buildings."), see also: upkeep
B2/C1 maintenance - поддержание (the act of making a state or situation continue: "the maintenance of international peace", "the maintenance of living standards")
      maintenance - содержание (the money needed for somebody's living expenses; the act of providing this money: "Most students need to take out loans for maintenance as well as tuition fees."), see also: upkeep
      maintenance (UK, law) - содержание, алименты (money that somebody must pay regularly to their former wife, husband or partner, especially when they have had children together: "a maintenance order (= given by a court of law)", "He has to pay maintenance to his ex-wife."), see also: upkeep
--/C1 manifest (formal) - показывать, C1/B2 illustrate, C2/-- exemplify, C1/B2 demonstrate, see also: reveal
        To manifest means to make something visible or obvious. "The holiday season manifested joy in the children."
        To demonstrate something is to show how it is done. "She demonstrated her plan to her co-workers."
--/C1 manifest (formal) - появляться, B1/A2 appear, see also: emerge
      manifest (formal) - очевидный, C1/B2 apparent(ly), B1/B1 obvious(ly), B2/B2 evident(ly), A2/A2 clear, patent, conspicuous (заметный), blatant(ly) (явный, вопиющий, откровенный), glaring(ly), flagrant(ly) (disapproving - вопиющий), egregious (formal - вопиющий), see also: gross (вопиюйщий, грубый) / inconspicuous (неприметный):
        If something is apparent, it is easy to see. "Her happiness was apparent from the smile on her face."
        If something is obvious, it is clear and easily seen. "It was obvious that he was tired. He kept falling asleep."
        When something is evident, it is easy to see or understand. "It was evident from the look on his face that he was unhappy."
      manifest - декларация судового груза (​a list of goods or passengers on a ship or an aircraft)
      manifestation - проявление (a clear appearance: "Singing and dancing are manifestations of what many Syrians describe as much broader cultural flowering")
С1/-- mansion - особняк, manor - поместье, A2/A2 castle, B1/A2 palace: A mansion is a large and expensive home. "The mansion had thirty bedrooms, two kitchens, and a pool."
                                           							   A castle is a building with strong walls where royalty usually lives. "The castle was built many years ago."
                                           				 			   A manor is a large house with many rooms. "The manor had over forty rooms in addition to beautiful gardens."
                                           				 			   A palace is a very large building. It is often the home of a royal family. "The king and queen live in a beautiful palace."
--/C1 manufacture, B2/B1 invent, fabricate, concoct - состряпать (выдумать обман), make <-> sth up, conjure sth from/out of sth, conjure sth <-> up - наколдвать, забацать, "родить": "He conjured a delicious meal out of a few leftovers.", "How am I expected to conjure up a meal for six of his friends with almost nothing in the fridge?"
--/C1 manuscript - рукопись, see also: script: "I read her poems in manuscript."
--/C1 manuscript - манускрипт: A manuscript is an old book or paper written by hand. "The manuscript was written over 150 years ago."
C1/B2 mass - массовый
B2/B2 mass - масса (количество), see also: plenty: A mass is a large number of things of one type. "We received a mass of letters this morning."
--/B2 mass - масса (бесформенная), knob - выпуклость, узел, набалдашник (бугорчатый, узловатый - knobby (US), knobbly (UK)), knob - комок, clod - ком(ок), see also: clot, lump
      mass - масса (физическая величина)
      mass - большинство (the mass of sth), B2/B2 majority, most: A majority of something is almost all of the people or things in that group. "A majority of the people voted for Tom Smith in the election."
C2/-- master: A master is a person who is very good at something. "My brother is a master of taekwondo."
C1/-- mat, B1/-- rug, A2/A2 carpet
C2/C1 march, B2/B2 parade, C2/-- procession: To march means to walk at a steady pace together with others. "The soldiers marched in straight rows."
                                             A parade is a celebration when groups of people walk in the same direction. "There were many marching bands in the spring parade."
                                             A procession is a group of people who walk or drive in a line during a public event. "The procession all celebrated when they reached the end."
C2/B2 margin; C2/-- marginal(ly), B2/-- trivial, B2/-- faint, tenuous(ly) - literary, see also: negligible, subtle(-y), petty, minor (TODO), niggling:
        When something is subtle, it is not easy to see or notice. "The handsome man has a subtle smile."
        To do something lightly is to not push very hard. "Draw lightly so you do not tear your paper."
        If something is slight, then it is small or minor. "There was only a slight change in the little boy’s height."
        If something is trivial, it is not important or meaningful. "Television is trivial, but learning to read is very important."
C1/-- masculine - мужской (B2/A2 male), manly (мужской, мужественный, по-мужски), virile (мужественный) / C1/-- feminine (B1/A2 female):
        When something is masculine, it is a quality or thing related to men. "American football is usually considered a masculine sport."
        If something is feminine, then it has qualities that are commonly related to women. "Many of the older people thought his long hair made him look too feminine."
C2/-- masterpiece (also masterwork), chef-d'oeuvre (formal): A masterpiece is a very good painting, novel, movie, or other work of art. "The Arc de Triomphe is considered a masterpiece in the world of architecture."
C2/-- matter - материя
C2/-- matter - материал, вещество, B2/A2 material: A material is what is used to make something. "Brick is a good material for building houses."
С2/B1 matter - дело, вопрос, question: "Baking a cake isn't difficult - it's just a matter of following the recipe.", as a matter of fact = actually (собсна)б a matter of life and/or death, C2 be no laughing matter - быть не поводом до смеха: "Being arrested by the police is no laughing matter."
B2/B1 matter - дело, вопрос, тема ("It's a private matter.", "The matter should be referred to a senior manager."), see also: affair
--/B1 matters - дела, ситуация, things, to make matters worse - усугублять проблему/ситуацию
A2/A2 matter - проблема (used (to ask) if somebody is upset, unhappy, etc. or if there is a problem)
C1/B2 mature, A2/A2 adult / C2/-- immature, B2/-- childish, puerile, C1/-- juvenile: To mature means to grow up to become an adult. "When they matured, they became as tall as their parents."
B2/B1 definition - определение (a statement that explains the meaning of a word or phrase; a description of the features and limits of sth): "a dictionary definition", "a precise/strict definition of a word", "Neighbours by definition live close by (= this is what being a neighbour means).", "What's your definition of happiness?"
C1/-- definition - чёткость (how clear an image or sound is): "The clarity and definition of the images are excellent.", "The photograph lacks definition."
A2/A1 mean, proclaim, --/C1 designate, B2/A1 show, B2/B1 indicate, B2/B2 define, denote, symbolise (US symbolize), signify, stand for (to be an abbrevation or symbol of sth), see also: represent:
        To designate someone or something means to give them a particular description. "The famous lighthouse was designated a historical monument."
        To indicate means to show, point or make something clear. "He pointed to his eyes to indicate where he had hurt himself."
        To signify means to be a symbol of something. "A red octagon is used to signify to stop."
		To define means to clearly state, show, or explain what something is. "People define success in many different ways."
С2/A1 mean(ly ness), C2/B2 spite, malice(C2/-- malicious(ly)), malevolent(ly, -ce); spiteful(ly), B1/B2 nasty(-ily, -iness), obnoxious(ly, ness) - бесячий, B2/B2 offensive(ly, ness), C2/-- wicked(ness) - порочный, непристойный, безнравственный, lustful(ly, ness) - похотливый, vile(ly, ness) - подлый, see also: crude / inoffensive(ly, ness):
        If you do something out of spite, you want to be mean. "He snuck into his sister's room and stole her bag out of spite."
        mean describes someone who is unkind or cruel. "My co-worker is a very mean person. He gets angry very quickly."
        If something is wicked, it is very bad or evil. "My boss is a very wicked man."
        If something is nasty, then it is not nice or pleasant. "The rotten apple left a nasty taste inside her mouth."
B1/A1 mean - , C2/C1 intent (B1/B1 intend), C2/C1 aspire(-ation), B1/A2 goal(aim), B1/B1 aim, B2/B2 target(aim), C1/B2 object, B2/B2 objective - цель (the goal intende to be attained: "The objective was to mobilize students from 18 high schools across the city to provide community services and inspire others"), C2/A2 purpose, C1/B2 object(purpose), B2/B1 ambition (B2/B1 ambitious), B2/B1 intention, B1/A2 hope, B1/A2 dream, B2/B2 priority, C2/-- longing, C2/-- craving; B1/B1 aim; B2/-- intentional(ly), B2/B2 deliberate(ly), purposely, B1 on purpose, advisedly (намеренно использовать слово):
        An intent is a plan to do something. "Her intent is to visit Italy next summer."
        To intend to do something means to plan to do it. "I intend to finish college in three years."
        To aspire means to have a strong desire to achieve or do something. "George aspired to be a doctor from a young age."
        A goal is something you work toward. "Her goal was to become a doctor."
        An aim is a goal someone wants to make happen. "My aim is to become a helicopter pilot."
        An objective is a goal or plan that someone has. "My objective this week is to finish my homework by 7:30 every night."
        A purpose is the reason that you do something. "The purpose of exercising is to get into shape."
        If someone is ambitious, they want to be rich or successful. "Kendra had to be ambitious to get into medical school."
        A priority is something that is more important than other things. "My priority is to get good grades in school."
        A longing is a strong feeling of wanting. "Since he skipped breakfast, he had a longing for food all morning."
        If you are deliberate, you do something on purpose. "Bernie made a deliberate attempt to injure Andy."
        If a thing you do is deliberate, you intend to do it. "She made a deliberate effort to save money each month."
TODO mean
C2/-- mean well - иметь добрые намерения: "I know he means well, but he just gets in the way."
C2/B2 means
C2/B2 medication, B1/A2 medicine, C2/-- antibiotic, B1/B2 pill, B1/A2 tablet, capsule: medication is medicine or drugs given to people who are sick. "The doctor gave me medication to treat my illness."
                                                    								   medicine is something you take to feel better or treat an illness. "The doctor gave me medicine for my cold."
                                                    								   An antibiotic is a medical drug used to kill bacteria and treat infections. "The doctor gave me a shot of an antibiotic when I got the flu."
																					   A pill is a small object that has medicine inside. "She took a pill for her headache."
B2/C1 medieval: If something is medieval, it comes from the period between 650 and 1500 CE. "We visited a castle that was built during medieval times."
C1/A1 meet, B2/B2 encounter, C1/B2 come across, B2/-- run into sb: If you encounter something, you meet or come close to it. "I encountered a sea turtle while I was swimming."
C2/C1 melody, B2/A2 tune, symphony, A2/A1 concert, concerto, elegy, lament: A tune is a song. "The students played a familiar tune for the audience."
                                                             				        A symphony is a long piece of music performed by many musicians. "Alex, a violin player, has always dreamt of playing a symphony."
                                                             				        A concert is an event where you listen to people play music. "I enjoyed the concert last night. The band was very good."
                                                             				        A concerto is music for a solo instrument and played with an orchestra. "The piano concerto has a section in which only the piano plays."
      merchandise, C2/A1 sell, fetch = to be sold for, C1/B2 retail - розница, (продавать) в розницу (wholesale - опт(ом)):
        retail is the activity of selling goods to the public, often for personal use. "Though cheap to make, once a t-shirt reaches retail, it costs ten times as much."
--/C1 merchant; vendor, seller / buyer, purchaser (formal): A merchant is a person who sells things. "The merchant was selling used cars."
C2/C1 mere: When something is mere, it is small or not important. "We lost the game by a mere two points."
С2/C1 merge, amalgamate
C2/C1 merger, amalgamation
C1/C1 merit; B1/B2 worth, A2/A1 cost (see also: charge), C1/C1 worthy, B2/C1 worthwhile / C2/-- worthless: The merit of something or someone is their good qualities. "The actor received an award for his merits in the movie."
                                                                                                           If something is worth an amount of money, it costs that amount. "Our house is worth a lot of money."
                                                                                                           To cost is to require expenditure or payment. "These designer shoes cost more than the regular ones."
                                                                                                           If something is worthwhile, it is important or useful. "On his visit to Canada, he realized studying English was worthwhile."
      circumlocution (formal) - иносказание ((an example of) an indirect way of saying something, especially something unpleasant: "'Economical with the truth' is a circumlocution for 'lying'.", "Politicians are experts in circumlocution."), see also: metaphor
      circumlocutory (formal) - иносказательный, многословный (relating to something said in an indirect way: "He began in a circumlocutory way, but eventually had to be fairly blunt.", "It was a difficult interview where I was given circumlocutory replies."), see also: ambiguous(ly)
C2/B2 metaphor (literary: conceit), simile, euphemism, see also: circumlocutory: A euphemism is a term that is used in place of a mean or unpleasant word. "“Window maintenance officer” is a euphemism for a window washer."
--/C1 midst (formal) - середина, A2/A2 middle; midstream - середина реки "They slowly paddled the boat into midstream.":
		The midst of something is the middle of it. "She was in the midst of cleaning when the telephone rang."
		The middle of something is the center or halfway point. "The Canadian flag has a maple leaf in the middle of it."
C2/-- mighty - мощный, могучий (Almighty - Всемогущий), C1/C1/ influential, B2/B2 powerful(ly), potent(ly) / C1/-- helpless(ly, ness), powerless(ness), impotent:
        When something is mighty, it is strong and large. "The mighty wrestler scared all who faced him."
        The Almighty is a name for a god in a religion. "Before eating, they thanked the Almighty for their food."
C1/C1 migration (migrate, emigrate, immigrate), B2/B1 immigrant: To migrate means to move from one place to another. "Many birds migrate to warmer countries in the winter."
																 An immigrant is a person who moves to a different country. "My parents were immigrants. They came from Poland."
C1/B1 mild - мягкий, умеренный, лёгкий, сдержанный (not violent, severe, or extreme)
B1/B1 mild - мягкий, умеренный, temperate (WEATHER), clement (formal): When a place is temperate, it never gets too hot or cold. "In Peru, the weather is temperate and rarely gets too hot or cold."
      mild - мягкий, спокойный, сдержанный, temperate (BEHAVIOUR) - сдержанный / intemperate
TODO mild
--/C1 mill - мельница, молоть, windmill, watermill, sawmill - лесопилка: A mill is a building where flour is made. "The farmer took his wheat to the mill to make it into flour."
C2/-- millennium, A2/A1 century, B2/B1 decade: A millennium is one thousand years. "Stonehenge is believed to have been built about 5 millenniums ago."
                                               A decade is a period of ten years. "She celebrated her three decades of work with the company."
                                               A century is one hundred years. "Our company is celebrating a century of business in London."
C1/B2 miner, B2/B1 mine (mineshaft), see also: shaft: A miner is a person who works in a mine. "The miner was looking for gold."
C1/C1 ministry - министрерство: A ministry is a government department. "The ministry of Trade is responsible for taxing imports and exports."
      ministry - духовенство
C2/C1 minute (infinitely or immeasurably small), C2/-- miniature, B1/B1 tiny, microscopic (science or humorous), infinitesimal (formal), A1/A1 little, A1/A1 small, minuscule, diminutive (formal), midget: "The minute stain on the document was not visible to the naked eye"
        If something is miniature, it is very small. "The boy enjoys playing with his miniature train set in his bedroom."
        When people or things are tiny, they are very small. "A baby's hand is tiny."
C1/B2 miracle, B1/B1 wonder, marvel
C2/B2 miserable, see also: grim; B2/C1 misery, anguish(ed), see also: cheerless: misery is extreme suffering. "There was a lot of misery after Sam lost his dog."
C1/-- misfortune, see also: blow, trouble, disaster / B2/B2 fortune: misfortune is bad luck or an unlucky event. "His family helped him when he encountered misfortune."
																	 When someone has good fortune, it means they have luck. "I have good fortune when I play cards."
C2/-- misplace, mislay, lose: To misplace something means to lose it. "I misplaced my wallet, and I didn’t find it until a week later."
C2/C1 missile, B2/B2 rocket (US arugula, руккола) - ракета, projectile
C2/B2 mission, C2/-- vocation(al(ly)), calling (formal); B1/A1 career, see also: profession(al(ism)): A mission is an important job that is sometimes far away. "The woman's mission was to help sick people."
                                                               		   								  A career is a job that you do for a large part of your life. "He was in the hospitality business for most of his career."
C1/B2 mode - способ (way, manner), see also: approach, pattern, tactic
C1/C1 mode - режим (настройка), setting: A mode is a setting or condition on a machine. "Mother turned the TV to quiet mode while she talked on the phone."
      mode - режим (самоощущение): to be in holiday mode
C1/C1 moderate (C1/-- moderation), B1/B1 average, B1/C1 intermediate, C1/A2 middle: When something is moderate, it is not too big or too small in size or amount. "It takes a moderate amount of patience to be around small children all day."
                                                   					  				moderation is a state of being just enough but not too much. "It is important to eat in moderation so that you can have a healthy body."
                                                   					  				If something is average, it is at a normal level. "I'm not rich or poor; I'm average."
                                                   					  				If something is intermediate, then it is in the middle of two levels, places, or times. "He selected the intermediate ski hill to begin his afternoon of skiing."
C2/-- monetary - монетарный, денежный, B1/B1 financial = fiscal, pecuniary (formal) - материальный, денежный: When something is monetary, it relates to money. "A strong monetary policy is important for a country to be successful."
--/C1 monk - монах, nun - монахиня, friar, B1/B1 priest, cleric, clergy - духовенство, clergyman, clergywoman, churchman, churchwoman, ecclesiastic - духовное лицо, ecclesiastical - церковный:
		A monk is a religious person who lives a simple life. "The monks knew a lot about religion."
        A priest is a person trained to perform religious duties. "The priest taught us about God."
C1/B2 moral, --/B2 ethics (C2/B2 ethical): A moral is a message at the end of a story that teaches you something. "At the end of the story, Mother explained the moral to the children."
                           				   ethics are moral beliefs or rules about right or wrong. "The act of stealing certainly doesn’t go against some people’s ethics."
										   If something is ethical, it is the right thing to do. "Many people believe that it is ethical to help others in need."
C2/-- morale - моральный/боевой дух, B1/B1 mood, B2/-- temper (see also: irritable, peevish), B2/-- ​spirits: morale is the amount of hope that people have during a difficult situation. "To improve our family’s morale, mom suggested going on a picnic."
                                                                              						         A mood is the way someone is feeling. "I am in a good mood because I did well on my math test."
                                                                              						         A temper is someone’s mood or a chance that they might get angry. "She has a temper. Even the slightest mistakes make her angry."
C2/C1 motion - предложение
C2/B2 motion - движение, B2/B2 movement - передвижение, перемещение
--/C1 motion - движение, жест, мановение, C1/B2 gesture, gesticulation, B2/A2 movement - движение ((частью) тела):
        A motion is a movement that someone makes. "The police officer made a motion with his hand."
        A gesture is a movement of the hands or body. "My teacher makes a lot of gestures when she speaks."
      motion - помахать, подать знак, C2/-- gesture, gesticulate
      motion - стул, испражнение (UK formal (med)), movement, defecation: "The nurse asked if her motions were regular."
                                                                          "When did you last have a (bowel) movement?"
B2/C1 motorist / B1/-- pedestrian: A pedestrian is a person who is walking on a street. "Cars should be careful when pedestrians are walking around."
С2/-- mount up - расти, нарастать, увеличиваться, накапливаться (to gradually increase in number or amount: "It isn't a good idea to let bills mount up.", "The cost quickly mounts up.", Meanwhile, my debts were mounting up.), see also: rise, build up
С2/B2 mount - расти, нарастать, увеличиваться, see also: intensify: Something mounts when it becomes stronger over time. "His fear mounted as the monster crawled out from under his bed."
С2/B2 mount - начать, запустить, устроить, организовать, совершить (to organize and begin sth: "to mount an exhibition/display", "to mount a defence/an operation/an attack/an assault/an offensive/campaign/challenge/protest", "an attack mounted by terrorists", "MPs will mount a fresh challenge to this new policy.", "The report mounts a withering attack on the food industry."), see also: arrange, commence, perpetrate
С2/-- mount - вмонтировать, установить, закрепить (to fix something to a wall, in a frame, etc., so that it can be looked at or used: "The surveillance camera is mounted above the main door.", "Cameras are mounted around the city.", "The diamond is mounted in gold.", "The specimens were mounted on slides.")
C2/B2 mount - оседлать, сесть, взобраться (to get on a horse, bicycle, etc.. in order to ride: "She mounted her horse and rode off.", "He mounted and galloped off.") / dismount - спешиться (to get off a horse, bicycle or motorcycle: "She brought her horse to a halt and dismounted.", "The cyclists were made to dismount and show their documents.")
      mount - (взойти/взобраться/подняться) на (to go up or onto: "He mounted the platform and began to speak to the assembled crowd.", "She slowly mounted the steps."), see also: scale, ascend
      mount - выставить стражу (to place someone on guard: "Sentries are mounted outside the palace at all times.")
      mount/stand/keep guard (on/over sb/sth) - стеречь, сторожить, караулить, охранять, стоять на шухере (to watch, guard or protect sb/sth: "Four soldiers stood guard over the coffin.", "Armed security officers are employed to mount guard over the president.", "One of the men kept guard, while the other broke into the house.")
      mount (formal or literary) - уздовое животное (лошадь, скакун и т.д.) (a horse that you ride on: "an excellent mount for a child", "She saddled her mount quickly.")
      mount - подставка, подложка (sth such as a piece of card or glass that you put sth on or attach sth to, to display it: "A black mount for this picture would look good.")
B1/A2 move, C1/-- relocate, B1/B2 transfer, (TODO convey? relay?): To transfer something means to move it from one place to another. "The family transferred the groceries from the shopping cart to the car."
C1/B2 multiple - несколько, множественный, многократный, several; многочисленный: massed, numerous - многочисленный, innumerable - бесчисленный; C1/C1 dual, duality (see also: contrast); B2/A2 single, single out:
        If there are multiple things, there are many of them. "When the stunt went wrong, the man suffered multiple injuries."
        If something is numerous, there are many of those things. "It was hard to drive fast since there were numerous holes in the road."
        If something is dual, then it is made up of two parts. "The room had a dual function. It was a living room, but at night it was a bedroom."
      multiple - кратное (math): "14, 21 and 28 are all multiples of 7.", "18 is a multiple of 3", "You can buy these chocolate bars in multiples of five."
      multiple - сетевой магазин (also chain store)
C2/-- murmur - гул, шёпот, шелест (a low continuous sound in the background), see also: rumble, rustle, sough, whisper: "the distant murmur of traffic", "The murmur of the waves on the beach lulled me to sleep."
C2/-- murmur - шопот, ропот, бормотание: "a murmur of agreement/approval/complaint", "polite murmurings of gratitude", "He paid the extra cost without a murmur (= without complaining at all)., "A murmur of agreement came from the crowd."
C2/-- murmur - шептать, бормотать (to say something in a soft quiet voice that is difficult to hear or understand): "'I love you,' she murmured.", "He was murmuring to himself.", "(humorous) He murmured sweet nothings (= romantic talk) in her ear."
      murmur - роптать (literary: to complain about sb/sth, but not openly): "The people murmured against the new regime."
      murmur - шептать, шелестеть, журчать (to make a quiet continuous sound): "The wind murmured in the trees."
C1/C1 mutual, reciprocal (formal): If something is mutual, it is felt in the same way by two or more people. "Robert likes Sarah. The feeling is mutual."
C1/C1 namely - а именно (used to introduce more exact and detailed information about sth that you have just mentioned): "We need to concentrate on our target audience, namely women aged between 20 and 30."
C1/-- nap: A nap is a short sleep, usually during the day. "I took a short nap because I stayed up late last night."
C2/C1 naval, maritime (formal), nautical - морской (мореходный, relating to ships, sailing, or sailors); --/C1 marine, submarine, undersea, underwater; navy; aquatic; aquarium:
		When something is naval, it relates to a country’s navy or military ships. "The country sent all of its naval forces to protect them."
        The word marine describes something related to the sea. "A healthy ocean is full of marine animals."
        A navy is the part of a country's military that fights at sea. "My country is known for our strong navy."
		submarine: A submarine is a boat that can go underwater for long periods of time. "The submarine dove under the sea so the enemy couldn't see it."
        If a plant or animal is aquatic, it lives or grows in water. "The dolphin is an aquatic mammal."
        An aquarium is a building where fish and underwater animals are kept. "We took a trip to the aquarium and saw a scary shark."
C1/B2 necessity, B1/B1 necessary(-ily), necessitate; necessary evil (неизбежное зло (ex работа, налоги, ..)), B2/B2 essential(ly), B2/B2 require(d, ment), (pre)requisite (formal)
        A necessity is something that is needed. "Fresh water is a necessity for life."
        If something is necessary, you must do it. "It is necessary to have a passport when you travel to a foreign country."
        To require something is to say that it is necessary. "We require teachers to have a university degree."
C2/B1 needle, syringe: A needle is a small, sharp piece of metal that you use to make or fix clothes. "I used a needle to fix the hole in my pants."
C2/B1 needle, B1/B1 leaf: A leaf is the flat green thing on trees or bushes. "In the fall, the leaves on the trees change colors."
C2/C1 neglect, disuse: To neglect someone or something is to not take care of it properly. "William neglected his room, so it is a complete mess."
C2/-- negligence - халатность: the failure to give somebody/something enough care or attention. "The doctor was sued for medical negligence.", "The accident was caused by negligence on the part of the driver."
C2/-- negligent, neglectful - небрежный, remiss - нерадивый / diligent(ly), diligence - тщательно, старательно; studious(ly, ness) - старательно, прилежно, намеренно
C2/-- negligible (negligibly), trifling, paltry, pittance - жалкие гроши, see also: marginal, minor (TODO), niggling, petty:
        If something is negligible, it is extremely small and not important. "The amount she owed was negligible. It was less than ten cents."
        When an amount of something is paltry, it is very small. "The poor man had a paltry sum of money."
C1/B2 negotiate - договариваться, bargain - торговаться, сделка (see also: deel), выгодная покупка, haggle, mediate, arbitrate, intercede (formal) - ходатайствовать, заступаться:
		To negotiate means to try to make an agreement through discussion. "Mario and Joe took a long time negotiating the contract between the companies."
      negotiate - преодолеть (трудный участок пути)
C2/-- nerve, --/C1 guts, B2/B2 courage, B2/-- bravery, valour (US valor), heroism, (intestinal) fortitude, see also: spine; дерзость: audacity, audaciousness, temerity (formal disapproving):
        When you have courage, you are not afraid. "The man had the courage to touch the lion."
        nerve is bravery or the belief that you can do something. "He has the nerve to think that he can actually wrestle with a lion."
C2/B2 nerve - нерв
C2/-- nerve (informal) - наглось, дерзость
      nerve (yourself for sth/to do sth) - осмелиться, C1/B2 dare: To dare means to be brave enough to try something. "He dared to jump out of the airplane and skydive."
B2/B2 nerves, B2/B2 anxiety (B2/B2 anxious), C2/A2 care, C1/B2 concern, apprehension (apprehensive), preoccupation, apprehension, see also: distress, dread: {concerned nervous anxious uneasy (https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/worried?q=worried)}
        When someone has anxiety, they have a lot of worries and fear. "When I have to climb to high places, I'm filled with anxiety."
        When a person is anxious, they worry that something bad will happen. "She was anxious about not making her appointment on time."
        concern is a feeling of worry. "I was filled with concern after reading the newspaper."
      nerveless, C2/-- fearless(ly, ness), C1/-- courageous(ly), B1/B1 brave(ly), B2/B2 bold(ly, ness), intrepid(ly), valiant(ly), dauntless (literary), venturesome, daring(ly), audacious(ly), gallant(ly, ry):
        When people are brave, they are not afraid to face pain or danger. "The brave firefighter saved the girl from the burning building."
        If someone is bold, they are not afraid of doing something. "The bold man climbed the high mountain."
C2/C1 nest - гнездо, roost - насест: A nest is a place where a bird lays its eggs. "The bird laid her eggs in the nest that she made."
                                     A roost is a place where birds can land and rest or sleep. "The family of doves made a roost at the top of the tree."
B1/C1 net: A net is a bag made of strong thread. It is used to catch animals. "The boy caught butterflies in his net."
C1/C1 noble (nobility) - благородный, gallant(ly, ry), chivalry - рыцарство, благородство, галантность, lofty - возвышенный, благородный, see also: genteel, dignity / ignoble(-y) - постыдный, позорный, ignominious (formal), base (literary) - низменный, B2/-- disgrace(ful(ly)), dishonour(able(-ly)), see also: infamy
C1/C1 noble (the nobility) - знатный, aristocratic (the aristocracy); earl (see also: count), duke, duchess, lord; dynasty:
        An earl is a nobleman from Britain. "The earl of Canterbury lived in a huge mansion."
        A duke is a man of high social rank but below a king or queen. "The duke ruled over the land."
        Long ago, a lord was a man in charge of a town. "The lord of the town was not kind."
        A noble is a rich and powerful person. "The Queen invited a noble from a nearby country to dinner."
        A dynasty is a series of rulers who are all from the same family. "The ancient Egyptians had a dynasty that lasted for many years."
        The aristocracy is the highest class of people in certain societies. "Most members of the aristocracy were very well-fed."
      noble - знатная персона, nobleman(noblewoman) - дворянин, aristocrat / commoner: An aristocrat is a person who is of the highest class in certain societies. "The aristocrat did not need a job because his family was wealthy."
B2/C1 nod: To nod is to move your head up and down. "I nodded my head as I listened to the song."
C2/B2 note - нота (муз.)
C2/-- note - нота (атмосфера: тревожная, оптимистичная и т.д. нота): "There was a note of amusement in his voice.", "It's good to finish on a positive note.", C2/-- air (impression, manner or appearence): "She has an air of confidence about her.", "There was an air of complete confidence about her.", "She looked at him with a defiant air." "The room had an air of luxury."
B1/B1 note - notice
B2/B1 note - примечание (footnote - сноска)
A1/A1 note - заметка, записка
B1/B1 note (UK banknote, US bill) - банкнота, купюра, A2/ cash, C2/A1 quarter, B1/A2 penny: cash is money in the form of paper or coins. "I was able to save up enough cash to buy my mother a gift."
                                                                                            A quarter is 25 cents. "He paid a quarter for the candy."
                                                                                            A penny is a coin worth one cent. "U.S. President Abraham Lincoln is on the penny."
TODO note
C1/C1 notify, B1/B2 inform, apprise (formal), advise (formal); C2/B2 relate (formal), narrate (C2/-- narrative - рассказ, повествование, narrative trope - тема, нить, образ), tell:
        To notify someone of something is to tell them about it. "The teacher notified us about a change to our assignment."
        To inform someone is to tell them about something. "I called and informed her about my idea."
        To narrate a story means to write about it or read it aloud. "This story was written by John, but Aaron is narrating it to the crowd."
C1/C1 notorious(ly), --/C1 infamous (infamy – позор, бесславие: "Traitors are held in infamy.", see also: disgrace):
		When something is notorious, it is well-known because of something bad. "This area of town is notorious for gang activity."
        When someone is infamous, they are well known for something bad. "That news channel is infamous for presenting biased information."
--/C1 novel (C2/-- novelty - новизна, новинка), C1/B2 innovative, pioneering - новаторский, see also: innovation: A novelty is something that is new, original, or strange. "Ice cream was a novelty for him since he rarely had any."
B1/A2 novel - роман: A novel is a book that tells a story. "He wrote a great novel about ancient China."
A2/A1 nurse - медсестра, caretaker: A nurse is a person who helps sick people in the hospital. "A nurse helped me get better."
                                    A caretaker is a person who takes care of very young, old, or sick people. "My grandmother's caretaker helps her get around the house."
C2/-- nurse - ухаживать
      nurse - кормить грудью, breastfeed, suckle (usually animals); lactate (BIOLOGY) - давать молоко, see also: suck
      nurse - залечивать, баюкать, зализывать (рану), отлёживаться (при ранении/заболевании)
      nurse - нянчиться, выпестовать, взрастить ("to nurse tender young plants", "The project will have to be nursed through its first few months.", "He nursed the car up the steep hill.")
      nurse - питать, вынашивать, таить (feeling or idea), harbour (US harbor)
B2/C1 nursery(UK): A nursery is a room where babies and children sleep, play, or are cared for. "The children kissed their parents goodnight and went upstairs to the nursery."
C1/B2 nutrition(al), C1/-- nutritious, nutrient, sustenance, see also: subsist, live off sth:
		nutrition is the process by which people use food to stay healthy. "It is important to pay attention to nutrition if you want to be an athlete."
		A nutrient is something that a living thing needs to keep it alive. "Vegetables are full of important nutrients."
        When something is nutritious, it helps the body stay healthy. "Mangoes are one of the most nutritious fruits in the world."
        sustenance is food and water needed to keep a person, animal, or plant alive. "Without the proper sustenance, the man will starve."
C1/-- obese, overweight, fat, plump (пухлый; полный), corpulent (тучный, formal), rotund (formal or humorous), gross (very fat and ugly) / C2/-- slender(ness), slim, B2/B2 slight(ly), A2/A2 thin, spare (literary: tall and thin - худощавый), underweight, gaunt - истощённый, измождённый, skinny - тощий; об одежде: обтягивающий, облегающий, scraggy = scrawny (disapproving) - тощий, костлявый:
        If someone is overweight, they are very fat. "Roger eats too much, so now he's overweight."
        If something or someone is slim, they are thin. "Look at my new cell phone. It's very slim."
        If someone or something is thin, they are not fat. "The man was thin because he didn't eat much."
        If someone is skinny, they are extremely thin. "Polly is very skinny. I think she needs to eat more."
B2/A1 object, B2/A2 item, article, C1/-- accessory: An object is an inanimate thing that you can see or touch. "The shopping cart was filled with objects."
                                                    An item is a thing that you buy or sell. "I have many items for school in my bag."
                                                    An accessory is a thing that is added to another thing to make it look better. "The store sold colorful accessories like bags, sunglasses, and makeup."
C1/B2 object - цель
B2/B2 object - возражать (see also: counter), C2/C1 clash, B2/B2 oppose(d) (see also: counteract), B2/B1 dislike, C2/C1 dispute, C2/B2 debate (see also: confer), B2/A2 argue, B2/-- quarrel (see also: squabble), --/C1 contention - раздор, разногласия, B1/A2 disagree(ment), --/C1 counter, B2/B2 conflict, strife - раздор, конфликт, discord - раздор, рознь, диссонанс, see also: faction, contradict(ory, ion), controversy / concord(ance):, harmony
        To oppose something means to dislike it or act against it. "I want to be a police officer because I oppose crime."
        To debate is to seriously discuss something with someone. "The husband and wife debated over which TV to buy."
        To argue is to angrily speak to someone because you do not agree. "We argued about hwere to go for dinner."
        To quarrel is to argue or fight. "Billy quarreled with his wife about buying a new house."
        To disagree with someone means to have a different opinion from them. "The lawyer disagreed about the best way to settle the case."
        strife is disagreement or fighting between people or groups. "There was a lot of strife between Jim and Lisa about what TV show to watch."
        discord is disagreement or fighting between people. "There was much discord between the experts on the talk show."
B2/C1 objection, C2/C1 dispute, B2/B2 protest(er); C1/C1 rebellion (B2/C1 rebel, C1/-- rebellious), C1/С1 riot (see also: rampage), B2/B2 revolution (C2/-- revolt), rising, uprising, insurrection, insurgent (formal) - повстанец, повстанческий (an opposition to a civil authority or government), C1/-- takeover and C2/C1 coup (also coup d'état) - переворот, C2/-- unrest - волнения, беспорядки, rise (up), outcry, see also: rail:
        A dispute is an argument or disagreement that people have. "Karen and Brian often have disputes about silly things."
        To protest something is to argue about it with someone. "The people protested the decision of the president."
        A rebel is a person who flights the government in order to change it. "The rebel had enough of the government's unfair polices."
        A riot is a crowd that reacts to bad news by violently breaking laws. "A riot broke out after the candidate lost the election."
        A revolution is a change to the political system by a group of people. "The revolution in Russia led to the creation of the Soviet Union."
        unrest is a state of anger about something among the people in a place. "High taxes caused much of the unrest that led to the Revolutionary War."
C2/-- obligatory, B2/B2 compulsory(-ily), --/C1 mandatory (fomal) / C1/-- voluntary(-ily) - добровольный, C1/B1 volunteer:
        If something is mandatory, then it is required by law. "It’s mandatory that everyone be at least sixteen to drive a car in the US."
        When something is voluntary, it is done by choice but is not required. "Many people attended the voluntary boat safety class."
        To volunteer means to offer to do something for free. "Many people volunteered to help the adults learn to read."
C1/C1 oblige, B2/B1 benefit, help, see also: accommodate
C1/C1 oblige, C1/C1 enforce, pressurize, pressure: To oblige someone means to require them to do something. "If I wanted to have playtime, I was obliged to clean my room once a week."
                                                   To enforce means to make a person follow a rule. "Police enforce traffic laws to keep everyone safe."
--/C1 obsess - зацикливаться, быть одержимым, fixate - зацикливаться (to think about something too much and find it difficult to stop: "High achievers sometimes fixate on their own flaws.", "He is fixated on things that remind him of his childhood."):
		To obsess about something means to think about it all of the time. "After watching the Star Wars movies, Ike obsessed about becoming a Jedi."
C1/B2 obstacle, hurdle, hindrance, B2/B2 barrier, see also: impediment, deterrent, snag: An obstacle is an object or a problem that stops you from doing something. "Climbing over the giant rock was the biggest obstacle for the hikers."
                                                                                         A barrier is something that is in your way. "The Great Wall was a barrier between China and its enemies."
C2/B1 occasion, C1/C1 occurrence (B2/B1 occur, A2/A1 happen, B1/A2 take place, see also: transpire), --/C1 incidence (formal, see also: scale), B1/A1 event, B2/-- episode (EVENT), C2/A2 case, C1/C1 incident(al(ly), -ce), accident(al(ly)), C1/B2 phenomenon(phenomena(l(ly))), happening, see also: matter, instance:
        An occasion is a time when something important happens. "Her graduation was an occasion to have a good time."
        An incident is an event that is usually not pleasant. "Mr. Wilson had an incident where he became sick and had to leave."
        An accident is an unexpected undesirable event. "She had to go to the hospital after she was in a serious car accident."
        A phenomenon is something that can be seen as it is happening. "I was amazed when I saw the phenomenon of shooting stars."
        To occur means to happen. "When did the thunderstorm occur?"
        An event is something that happens, especially something important. "Finishing high school was a major event in his life."
C1/C1 occasional(ly), C2/C1 arbitrary, C1/B2 random(ly), intermittent(ly, ness), sporadic(ally), ​C2/-- the odd. see also: rare / continual:
		If something is random, it happens without any pattern or reason. "Young children often ask random questions."
		If something is arbitrary, it is not based on any plan or system, so it seems random. "The classroom had many arbitrary rules that made me confused."
		If something is intermittent, then it happens in a way that is not constant. "It was hard to focus because intermittent noises came from the workers outside."
C2/B2 occupation, A1/A1 job, B2/B2 profession: An occupation is a person's job. "My father's occupation is a dentist."
											   A profession is a person's job. "He loved sailing, so he chose to work on ships as a profession."
B2/С1 occupy - занимать (место), take up (sth): To occupy a place is to live, work, or be there. "Kevin and Alice occupied the chairs and had a long discussion."
B2/С1 occupy - занимать (должность), see also: hold: to have an official job or position
B2/B2 occupy - занимать (делом): to fill your time or keep you busy doing something
C1/C1 occupy - оккупировать, annex(ation), see also: invade
C2/B1 odd(ly), B2/C1 bizarre(ly, ness), B2/B2 weird(ly, ness), B2/C1 peculiar, C2/-- quaint, A2/A2 unusual (see also: unconventional, A2/A2 strange(ly), B1/A1 funny (STRANGE), quirky, freakish, fanciful, eccentric, eerie (жуткий), outlandish(ly, ness) - usually disapproving, B2/B2 exotic
        When something is odd, it is unusual. "Her cat is odd. It walks on two feet."
        When something is bizarre, it is very strange. "My bizarre dreams make no sense to me when I am awake."
        When something is weird, it is very strange. "My best friend's dad is a bit weird."
        When something is peculiar, it is strange, sometimes in a bad way. "That peculiar smell coming from the kitchen reminds me of rotten eggs."
        When something is strange, it is not normal. "Joe had a strange look on his face after he saw what happened."
        When something is fanciful, it is unusual or unrealistic. "The girl had fanciful ideas about doing well in school without studying."
		exotic describes something unusual because it is from far away. "Rebecca tried many exotic foods on her trip to Africa."
C1/C1 odds (usually the odds) - шансы, вероятность (the degree to which something is likely to happen: "The odds are very much in our favour (= we are likely to succeed).", "The odds are heavily against him (= he is not likely to succeed).", "The odds are that (= it is likely that) she'll win.", "What are the odds (= how likely is it) he won't turn up?")
--/C1 odds - оценка шансов ((in betting) the connection between two numbers that shows how much money somebody will receive if they win a bet: "odds of ten to one (= ten times the amount of money that has been bet by somebody will be paid to them if they win)", "They are offering long/short odds (= the prize money will be high/low because there is a high/low risk of losing) on the defending champion.", (figurative) "I'll lay odds on him getting the job (= I'm sure he will get it).")
C1/C1 odds - (крайне низкие) шансы (something that makes it seem impossible to do or achieve something: "to beat/overcome the odds", "They secured a victory in the face of overwhelming odds.", "She defied the odds to beat the clear favourite."; against all (the) odds - вопреки всему: "The film is a heart-warming tale of triumph against the odds.", "Against all (the) odds, he made a full recovery.", "The odds against making a profit in this business are huge.")
C2/C1 offspring - отпрыск, потомство, see also: brood, litter: offspring are the children of a person or the babies of an animal. "The dog’s offspring had the same color of fur as she did."
C2/B2 ongoing - текущий, продолжающий(ся), действующий (sth that is (still) going in), C2/-- underway (also under way) - началось, идёт полным ходом (having started, happening now):
		If something is ongoing, then it is still happening or still growing. "The development of plants is ongoing because it takes time for them to mature."
C2/-- onwards (US usually onward) (formal) = C1/B2 forward(s): "We sailed onwards in a westerly direction." / B1/B1 backward(s); (C1/B2 upward(s) / C1/B2 downward(s)); inward(s) / outward(s); toward(s)
        If something goes upwards, it moves vertically higher. "The kite went upwards further and further."
        If you move forward, you move in the direction in front of you. "When he saw his mother, the baby crawled forward to her."
        If you go toward something, you go closer to it. "Santa walked toward my house with a special tree."
C2/-- onwards (US usually onward) - continuing from a particular time (​from... onwards): "They lived there from the 1980s onwards."
C1/B1 operation: An operation is when a doctor replaces or removes something in the body. "The operation on my arm was a success."
--/C1 operational - операционный (connected with the way in which a business, machine, system, etc. works: "operational activities/costs/difficulties", "There are operational advantages in putting sales and admin in the same building.")
--/C1 operational - действующий, рабочий, готовый к работе (if a system is operational, it is either working or ready or available to be used: "The new airport is now fully operational.", "Repairs have already begun and we expect the factory to be fully operational again with six months.")
      operationally - технически, операционно (in a way that is connected with how a business, machine, system, etc. works: "The idea is operationally and economically unfeasible.", "This new system must be technically and operationally feasible.", "The company continues to produce strong results operationally.")
C1/C1 opt (предпочесть в смысле "выбрать"): opt for/against sth, opt to do sth, A2/A1 prefer, B1/A2 pick, A1/A1 choose, B2/B2 elect, B1/B1 vote (suffrage - избирательное право (a legal right to vote): "There has been a great deal said in this country of late in regard to giving the right of suffrage to women"), see also: select:
        To opt is to make a choice, especially when deciding in favor of something. "My brother likes chocolate ice cream, but I always opt for vanilla."
        If you prefer something, you want it more than something else. "I prefer to take the path that will lead me to a bright future."
        To select something is to choose it. "I hope that I selected the right answers on the test."
        To vote is to officially choose between two or more things. "I voted for Billy to be our class president."
C2/C1 optimism (C1/-- optimist, B2/B2 optimistic(ally)), B1/B1 positive / (pessimist, B2/-- pessimistic(ally)), B1/B2 negative, gloomy, dim:
        optimism is the feeling of being hopeful about the future or success of something. "The mother had optimism about her children’s futures."
        An optimist is somebody who sees the good parts of a situation. "Even thugh he has physical problems, my brother is an optimist."
        If something is positive, it is good. "She has a positive future ahead of her after finishing college."
        If someone is pessimistic, they believe that the worst will happen. "John is pessimistic. He always thinks something bad will happen."
        When something is negative, it is unpleasant or sad. "She doesn’t like to say negative things about her friends."
C2/-- ordeal - суровое испытание, see also: challenge: An ordeal is a bad experience. "Driving in the snowstorm was an ordeal she’d never forget."
--/C1 organic - органический, organism, microorganism, cellular / inorganic: An organism is a living thing, especially a very small one. "We studied the organism on the microscope."
																			 When something is cellular, it relates to the cells of animals or plants. "She used a microscope to see the activity at a cellular level."
B2/B2 organic - (of food, farming methods, etc.) натуральный: If food is organic, it is grown without adding chemicals to it. "The organic carrots are more expensive, but they’re better for you."
C2/C1 originate (originator, origination, C1/B2 origin), derive (derivation, derivative function), source, genesis, birthplace, see also: stem from sth:
		To originate somewhere is to start there. "The idea of democracy originated in Ancient Creece."
        The origin of someone or something is where they come from. "The origin of the honey that we eat is from a beehive."
        To derive something from another source means to get it from that thing. "Red's nickname was derived from the color of her hair."
        A source of something is the place that it comes from. "The river was the source of drinking water for the village."
        A birthplace is a place where a person is born or where something started. "China is the birthplace of chopsticks."
C2/-- ornament, B2/B2 decorate(-ion, -ive(ly)), adorn(ment), --/B1 beautify, bauble (US ball) - ёлочная игрушка, tinsel - мишура (also figurative: "The show was all tinsel and glitter."), fairy lights (US (fairy) string lights) - гирлянда, see also embellish, embellishment:
        An ornament is an attractive object that people display in their homes. "The woman kept some colorful ornaments on the shelves."
        To adorn something means to make it more beautiful by decorating it. "Small glass beads adorned the vase."
C2/-- orphan(age), B2/C1 widow, dowager: An orphan is a child who does not have parents. "The orphan frequently cried during the night."
                                		 A widow is a woman whose husband has died. "The widow had no children and was very lonely."
C1/B2 outcome, B1/B1 result, --/C1 aftermath, B2/B2 consequence (consequent adj, consequently adv), repercussion, corollary (formal), the upshot:
        An outcome is the end of an action or event. "The outcome of his latest business plan was a complete failure."
        A result is something that happens because of something else. "As a result of all the rain, the man had to climb on the roof."
        A consequence is a result of a choice or action. "As a consequence of missing my bus, I had to find another way to work."
        consequent means happening because of a different situation. "Her consequent rash came after she touched the ivy."
C1/-- overcrowded: When a place is overcrowded, it has too many people or things in it. "The lobby was overcrowded with people."
C2/-- overload - перегрузка, чрезмерная нагрузка, overwork; laden - нагруженный
C2/-- overload - перегружать (электричество, груз, работа и т.д.), overwork: To overload something means to put more things into it than it is meant to hold. "If you overload the truck, it might crash."
                                                                             To overwork someone means to make them tired with too much work. "After working for three weeks with only one day of rest, Judy was overworked."
C2/B2 overnight: When something happens overnight, it happens during the night. "The campers stayed in the tent overnight."
--/C1 overturn - перевернуть, invert (formal) - перевернуть, capsize (to (cause a boat or ship to) turn upside down by accident while on water): To invert something means to turn it upside down. "He inverted the bicycle to make repairs on the wheels."
--/C1 overturn - отменить
      overturn - опровергнуть, dispel - развеять (to remove fears, doubts, and false ideas, usually by proving them wrong or unnecessary: "We need to dispel the myths and establish real facts.", "His speech dispelled any fears about his health.", "I'd like to start the speech by dispelling a few rumours that have been spreading recently."), see also: refute, disprove, dismiss
C1/-- overview - обзор, обозрение, see also: summary, round-up: An overview is a general description of a situation. "My brother gave me an overview of the important parts of the book."
C1/C1 overwhelm (охватить, переполнить), C2/B2 overcome (охватить, переполнить): To overwhelm is to exist in such a large amount that someone cannot deal with it. "The amount of homework her teacher assigned has overwhelmed her."
C1/C1 overwhelm (подавить, одолеть), C1/B2 beat, C2/B2 overcome, B2/B2 defeat (see also: subdue), overpower (подавлять, пересиливать), see also prevail, exceed, overtake, outnumber
C2/C1 outlet
C2/B2 outline, B2/B2 draft, B2/B2 scheme, contour, blueprint, see also: profile, chart: An outline is the plan for a story or essay. "Before I wrote my essay, I made an outline."
                                                   							            A scheme is a plan or design. "Mickey and Minnie came up with a scheme to solve the problem."
C2/C1 outlook, C2/B2 stance, C1/-- mentality, mindset; B1/B1 attitude, B2/B1 spirit, B2/A2 personality, B2/B1 character, C2/-- standpoint see also: disposition; C1/B2 perspective, C1/B2 viewpoint, B1/B1 opinion, point of view, posture (OPINION (позиция), see also position, judgment, angle, TODO separate attitude from opinion:
        An outlook is a person’s opinion or way of thinking about something. "He changed his outlook about rats after he read a book about them."
        A stance is an attitude about an issue that someone states clearly. "My stance is that using oil and gas is bad for the environment."
        Someone's attitude is the way they feel and think. "John has a bad attitude. He's always angry."
        A spirit is someone's feelings and personality, but not a physical body part. "He has a very outgoing spirit. He can make friends with anyone."
        Your personality is what you are like and how you behave. "John has a bad personality."
        Your character is your personality. "My sister's character is fun and very outgoing."
        An opinion is a thought about a person or a thing. "Meg told me her opinion of my story. She said it was not funny."
C1/C1 outlook, B2/B2 prospect
      outlook - обзор? ракурс? perspective?
C1/-- outnumber, C1/-- outweigh, see also: exceed, overtake, overwhelm: To outnumber a group means to have a greater number than it. "The girls outnumbered the boys at the school by four to one."
                                                                        To outweigh something means to exceed it in value, amount, or importance. "Finding a warm place to sleep outweighed the need to find something to eat."
--/C1 outrage, see also: rage:
        outrage is a very strong emotion of anger or shock. "Tommy was feeling outrage when his parents said he couldn’t go to the dance."
      outraged, outrageous, monstrous, unconscionable, resentful, see also: vehement, furious:
        If someone is outraged, they are very angry. "My father was outraged when he saw that I had crashed his car."
C2/-- overhear - случайно подслушать, eavesdrop - специально подслушивать
C2/-- overlap: To overlap something means to cover a piece of it. "The gift on top overlaps the other gift on the bottom."
C2/-- overlook: To overlook something is to not notice it, or to not realize that it is important. "Brenda overlooked the last step and had a bad fall."
C1/-- overtake - обойти, обогнать, превысить, вытеснить (to become greater in number, amount or importance than something else: "Nuclear energy may overtake oil as the main fuel.", "We mustn't let ourselves be overtaken by our competitors.", "Our US sales have now overtaken our sales in Europe."), see aslo: exceed, outnumber, overwhelm
B2/-- overtake (US pass) - обойти, обогнать (to go past a moving vehicle or person ahead of you because you are going faster than they are: "He pulled out to overtake a truck.", "It's dangerous to overtake on a bend.", "Always check your rear view mirror before you overtake (another car).")
      overtake - настичь, охватить, произойти ("The climbers were overtaken by bad weather.", "Sudden panic overtook her.", "The family was overtaken by tragedy several years ago, and they still haven't recovered.", "Our original plan was overtaken by events (= the situation changed very rapidly) and we had to make a new one.")
C2/B2 pace, C1/B2 rate: The pace of something is the speed at which it happens. "I ran the race at a slower pace than my friend."
                        A rate is the speed at which something happens. "Grass tends to grow at a very slow rate."
C2/B2 pace, step, stride (шаг, походка), see also: tread
С2/-- pack - стая, swarm - рой, толпа; herd, flock, pasture, mob; herder, herdsman, shepherd; ranch, plantation:
      A swarm is a group of flying insects. "A beautiful swarm of butterflies filled the summer sky."
      A herd is a large group of the same type of animals that live together. "The herd of cows moved slowly across the ranch."
      A flock is a group of animals, such as birds, sheep or goats. "There was one black sheep in the entire flock."
      A pasture is an area of land covered with grass for animals to use as food. "The sheep were taken to a pasture where there was more grass."
      A shepherd is a person who protects and cares for sheep. "The shepherd moved the sheep to another field."
      A ranch is a large farm where animals are kept. "My uncle has many horses on his ranch."
      A plantation is a big farm that only grows certain kinds of crops. "In the 1800s, there were many cotton plantations in the southern US."
      pack - колода карт
TODO pack
--/C1 pad - защитная/мягкая накладка, ватные диски и т.д.; sanitary pads - прокладки: A pad is a thick piece of soft material used to protect or clean things. "Football players wear shoulder pads to keep them safe."
      pad - идти бесшумно, C2/C1 creep, C1/C1 crawl; C2/-- sneak(y, -ily), slink, prowl - красться: To creep is to move quietly and slowly. "The cat slowly crept down the tree."
                                                                                                    To crawl is to move slowly on your hands and knees. "The baby crawled across the floor."
                                                                                                    To sneak is to move quietly so that no one hears or sees you. "The thief snuck out of the house without anyone noticing him."
TODO pad
C1/B2 panel, C2/B2 body - орган (законодательный, руководящий, ...)
TODO panel
C2/-- paradise, B2/B2 heaven: paradise is the place or condition of happiness where things are perfect. "My vacation in Hawaii was like being in paradise."
                              heaven is the place that some people believe people go when they die. "When I die, I hope that I go to heaven."
B2/C1 partial(ly, ity) - частичный
      partial(ity) - пристрастный, предвзятый, предубеждённый, C2/B2 bias(ed), B2/C1 prejudice(d), apt(ly, ness), inclination, see also: disposition; preconception - предрассудок, see also: liable, likely / impartial(ly, ity), neutral(ly, ity):
        A bias is a person’s likelihood to like one thing more than another thing. "The mothers had a natural bias for their own child’s picture."
        A prejudice is an unfair opinion about someone before you get to know them. "The company's rules against gender prejudice must be enforced."
        If someone is neutral, then they do not help either of the two fighting sides. "The girl’s friend remained neutral while the couple was arguing."
      partial(ity) - пристрастный, склонный, C1/B2 tendency, inclination, propensity (formal), proclivity (formal), partisan (often disapproving) - пристрастный, приверженный (devoted to a cause or party), see also: ​disposed (to do sth)
        A partiality is a tendency to prefer one thing to another. "She has a partiality for walking to school instead of driving."
C1/B2 participant (B2/B1 participate(-ory), take part), see also: involve, engage in: A participant is someone who joins in a social event or competition. "There were thousands of participants in this year’s marathon."
                                                                                      To participate is to take part in something. "The students participated in the school play."
B2/A2 particular, C1/B1 specific(ally), special, B2/B2 precise(ly, ness, precision), B1/B2 accurate(-ly, accuracy), B1/A2 exact(ly, exactness, exactitude) / imprecise(ly, imprecision), B2/-- inaccurate(-ly, inaccuracy), inexact (inexactitude):
        If something is particular, then it is a single, important part of a group of things. "The dress shop didn’t have the particular dress she was looking for."
        If someone is precise, then they are exact and careful about their work. "The builder was very precise about where he placed the nails."
        If something is accurate, it is completely correct. "The story in the newspaper wasn’t very accurate."
        If something is specific, it is precise or exact. "Please choose a specific place on the map."
        If something is exact, it is just the right amount. "Please use the exact amount of sugar for the cake."
C2/-- particular - требовательный, разборчивый, привередливый, C1/C1 selective(ly, -ity), fastidious(ly, ness), see also: meticulous, see also: fussy
C2/-- passage - проход, прохождение через что-л. (толпу, атмосферу, территорию и т.д.)
B2/B2 passage - проход, B2/B2 corridor - коридор,  B1/B2 canal, aisle, see also: lane:
        A passage is a long area with walls that goes from one place to another. "The long passage led us to the other side of the field."
        A canal is a path for water to travel through. "The city of Venice, Italy, has many canals."
        An aisle is a space between two things that people use to walk. "They were told to clear the aisle because the plane was about to land."
B2/B2 passage - отрывок, B2/B2 extract, excerpt, snippet: An excerpt is a short piece of writing or music taken from a larger piece. "I didn’t listen to the entire symphony online, but I did play an excerpt."
      passage - путешествие на корабле, A2/A1 journey, B2/B2 trip, A1/A1 travel, B2/-- voyage, B1/B1 tour, B1/B1 expedition, see also: foray:
      	A trip is a journey to a certain place. "Ken took a trip to the city yesterday."
        A journey is a long trip. "I went on a journey across the country with my parents."
        A voyage is a long journey made on a boat or an aircraft. "The astronauts took off on a long voyage to the moon."
        A tour is a short trip in which you see many sights. "I took a tour of Asia and Europe."
        An expedition is a long trip, usually to a place very far away. "They got into their spaceship to begin their expedition."
      passage - проход, пазуха (мед.): the nasal passages, the anal passage
      passage of law, bill, etc. - прохождение через законодательный орган
      passage of time - течение времени (literary)
C1/B1 passion, love affair: passion is a very strong feeling of wanting to do something. "She had a passion for dancing."
--/C1 passing, evanescent(-ce), ephemeral, ethereal (ethereal beauty - неземная красота), transient, see also: fleet
C2/-- pastime, --/C1 pursuit, A2/A1 hobby, enthusiasms: A pastime is an activity done for fun that you do often. "In the US, baseball is considered the national pastime."
C1/-- pastry - выпечка
C1/-- pastry - корж, тесто, dough - тесто, B1/B1 flour - мука, batter: dough is a mixture of flour and water that becomes bread when baked. "I made heart-shaped cookies from the dough."
                                                               		   flour is a powder made from plants that is used to make foods like bread. "I wanted to bake a pie, but I needed flour."
C2/-- pat, see also: stroke: To pat something is to hit it softly with your hand. "I patted some lotion onto my face."
TODO pat
C2/C1 patch, TODO (area?, field?, stretch?, tract?): A patch is a part of a surface that is different in appearance from the rest. "There was one small patch of grass in the sand-covered desert."
C2/-- pathetic(ally), C2/-- wretched, C2/-- pitiful(ly, ness), pitiable = pitiful, piteous (literary) - жалобный, see also: poor, hapless
--/C1 pattern - шаблон, выкройка
B2/A2 pattern - способ, метод, система, C2/B2 model, C2/-- paradigm, prototype, exemplar, see also: approach, tactic, mode:
		A pattern is a way in which something is done or organized. "My pattern of brushing my teeth is the same as most people's."
		A prototype is a new machine that is not ready to be made in large quantities. "He introduced his prototype to the motorcycle company."
B2/B1 pattern - узор
--/B1 pattern - образец (в т.ч. для подражания), see also: specimen
C2/C1 peculiar
C2/-- peek - подглядывать
C2/-- peep - подглядывать, выглядывать
C2/B2 peer, see also: gaze: To peer at something is to watch it carefully. "She peered at people through the window."
TODO peer
C2/-- perseverance, C2/-- persistence, tenacity (tenacious(ly)), see also: decisive, determined; C2/C1 persist, persevere; C2/C1 persistent, perseverant (formal), pertinacious (formal), dogged, unyielding - непреклонный, see also: stubborn:
        To persist means to keep doing something even when it is hard. "Even though the lesson was difficult, he persisted until he understood."
        If someone is tenacious, then they do not easily give up. "I’m sure that he’ll finish that difficult sale. He is very tenacious."
        When someone’s actions are dogged, they try hard to continue something. "Her dad bought her a new jacket after her dogged requests for one."
C2/C1 perceive - воспринимать (C2/C1 perception (see also insight, opinion, belief, notion)): A perception of a situation is a way of thinking about it or understanding it. "Since he couldn’t see, his perception of life was much different than mine."
C2/C1 perceive - заметить, C2/-- pinpoint, B2/B1 locate, C1/B2 detect, B1/A2 discover, B1/A2 notice, B2/B2 spot, ascertain (formal), see also: discern, recognize, trace:
        To perceive something means to be aware of it. "He was talking loudly, so he did not perceive that the music had stopped."
        To pinpoint something means to locate it exactly. "The navigation system in my car is able to pinpoint my exact location."
        To locate something is to find it. "I could not locate my keys in the house."
        To detect something means to notice or find something. "The boy ran to the kitchen when he detected the smell of cookies."
        To discover something is to find it for the first time. "I discovered some new information in this book!"
        To notice something is to see it for the first time. "Did you notice the view?"
C1/C1 personnel - персонал, кадры, A2/B1 staff: personnel are employees in a business. "When business increased, we had to hire more personnel."
                                                A staff is a group of people working together in a company. "My dad has a staff of four people to help him at the office."
C1/C1 personnel - отдел кадров, human resources (HR)
C2/-- petty (disapproving) - мелкий, незначительный (not important and not worth giving attention to: "petty corruption/tyranny/jealousies/feuds", "a petty bureaucrat/official (= who does not have much power or authority, although they might pretend to)", "Prisoners complain that they are subjected to too many petty rules and restrictions.", "I don't want to hear any more about your petty squabbles."), see also: inconsiderable, minor (TODO), negligible, niggling
      petty (disapproving) - мелочный (caring too much about small and unimportant matters, especially when this is unkind to other people: "How could you be so petty?")
      petty (law) - мелкий/незначительный ((of a crime or criminal) not very serious: "petty crime/theft", "a petty criminal/thief", "When these people run out of money, they often turn to petty crime.", "These youngsters are often involved in petty crime such as shoplifting and casual theft.")
      pettiness (disapproving) - ничтожность (the fact of lacking importance: "It was the pettiness of their arguments that irritated her.", "The murders have shocked the nation because of the pettiness of the dispute.")
      pettiness (disapproving) - мелочность (the quality of complaining or getting angry about things that are not important: "the sheer pettiness of the officials", "Arnold detested pettiness, meanness of spirit, and small mindedness.")
C1/B2 philosophy: A philosophy is a way to think about truth and life. "My philosophy is ""live and let live""."
C2/C1 philosophical - relating to the investigation of existence and knowledge: "His arguments, like Einstein's, were qualitative, verging on highly philosophical"
C2/C1 pit: A pit is a big hole in the ground. "Michael fell into the pit and needed some help to get out."
B2/C1 pity - жалость (to have/take/feel pity (on sb)), see also: sympathy, conscientious, be in sb's shoes:
		pity is the feeling of sadness and kindness for those who are suffering. "Because she had pity for the lost boy, she helped him find his parents."
C2/-- pity - жалеть (​to feel sorry for somebody because of their situation; to feel pity for somebody), see also: sympathize
A2/B2 pity - жаль (it's a pity)
C2/A2 plant
C2/C1 plea, --/C1 petition, B1/A2 request, see also: investigate:
		A plea is a request that is urgent or emotional. "The poor, hungry man made a plea for food."
		To request something is to ask for it. "The little girl requested a special gift from Santa Claus."
		A petition is a written request asking an authority to do something. "The citizens all signed a petition asking the mayor to repair the sidewalks."
C2/C1 plead - свидетельствовать (to state in court that you are guilty or not guilty of a crime), see also: testify, state, allege
C2/-- plead - оправдываться, ссылаться на что-л. (to say something as an excuse or explanation), see also: justify, cite: "She left early, pleading pressure of work."
C2/C1 plead (with sb) (for sth / to do sth) - умолять, B2/B2 beg, adjure (formal), implore (formal or literary), entreat (formal) - упрашивать (ask for or request earnestly): "'Let me go now, please,' she entreated, her eyes unable to meet his any longer", beseech (literary) - умолять (ask for or request earnestly): "Utterly distraught, he ran up and down the bank, hunting for his clothes, calling, crying out, imploring, beseeching hekp from somewhere", C1/B2 appeal (REQUEST); B2/B2 demand:
		To plead is to ask for something you want very badly. "He pleaded for his parents to let him go to the soccer game."
        To beg is to ask for something one really wants. "The man begged for some money."
        To demand something is to say strongly that you want it. "The workers demanded to be paid more money."
C2/-- plight: a difficult and sad situation/condition; predicament, quandary, dilemma, mess, fix (informal), see also: distress:
        "the plight of the poor/homeless" "The African elephant is in a desperate plight." "Few of us can be unmoved by the plight of the refugees."
        A dilemma is a difficult situation in which a choice has to be made. "Choosing either the tastier or healthier drink proved to be quite a dilemma."
C2/B2 plot - замышлять, see also: conspire, connive, be in cahoots (with somebody): To plot is to make a secret plan to do something that is wrong or mean. "The group was plotting to ruin the company's financial reports."
..... plot - участок земли (mainly UK; US usually parcel), see also: stretch, area, tract
TODO plot
--/C1 pole (polar, arctic): polar relates to the cold places on Earth's north and south ends. "Only a few people live in the Earth's northern polar region."
                            If something is arctic, it is from far north near the North Pole. "It is cold when the arctic winds blow."
C1/B1 policy: A policy is a rule. "He told us that his policy was to put customers first."
--/C1 poll, B1/B2 questionnaire - анкета, see also: survey: A poll is a survey in which people give their opinions about important things. "The poll showed that many people support the plan to stop gang violence."
B2/C1 pond, B2/A1 pool, puddle: A pond is a very small area of water. "The ducks swam in the pond."
                                A puddle is a pool of liquid on the ground. "When the ice melted, it formed a puddle."
C2/С1 pop - хлопнуть, see also: clap
      pop - хлопок: A pop is a short, loud sound. "I heard a loud pop; then my computer screen shattered.", see also: blast
C2/С1 pop - лопнуть [transitive, intransitive], see also: rupture
B2/C1 pop - заскочить (to go quickly)
--/C1 pop - выскочить, появиться, возникнуть (to suddenly appear, especially when not expected)
      pop - закладывать (уши), "My ears always pop as the plane comes in to land."
      pop (out) - вытаращить (глаза), "Her eyes nearly popped out of her head when she saw them."
C1/A2 populate(d, -ion), C2/B2 inhabit(ant), C2/C1 reside(nt, nce, ncy, ntial), dwell(er), denizen(literary); overpopulation, populous (formal) - густонаселённый (where a large number of people live: "the populous coastal region", "one of America’s most populous states", "China is the world's most populous country."):
        If people populate an area, they live there. "Billions of people populate the Earth."
        To inhabit means to live in a certain place. "No one inhabits the ancient city."
        An inhabitant is a person who lives in a certain place. "The number of inhabitants in the countryside is increasing."
        To reside means to live somewhere permanently or for a long time. "My brother and his family reside in a lovely house on the beach."
        overpopulation is the state of having too many people in an area. "The organization is concerned with overpopulation of the world."
C1/-- portable(portability), compact(ly, ness), mobile: Something that is portable is able to be moved or carried easily. "Since computers are portable, people can use them anywhere."
                                                		If something is compact, it is smaller than normal. "A laptop computer is much more compact than a desktop model."
                                                		If something is mobile, it can be moved easily. "mobile phones are popular because you can take them anywhere."
C1/B2 pose (a threat/risk/challenge/danger/...) - представлять (угрозу/проблему/...)
C1/-- pose (for sb/sth) - позировать: To pose is to stay in one place without moving. "The kids and their dog posed for a picture."
C2/-- pose a question - ставить вопрос
      pose (as sb) - притворяться, B2/B1 pretend (питворяться, претендовать), affect, pretence (US: pretense): To pretend means to make believe something is real. "The boy liked to pretend he was a king."
      pose - притворство, affectation, mannerism
      pose - поза, C1/-- posture - поза, осанка: A person’s posture is the position in which they stand or sit. "Your back will feel better if you improve your posture."
B1/A2 position - позиция, положение, место (текущее) - "Where would be the best position for the lights?", "He took up his position by the door.", TODO place
С1/A2 position - позиция, ориентация в пространстве, поза, stance - стойка (see also: pose, posture): A position is the way something is placed. "How can you sit in that position?"
С1/A2 position - позиция, положение, ситуация - "The company's financial position is not certain.", "When two of your best friends argue, it puts you in a very awkward position."
--/A2 position - позиция, мнение, отношение, TODO opinion (see also: posture, outlook)
B2/B2 position - позиция в соревновании, положение в обществе, на рынке, в истории и т.д., C1/B2 status, C1/-- prestige, TODO rank?:
        status is the position of something or someone in relation to others. "She had achieved the status of being the smartest girl in the class."
        If a person has prestige, people admire or respect them. "The young actress gained much prestige after she won an award."
B2/B2 position - позиция в компании, занимаемая должность, работа, see also role, TODO rank?, post, job
--/B2 position - расположить, B1/C1 situate(d), B2/B1 locate(d), B1/A2 site(d), TODO place:
		To situate something means to place or build it in a certain place. "The road was situated between the forest and the lake."
        If something is situated somewhere, it is in that place. "The white board is situated between the two men."
C1/B2 possess(ion), B1/A2 own(er(ship)), B2/B1 property, proprietary - ​(of goods) made and sold by a particular company and protected by a registered trademark (proprietor - owner) / non-proprietary:
		To possess something is to have it or own it. "My uncle possesses three sheep, a chicken, a cow and a dog."
        To own something means to have it. That thing belongs to you. "My grandfather owns that house."
        property is something that someone owns. "The house is now my property."
C2/B1 practical, C2/--down-to-earth, see also: empirical
TODO practical
      practicality - практичность
TODO practicality
C2/A1 practice, C1/A1 practise, see also: rehearse
C2/C1 practitioner, --/C1 physician, GP = general practitioner, family doctor; C1/B2 surgeon (B2/B2 surgery); C1/B2 therapist = psychotherapist, B2/B2 psychologist, C2/-- psychiatrist, --/C1 psychiatric, psychiatry; see also: obstetrician:
        A practitioner is a doctor. "She made an appointment with the practitioner to treat her cough."
        A physician is a doctor. "The physician said I would feel better if I took my medicine."
        A surgeon is a doctor who is trained to do surgery. "The surgeon operated on the old man’s heart."
        surgery is medical treatment when the doctor cuts open your body. "I needed surgery to repair my leg after the accident."
        If something is psychiatric, then it is related to mental illness or its treatment. "The doctor said the patient might have a psychiatric problem."
        psychiatry is the study and treatment of mental illness. "Studying psychiatry has taught me a lot about mental illness."
--/C1 preach(er): To preach is to talk about and promote a religious idea. "Aaron often preached about living an honest life."
C1/-- precaution(ary) - мера предосторожности: A precaution is an action that is meant to stop something bad from happening. "As a precaution, you should put on a heavy coat before going out in cold weather."
C2/B2 precede - предварять, предшествовать, see also: predate / B1/A1 follow, succeed: To precede something means to come before it. "The hurricane was preceded by a moment of still wind and clear sky."
C2/B2 precede - быть/следовать/... впереди (to go in front of somebody: "She preceded him out of the room.") / A2/A2 follow
C2/C1 predecessor - предшественник, предвестник (see also: herald), antecedent - предшественник (formal), forerunner / C1/C1 successor - преемник: "Charles Babbage's mechanical calculating engines were the antecedents of the modern computer."
C2/C1 prescribe (sb) sth (for sth) - прописать (лечение/лекарство), выписать (рецепт): To prescribe medicine means to tell someone to take it. "When I was sick, the doctor prescribed me flu medicine."
      prescribe - предписывать (MAKE RULE), B2/B2 specify, stipulate (formal): To specify is to describe something clearly. "The poster didn’t specify where the concert was taking place."
B1/C1 prescription - рецепт (в т.ч. figurative, "a prescription for happiness"); прописывание лекарств: A prescription is permission from a doctor to get medicine. "The doctor gave me a prescription for my medication."
C2/B2 presence - присутствие / B2/C1 absence:  absence is the state of something being away. "There is an absence of sand in the hourglass."
C2/-- presence - наружность, влияние, спомобность производить впечатление, see also: make your presence felt
C2/C1 present / B2/C1 absent(ly: Someone or something's presence is the fact they are there. "The presence of dark clouds meant it would rain."
C1/C1 presently, B1/B2 nowadays, A2/A2 these days; B1/A1 modern, B2/B2 contemporary, modern-day, at present, at the moment, see also: currently:
		If something happens presently, it is happening right now. "presently, our profits are good, but by next year we can do even better."
		If something happens nowadays, it happens at the present time. "In the past people walked everywhere. nowadays, they use cars."
        When something is contemporary, it is related to the present time. "contemporary scientists have learned quite a bit about DNA."
C2/B1 pressure, see also: strain: pressure is what you apply to make someone do something. "They put pressure on him to change his mind."
TODO pressure, see also: compel, pressurize, oblige
C2/C1 prey - жертва, добыча (be easy prey): prey is the animals that are hunted and eaten by another creature. "The lion ran as fast as he could to catch his prey."
C2/-- be/fall prey to sth - стать/пасть жертвой, быть подверженным, see also: susceptible: "Since the attack, she had fallen prey to irrational fears." "She knew she must not fall prey to his charm." "The new government has fallen prey to corruption and fraud." "Small children are prey to all sorts of fears."
      prey (on/upon sb/sth) - охотиться (питаться (о хищниках))
B1/C1 principal - директор школы, mainly UK: headmaster, headmistress; dean - декан: A principal is a person in charge of a school. "My school's principal can be very strict with the rules."
B1/B2 principal - основной, see also: essential, paramount, substantial
C2/B2 principle (man, woman, matter of principle), precept: A principle is a belief about the correct way to behave. "To maintain principles, it’s vital to watch, listen, and speak carefully."
B2/B2 primary(-ily), secondary(-ily), tertiary = ​third in order, rank or importance (tertiary education - высшее образование; the tertiary sector = the area of industry that deals with services):
C2/B2 print: To print something is to put it onto paper. "Make sure that you print your name clearly."
C1/C1 privilege, prerogative (formal): A privilege is a special right given to only a certain person or group of people. "Only the best employee had the privilege of parking in that spot."
C2/B2 proceed, B2/B1 head: To proceed is to go in a certain direction. "My son and I proceeded to the beach so we could go fishing."
C2/C1 proceedings - происходящее
C2/C1 proceedings - судебный процесс, судебное разбирательство, see also: trial: "Chu attended the special court-martial proceedings on Monday on Hawaii, Hill said."
--/C1 proclaim (proclamation, see also: law, charter, ordain), B1/B2 declare, B1/B1 announce(r, ment), herald:
		To proclaim something means to say it in public. "The army general proclaimed that the war was won."
        To declare is to say something officially. "I declared my love for him."
        To announce something is to make it known. "He announced to everyone his new idea for the company."
C1/C1 productivity, see also: performance
C1/B2 professional - профессионал (a person who does a job that needs special training and a high level of education; a person who does a sport or other activity as a paid job rather than as a hobby)
B2/B1 professional - профессиональный, C1/-- vocational, C1/C1 competent (C1/C1 competence, B2/A2 expert, --/B2 expertise (компетентность)), C1/B2 profession(al(ism)) (see also: vocation(al(ly))), B2/B2 skilled, B2/-- skilful, practised, versed (in sth), accomplished, proficient, adept, slick  / C1/C1 amateur(ish), inexpert (incompetent, inept), unskilled:
		If something is professional, it deals with work that uses special skills. "If you want to be a pilot, you must have professional training."
        If someone is competent, they are able to think or act successfully. "competent employees are much better than unknowledgeable ones."
        competence is the ability to do something well or effectively. "The job was easy because the group had enough competence to do it well."
        expertise is the knowledge and skills to do something well. "John has a lot of advertising expertise. He can sell anything!"
        When a person is proficient at something, they can do it well. "Secretaries are proficient at typing quickly."
        If someone is adept at something, they are very good at doing it. "The carpenter is very adept at building houses."
C1/B2 profile - внимание, известность, B2/A2 public(ity), see also: renown / B1/B1 private: If something is public, it is meant for everyone to use. "I went to the public park to play with my friends."
                                   												  			publicity is public attention given to someone or something by the media. "She received a lot of publicity after her performance in the film."
                                   												  			If something is private, it is only used by one person or group. "Don't look at my diary! It's private!"
B2/B2 profile - профиль, досье, описание
	  profile - профиль (очертание на фоне), see also: outline
	  profile - профиль (вид сбоку): A profile is an outline of a face, usually as seen from the side. "The drawing of Olivia’s profile came out very well."
	  profile - описывать, see also: convey, represent
C2/C1 profound, C2/B1 deep
C1/C1 prominent(ly, -ce) - видный, выдающийся, C2/-- eminent(ly), pre-eminent(ly) (formal), see also: renowned: When something is prominent, it is important and well known. "Queen Victoria was a prominent person in history."
      prominent(ly, -ce) - выдающийся, выпирающий (nose, chin, cheekbones etc.), salient - основной, ключевой, наиболее заметный
C2/-- prone (see also: subject), supine(ly), prostrate, prostration; susceptible (see also: be/fall prey to sth):
		When things are prone to some bad thing, they are likely affected by it. "Some people are more prone to catching colds than others."
        If one is susceptible to something like disease, they are easily harmed by it. "Not eating enough vegetables makes you more susceptible to getting sick."
C2/B2 proportion, TODO part - часть, share - доля: A proportion is an amount that shows the link between the parts and the whole. "Only a small proportion of the people in this town actually work here."
С2/B2 proportion - отношение, C1/C1 ratio, see also: scale: A ratio is a relationship between two things expressed in numbers or amounts. "The boy to girl ratio is one to three."
C2/C1 proportion - пропорция (правильное соотношение)
      proportion - пропорция (math)
C2/C1 prosecute(-ion, -or): To prosecute someone means to take legal action against them. "They were prosecuted for fishing in the river without a permit."
C1/B2 protein, carbohydrates - углеводы; hydrogen - водород, oxygen - кислород: protein is a substance that is necessary for the body to grow and be strong. "Fish and beef are good sources of protein."
                                                             					carbohydrates are substances in foods like bread that give you energy. "carbohydrates like rice are a good source of energy for active people."
                                                             					hydrogen is a gas that has no taste, color, or smell. "Balloons filled with hydrogen can easily float away if you aren’t careful."
                                                             					oxygen is a gas that all living things need to breathe. "My aunt believes that the oxygen in the country is cleaner than in the city."
C2/C1 provoke (MAKE ANGRY), goad: To provoke someone means to annoy them on purpose to cause violence. "The older boy provoked Paul by calling him mean names."
C2/C1 provoke (CAUSE REACTION), goad, incite(ment) - подстрекать, разжигать, see also: compel, precipitate, stir sth <-> up
C2/-- proverb (поговорка), C1/-- saying (высказывание), B2/A2 expression (выражение), adage (поговорка), B2/-- idiom:
        A proverb is a short saying that tells you something important. "The proverb ""egg on your face"" means you've done something embarrassing."
        An idiom is a phrase with a meaning different from its words. "The idiom ""when pigs fly"" means that something will never happen."
C2/?? provide for sth: to make plans in order to deal with a possible event in the future. "We must provide for depreciation when calculating the costs."
      provide for sb
C2/B1 pull - потянуть (a muscle/ligament/tendon/hamstring etc)
B1/B1 pull, C2/-- haul, C2/B2 drag, lug, schlep, heave: https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/pull_1?q=pull (pull: drag draw haul tow tug)
        To drag something means to pull it across the ground. "The dog was dragging his owner down the street."
        To tow something is to pull it. The truck was towing a trailer behind it.
TODO pull (synonims: drag, draw, hawl, tow, tug)
C2/B2 puzzle, B1/B1 mystery (mysterious = arcane (formal) - таинственный, загадочный (mysterious and known only by a few people: "the arcane rules of cricket"), "He was the only person who understood all the arcane details of the agreement.", "This argument may seem arcane to those not closely involved in the world of finance."), riddle, enigma; flummox(informal), bewilder, bemuse, mystify/demystify, perplex, paradox (paradoxical(ly)), see also: stump, confuse:
        A puzzle is something that is hard to understand. "The question was a puzzle to him."
        A mystery is something that is difficult to understand or explain. "The path on the map was a complete mystery to me."
        A riddle is a question that is difficult to answer but meant to be funny. "I could not answer Wendy's riddle, but it made me laugh."
        An enigma is someone or something that is mysterious or hard to understand. "The theft of the paintings is an enigma to the investigators."
		A paradox is a true statement or real event that seems illogical. "The paradox of her work was that the less she worked, the more she got done."
C2/C1 quest: A quest is a long and difficult search for something. "The treasure hunter went on aquest to find an ancient gold necklace."
C1/B1 quote, --/B2 cite, B1/A2 mention, --/B2 raise - поднимать (вопрос), broach, B2 bring sth <-> up, see also: invoke, plead:
        To cite something is to mention it as an example or as proof of something. "She cited six reasons that the school needed to build new classrooms."
        To mention something is to talk about it. "The doctors mentioned the problems that the patient was having."
TODO quote
C1/B1 race, C2/C1 rally, B2/B2 marathon: A race is a contest to see who is the fastest. "Paul is a fast runner, so he easily won the race."
										 A marathon is a very long foot race just over 42 kilometers. "I ran a marathon, and now my legs are tired."
C1/B2 race, C2/B2 rush, B1/B1 hurry, B2/-- dash, streak, sprint, haste (спешка, поспешность), zoom (informal), whizz (informal - пронестись), see also: zap, charge:
        To rush is to go somewhere or do something very quickly. "Nancy rushed to finish her homework."
        To hurry is to do something quickly. "I hurried home on my bike."
        To dash means to run or move quickly. "Helen dashed up the stairs, so she wouldn’t be late for her appointment."
        To sprint means to run very fast over a short distance. "The kids didn’t want to be late to class, so they sprinted to the bus stop."
        haste is speed in movement or action. "In order to get to the meeting in time, he proceeds with haste."
        To zoom is to move quickly. "The cars zoomed along the road."
TODO race
      rack - стойка, полка, A2/C1 cabinet - шкаф, A2/A2 cupboard, A2/-- drawer, locker, wardrobe:
        A rack is an object with shelves that holds things. "He stored his tools on a rack."
        A cupboard is a piece of furniture that is used to store food or household items. "We put all of our dishes and food in the cupboards."
        A drawer is a small part in furniture that is used to store things. "I put my clothes into the empty drawers."
        A locker is a small cabinet with a lock where people store their possessions. "I keep my school books in my locker."
        A wardrobe is the collection of all of a person’s clothing. "She bought some new clothes to expand her wardrobe."
      rack - рамка для шаров в бильярде (UK frame)
      rack - каре (​rack of lamb/pork)
      rack - дыба ​(usually the rack)
      rack - мучить, терзать, torment, C2/C1 torture, anguish; C2/-- plague: torture is something that causes you physical or mental pain. "Greg thought that writing the essay was torture."
                                                                             To torment someone means to cause them to suffer on purpose. "She tormented her little brother by taking his favorite toy."
C1/C1 radical(ly), see also: abrupt: If something is radical, it is very new or different. "The president is planning to make some radical changes to the law."
TODO radical
C2/C1 raid
TODO raid, air-raid, bombing campaign
C2/B2 rail - перила, поручень, guard rail - ограждение; "отбойник": US: guard rail, UK: crash barrier
C2/B2 rail - гардина, вешалка, перекладина, see also: bar, see also: rod: A rail is horizontal bar made of metal or wood. "The cat was sitting on the rail of the fence."
B1/B2 rail - рельс (railway(s) - ж/д)
B1/B2 rail - протестовать, see also: protest.
      rail - проклинать, ругать, revile, vilify, С2/C1 rage, condemn, decry, attack, censure, etc.
С2/C1 rage - свирепствовать, бушевать
B2/C1 rage - гнев, ярость, enrage, B2/B2 anger, wrath(ful), fume - злиться (see also: seethe), see also: C2/C1 outrage:
		rage is a very angry feeling. "The chef was filled with rage when his helpers ruined the meal."
        To anger someone is to make them mad. "It angers me when people are rude."
C2/B2 range: A range is a number or a set of similar things. "I saw a range of cars to choose from."
C1/B2 rank: A person's rank is their place in an order of people. "The man got to the rank of captain in the navy."
B2/C1 rape - изнасиловать, see also: violate
B2/C1 rape - изнасилование, see also: violation
C1/B1 rare(ly), B2/C1 seldom, infrequent(ly), see also: occasional / A1/A1 often, frequent(ly), --/B2 frequency, in many cases:
		If something is rare, you do not see it very often. "It is rare for him to miss his flight."
        If something seldom happens, it doesn't happen very often. "It seldom rains in southern Arizona."
        If something is frequent, then it happens or is done often. "While Dad was sick, the doctor made frequent visits to his house."
        When something happens frequently, it happens often. "We meet frequently, either at the beginning or ending of the week."
        The frequency of something is the number of times that it happens. "The frequency of rainstorms is very high, especially during the spring."
C2/-- rash(ly, ness) - опрометчивый, непродуманный, C2/-- reckless, foolhardy - безрассудный, опрометчивый, see also: unwise: When people are reckless, they act in an unsafe way. "The reckless driver posed a threat to everyone else on the road."
C2/-- rash - сыпь, hives - крапивница: A rash is an infected area of the skin with redness, bumps, itching, or dryness. "The new perfume left a horrible rash on my skin."
      rash (of sth) - множество, C2/-- wealth - a large amount of something good, plenty, lot, flood, spate, loads, hoard?, abundance? (TODO), multitude - множество (людей, предметов), outpouring - разлив, излияние, наплыв, изобилие, see also: reachness, surplus, wealth:
        A multitude of things or people is a very large number of them. "A multitude of people were waiting at the airport."
        A lot means a large number or amount of people, animals, things, etc. "There are a lot of apples in the basket."
C1/C1 rational(ly, ity, ize, ization): When something is rational, it is normal or practical. "It is hard to think in a rational way when you are scared."
B2/C1 ray - луч, B2/C1 beam, shaft of light, sunlight, etc: A ray is a line of light that comes from a bright object. "The sun's warm rays covered the beach."
C2/C1 ray - лучик (надежды и т.д.), glimmer, gleam, spark, see also: glare
C2/A2 react; react against: To react is to act in a certain way because of something that happened. "James reacted badly to the news."
C1/C1 rear (rearguard - арьергард), posterior, astern, B1/B1 bottom (informal: backside, behind) - зад(ница) / anterior, front, fore, forward:
		When something is in the rear of something, it is in the back. "The man loaded the rear of his truck with boxes."
        The fore of something is the front part of it. "The teacher’s desk is at the fore of the classroom."
A2/A1 reason - причина (a cause or an explanation for something that has happened or that somebody has done: "He said no but he didn't give a reason."), rationale (formal) - основание, причина; synonyms (https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/reason_1): explanation, grounds, basis, excuse, motive, justification, pretext
A2/B2 reason - основание (a fact that makes it right or fair to do something: "They have reason to believe she is lying.", "I have no particular reason for doubting him.", "We have every reason (= have very good reasons) to feel optimistic.")
--/B2 reason - разум, рассудок, мышление (the power of the mind to think in a logical way, to understand and have opinions, etc.: "to lose your reason (= become mentally ill)", "the conflict between faith and reason", "Only human beings are capable of reason")
C2/B2 reason - разум, рассудок, здравый смысл (what is possible, practical or right: "I can't get her to listen to reason.", "Look, you're supposed to be the voice of reason here.", "We can wear anything we like to the office, within reason."), see also: common sense
      reason - рассуждать, размышлять (to form a judgement about a situation by considering the facts and using your power to think in a logical way: "She reasoned that she must have left her bag on the train.", "Newton reasoned (that) there must be a force such as gravity"), see also: contemplate, hypothesize
      reason sth <-> out - найти, выяснить, понять, решить, придумать (to try and find the answer to a problem by using your power to think in a logical way: "I spent hours reasoning out the solution to the puzzle.")
      reason with sb - урезонивать (to talk to sb in order to persuade them to be more sensible: "I tried to reason with him, but he wouldn't listen.", "The police reasoned with the hijackers to at least let the children go free."), see also: incentivize, persuade
C2/C1 reasoning - рассуждение, аргументация, доводы, обоснование (the process of thinking about things in a logical way; opinions and ideas that are based on logical thinking): "The reasoning behind her conclusion is impossible to fault.", "What is the reasoning behind this decision?", "This line of reasoning is faulty.", "His reasoning for the decision followed a logical and rational analysis."
C1/A2 receive: To receive something is to get it. "I received a present on my birthday."
C1/A1 reception - приём (торжественный), prom - выпускной: A reception is a party to welcome a person or celebrate an event. "We all danced and had a good time at the wedding reception."
--/C1 recipient (formal) - получатель (B2/B2 receipt - получение): A recipient of something is the person who receives it. "I was the recipient of four phone calls today."
C1/A2 recognize, identify, see also: perceive, discern: To recognize something is to know it because you have seen it before. "I recognized an old friend from many years ago."
														                            To identify something is to be able to name it. "I used the file to identify his name."
TODO recognize, C1/B2 acknowledge(-ment)
C2/-- reconcile (reconciliation), conciliate(-ion, -ory), appease - умиротворять, placate, mollify, pacify; armistice, ceasefire, truce, disarm(ament):
        To reconcile means to return to a friendly relationship. "After arguing, the two friends were reconciled with each other."
C2/C1 reconstruct(ive, ion), C1/-- redevelop(ment), C1/B2 restore, C1/-- renovate, rejuvenate (rejuvenation), redecorate, refurbish (formal), refit - переоборудовать, remodel, redesign, see also: upgrade, gentrify:
		    To restore something is to put it back the way it was. "Victor restored the old car."
        To renovate a building means to repair it or build new structures on it. "The old fire station was renovated into an apartment building."
C2/-- recur(rent, rence): To recur means to happen more than once. "Burglaries seem to recur over and over in our neighborhood."
С2/С1 realm - область, сфера, C1/C1 domain, C1/C1 sphere, C1/B2 sector (the tertiary sector = the area of industry that deals with services), B2/B1 field, see also: area:
        A realm is any area of activity or interest. "He was not very active in the realm of business."
        A sector is a part of a country’s economy in a specific type of industry. "We learned about just a few of the factories within the manufacturing sector."
      realm - королевство, C2/C1 kingdom (royal; figurative: the animal, plant and mineral kingdoms), C1/C1 empire (imperial), ---/C1 crown (корона, венок, крона дерева, коронка (also cap)), C2/-- throne, see also: emperor:
        royal describes something that belongs to a king or queen. "The king sat upon the royal throne."
        An empire is a large group of countries ruled by an emperor or empress. "The emperor built roads to make travel easier throughout the empire."
        If something is imperial, then it is of, or related to an empire. "These old imperial coins were once used in the Roman Empire."
        A crown is the hat worn by a king or queen. "The crown is made of gold."
        A throne is the special chair in which a ruler sits. "Nobody except the king and queen sat in the thrones in the great hall."
C2/-- recur; C2/B1 repeated(ly), recurrent, recurring
C2/-- refine, C2/-- perfect, C2/-- sharpen, hone, see also: grind, polish sth up:
		    To refine something is to make it better by making changes. "The principal refined his method of controlling students over the years."
        To hone something is to improve it and make it very good. "Lisa honed her chess skills by hours and hours of practice."
      refined - утончённый, see also: genteel
      refinement - усовершенствование (a small change that improves sth), see also: enhancement (TODO): "These refinements have increased the machine's accuracy by 25 percent."
      refinement - очистка, переработка (the process of making a substance pure)
      refinement - утончённость (the quality of being polite and well educated and able to judge the quality of things; the state of having the sort of manners that are considered typical of a high social class), see also: gentility: "She's the personification of culture and refinement." - она олицетворение культуры и утончённости
B2/B1 reflect (C1/C1 reflection): To reflect is when a surface sends back light, heat, sound or an image. "Her face was reflected on the smooth glass."
B2/B1 reflect (C1/C1 reflection), C2/C1 contemplate(-ion), C2/-- ponder, think sth <-> out - продумать (to consider or plan something carefully), C1/-- dwell on/upon sth - думать/говорить о чём-л. неприятном, переживать, C2/B2 speculate (C1/B2 speculation), meditate (--/C1 meditation), muse - reflect deeply on a subject ("Musing about the Big Picture may be a lot more gratifying than focusing on on the details of the specific policies that aren't working"), ruminate, see also: hypothesize, reason
        To contemplate something means to think about it. To consider thoughtfully. "Mark took a moment to contemplate the math problem before solving it."
        To ponder something is to think about it carefully. "She sat in the park and pondered her problem."
        To speculate means to guess about something. "My sister looked at the sky and speculated that it would rain tomorrow."
        To meditate means to focus or think deeply in silence. "She liked to meditate for several hours of each day."
C2/-- refrain (formal), desist (formal), abstain: To refrain from something is to avoid doing it. "The doctor asked Mary to refrain from eating fast food as part of her diet."
C1/-- refresh: To refresh someone is to make them feel less hot or tired. "The baby was refreshed after taking a cool bath."
C2/C1 refuge, C2/B2 shelter, --/C1 asylum; an air-raid shelter - бомбоубежище, sanctuary - убежище: A refuge is a place where you go to be safe. "When it started to rain, she found refuge in the house."
                                                                                                    A shelter is a place to go that is safe from danger or bad weather. "The frog took shelter from the storm in a nearby cave."
                                                                                                    A sanctuary is a place where people in danger can go to be safe. "The church was made into a sanctuary for homeless people in the winter."
C1/B2 regard (C1/C1 regardless, C2/-- irrespective), see also: consider / disregard, B2/B1 ignore, C2 put sth <-> aside:
		To regard someone or something is to think of them in a certain way. "The boy regarded the girl as a good friend."
        To ignore something is to act like you do not see or hear it. "I ignored the message he was making and kept studying."
C1/C1 regardless, C2/-- irrespective, C1/-- notwithstanding (formal) - вопреки, B1/B1 despite; (see also: in the face of sth) C2/A1 however, C1/C1 nonetheless, B2/B2 nevertheless, C1/B1 after all (в конце концов), yet, C1 all/just the same; B1/B1 unless; C2/C1 albeit, B2/B1 (al)though, see also: still:
        If something happens despite what you do, it happens anyway. "We still played the game despite the cold weather."
        however means despite or not being influenced by something. "She is a great cook. However, she never had professional lessons."
        If something happens nonetheless, then it occurs despite some other thing. "She tried to keep the dog out of the mud, but it got dirty nonetheless."
        You use nevertheless to show that something goes against a fact. "He is usually friendly. Nevertheless, he wasn't this afternoon."
		yet is used to say something has not happened up to now. "We can't go out yet; we're still eating."
        unless means if not or except when. "unless you clean your room, you cannot play with your friends."
        though is used when the second idea makes the first seem surprising. "though he was overweight, he liked to be active."
        You use although to say that one thing is contrasted by another. "although she was late, her friends gave her a warm welcome."
C2/-- register - выражать, озвучивать (to make your opinion known officially or publicly)
C2/-- register - выражать (to show or express a feeling), see also: express
C2/-- register - регистрировать (on measuring instrument)
      register - to notice something and remember it; to be noticed (often used in negative sentences)
B1/B2 register - регистрировать(ся), записывать(ся), --/C1 enroll: To enroll in something is to put one’s name on a list as a member of a group. "The students had to enroll in the class one semester in advance."
--/B2 register - реестр, список имён, rota, roster, see also: roll: A register is an official list or record of people or things. "At a wedding there is register for all of the guests to sign."
C1/-- rehearse (sth / for sth) - репетировать, see also: practise: To rehearse means to practice and prepare for a performance in front of people. "Vick’s band rehearsed all week before their first show."
C1/C1 reign - период правления: A reign is the period of time in which a ruler rules. "The emperor’s reign lasted for only two years."
C2/C1 reign - царствовать, править
С2/-- reign - царить, властвовать: "At last silence reigned", "For a while, chaos and confusion reigned.", "Love reigned supreme in her heart." "The bomb attacks produced a panic which reigned over the city."
C2/B1 relate (see also: affiliate), C2/B2 relative(ly, -ity), C1/B2 comparative - сравнительный, относительный, сравнимый, сопоставимый, commensurate - соразмерный, сопоставимый (TODO / incommensurate), kin - родня (kindred - родственный, next of kin - ближайший родственник, clan), pertain (pertinent, see also: relevant):
        To relate to something means to have a connection with it. "A company’s plan usually relates to how much profit it can make."
        A relative is a family member. "My relatives came by to see the new baby."
        relativity is a set of ideas about time and space developed by Albert Einstein. "relativity teaches that light travels at the same speed in the universe."
        If something is comparative, it is being judged based on something else. "The money that John has is comparative to most other adults."
        kin is a person’s family and relatives. "His kin were all farmers."
        A clan is a group of relatives or friends. "The Lee clan meets every year to celebrate the New Year."
        To pertain to something means to be related or connected to it. "All of the lawyer’s questions pertained to events around the night of the crime."
TODO relate- общаться? обращаться?
TODO related, see also: affiliated
      relay - эстафета: A relay is a race in which teams of runners or swimmers race against each other. "Jerry was the fastest on his team, so he ran the last part of the relay."
      relay - смена (work in relays - работать посменно)
      relay - реле
      relay - переложить ("The carpet will have to be relaid.", "The council are going to relay the road surface outside our house next month."), resurface
      relay - переда(ва)ть, C1/C1 transmit, TODO transfer conduct deliver, see also: convey: To transmit something means to pass it from one person or place to another. "The radio tower transmits a signal to all the radios in a 20-kilometer radius."
C1/B1 release, unleash, untether: To release something is to stop holding it. "She released the bird from her hands."
C2/B2 relief (C2/B2 relieve), --/C1 ease (see also: simplicity, effortless(ly)), soothe, alleviate (alleviation), assuage, see also: extenuate:
        To relieve someone is to make them feel less pain. "The medicine relieved the sick boy."
        relief is a feeling you get when something bad or challenging ends. "I felt a sense of relief when I heard the good news."
        When something is done with ease, it is not hard to do. "The monkey climbed the tree with ease."
        To alleviate pain or suffering means to make it less intense or severe. "She needed something to alleviate the pain in her back."
TODO relief, see also: welfare
C1/C1 reluctan(t(ly), ce), C2/-- unwilling(ly, ness), indisposed
C2/-- remorse, repent (formal), B2/B2 regret, compunction; remorseful(ly), contrite(ly, -ion), B2/B2 regret(ful(ly)), rue(ful(ly)) (old-fashioned or formal) - сожалеть, deplore (formal) - осуждать, сожалеть; lament - горевать, оплакивать, bewail (literary) - сокрушаться, bemoan (formal) - оплакивать.
        To regret something is to wish that it didn't happen. "I regret that I was mean to my sister."
        remorse is a strong feeling of sadness and regret. "When I realized what I did, I felt remorse for my actions." "Any sign of remorse was completely absent from her face."
C2/B1 remote, C2/B2 distant, outlying, TODO far: If something is remote, it is very far away and difficult to get to. "It took many days to get to the remote island."
                             		             If something is distant, it is far away. "Michael could barely see the distant island."
                             		             If something is far, it is not close. "It's far going from the east coast to the west coast of America."
C2/B1 remote (NOT FRIENDLY), C2/B2 distant (NOT FRIENDLY), C2/-- detached, C2/-- indifferent (равнодушный, безразличный, see also: passive, disengaged), aloof, forbidding, unapproachable
        When someone is indifferent toward something, they have a lack of interest in it. "Lisa is indifferent toward school. She doesn’t care what her final grades are."
C2/C1 render, make: To render something means to make it become something else. "His report was rendered unimportant by the release of new information."
C2/C1 render - предоставлять (помощь), оказывать (услугу) и т.д., B1/A2 provide (C1/C1 provision), TODO supply(?), present, see also: furnish
		To provide something means to supply it. "Each student was provided with a test and three sharp pencils."
      	provide against sth (formal): to make plans in order to prevent or deal with a bad situation. "Beach operators do not have a legal obligation to provide against injury or drowning."
      	The provision of something is the act of giving it to people in need or want. "That department is responsible for the provision of emergency supplies."
--/C1 render - исполнить, выразить (see also enact, perform)
C2/C1 render, see also: translate
C2/C1 renowned, B2/-- distinguished, famed, famous, world-famous, well-known, illustrious (formal) - widely known and esteemed ("She will be joining an illustrious list of recipients that include Winston Churchill, Nelson Mandela, Pope John Paul II and Princess Diana"), see also: prominent / obscure(дн) - (мало/не)известный (obscurity):
		If someone or something is famous, they are known to many people. "The Eiffel Tower in Paris is very famous."
		If something is obscure, it is not well-known. "The old man travels the world in search of obscure books."
--/C1 rental, A2/B1 rent, lease, see also: tuition: To lease means to rent property, usually an apartment or land. "When the family first leased the apartment, the rent was very low."
C2/-- replace - вернуть на место
B1/A2 replace - заменить, B2/C1 substitute, surrogate (formal), see also: displace: To replace something is to put it in the place of something else. "I replaced the tire on my car because it was flat."
                                                                                    To substitute something or someone means to have them take the place of another. "When I ran out of juice, I had to substitute water to drink in the morning."
C2/B1 represent - представлять (организацию на собрании, страну на соревнованиях, кого-л. в суде и т.д.): To represent is to speak or act for a person or group. "My lawyer will represent me in court."
C2/-- represent - представлять, изображать, see also: depict, (?)profile
B2/B1 represent - представлять, обозначать, see also: symbolise
      represent (formal) - довести до сведения (to make a formal statement to somebody in authority to make your opinions known or to protest)
TODO represent
C2/-- reproach - упрекать, укорять
      reproach(ful(ly)) - укоризненный (​expressing blame or criticism): "reproachful looks/words", "She was doing her best not to sound reproachful."
C2/C1 reproduce (reproductive): To reproduce is to make something exactly how someone else did it. "The children tried to reproduce their house using toy blocks."
                                If something is reproductive, it has to do with a living thing producing young. "The reproductive system of a plant is simple."
C2/-- resemblance, likeness; C1/C1 resemble; reminiscent, evocative, resonant, redolent: likeness means the state of being like, or resemblance. "Michelle bears a strong likeness to her older sister Kate."
                                                                               			 To resemble someone is to look like them. "The baby resembles his father a great deal"
C2/-- resent (C2/-- resentment) - негодовать, gall: To resent something means to have bad feelings about it. "She resented the fact that she had never been able to play an instrument."
C2/B2 reserve - запас, see also: stock; reservoir: A reservoir is a place for storing water for a town to use. "If it doesn’t rain soon, the reservoir is going to dry up completely."
B2/B2 reserve - заповедник (also reservation (US also preserve)), sanctuary
TODO reserve - резервировать: To reserve something means to keep it for a certain person or time. "He reserved a table at the busy restaurant."
--/C1 residue (residual), --/C1 remainder, --/C1 remains: The remainder of something is what is left. "He took a bite of the apple, then gave me the remainder of it."
C2/C1 resignation - отставка
B2/B2 resign - подать в отставку, B1/B1 retire, step aside/down: To retire is to leave a job, usually because of old age. "My father is sixty-five years old. He is about to retire from work."
                                                                 To resign means to quit a job. "After I officially resigned from work, I said goodbye to my boss."
C2/-- resign oneself to sth - смириться, see also: agree, concede
C2/C1 resignation (C2/-- resign yourself to sth) - смирение
C2/-- resilient - упругий, tensile - растяжимый, эластичный, elastic: elastic is a rubber that stretches when it is pulled. "He attached the elastic bungee to his legs before he jumped off the platform."
C2/-- resilient - (психологически) устойчивый
C1/C1 resist(ance): To resist something is to fight against it. "He resisted the treatment at the hospital."
C1/-- respect, C1/C1 worship, deify, idolize, revere (formal), reverence (reverent(ial(ly)), venerate(formal), B2/-- admire (восхищаться; любоваться), see also: compliment / C2/-- disrespect, see also: contempt
        respect is a good opinion of someone because they are good. "I have great respect for firemen."
        To worship means to like and honor a person, thing, or religious figure. "Many people around the world worship in a church."
        To revere something is to admire it greatly. "The students revere their teacher, who has taught them a lot."
        venerate - regard with feelings of respect and reverance: "He venerated me like a being descended from an upper world"
        To admire someone is to like them for what they do. "I admire my brother for his hard work."
        disrespect is rudeness or a behavior that shows a lack of respect. "He showed disrespect by arguing with his boss during a meeting."
C1/-- respectful(ly) - уважительный / C2/-- disrespectful(ly), irreverent(-ce, ly), insolent, impertinent, impudent(-ce), gall
      respected - уважаемый, C1/-- reputable(-y), esteemed (formal), venerable (formal) - почтенный, уважаемый (impressive by reason of age: "Thus, after much more than two handred years, the venerable building looks almost as it did when the first studens entered its doors"), see also: compliment / disreputable(-y), see also: dubious etc.:
      	If someone or something is reputable, then they have a good reputation. "The service from the less than reputable company made her angry."
		If someone is esteemed, many people like or respect them. "An esteemed scientist is coming to the university to talk about her discoveries."
C1/C1 respective(ly), see also: corresponding: When things are respective, they relate separately to each person just mentioned. "The boxers were told to return to their respective corners."
C1/C1 resume (resumption), B1/A2 continue: To resume something means to start it again after taking a break. "I put the newspaper down to eat breakfast. Then I resumed reading."
C2/C1 retrieve, B2/C1 extract, B2/C1 regain, B1/-- fetch, B1/A2 remove, B1/-- recover(y), recoup: To retrieve something is to find it and get it back. "She retrieved her mail from the mail box."
                                                                                                  To extract something means to remove it. "The dentist extracted the woman’s damaged tooth and put in a fake one."
                                                                                                  To remove something is to take it away. "I removed the nail from the board."
C1/A1 return: To return is to go back to a place. "I was happy to return home to my mom after school."
C2/B2 reveal, B2/B2 expose, --/C1 unveil, C2/B2 display, unmask, divulge, debunk, see also: manifest, disclose:
        To reveal is to show something. "I will reveal where I hid the candy bar."
        To expose is to make known something that is hidden. "He took off his shirt exposeing his costume."
        To disclose something means to tell it to someone else. "John came home late, so he had to disclose his activities to his wife."
        To display something is to show it, especially by putting it in a certain place. "The museum displayed many wonderful paintings."
      revel - кутить, make merry ((old-fashioned))
      revel - кутёж, гулянка, пирушка (noisy celebrations): "Bright lights illuminated the revels and feasting."
      revel in - упиваться, наслаждаться (​to enjoy sth very much), see also: relish: "She was clearly revelling in all the attention.", "He revelled in the freedom he was allowed.", "Some people seem to revel in annoying others.", "She revelled in defying the critics.", "He revelled in his role as team manager."
      reveller (US reveler) - гуляка, бухарик
C2/C1 revelation - разоблачение, раскрытие (the act of making people aware of something that has been secret), see also: disclosure: "His wife divorced him after the revelation that he was having an affair.", "The company's financial problems followed the revelation of a major fraud scandal."
C2/C1 revelation - разоблачение, раскрытие, откровение (a fact that people are made aware of, especially one that has been secret and is surprising), see also: disclosure: "revelation about/concerning something startling/sensational revelations about her private life", "He was dismissed after revelations that confidential files were missing.", "These events were seen as a divine revelation."
B2/C1 revenge, avenge, vengeance; revengeful, vengeful, vindictive: revenge is what you do to hurt or punish someone who hurts you. "He broke his sister's doll as revenge after she lost his favorite book."
C2/C1 reverse (reversal); C1/-- setback, --/B2 lift, revoke (formal), rescind (formal), annul (LAW), repeal), see also: scrap, abolish, withdraw, overturn, turn around, turn sth <-> around (turnaround):
        To reverse means to change to the opposite direction. "They reversed their direction after seeing the sign."
C2/c1 reverse, C1/C1 contrary
C1/A2 review (see also: audit), B2/B1 revise, C1/-- reconsider(ation), B2/A1 study, cram, C1 brush up (on) sth освежить (повторить): A review of something is a formal inspection of it by people in authority. "The government ordered a careful review of the economic situation."
C2/C1 revive - оживить(ся), возродить(ся), восстановить(ся), revitalise (US revitalize), revivify (formal), resuscitate, --/B2 recover(y) - восстановиться, выздороветь, B2/B2 heal (see also: cure), recuperate (recuperation), convalesce(nce), see also: invigorate:
        To revive someone or something means to restore health or life to them. "She revived the feeling of warmth in her leg by rubbing it softly."
        To recover is to go back to normal after something bad happens. "I hope the city will recover soon after the flood."
        To heal means to make a part of the body healthy again after injury. "After my broken arm heals, I can play baseball again."
--/C1 rhetoric - (formal, often disapproving) риторика, болтовня (clever language that sounds good but is not sincere or has no real meaning: "the rhetoric of political slogans", "Her speech was just empty rhetoric.", "His speech was dismissed as mere rhetoric by the opposition.", "In reply to the question, he just produced a lot of empty (= meaningless) rhetoric.")
      rhetoric - (formal) риторика (speech or writing intended to be effective and influence people: "I was swayed by her rhetoric into donating all my savings to the charity.", "How far the president will be able to translate his campaign rhetoric into action remains to be seen.", "His fiery rhetoric in support of limiting cuts to projected defence spending has surprised and impressed some of Obama's toughest Republican critics")
      rhetoric - (formal) риторика, красноречие, ораторское искусство (the art of using language in speech or writing in a special way that influences or entertains people), oratory (formal), elocution - ораторское искусство (the art of careful public speaking, using clear pronunciation and good breathing to control the voice: "classes in elocution", "elocution lessons"), see also: eloquence
      rhetorical - риторический ((of a question) asked only to make a statement or to produce an effect rather than to get an answer: "‘Don't you care what I do?’ he asked, but it was a rhetorical question.")
      rhetorical - (formal, often disapproving) риторический (intended to influence people, but not completely honest or sincere)
      rhetorical - (formal) риторический (connected with the art of rhetoric: "repetition, that tedious rhetorical device", "the use of rhetorical devices such as metaphor and irony", "She ended her speech with a rhetorical flourish.")
      rhetorically - риторически (in a way that is intended to make a statement or to produce an effect rather than to get an answer: "‘Do you think I'm stupid?’ she asked rhetorically.", "I do not ask rhetorically, but because I would truly like to know the answer.")
      rhetorically - (formal, often disapproving) риторически (in a way that is intended to influence people although it is not completely honest or sincere)
      rhetorically - (formal) риторически (by using the art of rhetoric: "a rhetorically structured essay", "Was he more rhetorically skilled during the debate? Probably.")
C2/-- rhyme, B2/C1 verse, B1/B1 poetry: To rhyme is to have the same sounds at the end of a word. "Humpty Dumpty is an old rhyme that children learn in school."
C1/-- richness, the better off, see also: wealth: "The new tax will not have a serious impact on the better off."
TODO richness, see also: surplus, rash
--/C1 rifle (through) - обшаривать, рыться, rake - рыться, шмонать, rummage - рыться, обыскивать, scour, burrow, B2/B1 feel - шарить рукой, искать, comb - прочёсывать, delve (in(to)) - рыться, drill down - to go to deeper levels of an organized set of data in order to find more detail, especially on a computer or a website, see also: search: "She rifled through her clothes for something suitable to wear." "He rifled through the papers on the desk, but couldn't find the photographs." "Sally rifled through her wardrobe looking for a dress." "He rifled through his briefcase and extracted a file."
C1/C1 rip, B1/B2 tear, sever - (от/раз)орвать, (от/раз)резать, отрубить, hack - рубить, slit, nick, pull sth apart - разорвать, cleave (old-fashioned or literary):
        To rip something means to pull it apart. "She ripped the paper in half by accident."
        To tear something means to pull it apart. "It is easy to tear paper."
        To sever something is to cut through it completely. "He severed the string using scissors."
        To hack something means to cut it into uneven pieces. "My uncle used the ax to hack the tree into many logs."
        To nick someone means to cut them slightly with a sharp object. "While cutting the carrots, the cook nicked his finger with the edge of his knife."
C2/B2 rise - повышаться, подниматься, расти (по важности, силе, в плане карьеры)
B2/A2 rise - повышаться, подниматься, расти, увеличиваться, C2/C1 maximize (maximal), B2/A2 increase, B2/B2 boost, C1/B2 enhance(ment), A2/A1 improve(ment) (see also: complement), --/B2 multiply, enlarge, magnify, formal: augment(ation), see also: expand, supplement, wax (of the moon, see also: wax and wane), mount up / C1/C1 minimize (C1/C1 minimal), C1/C1 diminish, C1/-- lessen, B2/B2 decline, B2/B2 lower, see also: reduce, sink, shrink, contract, worsen, weaken, wane, , subside - опуститься, просесть:
        To increase something is to make it larger or more. "They've increased the price of gas by 15 cents!"
        To maximize something is to make it as great in amount, size, or importance. "You should exercise regularly to maximize a healthy lifestyle."
        To maximize something means to make it the biggest in size or amount. "Businesses try to maximize their profits."
        To boost something means to increase or improve it. "Lowering prices boosts customers’ interest in shopping."
        To enhance something is to make it better. "Amy’s blue shirt really enhances the color of her eyes."
        To improve something means to make it better. "He studied hard to improve his test scores from the previous year."
        To multiply is to increase in number. "In the past year, the number of people at work multiplied by ten percent."
        To enlarge something means to make it bigger. "The classrooms were enlarged over the summer to make room for more students."
        To magnify something means to make it look bigger than it really is. "Astronomers use telescopes to magnify far-away stars."
        To minimize means to reduce something to the lowest possible level. "I checked my homework twice to minimize errors I might have made."
        When something is minimal, it is very small. "My lazy husband does a minimal amount of work around the house."
        To diminish means to reduce or get smaller. "As the economy got worse, my savings diminished."
 		To lower something is to make it go down. "The chart shows how his production has lowered over the year."
B2/A2 reduce - уменьшать(ся), B1/B2 decrease, see also: minimize
        To reduce something means to make it less in size or number. "When the store reduced its prices, people wanted to shop there."
        To decrease something is to make it less than it was before. "Hiring more police officers has decreased crime in the city."
      reduce - выпаривать, загустевать (if you reduce a liquid or a liquid reduces, you boil it so that it becomes less in quantity: "Reduce the sauce by boiling for five minutes.", "Simmer until the liquid has reduced by about one third."), see also: condense
      reduction - уменьшение, B1/B2 decrease
TODO rise
C2/C1 ritual(ly), rite - ритуал, обряд, B1/B2 ceremony (ceremonial(ly) - церемониальный, ceremonious(ly) - церемонный), B1/B1 custom, B2/A2 tradition:
		A ritual is a formal custom that people do regularly. "Ken was very interested to learn about the religious rituals of the natives."
        A rite is a traditional ceremony carried out by a particular group or society. "Special masks are worn during the rite when a new baby is born."
        A ceremony is an event that happens on special occasions. "Tom and Amy’s marriage ceremony is in June."
		A custom is a way of doing things that has been the same for a long time. "It is a custom that the bride and groom have the first dance."
		A tradition is something people have been doing for a long time. "Marriage is a tradition all over the world."
C2/-- roar, bellow, growl - рычать, snarl - рычать, реветь и тд, howl - выть, see also: grumble: To growl means to make a deep, angry sound. "The dog started to growl at the man walking by."
																			  					 To howl means to make a long, loud sound like a wolf or a dog. "The wolf howled at the moon."
C2/B2 rob(bery), A2/A2 steal, B2/-- burgle; B2/B2 theft (B1/A2 thief - вор, thieve - to steal things: "They often get into fights and thieve."), larceny (law), larcenous (law), pilfer - тырить (понемногу), lift (informal):
        To rob a person or place is to take their property by using force. "A thief has robbed me of my passport."
        To steal is to take something that is not yours. "The men tried to steal money from the bank."
        A theft is a criminal act that involves someone stealing something. "The theft of his TV took place when he was at work."
        A thief is someone who quietly takes things that do not belong to them. "A thief broke into our home and took my mother's jewelry."
--/C1 robust, sturdy, see also: firm
C2/C1 rock - покачивать(ся), качнуть, укачать (rock the boat (informal) - раскачивать лодку), see also: shake, B2/-- tremble, B2/-- shiver - дрож(ь|ать), трястись, quiver, tremor, vibrate, quake, shudder; C2/-- fluctuate (колебаться), oscillate, hover (колебаться; маячить; висеть в воздухе, как колибри, пчела и тд), flap - трепыхать, хлопать, flutter, (of the heart) palpitate, wobble - колебать(ся), трясти(сь), шатать(ся); sharp wobble - резкое колебание; wiggle (wiggly), waggle, wriggle, jiggle, joggle - покачиваться, раскачиваться и т.д., totter, lurch, sway - качать(ся), колебать(ся), see also: wave, fit, swing, wax and wane:
        To tremble is to shake as a result of cold weather. "Harry was not used to the cold, so he trembled most of the day."
        A shiver is a shaking movement the body makes when someone is cold or scared. "I got shivers on my way home because it was so cold."
        To quiver means to tremble or shake. "The flame on the candle quivered whenever someone opened or closed a door."
        To vibrate is to shake very hard. "The machine made his whole body vibrate as he broke up the ground."
        To fluctuate means to rise and fall in number or amount. "Prices for gasoline have been fluctuating all month."
        To sway is to move slowly from side to side. "She swayed while she listened to the music."
        To flap means to move quickly up and down or from side to side. "The tiny bird flapped its wings and ate from the flowers."
--/C1 rock - потрясти, see also: shock, stun
      rock - тряхнуть, сотрясти (rock/shake the foundations of sth | rock/shake sth to its foundations), see also: shake, undermine
B1/A2 rock - камень (US, stone (UK), boulder - валун: A rock is a hard thing in the dirt. "I stacked rocks on top of one another."
B1/A2 rock - скала, B1/B2 cliff - утёс, mountain - гора, A2/A2 hill, precipice (обрыв)
        A cliff is a high and often flat wall of rock. "The wolf stood at the cliff and howled."
		A hill is a round area of land. It is higher than the land around it. "The sun was rising above the green hills."
TODO rock
C2/B1 roll - закатить глаза: "Her eyes rolled.", "When he suggested they should buy a new car, she rolled her eyes in disbelief."
B1/B1 roll - крутить(ся): "He was rolling a pencil between his fingers.", "The dog rolled over onto its back."
B2/B2 roll - катить(ся): To roll is to move by turning over and over. "You must roll the ball into the pins when you bowl.", "Tanks rolled triumphantly into the city.", "Tears rolled down her cheeks.", "Mist was rolling in from the sea.", "A wave of cigarette smoke rolled towards me."
--/B2 roll - бросить игральную кость (to throw dice in a game): "Each player rolls their dice.", "Roll a six to start."
B1/-- roll - скрутить(ся), скатать(ся), свернуть(ся), furl, see also: fold / unroll, unfurl, see also: unfold: "I rolled the string into a ball.", "We rolled up the carpet.", "The hedgehog rolled (up) into a ball."
      roll - раскатать (to make something smooth and flat): "When you have rolled (out) the pastry, place it in a pie dish."
      roll - функционировать (If a machine is rolling, it is operating), see also: function: "Just as the television cameras started rolling, it began to pour down with rain."
B2/B2 roll - рулон, see also: bolt
B1/-- roll - рулет: "a chicken/cheese, etc. roll (= filled with chicken/cheese, etc.)",  "Would you like a roll and butter with your soup?"
      roll - жировая складка: "Rolls of fat hung over his belt."
      roll - список (an official list of names), see also: register
      roll - крен, TODO pitch - тангаж
      roll - кувыркание: "The kittens were enjoying a roll in the sunshine.", "The dog went for a roll in the grass."
      roll - сальто: "a forward/backward roll", "He did a forward roll to celebrate his goal."
      roll - грохот: "a drum roll" - барабанная дробь, "a deafening roll of thunder" - оглушающий раскат грома, see also: clap, rumble, whirr
C2/B1 romantic: When something is romantic, it has to do with love. "The young couple went to see a romantic movie."
C2/-- rot(ten), B2/-- decay(ed), spoil, decompose, degrade, moulder (US: molder): When something rots, it slowly gets softer and is destroyed. "The old log began to rot in the forest."
                                                                              	  To decay is to be destroyed naturally. "The old wooden house was slowly decaying."
                                                                                  If something spoils, it turns bad or rots. "We left the fruit out too long, and it spoiled."
B1/B2 rough(ly) - not exact or detailed, B2/B1 approximate(ly), A1/A1 about, A2/A1 around, { almost, nearly }, C2 in the region of = approximately:
        approximate means to be close to an exact amount, number or time. "My approximate height is two meters."
B1/B1 rough(ly) - not smooth, coarse, rugged; jagged - зазубренный: When something is rough, it is not even or smooth. "The rough ground hurt my feet."
                                                                    If something is coarse, that means it has a rough texture. "The coarse sweater made my skin itch"
                                                                    If an area of land is rugged, then it is rocky and difficult to travel through. "Their car couldn’t make it far along the rugged roads."
                                                                    When something is jagged, it has a tough, uneven shape or edge. "The swimmer was hurt when he fell on the jagged rocks."
B2/B2 B2/-- rough(ly) - violent, coarse
B2/-- rough(ly) - difficult and unpleasant, C2/B2 tough(ness, en), C2/C1 harsh(ly, ness), C2/B2 severe(ly, -ity), austere, inclement ((of the weather) not pleasant; cold, wet, etc.)
        If something is tough, it is difficult. "The man passed his driving test even though it was very tough."
        When something is harsh, it is very unpleasant. "The desert can be a very harsh environment."
B2/B2 B2/-- rough(ly) - stormy (of sea or weather): stormy describes something affected or characterized by storms. "The golfers decided to go home because of the stormy weather."
TODO rough, severe, stern etc.
C2/B2 routine, B2/B2 procedure, B2/A2 process: A routine is a way of doing things that is the same every time. "My father's daily routine includes shaving right before breakfast."
                                               A process is the steps to take to do something (A series of steps leading to a result). "Making a cake is a long process."
C2/B1 rule, C2/B2 command (see also: ordain), B2/B2 govern, B1/A2 control, C1/B2 regulate, B2/C1 supervise, --/C1 oversee, B1/A2 manage (managerial(ly) - управленческий), superintend(ent) (formal), chair - возглавлять, председательствовать, see also: monitor, administer:
        To command someone is to tell them to do something. "The general commanded his army to attack."
        To govern is to control the public business of a country, state, or city. "The United States is governed from the White House."
        To control something is to make it do what you want. "To control the TV, just push the buttons"
        To regulate something is to control how it happens. "The bank regulates how much money people can borrow from it."
        To supervise something means to make sure that it is done correctly. "Allen supervised the construction workers to ensure everyone’s safety."
        To oversee something means to make sure that it is being done properly. "His job was to oversee the progress of the construction project."
        To manage something means to control or be in charge of it. "I had to manage the meeting myself."
        A superintendent is a person who runs a certain department or building. "The superintendent decided to close the schools because of the weather."
        managerial describes something related to a manager or management. "Nancy has a managerial position at the bank."
--/C1 rumour (US rumor), B2/-- gossip: A rumor is a story that may not be true. "Carla was spreading rumors around the office."
                                       A rumor is something people talk about even though it may not be true. "Kevin was spreading rumors about Marcia to everyone."
                                       gossip is information that might be untrue but is still discussed anyway. "The friends exchanged gossip about the people they knew in school."
C1/-- runway - взлётно-посадочна полоса: "The plane taxied along the runway.", airstrip, landing strip
      runway - подиум (especially US), catwalk
C2/-- ruthless(ly, ness), pitiless(ly, ness), remorseless(ly)
B2/C1 sake: The sake of something is the reason for doing it. "The parents worked hard for their children’s sake."
C1/C1 sack - мешок; пакет, A2/-- wallet, A2/-- purse, A2/-- handbag, pouch: A wallet is a thing that holds money and fits in a pocket. "I keep my money in a wallet."
                                                 							A purse is a bag where women keep money, makeup and keys. "My sister likes to buy designer purses."
                                                 							A pouch is a small, flexible bag that is usually made of cloth. "I keep my money in a small pouch."
TODO sack
C2/C1 sacred - (религия) священный, сакральный, consecrate(d) - освятить (render holy by means of religious rites: "The building was consecrated as a Protestant Episcopal church in May, 1814"), consecration - освящение, see also: sanctuary:
		If something is sacred, then it is worshipped and respected. "One religion in India will not harm cows because it believes that they are sacred."
C2/C1 sacred - (важность) священный, sacrosanct - "например, выходные - это святое", inviolable (formal) - неприкосновенный, нерушимый
C1/A2 safe(ness), B2/B1 safety, B2/B2 secure(ly): When a person is safe, they are not in danger. "Put on your seat belt in the car to be safe."
											  	  safety means to be the condition of being safe and free from danger. "For his own safety, he was placed in a car seat."
C2/B1 sail - парус, mast - мачта, spire - шпиль, steeple - шпиль, колокольня: A mast is a long pole on a ship that holds the sail. "The mast held both sails of the ship upright."
--/B1 sail - прогулка под парусом
??/?? sail - плыть под парусами: To sail is to move a boat on the water. "I love to sail my boat on the lake."
TODO sail
B1/B1 sailor, seaman, mariner (old-fashioned or literary), seafarer (old-fashioned or literary) - мореплаватель?, sea dog (literary or humorous) - морской волк:
		A mariner is a sailor. "The old mariner used his telescope to find the shore."
C2/C1 sanction (formal) - санкция (an official order that limits trade, contact, etc. with a particular country, in order to make it do something, such as obeying international law)
      sanction (formal) - санкция (official permission or approval for an action or a change), ratify - ратифицировать (approve and express assent, responsibility, or obligation: "Company officials at Safeway said those replacement workers will remain on standby until the agreement is ratified by union members"), see also: consent
B2/-- scar (physical): A scar is a mark on the skin after a wound heals. "The monster had horrible scars on his cheek and forehead."
C2/-- scar (mental), imprint: An imprint is an effect or lesson from an experience that is hard to forget. "The experience of war left an imprint on his mind that troubled him."
C2/-- scarcely, B2/B1 hardly, B2/B2 barely: If something hardly happens, it almost does not happen at all. "I hardly saw the concert since I had to leave early."
                                            barely means by the smallest amount, almost not. "I barely had enough money to pay for my bus ticket."
C2/C1 scatter(ed), dissipate(d)
C2/B2 scenario - план действий, вариант развития событий (worst-case scenario), see also: prospect
B1/A2 scene - сцена (из фильма, книги), see also: episode: A scene is one part of a book or movie. "A scene is one part of a book or movie."
B2/A2 scene - сцена (вид), see also: spectacle
B2/A2 scene - место (происшествия, преступления и т.д.)
C2/-- scene - сцена (скандал, истерика), tantrum - истерика, outburst - вспышка, всплеск (эмоций / активности или явления), flare-up - вспышка (эмоций или боли), throw a fit/tantrum - закатить истерику, придти в ярость, see also: fuss:
        An outburst is a sudden, strong expression of an emotion. "There was an outburst of cheers when the comedian took the stage."
C1/B2 scholar, B1/A1 scientist: A scholar is a person who studies something and knows much about it. "The scholar knew much about art history."
C1/B2 scholarship: A scholarship is money given to one so they can go to school. "I got a scholarship to help me pay for university."
C2/C1 scope - возможности, B2/B2 potential (see also ability), promise; B1/B1 possibility, B1/A2 opportunity, B2/A2 chance; contingency, eventuality:
		An opportunity is a chance to do something. "I had an opportunity to take pictures in the jungle."
		A chance is an opportunity to do something. "I had a chance to see the Roman Coliseum last summer."
C2/C1 scope - рамки, охват, see also: bounds:
        The scope of something is how many people or things it relates to. "Modern history has a wide scope."
C2/-- scramble - лезть, карабкаться, взбираться, B2/B1 climb, clamber, shin, ascend, see also: scale, mount:
		To scramble is to move somewhere quickly and desperately. "The hikers scrambled down the side of the hill."
		To climb means to use your hands and feet to go up on something. "The girls climbed to the top of the mountain."
      scramble - подъём, перевал
      scramble (for sth / to do sth) - бороться, соревноваться, прорываться (через толпу и т.д.), see also: contend
      scramble - борьба, толкотня, давка, free-for-all - замес, потасовка, scuffle, brawlbrawl, scuffle - небольшая потасовка, see also: combat, scrap, fray
      scramble - втащить (to manage to achieve something with difficulty, or in a hurry, without much control), contrive - смочь, умудриться, see also: win, accomplish: "Salah managed to scramble the ball into the net."
	  scramble - смешивать, путать, see also: mix "He had a habit of scrambling his words when excited."
	  scramble (sth) = take off "A helicopter was scrambled to help rescue three young climbers."
C2/-- scrap - отменить, отказаться, пересмотреть, B1/B2 cancel, see also: reverse, abolish, overturn, withdraw:
		To cancel means to decide that an event or a request will not happen. "She canceled the rest of her plans because of the rain."
С2/-- scrap - избавиться, списать, утилизировать, see also: dispose of sb/sth, ditch
C2/-- scrap - металлолом: "scrap iron/metal", "We sold our old car for scrap."
C2/-- scrap - клочок, обрывок, bit, see also: dice, chip, slip: A scrap of something is a small amount of it. "Chris liked to use many scraps of paper when thinking up ideas."
        A bit is a small amount of something. "I ate a bit of chocolate before I went to bed."
      scrap (informal) - бороться; потасовка, see also: combat, scramble, fray
C2/-- script - алфавит, B1/-- alphabet
B2/B1 script - сценарий: A script is the words of a film or play. "He read the script of the play three times."
      script - рукописный текст (особенно красивый), see also: manuscript - рукопись: "The invitation was written in beautiful italic script.", "She admired his neat script."
      script - написать сценарий: "He scripted the TV series "Homicide".", "He's a very good actor, but the part was scripted for an older person.", "The series was scripted to appeal to an international audience."
      scripted - написанный заранее / unscripted, see also: spontaneous - ​(of a speech, broadcast, etc.) not written or prepared in detail in advance: "He read from a scripted speech and refused to answer any questions at all at the end of it."
      scripture - священный текст, писания
C2/C1 scrutiny (scrutinise), C1/C1 inspect, C2/B1 scan, C2/B1 examine, C1/B2 survey, peruse (formal or humorous), see also: observe, poll, C1/-- check sth out (informal), A2/A2 check (EXAMINE), B1/A2 research, B2/B2 explore - исследовать, изучать, B2/B1 analyse (US analyze), see also: dissect:
        scrutiny is the careful examination of something. "A scientist should always practice scrutiny with their work."
        To inspect is to look at something carefully. "The mechanic inspected our car to see if it had any problems."
        To scan something is to look at it very carefully. "You must scan each person closely."
        To examine something is to look at it carefully. "The doctor examined my eyes today."
        To analyze something is to study it. "The scientist will analyze the blood sample."
		research is close and careful study to discover new things. "Scientists did a lot of research on the subject of blood type."
C2/B2 skull, B2/-- skeleton, skeletal, B1/A2 bone: A skull is the hard part of your head. Your brain is inside of it. "The brain is protected by the skull."
                                    			   A skeleton is the bones of a body. "There is a skeleton in the science classroom."
                                       			   When something is skeletal, it relates to bones in the body. "We studied the skeletal system in anatomy class."
                                       			   A bone is a hard part of the body. "I brought home a nice bone for my dog."
C2/C1 seal
      seizure - изъятие, конфискация
      seizure - захват (the act of using force to take control of a country, town, power, etc.)
      seizure - приступ, припадок, cramp - судорога: A seizure is sudden illness in which the body loses control and shakes. "Bright flashing lights can cause seizures in children."
										  			 A cramp is a strong pain caused by a muscle after a lot of physical use. "After the marathon, Jenny got a terrible cramp in her calf muscle."
C1/A1 secretary: A secretary is a person who works in an office. "Rebecca asked her secretary to type a report."
C2/-- sedentary - малоподвижный (a sedentary job/occupation/lifestyle, "He became increasingly sedentary in later life."), see also: inactive
--/C1 senator (senate), A2/B1 president, B2/B2 minister, B2/B2 mayor, B1/A2 officer, sheriff, ranger, sergeant, lieutenant, B2/B1 captain, colonel, admiral:
        A senator is someone who makes laws for a state. "The young senator promised to make laws that would help the people."
        A president is the leader of a country. "The president of our country made an important announcement."
        A senate is a part of the government in some countries. "Everybody liked Caroline and chose her to speak for them in the senate."
        A minister is an important person in government with many duties. "The minister of education controls the country's schools."
        The mayor is the person in charge of a city. "The mayor of my hometown is quite a powerful speaker."
        An officer is a leader in the army. "The soldiers followed the orders of the officer."
        A sheriff is a police officer who is in charge of a large area. "It was the sheriff's job to make the city safe."
        A ranger is a person who protects the forest or parks. "Peter wanted to be a ranger because he liked spending time outside."
        A sergeant is a soldier or police officer of middle rank. "He was promoted to sergeant after a year in the army."
        A lieutenant is a rank in the military or police, or a person with that rank. "The lieutenant was a good leader, and his soldiers respected him."
		A captain is the person who leads a ship or airplane. "The captain sailed his ship to Australia."
        A colonel is a military officer. "James has been given a promotion in the army. He is now a colonel."
        An admiral is someone who controls many military ships. "They won the sea battle because of the admiral's great leadership."
TODO send, post, dispatch - send away towards a designated goal: "More than one assassin was dispatched by the Turkish authorities to murder Napoleon."
C2/C1 sentiment, C2/B2 sense (see also: feel), B2/C1 sensation, B2/A1 feeling, sensory (see also: moving):
		To sense something is to know about it without being told. "I could sense that he was watching me."
		Your senses are how you see, taste, hear, feel and smell. "It would be hard to live without your five senses."
        A sentiment is an opinion based on your feelings. "Tess told everyone at the table her sentiments about eating meat."
        A sensation is a feeling a person gets from their senses. "Mom got a painful sensation in her head from the loud noise."
        If something is sensory, it is related to the senses. "Iris and Eric preferred the sensory thrill of watching movies in the theater."
C2/-- sentimental - сентиментальный
      sentimental (disapproving) - слезливый, mawkish, maudlin, see also: slushy
C2/B2 sequence - последовательность, --/C1 succession, batch: A sequence is a number of events or things that come one after another. "The dominos fell in a sequence of one after another."
													          A succession is a number of things that follow one afterthe other. "The student said the letters of the alphabet in succession."
      sequence - устанавливать последовательность, B2/A2 arrange, B2/A2 organize, orchestrate(-ion), marshal - построить, see also see also: dispose, classify, see also: mount:
        To arrange things is to put them in the right place. "Please arrange the bowling pins in order so we can play."
        To organize is to plan or get ready for an event. "Make a list to help you organize the things you need."
        To marshal a group means to assemble them in order. "The students were marshaled outside and put into groups."
      sequence - эпизод (фильма), B2/B1 episode, see also: scene
C2/-- serenity - спокойствие, безмятежность (the quality of being calm and peaceful): "I admired her serenity in the midst of so much chaos.", "The hotel offers a tranquil haven of peace and serenity, away from the bustle of the city.")
C2/-- serene(ly) - спокойный, безмятежный (peaceful and calm; worried by nothing: "a lake, still and serene in the sunlight", "She has a lovely serene face."), see also: idyllic
C1/-- serial - сериал
      serial - многосерийный (фильм, передача и т.д.)
C1/C1 serial - серийный (преступник)
      serial - последовательный, C2/C1 successive, C2/C1 consecutive, sequential (formal): When things are consecutive, they happen one after another without interruption. "The king ruled for ten consecutive years."
C1/B2 serve - служить (в организации, армии и т.д.)
A2/A2 serve - обслуживать, подавать (еду, напитки): To serve someone is to give them food or drinks. "He served us our drinks quickly."
TODO serve
C1/-- set - готов(ый)
C2/-- set - одно и то же, застывший, установленный, предопределённый (always the same, never changing: "a set smile", "His face took on a set expression.", "My parents say I have to be home by a set time.")
B2/B2 set - расположить, установить, поставить, бросить и т.д.: To set something is to put it somewhere. "Please set the dice down on the table."
TODO set
B2/B2 settle(r), B1/A2 solve, C2/B2 overcome, B2/B2 cope, B1/B1 manage, mend, see also: resolve: To settle a problem means to end it by finding a solution. "It took three of our best executives all day to settle the problem."
                                                                                                 To solve something is to find an answer to it. "All the students could easily solve the math problem."
                                                                                                 To overcome a problem is to successfully fix it. "She overcame her shyness and spoke in front of the class."
                                                                                                 To cope with a difficult or stressful situation means to deal with it. "He copes with work stress by exercising three or four times a week."
C2/-- settle, C1/C1 compensate, C1/-- refund, B2/-- repay - выплатить, C2/-- offset (see also: nullify), reimburse(ment) - formal: возмещать (компенсация), indemnify (indemnification, indemnity)
        To compensate is to pay someone for the time they spent doing something. "Her boss compensated her for the extra work she did last week."
        A refund is money given back to a person when an item is returned to a store. "I asked for a refund because the shoes I bought were too tight."
        To offset means to use one thing to cancel out the effect of another thing. "Increased wages are offset by higher prices for goods."
TODO  settle, settlement
C2/C1 settlement - соглашение, урегулирование (an official agreement that ends an argument between two people or groups): "the settlement of a dispute"
C2/C1 settlement - поселение (a place where people have come to live and make their homes)
      settlement - заселение (the process of people making their homes in a place): "the settlement of the American West"
      settlement - проседание здания, грунта (the process of the slow sinking of a building or the ground)
C2/B2 severe(ly, -ity), --/C1 acute(ly, ness), B2/B1 serious(ly, ness), dire, in earnest, see also: grave:
		When something is dire, it is terrible and very serious. The tornado created a dire situation for the small town.
        When something is serious, it is bad or unsafe. "The accident was very serious."
C2/-- severity - тяжесть, серьёзность (the fact or condition of something being extremely bad or serious: "the severity of the problem", "A prison sentence should match the severity of the crime.", "The chances of a full recovery will depend on the severity of her injuries."), see also: gravity, seriousness:
TODO severity
C1/B1 sex, B2/B2 gender: gender is a category that describes being either a boy or a girl. "Do you know the gender of her new baby?"
C2/-- shabby(-ily, ness), scruffy(-ily, informal), shoddy(-ily,-iness), ragged, threadbare - затасканный, поношенный, decrepit - ветхий, дряхлый (see also: frail), dilapidated - обветшалый, ramshackle - ветхий, tumbledown - рассыпающийся на глазах, rickety - шаткий, ненадёжный (also precarious?), derelict - заброшенный:
        If something is ragged, then it is old, torn, and falling apart. "They could see his toes through the holes in his ragged shoes."
        When a building is dilapidated, it is old and in bad condition. "Paint peeled off of the old dilapidated apartment building."
C2/B2 shade, shady; B1/B2 shadow: The shade is a dark area that something makes when it blocks the sun. "It was hot outside, so the boy sat in the shade of a tree."
                                  A shadow is the dark area that is made when something blocks light. "The man's shadow was taller than he was."
B2/B2 shade - оттенок (a type or degree of a colour): "a subtle/delicate shade of grey", "The room has been decorated in pastel shades (= soft and light colours) throughout."
      shade - оттенок (a different kind or level of opinion, feeling, etc.), see also: aspect, subtlety, the ins and outs, the nuts and bolts (of sth): "politicians of all shades of opinion", "reformers of all political shades", "The word has many shades of meaning."
TODO shade
C2/B1 shake - трясти, see also: rock
        To shake is to move back and forth or up and down quickly. "When people shake hands, it usually means they agree."
      shake sb <-> up - потрясти (to upset someone): "It really shook Gerry up when his best friend moved away."
      shake sth <-> up - перетряхнуть, встряхнуть как следует (to make important changes in an organization, a profession, etc. in order to make it more efficient): "The whole industry needs shaking up.", "He’s running for senator as an outsider who will shake things up."
      shake-up - перетряска, встряска (a large change in the way something is organized): "a management shake-up", "Union leaders are calling for a major shake-up of the system.", "The company is undergoing a radical shake-up.", "The arrival of the new baby caused a thorough shake-up of their family life."
TODO shake
C2/B2 shallow(ly, ness): If something is shallow, it is not deep. "The kids were playing in the shallow water."
C1/C1 shed, B1/B2 spill, C2/C1 scatter, C2/-- sprinkle - посыпать, побрызгать, C2/-- splash, B2/-- spray - распылять, drizzle - сбрызнуть, слегка полить, see also: splatter, see also tip:
		To spill is to have something fall out of its container. "I spilled the coffee on the table."
        To scatter something is to make it go in many places. "I accidentally scattered all of my pills."
        To sprinkle means to scatter something all over something else. "He sprinkled the pasta with salt and black pepper."
        When a liquid splashes, it bursts and hits something. "Some green paint splashed upon the floor."
C1/C1 shed - сарай, C2/-- barn, C2/B2 stable, stall - стойло: A shed is a small building where you store things like tools. "We have a small shed in the backyard for storage."
C2/C1 sheer, C2/B2 extreme(ly) (see also: abrupt), C2/C1 profound, C2/-- tiresome (mainly UK), C2/-- strenuous, C2/A2 dry, C1/-- tedious (see also: mundane), C1/B2 dull, lame​ (not interesting or fun), tame (informal), C1/-- monotonous(ly), C1/-- repetitive, B1/-- uninteresting, wearisome (formal), see also: weary, irksome (formal), A1/A1 hard, A1/A1 boring, drab, dowdy, dreary, arduous, backbreaking, punishing, gruelling (US grueling), laborious, see also: burdensome, demanding, see also: impersonal, tiring, heavy lifting
        If something is extreme, it is in a large amount or degree. "His workout was so extreme that he was sweating heavily."
        When something is arduous, it demands great effort or labor. "The explorers began their arduous hike up the steep mountain."
        When something is grueling, it is very hard to do. "The climber faced the grueling task of reaching the top of the steep mountain."
        When something is tedious, it is long, frustrating, and boring. "His job involved a lot of tedious typing, filing, and organizing."
        If something is dull, it is not exciting. "The movie was very dull. I fell asleep watching it."
        If something is dreary, then it is dull, dark, and lifeless. "After the fire, this section of forest is rather dreary."
        When something is repetitive, it is repeated many times and becomes boring. "Working on an assembly line making cars every day is a repetitive job."
        If something is boring, it is not fun. "I think the Internet is boring."
C1/B2 shift: To shift to something is to move into a new place or direction. "He shifted to the other side of the table to eat his breakfast."
C2/B2 shock, see also rock, stun: To shock people is to surprise them. "The man was shocked by the news."
B1/B2 shocking, C2/-- devastating
C2/B1 shoot (v) - стрелять, cull - отстреливать: To shoot is to fire something like a bullet at someone or something. "The hunter raised his gun to shoot at the target."
--/C1 shoot (n) - росток, побег, bud - почка, росток, давать ростки, sprout - побег, росток, давать побеги, прорастать; bloom, blossom; floret "broccoli/cauliflower florets", see also: bulb:
        When a plant blooms, it makes flowers. "Roses look so pretty when they bloom."
        A blossom is a flower or group of flowers. "There were colorful blossoms in the yard."
        A bud is a part of a plant that turns into a flower or a leaf. "Two weeks after planting the seed, a small bud appeared."
C2/-- short-sighted(ness) (US nearsighted(ness)) - близорукий / long-sighted(ness) (US far-sighted) - дальнозоркий
C2/-- short-sighted(ness) (disapproving) - недальновидный / long-sighted(ness) (US far-sighted) - дальновидный
C1/-- shorten, B2/A1 short, B2/B2 shortly: If something will happen shortly, it will happen very soon. "My workday will end shortly."
B2/C1 shrink (see also reduce, contract), shrivel - усохнуть, сморщиться / C2/-- swell, inflate, bloat:
		To shrink means to get smaller. "If you stick to a healthy diet, your stomach will shrink!"
        To swell is to become larger and rounder. "My sister's stomach began to swell after she got pregnant."
        To inflate something means to fill it up with air. "I helped him inflate the balloons."
B2/C1 shrink, cower (see also: crouch) - съёжиться, сжаться, recoil - отпрянуть, отпрыгнуть; отказаться, pull back/away; B2/-- coward: A coward is a person who lacks courage to do risky or dangerous things. "A firefighter cannot be a coward. They have to be able to act quickly."
С2/С1 shrug - пожимать плечами
C2/B2 sibling, B1/A2 twin: A sibling is a brother or sister. "Jane has two siblings, an older brother and a younger sister."
						   twins are two children born at the same time. "My sister and I are twins. We look exactly the same."
B2/C1 sigh, B1/B1 breath, B1/B1 breathe, inhale / exhale, see also: expire: To sigh is to breathe out loudly and show that you are tired or sad. "Molly sighed when she looked at all the information she had to research."
                                                                            A breath is the air that goes into and out of one's lungs. "You can't take a breath under water."
                                                                            To breathe means to let air go in and out of our body. "We need strong healthy lungs to help us breathe well."
                                                                            To inhale means to take air or a smell into the lungs. "The camper inhaled the cool and fresh mountain air and felt relaxed."
C2/B1 signal, see also: cue, allusion, implication: A signal is a sound or action that tells someone to do something. "The coach blew his whistle as a signal to begin the game."
B1/C1 signature - подпись, autograph: A signature is your name that you have written in your own way. "I put my signature at the end of the letter."
                                      An autograph is the written name of a famous person. "Everybody wanted the movie star’s autograph."
--/C1 signature - стиль, признак, see also: attribute, strain
--/C1 simulate, duplicate, replicate: To simulate something means to copy its actions or characteristics. "The French language teacher could simulate the accent of a French citizen."
                                      To duplicate something means to copy it. "She duplicated her friend’s movements like she was in front of a mirror."
                                      To replicate something is to do it in the exact same way as someone before. "I would love to replicate my father’s achievements in school."
      simulate - симулировать (притворяться), feign, see also: pretend
C1/C1 simultaneous(ly, ness), concurrence(-y, concurrent(ly)), coincident(al(ly), -ce), C1 at once: at the same time. "They all started talking at once." "Don't all speak at once!" "I can't do two things at once."
        When something is simultaneous, it occurs at the same time as something else. "The movement of the gears inside the watch was simultaneous."
C2/-- sip - маленький глоток
C1/-- sip - потягивать, nurse ("He sat nursing his cup of coffee."): To sip something means to drink a small amount at a time. "Liza relaxed on the beach, sipping fruit juice through a straw."
C1/C1 skip, C1/-- omit (omission) - (у|о|про)пустить: To skip something is to not do it. "He skipped work to get more sleep.", see also: leave out
				An omission is something that has been left out or not done. "Mike was upset because of the omission of his name during the ceremony."
--/C1 slash, gash, slit
C1/-- sleepy, drowsy (drowsiness), see also: mellow
С2/B2 slip - поскользнуться, соскользнуть, C1/-- slippery (скользкий), slick: To slip means to slide and fall down. "The man slipped on the wet floor."
                                                                              If something is slippery, it is wet or smooth and causes people to slip. "The repairman fell down on the floor because it was too slippery."
B1/B2 slip - выскальзывать, соскальзывать, сползать (to slide out of position or out of your hand): "Her hat had slipped over one eye.", "He could feel the rope slipping out of his grasp."
C2/B2 slip - выскользнуть, ускользныть, улизнуть, проскользнуть, прокрасться, see also: creep, sneak: "She slipped out of the house before the others were awake.", "The ship slipped into the harbour at night."
      slip - освободиться (to get free from, leave, or escape something), give sb the slip: "The ship had slipped its moorings in the night.", "The dog slipped its collar.", "The animal had slipped free and escaped.", see also: escape
C2/B2 slip - (про)сунуть, вставить: "Anna slipped her hand into his.", "She slipped between the cool cotton sheets and was soon asleep.", "I managed to slip a few jokes into my speech.", "He slipped the ring onto her finger.", "They'd slipped some money to the guards."
--/B2 slip - ухудшиться (to fall to a lower level; to become worse), see also: worsen: "Productivity in the factory has slipped noticeably in the last year.", "The schedule has started to slip (= things are happening later than planned)."
      slip - надеть/снять (to slip into/out of a dress, slip something + adv./prep.): "to slip your shoes on/off", "He slipped a coat over his sweatshirt."
      slip - an act of slipping (sliding) or falling: "One slip meant a long tumble to the rocks below.", "One slip and you could fall to your death."
      slip - погрязнуть, впасть ( to pass into a particular state or situation, especially a difficult or unpleasant one): "He began to slip into debt.", "The patient had slipped into a coma."
      slip - оплошность, оговорка, неточность (a small mistake, usually made by being careless or not paying attention), faux pas - оплошность (an action or a remark that causes sb to feel embarrassed because it is not socially correct: "I made some remark about his wife's family, and then realized I'd made a serious faux pas.", "I committed a faux pas that my friends have never let me forget."), gaffe - оплошность (a remark or action that is a social mistake and not considered polite: "I made a real gaffe - I called his new wife "Judy", which is the name of his ex-wife.", "You started eating before anyone else had been served? What a gaffe!", "Most people will politely look the other way if you commit some social gaffe.", "He made some real gaffes early in his career."), see also: a slip of the pen/tongue: "Freudian slip", "He recited the whole poem without making a single slip."
      slip - листок бумаги, бланк (​a small piece of paper, especially one for writing on or with something printed on it), see also: scrap: "I wrote it down on a slip of paper.", "If you want to order a book fill out the green slip."
      slip - элемент женского нижнего белья (​a piece of women’s underwear like a thin dress or skirt, worn under a dress)
C2/B1 slow, B1/B2 delay, retard
C2/B1 smooth: If something is smooth, it has no bumps. "The baby's skin felt very smooth."
TODO smoothly
C2/C1 snap - вспылить, огрызнаться
C2/C1 snap - сломать, B2/C1 smash (разбить вдребезги), A2/A1 break, --/C1 breach (прорвать(ся), проломить(ся)), B2/B2 crack (сломать(ся), треснуть), fracture (сломать(ся), треснуть), chap - трескаться:
        To snap something means to break it suddenly, which causes a loud noise. "I took the stick and snapped it with my hands."
C2/-- snap (shut) - защёлкнуть(ся), nip (ущипнуть, цапнуть, сдавить), see also: pinch
      snap - фоткать (щёлкать фотоаппаратом)
      snap - клацать зубами (о животных), пытаться укусить
C2/-- sniff
B2/C1 soak - (за/вы)мачивать, пропитывать, отмокать, saturate(d): To soak something means to make it very wet. "You need to soak these beans overnight before you cook them."
                                                                  To saturate something means to completely soak it with a liquid. "The sponge was saturated with soapy water and dripped all over the floor."
                                                                  If something is saturated, it is completely wet. "Leigh’s hair became saturated in the rain storm."
C1/C1 soak - (про/на)мочить, drench, wet
C1/-- soak - впитаться, пропитать, просочиться
C2/C1 soar - достигать (высоких значений), B2/B1 reach
C2/C1 soar - взлететь, skyrocket, shoot up (informal)
C2/C1 soar - повышаться (быстро увеличиваться)
--/C1 soar - парить, glide: To soar means to fly high in the air. "As the sun rose, two eagles soared through the sky."
                            To glide means to fly on extended wings with little or no effort. "When the wind is blowing, birds can glide easily through the sky."
C2/C1 soaring
C2/-- sober - трезвый
      sober (sb) up - протрезветь (протрезвить)
C2/-- sober - спокойный серьёзный, see also: solemn, grave, serious: When something or someone is sober, they are serious and calm. "After the funeral, everybody felt very sober."
      sober - спокойные (тона): ​plain and not bright (of colours or clothes)
      sober (sb) - отрезвить, успокоить
      sobering - отрезвляющий (making you feel serious or think about serious matters: "a sobering effect/experience/thought", "Surviving a car accident is a sobering experience.", "It is sobering to realize that this is not a new problem.")
C1/C1 sole; B2/B2 single; lone, see also: solitary:
        "the sole surviving member of the family" "My sole reason for coming here was to see you." "This is the sole means of access to the building."
        "the sole owner" "She has sole responsibility for the project." "I have sole charge of both children all day." "We may have the opportunity to take over sole ownership of the company."
        When something is the sole thing, it is the only thing of a particular type. "His sole purpose in life was to help others."
        If someone or something is lone, they are the only one of that kind. "A lone man walked along the street."
        If something is single, then there is only one. "I have a single key in my hand."
C1/C1 solely (only, exclusively): only and not involving anyone or anything else. "She was motivated solely by self-interest." "Selection is based solely on merit." "He became solely responsible for the firm."
        "I bought it solely for that purpose." "It seems he's not solely to blame for the accident." "The product's success cannot be attributable solely to the ads."
C1/C1 solicitor (UK, AU) - адвокат; solicit(ation), C1/C1 attorney, B1/A2 lawyer: An attorney is one who gives others advice about the law. "The attorney appeared in front of the judge for me."
                                                                                  A lawyer works with the law and represents people in court. "The lawyer left the courthouse after the judge made her decision."
      solicitor (US) - продаван (a person whose job is to visit or phone people and try to sell them something)
      solicit(ation) - просить денег
      solicit(ation) - предлагать секс за деньги
C2/-- solitary - уединённый, одинокий (see also: lone), C2/-- secluded; seclude (see also: isolate), C1/B2 withdraw, C2/C1 withdrawal; reclusive - уединённый, затворнический, recluse - отшельник, hermit, anchorite (for religious reasons):
        If something is solitary, then it is lonely or the only one. "The only thing in the room was a solitary chair."
        If a place is secluded, it is far away from any other place. "There was a secluded bench in the park."
        To seclude someone means to keep them away from other people. "She was secluded on an island for over a year."
        A hermit is one who lives alone and does not spend time with others. "The hermit lived a simple life in a small cave in the forest."
C1/-- solitude - уединение, seclusion, C1/-- loneliness, B2/B2 privacy: solitude is the state of being totally alone. "John lives a life of solitude because he doesn’t get along well with people."
																		To have privacy is to be away from other people. "Please hang the sign on the door so we can have some privacy."
C1/B2 somewhat, B2/B2 somehow: somewhat means to some degreee, but not to a large degree. "James was somewhat upset when he had to move some boxes."
							   somehow means in a way or by some means which is not known. "He somehow had to find a way to reach the life preserver."
C2/-- soothing(ly), restful, B1/B1 relaxing, B1/B1 calm(ly, ness), equable / C1/-- restless, restive (formal):
        When something is soothing, it makes you calm or relaxed. "The soothing music helped the baby fall asleep."
        When someone is calm, they do not get excited or upset. "A nice warm bath makes me feel so calm."
B2/C1 sophisticated - прошаренный, умный: If someone is sophisticated, they know many things about the world. "Jake is one of the most sophisticated persons I’ve ever met."
B2/B2 sophisticated - сложный, C2/B2 complex (C2/C1 complexity, C1/-- complicate) / A2/A2 simple (C1/-- simplicity, see also: ease), C1/C1 facilitate, see also: straightforward:
        If something is complex, it has many small parts. It is hard to understand. "A jig-saw puzzle can be complex because it has so many pieces."
		To complicate something means to make it harder than necessary. "The bad weather complicated finishing the job quickly."
        The simplicity of something is the fact that it is easy to do or understand. "We were able to find the house thanks to the simplicity of the directions."
		To facilitate something is to make it easier. "To facilitate the meeting, Melissa used a simple computer program."
B2/A1 sound - звучать, раздаваться, resound, resonate, sonorous(ly) - звучный: To sound means to make a noise. "The alarm clock sounded and woke us all up."
--/C1 sound(ly) - разумный, C2/-- sane (sanity), B1/B1 sensible, B2/B2 reasonable, B2/B2 responsible, prudent (formal) - благоразумный, prudence, see also: discreet, see also: judicious / C2/-- unwise(ly), unsound, imprudent, insane (insanity), B1/B1 mad, see also: rash:
        If someone is sane, they can think in a normal way. "Oliver does not act like a sane person when he is angry."
        If someone is sensible, they make good decisions. "It was sensible for her to save some money each month."
		If a person is responsible, they do the right things. "I try to be responsible and save money."
		When someone is mad, they are angry. "Mother got mad when I didn't listen to her."
--/C1 sound(ly) - здравый / unsound
--/C1 sound(ly), B2/B2 thorough(ly, ness - доскональный), rigorous, meticulous (скрупулёзный, тщательный, scrupulous?, fastidious(ly, ness)?), see also: closely, utter(ly), complete(ly) etc., see also: hands down:
        If something is done soundly, then it is done in the best or most complete way. "The nearest opponent was ten meters behind. She won the race soundly."
        If something or someone is thorough, then they are complete in every way. "Tina did a thorough job of cleaning the stains out of the carpet."
      soundly - крепко (of sleep or physical punishment)
C1/A2 source
C1/-- sow - сеять, B2/A2 plant: To sow seeds means to plant them in the ground. "He always sows his garden seeds in the springtime."
A2/B2 spare, B1/B1 leisure, me time (informal) - личное время (time when a person who is normally very busy relaxes or does something they enjoy: "The spa is popular with women who want a bit of me-time.", "Me-time needs to be part of your regular routine.", "All mothers of young children should try to find some me time."): leisure is time when you do not have to do work. "Eve likes to listen to music in her leisure time."
C1/C1 spare, C1/C1 excess, C2/C1 surplus, C1/B2 excessive(ly), C2/-- superfluous(ly, ness, superfluity), C2/-- redundant, C1/B1 extra, C2/-- plethora (formal), profusion (formal), cornucopia (formal), inordinate, overdose, surfeit (formal), glut, oversupply, see also: richness, see also: undue; C2/C1 supplement(ary), --/C1 complement, harmonize, harmonious (see also: match, improve), augment:
        An excess is an amount of something that is more than needed or wanted. "Because it never got cold that winter, many stores had an excess of coats."
        A surplus is an extra amount of something. "The store sold their surplus items on sale."
        If something is extra, it is more than what is needed. "The squirrel had extra nuts for the winter."
        An overdose is an instance of taking or having too much of something. "John’s skin was burned from an overdose of sunshine."
        To supplement something is to add something else to it in a good way. "He supplements his diet with fresh fruits."
        To complement something or someone is to make them better. "The wool scarf complemented her lovely eyes."
        To harmonize means to make different things go well together. "The sweet and sour flavors of the dish harmonized well and tasted great."
C1/C1 spare - выделить (избыток): To spare something is to give it because you have more than you need. "I wanted to help him but I couldn't spare a tire."
C1/C1 spare - уделить (с трудом), C1/C1 sacrifice, A2/A1 share - поделиться: To share something is to give some of it to another person. "Jimmy shared his apple with me."
                                                                             To sacrifice something valuable is to give it up to get something else. "Her parents sacrificed a lot of money in order for her to go to college."
--/C1 spare - пощадить
--/C1 spare - избавить: "Spare me of the tears over this 'martyr'", see also: leave out
C1/C1 spare (no effort, expense, etc.), C2/C1 strive, C1/-- endeavor (UK endeavour, see also: venture, crucible), B2/B2 attempt (see also: bid, foray), C2/-- apply yourself, strain every nerve/sinew (to do sth), exert yourself, all out, all-out, full-scale - полномастштабный, крупномасштабный (TODO utter? extreme?):
        To strive is to struggle to achieve something. "People who strive to succeed often do."
        An endeavor is an attempt to do something, especially something new or original. "The company’s new advertising endeavor ended in a horrible failure."
        To attempt something is to try to do that thing. "I am attempting to learn English."
C2/C1 spouse: wife, husband; B1/B1 bride, B1/A2 marry, the newly-weds - молодожены, see also: groom: A spouse is the person to whom someone is married. "I live in a home with my spouse and our two children."
                                                 										             A bride is a woman who is getting married or has just gotten married. "The bride looked beautiful in her wedding dress."
                                                 										             A groom is a man who is going to be married. "The groom looked happy as he walked with his new wife."
																						             To marry is to legally become husband and wife. "Rose and Henry were married, and they lived happily."
C2/C1 stir - see also: blend
        To stir something means to mix it using something small, like a spoon. "Mom stirred the batter until it was smooth."
      stir sb <-> up - расшевелить (to encourage somebody to do something; to make somebody feel they must do something)
С2/-- stir sth <-> up - разжечь, see also: compel, provoke, precipitate, cause: "to stir up hatred", "to stir up a debate", "Whenever he's around, he always manages to stir up trouble."
С2/-- stir sth <-> up - разворошить (неприятные вопоминания), see also: invoke: "Going back there stirred up a lot of memories for her.", "The photographs stirred up some painful memories."
      stir sth <-> up - поднять пыль и т.д. (to cause a substance such as soil or dust to move and rise up): "The helicopter stirred up clouds of dust."
TODO привязать сюда (re)invigorate (see also: revive), elate, overjoy, ..., liven up | liven sb/sth up
TODO stir
TODO stirring - волнующий, see also: moving
B2/C1 strain - нагрузка, напряжение, давление, --/C1 tension (B2/-- tense), see also: pressure: If someone is tense, they are worried something bad might happen. "After the phone call, Monica was very tense."
B2/C1 strain - стресс, напряжение (психологическое), B2/B2 tension, exertion (see also: anxiety, distress etc): exertion - use of physical or mental energy; hard work. "One day overcome by exertion, she fainted in the street."
B2/-- strain - напрягать(ся), тужится, тянусь/толкать изо всех сил: To strain is to try very hard. "Casey strained to lift the heavy box."; "creak under the strain" - скрипеть от напряжения: ​if a system or service creaks under the strain, it cannot deal effectively with all the things it is expected to do or provide.
C2/-- strain - напрячь до предела, проверить на прочность
B2/-- strain - натрудить, перенапрячь, надорвать, потянуть, sprain - вывихнуть, подвернуть, see also: pull
C2/C1 strain - растяжение (травма)
      strain - процеживать, sieve - просеивать, see also: sift
      strain - штамм, culture - культура (клеток, бактерий и т.д.)
      strain - черта, признак, streak - черта, C2/B2 characteristic, C2/B2 trait, B2/B1 feature,, B2/B1 element, property, hallmark, facility (a special feature of a machine, service, etc.); foible, idiosyncrasy, eccentricity, see also: signature, attribute:
        A characteristic is something that shows what a person or a thing is like. "One characteristic of tigers is their black stripes."
        A trait is part of someone's personality. "One trait of Salvador's personality is his cheerfulness."
        A feature is an important part of something. "The cell phone has many features."
        An attribute is a characteristic of a person or thing. "He isn’t very clever, but he does have some other positive attributes."
        An element of something is a particular part of it. "Tackling an opponent is Johnny's favorite element of American football."
        A hallmark is a unique characteristic of something. "Different types of pasta and tomato sauces are hallmarks of Italian food."
      strain - нотка, мелодия, звук: "I could hear the strains of Mozart in the background.", "She could hear the strains of Mozart through the window.", "He heard the familiar strains of a tango coming from the club."
C2/C1 strand - нить, прядь (локон - curl, lock), C1/C1 fibre (US fiber), C2/C1 thread, C2/B1 string, B2/B2 wire, roughage, filament:
        fiber is a thread of a substance used to make clothes or rope. "The mat was made from tiny fibers."
        A thread is a thin piece of string. "I have many different colors of thread at home."
        string is a thin piece of fabric or rope. "I found a large ball of string."
        A wire is a thin string made out of metal. "The wires were connected to towers that brought electricity to the city."
C2/C1 strand - нить размышлений, аспект, C1/B2 angle (WAY OF THINKING), B2/A2 feature (QUALITY), B2/B2 aspect (FEATURE), B2/B1 point (CHARACTERISTIC), B2/B2 side (PART OF SITUATION), facet
      strand (literary), C2/-- coastline, B1/A2 coast, B1/B2 shore, A1/A1 beach: A coastline is the outline of a country’s coast. "He noticed that most of the cities in Australia are on the coastline."
                                                                                 The coast is the land by an ocean. "I stayed on the southern coast of Australia."
                                                                                 A shore is the edge of a large body of water. "All of the boats were floating near the shore."
C2/-- stranded, marooned - застрявший, брошенный, оставленный, отрезанный от внешнего мира, выброшенный на берег (о рыбе, корабле и т.д.): "The strike left hundreds of tourists stranded at the airport.", "If the tide comes in, we'll be stranded on these rocks.", "He left me stranded in town with no car and no money for a bus.", "The ship was stranded on a sandbank."
        If someone is stranded, they are prevented from leaving a place. "When the plane left, my sister and I were stranded in China."
C2/-- spade - штыковая лопата, C2/-- shovel - совковая лопата, ковш экскаватора, hoe - мотыга, trowel - шпатель:
		A spade is a tool used for digging. "The gardener used her spade to make a hole for the seed."
        A shovel is a tool with a long handle that is used for digging. "The boy grabbed his shovel and got all of the snow off of the sidewalk."
C2/C1 specimen, C2/B2 sample, C1/B2 instance, C2/A2 case, C1/B2 illustration, A1/A1 example, paragon, see also: pattern:
        To illustrate is to show something by drawing a picture. "The executive illustrated the decreasing profits of the company."
        An instance is an example of something. "I have never experienced an instance of hate. Have you?"
        An example of something is a thing that is typical of it. "Cola is an example of a soft drink."
C1/C1 spin, --/C1 rotate, revolve, orbit, ...: To spin is to turn around in circles. "The boy kept spinning until he fell down."
                                               To rotate something means to turn it around in a circle. "An airplane's propellers rotate quickly to help it fly."
                                               To revolve around something is to keep it as the main feature or focus. "My life revolves around sports."
                                               To orbit something means to move around it in a continuous, curving path. "The moon orbits the Earth."
C1/C1 spine - позвоночник, backbone: The spine is the bone that runs up and down the middle of the back. "Our spine helps us to stand up nice and straight."
      spine - стержень, основа, the backbone of sth, see also: foundation
      spine - стержень (черта характера, informal), backbone, see also: nerve
      spine - корешок книги
      spine - шип, игра, thorn - шип, колючка, prickle - колючка, покалывать (prickly - колючий), see also: burr: A thorn is a sharp part of a plant. "Be careful of the thorns when you pick the roses!"
C1/B2 spirit, B2/B2 soul: A soul is a person's spirit. "Some people believe that the soul lives after the body dies."
B2/B2 spirit, B1/B1 ghost, phantom, wraith (literary), spectre (literary, US specter), vampire, ghoul, wight (literary or old use) - a ghost (or other spirit), or a dead person who has come back to life, see also: devil:
		A ghost is the spirit of a dead person. "Many people are afraid of ghosts."
		A phantom is a ghost or spirit. "A scary phantom appeared from out of the darkness."
		A vampire is a fictional monster that sleeps in a coffin and sucks people’s blood. "The vampire snuck up on the woman and bit her in the neck."
--/B2 spirit (дух закона, времени и т.д.), see also essence
        The essence of something is its important qualities or basic characteristics. "The essence of the argument was that both sides felt they had lost money."
C2/-- spit: To spit means to force liquid from one’s mouth. "He emerged from the pool and spit water from his mouth."
--/C1 spectacle - вид, B2/B1 sight, C2/B1 view: A spectacle is an amazing sight. "Niagara Falls is quite a spectacle."
												A sight is something interesting to see. "I saw the pyramids of Egypt. What a sight!"
--/C1 spectacle - зрелище
--/C1 spectacles - очки, glasses (US eyeglasses)
B2/B2 spectator: A spectator is someone who watches something, especially a sports event. "There were thousands of spectators at the big game."
C2/C1 spectrum: The spectrum is the full range of color ranging from red to violet. "You can see the entire spectrum in a rainbow."
C1/B2 spokesperson, --/B2 spokesman, --/B2 spokeswoman, B2/B2 representative
C2/С1 spotlight - прожектор
C2/С1 the spotlight - пятно света от прожектора
C2/С1 the spotlight - центр веобщего внимания, the limelight, the centre of attention: "Unemployment is once again in the spotlight.", "The issue will come under the spotlight when parliament reassembles." "The report has turned the spotlight on the startling rise in street crime.", "She was happy to share the spotlight with her sister."
      spotlight - освещать прожектором
      spotlight - освещать, подчёркивать, B2/B1 highlight, B2/B2 emphasize (B2/B2 emphasis), C1/-- stress, accent, B1/B1 attention:
        To highlight something means to mark it with a color so that it is easy to see. "I read my vocabulary list and highlighted the most difficult words."
        To emphasize is to give importance or attention to something. "She emphasized the key points by circling them in red ink."
        emphasis is special attention or importance. "The students put special emphasis on chapter 4 because it will be on test."
        attention is the notice, thought, or consideration of someone. "His work got the attention of two of his co-workers."
A2/A1 spring, A2/A1 autumn (US usually fall), B1/B1 season: autumn is the season of the year between summer and winter. "I love when the leaves fall in autumn because I can play in them."
                                                            A season is a time of the year: spring, summer, fall or winter. "Fall is a warm season while winter is very cold."
C2/B2 spring - прыгнуть, вскочить, C2/C1 leap, C2/-- hop, see also: bound: To leap means to jump a long distance. "He had to leap over the gap to reach the other side of the hill."
                                                          				   To hop means to jump a short distance. "The kangaroo quickly hopped away from danger."
C2/B2 spring - to move quickly and suddenly towards a particular place
C1/B2 spring - источник, родник, ключ
      spring - пружина
      spring - упругость
C2/-- squeak - писк (пищать), скрип(еть), creak - срип(еть); see also: squeal etc.
      squeak - протиснуться (в финал, в парламент, через экзамен, комиссию и т.д.) в плане еле-еле преуспеть
C1/C1 squeeze, mash; squeeze sb dry, see also: express: To squeeze something means to press it together and hold it tightly. "When Clara saw her cat, she gave it a big squeeze."
                                    					To mash something is to crush it so that it is soft. "We mashed the hard potatoes and served them for dinner."
C2/B2 stage - организовать, устроить, поставить, провести (выставку, чемпионат, пьесу и т.д.)
C2/B2 stage - организовать, устроить (демонстрацию, забастовку, переворот и т.д.)
B2/A2 stage - стадия, этап, B2/B2 phase, see also: landmark: A phase is a stage in a process or the gradual development of something. "The first phase in the recycling project involves finding volunteers to help out."
A2/B1 stage - сцена (backstage, offstage, onstage): A stage is a place where actors or musicians act or sing. "A large screen was on the stage."
                                                    If something happens backstage, it occurs behind a theater’s stage. "After the show, the director went backstage and thanked the actors."
      stage - арена (political/world/international/... stage)
C2/-- stagger(ed) - идти пошатываясь, ковылять, C2/-- trudge - идти с трудом, тащиться, волочиться, пробираться (see also: tramp), reel, totter, lurch, see also: stumble, lame, toil:
		To stagger means to move in an unsteady way and almost fall over. "He staggered around after having too much to drink."
      stagger(ed), C2/C1 stun(ned) (see also: rock, shock, awe(d)), С2/-- speechless - онемевший, boggle - поражать воображение ("на голову не налазит"), B1/B1 amaze(d), B2/B2 astonish(ed), astound(ed), marvel, lurch, delightful(ly), B1/A1 delicious(ly, ness), numb - оцепенеть:
        To stun someone means to make them unable to speak due to surprise or shock. "Tim fell off the swing and was too stunned to cry."
        To amaze someone is to surprise them very much. "The news in the paper amazed Jack."
        To astonish someone means to greatly surprise them. "The amount of people that came to her party astonished her."
        If someone is astonished, they are very surprised or shocked. "I was astonished when he pulled the live rabbit out of his hat."
        If you are astounded, you are very surprised. "I was astounded that Monica won the art competition."
        To marvel at something is to feel surprise and interest in it. "We marveled at her excellent piano playing."
C1/-- staggering, B2/C1 stunning(ly) - ошеломительный, B2/C1 striking(ly), B2/C1 exceptional, B2/B2 outstanding(ly), B1/A1 amazing(ly), B1/-- spectacular(ly), B2/-- breathtaking(ly), B2/B2 astonishing(ly), astounding(ly), B1/-- marvellous(ly), C1/B2 magnificent(ly, -ce) = splendid, majestic, majesty, B2/B1 impressive, devastating, A2/A2 wonderful(ly) = literary: wondrous(ly), C1/-- heavenly (informal), B2/B2 remarkable(-y), B2/B2 memorable(-y), B1/-- unforgettable(-y), C1/C1 supreme(ly), sublime, B2/C1 superb(ly), C1/-- splendid (splendour) = magnificent, C2/-- awesome, C2/-- phenomenal, B1/B2 extraordinary, C1/B2 grand (grandeur), pomp, C1/C1 terrific (informal), --/C1 glorious, B1/A2 brilliant, A2/A2 excellent, A2/A1 fantastic, --/B2 fabulous, super, resplendent, see also: imposing:
        If something is spectacular, it looks or sounds very impressive. "There was a spectacular fireworks display in the park at New Year."
        When something is magnificent, it is beautiful and grand. "The man gave his wife a pair of magnificent diamond earrings."
        If something is majestic, it is large and beautiful. "The rich people lived in a big, majestic house."
        majesty is supreme greatness or authority. "You should address the king and queen as your majesty."
        When something is supreme, it is the highest or best. "The supreme officer was in charge of keeping the citizens calm."
        sublime - of high moral or intellectual value: "He was uneven, disproportioned, saying ordinary things on 		great occasions, and now and then, without the slightest provocation, uttering the sublimest most beautiful thoughts."
        If something or someone is awesome, they are impressive or frightening. "The huge military plane was an awesome sight."
        If something or someone is splendid, then they are very good. "From his head down to his shoes, his clothes looked splendid."
        When something is phenomenal, it is unusually great. "The child’s ability to play the piano is nothing short of phenomenal."
        When someone or something are extraordinary, they are amazing. "The fireman who rescued the girl was extraordinary."
        When something is grand, it is big and liked by people. "The grand mountain rose high into the sky."
        When something is terrific, it is very good. "My youngest daughter is a terrific painter."
        If someone is brilliant, they are very smart. "My younger sister is brilliant for someone her age."
        When something is excellent, it is very good. "I got an excellent score on my school test."
        If something is memorable, then it is remembered for a special reason. "The party was memorable; people were still talking about it years later."
        If something is fantastic, it is really good. "The student did a fantastic job on his project and got an award."
        If something is fabulous, it is extremely good. "This strawberry is the best I’ve ever had. It’s fabulous."
		super means really good. "My dad said I did a super job cleaning the house."
C2/-- stain, see also: blot: A stain is a dirty mark that is difficult to clean. "He had a red stain on the collar of his shirt."
C2/B2 stand
TODO stand
B2/-- stand back - отойти назад: "The police ordered the crowd to stand back."
      stand back - находиться в стороне, на удалении: "The house stands back from the road."
      stand back - остановиться, выдохнуть и посмотреть со стороны, see also: look back: "It's time to stand back and look at your career so far."
C1/-- stale: If food is stale, then it is not fresh but dry, hard, and not good to eat. "The cookies sat on the table so long that they became stale."
--/C1 stake - доля в бизнесе
      stake - ставка в игре; C2 at stake - поставленный на карту
      stake - кол, C2/C1 pole, B2/C1 beam, C2/B2 bar (see also: rail), stilt (свая, ходуля), plank (планка, доска), staff (посох, трость), cane (клюка), crook (пастушеский посох), --/C1 rod - стержень (lightning rod - громоотвод); удочка, angling (litetrary, means fishing with rod, line and lure):
        A stake is a small, sharp piece of wood or metal that is put into the ground. "We marked our property by placing stakes into the ground."
        A pole is a long thin stick made of wood or metal that supports things. "The flag was hanging from the flag pole."
        A beam is a heavy bar. "Modern skyscrapers are made with several beams."
        A rod is a thin stick made of wood or metal. "I bought a new fishing rod to use while on vacation."
      stake - подпирать колом/жердью (растения)
      stake - делать ставку, C2/B2 bet, C2/C1 gamble(-ing), C1/B2 risk(y), jeopardize, endanger, threaten, menace (formal), imperil (formal), see also: compromise:
                To bet is to risk money on the result of a game or a business. "How much will you bet that your horse will win?"
                To gamble means to play a game that involves winning or losing money. "Many people like to go to casinos to gamble."
                A risk is a chance of something bad happening. "I took a risk and climbed the snowy mountain."
B2/B2 state (состояние), B1/A2 condition, see also: circumstance: The condition of someone or something is the state that they are in. "The patient's condition was very good."
C1/A2 state (государство), A2/A1 country, C2/C1 province, B2/B2 county, B1/B2 district, borough, municipality, see also: ward:
        A province is a small area that is controlled by a country. "Canada is divided into several different provinces."
        A county is the largest political division of a state in the US. "He wanted to represent the citizens of his county."
        A district is a small part of a city, county, state, or country. "I live in a residential district of Seattle, Washington."
B2/B2 state (утверждать), C2/C1 assert, C1/B2 insist, --/C1 contend (--/C1 contention - утверждение, позиция в споре; a bone of contention - яблоко раздора), C1/B1 claim, C2/B2 maintain (EXPRESS), affirm (formal) - (у|под)тверждать, restate - вновь/повторно утвержать, заявлять, reiterate (formal), rehearse (formal, usually disapproving), see also: testify, plead, allege
        To state something means to say it in a definite way. "The president stated his opinion about the world’s health concerns."
        To assert a fact or belief means to state it with confidence. "He asserted that his mother’s cooking was better than his best friend’s."
        To claim means to say that something is true. "He claimed to know why the country's laws were weak."
        To affirm is to say that something is true. "Using a graph, Malcolm affirmed the success of the company."
        To restate something means to say it again or in a different way. "Mrs. Jones restated the test question to the class."
C2/A1 statement, --/C1 assertion, see also: utterance
C1/B1 statistic, C1/C1 statistical: A statistic is a number that tells a fact about something. "The statistics showed that we did just as well this year as last year."
B2/C1 steer, navigate (navigation(al)): To steer something is to control where it goes. "He steered the go-cart around the track."
                                        To navigate something is to control the way it moves or goes. "She navigated the ship across the ocean."
--/C1 steer - направляться (The ship steered into port.)
--/C1 steer - направлять, вести (She steered the team to victory.), lead, see also: pull
--/C1 stem - остановить, сдержать (to stop something from spreading or increasing), see also: constrain(t): "The cut was bandaged to stem the bleeding.", "The government had failed to stem the tide of factory closures."
C1/-- stem from sth - проистекать, see also: derive: "Most people’s insecurities stem from something that happened in their childhood."
--/C1 stem - стебель, stalk, trunk: The stem of a plant is the stick that grows leaves or flowers. "The rose had a long thin stem."
      stem - ножка бокала
      stem - мундштук (the thin tube of a tobacco pipe)
      stem - корень слова
      stem - колёсико на мех. часах (UK winder)
      STEM - abbreviation for Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (as subjects of study): "We work with schools and colleges to help educators inspire students in STEM."
C2/B2 stiff(ly, ness), C2/-- rigid, C2/-- stern(ly, ness), C2/C1 harsh(ly, ness), B2/B2 severe(ly, -ty), C2/B2 strict(ly, ness), inflexible, uncompromising, unbending (formal):
        When somebody is stern, they are very serious. "The stern teacher didn’t allow the students to speak during class."
        When rules or systems are rigid, they are severe because they cannot be changed. "Societies often have rigid rules about the way that people are supposed to act."
        If something is severe, it is very bad or serious. "After hitting his hand with the hammer, Sam was in severe pain."
        When someone is strict, they make sure others follow rules. "The teacher is strict. She does not let students talk in class."
C1/B2 stock, see also: reserve, inventory: A stock is a stored amount of something. "They keep a stock of rice so they'll always have something to eat."
      stock up (on/with sth) - затариваться, запасаться (to buy a lot of something so that you can use it later): "We ought to stock up on sun cream before our trip.", "During the emergency, people stocked up on essential items."
      stock sth <-> up - заполнить, забить, затарить (to fill something with goods, food, etc.): "We need to stock up the freezer."
TODO stock
C1/-- stocking - чулок
C1/A2 straight - прямо(й), straighten, B2/B1 direct / C2/B2 indirect, circuitous (formal) - окольный, see also: roundabout, bypass:
		If something is direct, it goes straight between two places. "The green path is a direct route to my house."
		If something is indirect, then it is not the easiest or straightest way. "He chose to take the most indirect route to the coast."
B2/-- straight - честно, see also: scrupulous, explicit
      straight - подряд, непрерывно (continuously without being interrupted): "They had been working for 16 hours straight."
C1/C1 strategic, B2/B2 strategy, see also: tactic: A strategy is a plan for how to do something. "The team came up with a strategy to win the game."
C1/-- straw - солома, соломинка, hay - сено: A straw is a thin tube that is used to suck liquid into the mouth. "I drank the orange juice through a straw."
                							 hay is dry grass used to feed animals or used as a covering. "I need to buy some more hay for the horse to sleep on."
C1/-- straw - соломка (also drinking straw)
C2/B2 strength(en), C2/B1 force, C2/C1 reinforce, fortify, bolster: strength is the physical power that you have. "Exercising will increase your strength and give you more power."
        															force is a person's strength or power. "He used all his force to try and open the door."
									 		  						To reinforce something is to make it stronger. "Peter reinforced his opinion with information from a book."
C1/A2 stress
C2/B2 stretch - простираться, B2/B2 extend, spread
C1/B2 stretch - участок, область, see also: area, plot, tract:
B2/B2 stretch - растянуть(ся), B2/B2 extend, elongate, outstretched: To extend is to stretch out or reach. "The boy extended his hand to catch the ball."
                                                                     If something is outstretched, then it is extended to its full length. "The cat stood on its back legs with its front legs outstretched."
B2/B2 stretch - настянуть
B2/B2 stretch - дотянуться, потянуться, размяться: To stretch is to make your arms or legs reach out. "She stretched her body before exercising."
TODO stretch
C2/B2 strike, B2/C1 punch, thrust - толчок, тычок, удар - толкающие либо пронзающие (see also stab): To strike someone or something is to hit them. "She struck the other girl in the face."
	  stricken - пострадавший, --/C1 inflict(ion) - причинять, наносить, afflict (often passive) - поразить, причинить боль, вред и т.д., afflicted (by/with) - пострадавший (от), affliction (formal) - беда, страдания (sth that makes you suffer), beset: [usually passive] (formal) to affect sb/sth in an unpleasant or harmful way: "Melanoma globally afflicts nearly 160000 new people each years", see also: administer
	  	If one is stricken by a disease or problem, they are badly affected by it. "Mike was stricken with a horrible illness."
		afflicted means to suffer physically or mentally. "He was afflicted by pain in his right arm."
C1/C1 strip, B1/-- stripe (colour), C2/-- strap (leather, cloth etc.) - ремешок, ручка, streak - черта, полоса (как в прямом - "streaks of sunlight", "There was a streak of blood on his face.", так и в перен. смысле - "a streak of good luck", "a lucky/unlucky streak"), исполосовать:
        A strip is a long, narrow piece of material or land. "He had long strips of film that held images of his trip abroad."
        A stripe is a thick line. "The flag of the United States has red and white stripes."
        A strap is a thin long piece of fabric used to fasten, carry, or hold something. "She put the strap of her purse over her shoulder and walked out of the door."
        A streak is a long, thin mark that is easy to see. "Her hair was brown except for a streak which she dyed blonde."
--/C1 strip - оголить, C2/-- peel, see also: husk: To peel fruits and vegetables is to remove their skin. "We peeled the apple before eating it."
C2/-- stroke - росчерк (пера), взмах (кисти)
C1/C1 stroke - гребок (в плавании); backstroke, breaststroke, sidestroke
B2/C1 stroke - инсульт
B2/-- stroke, pet, B2/A1 feel, see also: sense, pat sb/yourself on the back, see also: pat: To stroke is to move a hand over something or someone. "She stroked her cheek to see if there was something on it."
TODO stroke
C2/C1 structural(ly), C2/B2 structure: A structure is a building. "They just built a beautiful new structure downtown."
C2/-- stubbornness, obstinacy; B2/-- stubborn(ly), obstinate(ly): If people are stubborn, they don't change their minds easily. "Both of my parents are stubborn. They never give in to each other."
C2/C1 stumble - спотыкаться, B2/B2 trip: To stumble means to put your foot down wrong so that you almost fall. "He stumbled as he ran through the puddle."
C2/-- stumble - запинаться, see also: bumble (see also: lisp), mumble
C2/-- stumble - ковылять, hobble - прихрамывать, limp - хромать, влачиться, lag, see also: stagger, lame, toil, bumble:
		To limp means to walk with difficulty because someone’s leg or foot is hurt. "After the injury, the player limped off of the field."
		To lag behind is to move slowly behind other moving objects. "The girl on rollerblades lagged behind the little girl on the bicycle."
С1/B2 subject - подверженный, see also: prone
      subject - подвергать: To subject someone to something means to force them to do or experience it. "The officers subjected everyone to a careful search before they left the plane."
      subject - подчинять
B1/A1 subject - предмет, тема (обсуждения и т.д.), B2/B1 theme: A subject is the topic that is being discussed or taught. "The subject of Marco’s speech was the economy."
                                                                A theme is the main subject of a book, movie, or painting. "The students discussed the book’s theme in class."
A1/A1 subject - предмет (дисциплина), see also: discipline
TODO subject
C2/B2 submit, B1/B2 register, lodge
C2/B2 submit (formal), B2/A2 suggest (sth) (to sb), B2/B2 propose, B1/A2 recommend: To suggest something means to give an idea or plan about it. "He suggested that we go to see his boss."
                                                                      				To propose something is to say that it should be done. "Santa Claus proposed that I try to be a good boy all year."
                                                                      				To recommend something is to say that someone should do it. "My doctor recommended that I get some exercise."
C2/B1 substance - вещество: A substance is any specific material or mixture of materials. "Water is an important substance for all living things."
C2/-- substance - суть, C2/C1 essence, the gist, the thrust, the pith ("the pith of her argument")
C2/-- substance (B2/C1 substantial) - важность, C1/B2 significance (B2/B2 significant(ly)), C2/B2 prime, B2/B2 primary(-ily), B1/B1 importance (B1/A1 important(ly)), B2/B2 considerable (-y), noteworthy - примечательный, see also: essential, paramount, principal / inconsiderable, negligible(-ly), C1/-- insignificant(ly), insignificance:
        If something is substantial, then it is of great importance, size, or value. "The bank said that he owed it a substantial amount of money."
        If something is prime, it is the most important one. "Dirty air is a prime cause of illness."
        If something is primary, it is the most important thing. "His primary thoughts are about money."
        The significance of something is the quality that makes it important. "The significance of the snowy weather was that we didn’t have to go to school."
        When someone or something is significant, they are important. "I read many significant novels as a literature major in university."
        importance means the quality or condition of being needed or valued. "VIPs are people of great importance."
        If something is considerable, it is large in size, amount or extent. "They paid a considerable amount of money for that car."
C2/C1 subtle(-y), C1/A2 light(ly), B2/B2 slight(ly), C1/-- a shade = trifle = slightly, see also: marginal(ly)
      subtlety - утончённость (the quality of being subtle)
      subtlety - тонкость, нюанс (the small but important details or aspects of something): "the subtleties of language", "She was too young to grasp the subtleties of the film.", see also: aspect, shade, the ins and outs, the nuts and bolts (of sth)
B1/A2 success: success is doing something well that you choose to do. "My daughter was a big success at school."
C2/-- succumb - уступить, поддаться (чарам, искушению); пасть, погибнуть, see also: concede, yield
C2/C1 suck, see also: suckle: To suck is to put something in your mouth and try to get flavor out of it. "The baby sucked milk from her bottle."
C2/C1 sue, litigate (law): To sue someone is to take them to court for something wrong they did. "I sued the company after I slipped on a banana peel in their hallway."
B2/C1 suicide; B1/B1 murder(ous), homicide(-al), manslaughter (LAW) - непредумышленное, regicide (formal) - цареубийство, цареубийца, slay (literary) - kill intentionally and with premeditation:
		suicide is the act of killing oneself. "Some people feel so sad that they think suicide is the only answer."
A2/B1 suit - костюм, outfit, uniform, В2/С1 gear - снаряжение, (informal) шмотки, C1/-- (under)garment, B2/B1 costume, wear - одежда, B2/B1 dress - платье, B2/A2 clothing (formal), A1/A1 clothes - одежда, attire - наряд, garb (literary or humorous) - наряд, одежда:
        A suit is a set of clothes. It usually includes a jacket with pants or a skirt. "I wore my new suit on my date with Melissa."
        An outfit is a set of clothes worn together, often for a certain job or event. "Kelly’s new outfit made her look so glamourous."
        A uniform is a piece of clothing worn by people of the same group. "All the members of our marching band wear matching uniforms."
        A garment is a piece of clothing. "The business man had all of his garments cleaned before the important meeting."
        A costume is a set of clothes people wear for a particular occasion. "The woman wore a mask with her costume."
        attire is nice or special clothing. "Everyone wore their best attire to the president’s daughter’s wedding."
      suit - иск, C2/C1 lawsuit, writ
      suit - масть (spades - пиковая, diamonds - бубновая, hearts - черви, clabs - крести)
B2/B1 suit - подходить, устраивать, удовлетворять
B2/B1 suit - подходить (одежда, цвет и т.д.: "это вам идёт")
--/С1 suite - номер люкс
--/C1 suite - гарнитур (кухонный, мебельный и т.д.)
      suite - сюита (муз.)
      suite - набор (IT): "a suite of software development tools", B1/B2 kit: A kit is a set of all the things needed to do something. "Is there a first aid kit in your office?"
C2/C1 summit (HIGHEST POINT), B2/C1 peak, apex, vertex, pinnacle, cusp: The peak is the very top of a mountain. "There is snow on the peaks of those mountains."
                                                                		A summit is the highest part of a hill or mountain. "Snow covered the summit of the mountain even during the summer."
C2/C1 summit (MEETING), C2/C1 assembly, C2/C1 consultation, C1/C1 gathering, C2/C1 rally, C2/-- reunion (встреча (нечастая); воссоединение), get-together (informal), B2/B2 seminar, --/B2 session, B1/-- conference (MEETING), A2/A1 meeting, --/B2 forum (MEETING), congress (MEETING), convocation (formal), symposium (formal), conclave (formal), --/C1 congregation - община, приход, паства, see also: convention
        An assembly is a group that is together for the same reason. "The students had an assembly to talk about their interests."
        A rally is a large public meeting in order to support something. "The school had a rally in the gym to support the basketball team."
        A reunion is the meeting of people or things that have been separated. "Every summer we have a family reunion at the lake."
        A session is a meeting at a regular time in order to discuss and solve an issue. "Every three months the managers met in a session to discuss regional sales."
        congress is a group of leaders in a government. "congress makes laws for people to follow."
C2/-- summon - созвать (собрание), convene (formal), see also: assemble, round sb/sth <-> up
C2/-- summon - призвать, вызвать, запросить (подкрепление, поддержку, кого-либо): To summon a person is to ask them to come to you. "We summoned the doctor as soon as we noticed she was sick."
C2/-- summon - призвать (всё своё мужество), набраться (смелости), muster - gather or bring together ("Yet Fox needed all the strength that he could muster.")
C2/-- superficial - поверхностный (see also: shallow), facile
C2/C1 superior, superiority / inferior (see also: subordinate), inferiority: If sb/sth is superior, they are better than another. "I think cooking outdoors is superior to cooking indoors."
                                                    						 If something is inferior, it is not as good as something else. "Cars built a hundred years ago are inferior to ones built today."
C2/C1 suppress, repress, extinguish (feeling/idea, literary) - погасить, потушить, подавить, see also: appease, contain, see also: subdue:
		    To suppress something means to prevent it from happening. "She suppressed her urge to scream because she didn’t want to be noticed."
C1/C1 surge, see also: ​shaft, wave; resurgence
C1/C1 suspend, B2/B2 pause: To suspend something means to delay or stop it from happening for a while. "The oil company suspended production until it was sure the factory was safe."
                            To pause means to stop doing something for a while. "Since she was so hungry, she paused to make a snack."
C1/C1 suspend, B1/C1 postpone, B1/B2 delay, leave, defer, shelve, B1 put sth <-> off, leave/put sth aside, (put, be) on ice, see also: stall:
        To postpone something is to make it happen later than planned. "They postponed the meeting until Elena arrived."
        To delay means to wait to do something. "I was delayed at the airport for over two hours."
        To defer means to arrange for an action to happen at a later time. "The girl was very sleepy, so she chose to defer her bath until morning."
B2/C1 suspend - отстранить (usually passive)
--/B2 suspend - по(д)весить, hang, see also: dangle: To hang something is to keep it above the ground. "I drew a picture of my family, and my mother hung it on the wall."
B2/C1 suspicious - подозрительный, C2/-- dubious(ly) - сомнительный, see also: untrustworthy: When something or someone is dubious, they are not considered honest. "The police thought that the man’s description of the crime was dubious."
B2/C1 suspicious - подозрительный (недоверчивый), подозревающий, C2/-- dubious(ly) - сомневающийся, B2/B1 doubt(ful); doubter, skeptic(al), C2/C1 cautious(ly, ness, C1/C1 caution, see also: discretion), C2/-- wary(-ily, -iness), B2/A2 careful(ly), see also: incredulous / unwary, unsuspecting, incautious (formal):
        If someone is suspicious of someone else, they do not trust that person. "Dad was suspicious of the caller on the line."
        doubt is a feeling of not being sure. "I have doubt that the story is true."
        A skeptic is a person who does not believe something. "The scientist showed the skeptic that dinosaurs did exist by providing evidence."
        If you are cautious, you are careful in a dangerous situation. "Be very cautious as you stack those boxes."
        caution is care and attention in order to avoid danger. "Please use the power saw with caution. It is very dangerous."
        If someone is wary, they are cautious or mistrusting. "She was wary of going to school because she hadn’t done her homework."
        carefully means with great attention, especially to detail or safety. "The baby carefully climbed down the stairs."
C2/C1 suspicion (C2/B2 suspect), see also: distrust: To suspect something is to believe that it is true. "I suspect that those kids stole the money."
                                 					 A suspicion is a feeling that something is possible or true in a crime. "The police had a suspicion that the driver had stolen the purse."
C2/B2 sweep - подметать, rinse (rinse sth <-> out - промыть) - сполоснуть, see also: flush: If you sweep the floor, you clean it with a tool like a broom or a brush. "There is a lot of dirt on the floor. Can you sweep it please?"
B2/C1 swing - качать(ся), (вз)махнуть, мотать(ся), teeter - качаться, раскачиваться; teeter on the brink/edge of sth - балансировать на грани; wag - качать(ся), вилять, взмах (TODO), see also: rock, wave, fit, ripple
        To swing something means to move it back and forth or from side to side. "He can swing a golf club very powerfully."
--/C1 swing - (по)менять(ся), переметнуться, качнуться, see also: adjust
      swing (sth/sb) around - резко повернуть(ся)
      swing (at sb) - махнуть, попытаться ударить с размахом
--/C1 swing - взмах, размах, удар с замахом, see also: in full swing
--/C1 swing - колебания, изменение, скачок, перепад, переход
B2/C1 swing - качели, see-saw (US: seesaw, teeter-totter)
      swish - размахивать, рассекать со свистом (to (cause to) move quickly through the air making a soft sound): "I heard the rope swish through the air.", "The horses swished their tails to get rid of the flies hovering around them."
B2/B1 switch, C1/-- swap: To switch means to change something to something else. "Mom switched the TV station from the news to her favorite show."
TODO switch
C2/C1 symbolic, B2/A2 symbol: A symbol is a thing that stands for something else. "This symbol tells us that we cannot smoke in this area."
C2/B2 sympathetic / unsympathetic
C2/-- sympathize (with) (British English also sympathise). "I find it very hard to sympathize with him.", see also: pity
C2/B2 sympathy, C2/-- empathy (empathetic, empathize), --/C1 compassion(ate), commiserate(-ion), condole(nce), see also: pity, conscientious, be in sb's shoes:
        sympathy is a feeling of being sad for another person. "I felt sympathy for my sister so I got her a ballon to cheer her up."
        empathy is sharing or understanding another person’s feelings. "The caring nurse had empathy for her patients."
        compassion is a feeling of understanding for someone who is hurt or suffering. "The veterinarian had compassion for the sick little puppy."
        When people are compassionate, they feel pity and sympathy for others. "The compassionate nurse tried to make the sick man feel comfortable."
C2/B1 symptom: A symptom of a bad condition or illness is a sign that it is happening. "Sneezing and a high fever are symptoms of the common cold."
C2/C1 tactic(al(ly)), --/C1 methodology(-ical(ly)), C1/C1 mechanism; B1/A2 method (метод), device (метод, приём), see also: approach, pattern, mode, strategy:
		A tactic is a careful plan to achieve something. "Sam thought of a good tactic in order to attract more business."
		A method is the way to do something. "One method to remember things is to tie a string around your finger."
C2/-- takeover
C1/-- talkative - разговорчивый, garrulous - болтливый, loquacious (formal) - болтливый, see also: dynamic / quiet, taciturn - молчаливый: When someone is talkative, they talk a lot. "My aunt is very talkative whenever she is on the phone."
C1/-- technician, A2/B2 mechanic(al(ly)): A technician is a person who is skilled in electronic or mechanical work. "I need to call the technician to help me with my computer."
										  A mechanic is someone who fixes vehicles or machines. "We took the car to the mechanic to be fixed."
B2/C1 tempt, C2/-- lure, B2/B1 attract, entice, bait: To tempt people is to offer them something they want but shouldn't have. "I wasn't hungry, but she tempted me with a piece of my favorite cake."
                                                      To lure someone is to convince them to do something, by using a trick. "The store lures people in with big signs that say “Sale!”"
                                                      bait is something used to trick a person or thing to do something. "The best bait for catching fish is a big, fat worm."
      tempting, alluring, beguiling, enticing
C2/C1 tenant, B2/C1 landlord: A tenant is a person who rents property from a landlord. "The new tenants moved into the house across the street."
                              A landlord is a man who rents property to a person. "The landlord collected everyone’s rent money on the first day of every month."
C2/C1 tender(ly, ness), C2/C1 affection(ate), C1/B1 gentle(-ly, ness), B2 warmth (FEELING), fond(ness), care for (= be in love), see also: delicate:
        When something is tender, it is soft and easy to chew. "The meat was so tender they didn't need knives to cut it with."
        affection is a feeling of liking someone or something. "Amanda has a lot of affection for her little sister Sarah."
        Someone who is gentle is kind and calm. (to be nice or polite; opposite of rough). "He is very gentle with the baby."
        When someone is fond of something, they like it. "I am very fond of chocolate cake."
--/C1 terminal - терминальный, смертельный (terminally - неизлечимо): If something is terminal, then it causes or results in death. "Since his condition was not terminal, he felt a great sense of relief."
      terminal - смертельный (figurative): She's suffering from terminal (= very great) boredom.
--/C1 terminal - умирающий
--/C1 terminal - предельный (certain to get worse and come to an end: "The industry is in terminal decline.")
B2/B2 terminal - терминал ((аэро)порта, станции)
--/C1 terminal - терминал (компьютерный)
      terminal - клемма: "a positive/negative terminal"
--/C1 terrain, B1/B2 landscape (cityscape), B1/-- scenery, A2/A1 country, A2/B2 countryside (https://www.oxfordlearnersdictionaries.com/definition/english/terrain?q=terrain)
        The terrain is the land and all of its physical features or parts. "The terrain below was rocky and full of hills."
        A landscape is how an area of land looks. "The landscape of the country is very green."
C2/C1 testify (see also: state, plead, allege), --/C1 testimony (testimonial - характеристика, отзыв, рекомендательное письмо), testament, B2/B2 witness, B2/B2 proof, B2/A2 evidence, indicative - свидетельствующий, характеризующий (being or relating to a sign that sth exists, is true, or is likely to happen: "Their failure to act is indicative of their lack of interest.", "The rise in unemployment is seen as indicative of a new economic recession.", "Resumption of the talks is indicative of an improving relationship between the countries."):
        To testify means to give evidence as a witness. "The judge listened while the victim testified about the robbery."
        A testament to something shows that it exists or is true. "The beautiful performance was a testament to the singer’s natural talents."
        A witness is someone who sees or hears a crime or accident happen. "The woman was the only witness of the horrible crime."
        proof is a fact that shows something is real. "They used his fingerprint as proof for the crime he committed."
        evidence is a fact or thing that you use to prove something. "He used the pictures as evidence that UFOs are real."
--/C1 testimony, affidavit, deponent (LAW, свидетель)
C1/C1 texture (see also: consistency), B2/B2 surface: The texture of something is the way its surface looks and feels. "The texture of a rock found in the water is typically very smooth."
                                                      texture is the quality of something that can be known by its touch. "The texture of her skin was very soft and smooth."
                                                      The surface of something is the top part or outside of it. "The surface of the moon is very rough."
C1/C1 thankful(ly, ness), B1/B1 grateful(ly, gratitude) / ungrateful, ingratitude: When you are grateful for something, you are happy that it happened. "The girls were grateful to have a chance to spend time with their grandfather."
                                                                                   gratitude is a feeling of being thankful. "The kids showed Aunt Tess much gratitude for visiting them."
C2/C1 theoretical(ly), hypothetical(ly); C2/B2 hypothesis (hypothesize), B2/B1 theory (theorize), see also: speculate / C2/C1 empirical - эмпирический (​based on experiments or experience rather than ideas or theories), see also: practical:
        A theory is an idea about how something works. "We talked about Einstein's theory of relativity in class."
        If something is theoretical, it is based on theory rather than experience. "His conclusion was only theoretical and not meant to be publicized."
        A hypothesis is an idea for something that has not been proved yet. "The teacher did an experiment to prove whether his hypothesis was right."
        To theorize means to develop ideas about something. "They enjoyed theorizing about how things worked."
        If something is practical, it is useful in normal life. "Learning English is practical; you can use it in many places."
C2/C1 thereafter - после этого, hereafter (formal) - в дальнейшем, thenceforth (old-fashioned or formal) - с тех пор, henceforth (formal, UK also henceforward) - впредь, отныне, see also: since, afterwards
C2/B2 thesis: A thesis is an idea that needs to be proved. "She did not support her thesis very well."
C2/C1 thoughtful(ly, ness) - задумчивый, wistful(ly, ness) - печально-задумчивый (showing pensive sadness), pensive(ly), formal: ruminative(ly), reflective(ly), see also: be sunk in sth
B2/C1 thoughtful(ly, ness) - чуткий, внимательный, see also: courteous / C2/-- thoughtless(ly, ness), C1/-- inconsiderate, B1/-- selfish(ly, ness), egoistic, egocentric, impolite:
		If someone is impolite, they are rude. "Roger is impolite to everyone he meets."
C1/B2 thrill(ed), C2/-- chill, frisson: A thrill is an exciting feeling. "The boys enjoy the thrill of surfing a big wave."
B2/C1 tide - прилив/отлив, уровень моря, ebb - отлив, ослабевать (at a low ebb - на низком уровне, ослабленный подавленный (in a bad or weak state), ebb and flow - приливы и отливы, взлёты и падения (also ups and downs)):
		The tide is the level of the water in the sea. "The tide continued to crawl upon the beach little by little."
B2/C1 tide - волна, рост, подъём (a large amount of sth unpleasant that is increasing and is difficult to control)
      tide - волна чувств, эмоций: "A tide of rage surged through her.", "They were carried along on a tide of euphoria."
C2/C1 timber - древесина, пиломатериал, балки, брёвна, lumber (US): timber is wood that is used for building houses and making furniture. "Trees in this area are grown specifically to be used for timber."
C2/-- timid - робкий, пугливый, timorous (literary) - боязливый, C2/-- fearful, cowardly, craven(ly), pusillanimous(ly, pusillanimity) - малодушый (formal), see also: close, humble, withdrawn:
        If someone is timid, they are afraid, shy, or nervous. "The timid child hides behind her mother whenever she sees a stranger."
C2/-- tip - наконечник, cusp: A tip is a pointed end of something. "The tip of his pen was very sharp."
      tip - to cover the tip with colour/substance/etc.
B2/A2 tip - подсказка, совет, C2/C1 hint, A2/A1 advice: A hint is information that suggests something will happen or is true. "I quietly passed on a hint to my sister about the test."
                                                        advice is an opinion about what to do. "I don't know how to study for my exams. Can you give me some advice?"
B1/B1 tip - чаевые, gratuity (formal)
B1/B1 tip - давать чаевые
C2/-- tip - наклонять, tilt, B2/B2 lean, recline: To tilt something means to tip it into a sloping position. "She tilted her glass and almost spilled some of the wine inside."
                                                  To lean is to bend the body in a particular direction. "The woman leaned against the counter because she was tired."
C2/-- tip - вылить, высыпать, B1/B1 pour, decant, see also shed: To pour a liquid means to make it come out of a container. "I poured some milk into my sister's cup."
C1/C1 tobacco: tobacco is a plant whose leaves are smoked, such as in cigarettes. "The tobacco in cigarettes is bad for your health."
C1/-- token - символ, элемент внимания, B1/-- souvenir, memento, keepsake: A souvenir is something you buy to remind you of a place or event. "I bought a Russian doll as a souvenir from my trip to Moscow."
C1/-- token - жетон
      token (US gift certificate) - подарочный сертификат
      token - показной, символический, nominal
TODO: разделить (перегруппировать слишком разошедшиеся синонимы):
C2/C1 tolerate, C2/C1 sustain (C2/C1 sustainable / unsustainable); C2/B2 maintain; C2/C1 uphold(er); C2/B2 retain (retention, retentive), B2/A1 keep, B2/B2 preserve, --/C1 conserve, save, perpetuate; C2/-- withstand, C1/B2 undergo, C2/B2 bear, B1/B2 stand, abide (can't bear/stand/abide sb/sth), B2/B1 suffer, B2/C1 endure, B1/B1 brave, C2/C1 incur - подвергаться, нести убытки, C2/-- incurable(-ly), B2 put up with sth/sb:
        To tolerate something means to be able to accept it even when it is unpleasant. "When you are in a hurry, it can be hard to tolerate traffic signals."
        To sustain something is to keep it going. "Wind power is a clean way to sustain a city with energy."
        To maintain means to make something stay the same. "The balls maintain constant movement."
		To retain something is to keep it. "Even by the afternoon, the day had retained the morning’s freshness."
        To preserve is to protect something from harm. "Dad sprayed a chemical on the house to help preserve its looks."
        To conserve something is to protect it from being ruined or used completely. "The group worked to conserve the beauty of Europe’s national parks."
        To save something is to keep it from being hurt. "I want to help save the world."
        To undergo an action means to have it happen to you. "The cancer patient undergoes treatments twice a week."
        To suffer is to feel pain. "Her headache made her suffer all day."
        To endure something tough means to do or go through it. "She had to endure her husband shouting all day long."
C2/C1 tolerance: tolerance is the ability to accept something painful or unpleasant. "Boxers have a high tolerance for pain."
      tolerant(ly): When people are tolerant, they are approved of because they accept others. "The tolerant leader thought that everyone was equal regardless of race."
C2/B2 tone: tone is the sound of someone's voice. It shows how they feel. "My father's tone told me I had broken the rule."
C2/TODO total, B1/B2 sum: A sum is a specific amount of money. "He calculated the numbers to see what the sum of his bills would be."
TODO total, C2/C1 gross (compare: net), aggregate, see also: cumulative: When a number is aggregate, it is made up of smaller amounts added together. "The company totaled its aggregate sales for the entire year."
C2/?? touch
TODO touch - чуток, see also: pinch, dice
B2/C1 toxic (toxin), B2/B1 poison(ous), venom(ous(ly)): poison is a dangerous substance that causes illness or death. "They used poison to get rid of the rats in their home."
                                                        When something is toxic, it is poisonous. toxic things are very dangerous. "Please check the label to see if the product is toxic."
                                                        venom is a poisonous substance that comes from animals or plants. "A snake’s venom can be used to cure the illnesses it creates."
C1/C1 trace - , remnant, vestige (formal), dregs (literary), see also: relic: "the last dregs of daylight"
C1/C1 trace, C2/B2 seek(er), C1/B1 search (sth/sb / out sth / for sth) - обыскивать, искать (see also: rifle), разыскать (обнаружить), B2/B1 hunt (out sth / for sth), see also: perceive:
		To seek is to look for something. "If I have a problem, I seek my sister's advice."
		To search for something or someone means to look for them carefully. "I searched the newspaper for a new job."
C1/C1 trace: To trace something means to follow over it with the eyes or a finger. "He traced over the graph with his finger."
TODO  trace
C2/B2 track; C1/B2 monitor, see also: rule, administer: To monitor people or things is to watch them closely. "The teacher monitors the students when they take tests."
TODO track
B2/B1 ​trade - торговать, vend (formal)
B1/B1 ​trade - торговля, B2/C1 commerce, vending (formal): commerce is the activity of buying and selling things. "The new shopping mall increased the commerce in that section of town."
C1/B1 ​trade - бизнес (building/food/tourist/etc. trade)
C2/C1 trail - след
B2/С1 trail - тропа, C2/A2 route, B2/B1 path, pathway, shortcut, approach: A trail is a path through a wild area. "A narrow trail cut through the field and over the hills."
                                                        		               A route is the way you go from one place to another. "I saw many new houses along the route to the city."
                                                        		               A path is a way from one place to another that people can walk along. "We followed a path through the woods."
                                                        		               A shortcut is a route that is shorter than the main route. "We got to the house first because we took a shortcut through the forest."
TODO trail (connect with track and trace)
--/C1 trailer - прицеп (a truck, or a container with wheels, that is pulled by another vehicle): "a car towing a trailer with a boat on it"
--/C1 trailer - дом на колёсах (also travel trailer, UK caravan, mobile home): "a trailer park (= an area where trailers are parked and used as homes)"
--/C1 trailer (UK) - трейлер (a series of short scenes from a film or television programme, shown in advance to advertise it): "He featured in the trailer for the movie.", "The review said that if you've seen the trailer, you needn't bother watching this film."
C1/-- trainee - стажёр, apprentice - подмастерье: An apprentice is a person who learns how to do a job from a skilled person. "Mark is an apprentice chef at the restaurant."
C2/-- tranquil
C1/C1 transaction, B2/B1 deal: A transaction is an act of buying or selling something. "Because the clerk was new at the job, the simple transaction took a long time."
                               A deal is an agreement that you have with another person. "I made a deal with the other company to give us some money."
C2/B2 transition - переход (переходный процесс, состояние): A transition is a process where there is a change from one form to another. "The weather gets colder during the transition from summer to autumn."
      transition - переходить/переводить (to change or to make sth change from one state or condition to another): "They transitioned from print journalism to the digital world."
C2/-- transplant(ation): A transplant is an operation in which a damaged part of one’s body is replaced. "The sick child needed a heart transplant to live."
B2/C1 transparent/opaque, translucent; penetrable/impenetrable; permeable/impermeable; impervious; watertight, waterproof, weatherproof
B2/A2 transport (US usually transportation) - транспорт: "air/freight/road transport", "Applicants must have their own transport.": transportation is any type of vehicle that can carry people or things. "I don’t have a car, so my normal transportation is the train."
B2/A2 transport (US usually transportation) - транспортировка, перевозка
C2/-- tread - наступать, B2/B2 step, tramp, trample, stalk (to walk in an angry or proud way: "She refused to accept that she was wrong and stalked furiously out of the room."), see also: stump:
        To step is to walk. "Be careful where you step."
        To tramp is to put your feet down in a loud, heavy way as you walk. "The baby tramped across the floor as he was learning to walk."
      tread - идти (literary: ступать, поступь, шаг), stride, C1/-- stroll, saunter, amble, mince (семенить), see also: pace: To stroll means to walk slowly and calmly. "My dog and I strolled through the park today."
B2/B2 treasure: A treasure is a collection of valuable things, especially jewels or gold. "They became very rich when they found the buried treasure."
C2/-- treasure, cherish; B2/B2 precious (treasured): To cherish something means to hold it as very important. "I cherish this trophy I won."
													 When something is precious, it is valuable and important. "In a desert, water can be more precious than money."
C2/B1 treat: To treat is to act in a certain way toward someone. "The cats treated the mouse very nicely."
C2/B1 treatment, B2/B2 therapy (C1/-- therapeutic), (curative), healing, --/B2 deal: therapy is treatment for a particular physical or mental illness or condition. "After she broke her legs, she used physical therapy to learn how to walk again."
                                                                					 If something is therapeutic, it helps to cure a disease or makes you healthier. "After a stressful day of working, Phoebe would take a therapeutic bath."
C1/-- trend(y), --/B2 tendency, B1/B1 fashion(able), B2/B1 fancy, fad, craze:
        If something is trendy, then it is very popular and new. "Carlo bought a trendy new car."
        If something is fancy, it is nicer than normal. "Their table was all set for a fancy dinner."
        A fad is something that is popular for a short time. "The hula hoop was a fad for a few years, but it soon lost its popularity."
        A craze is a brief and popular activity or object. "Wearing bright red socks was a craze when I was in high school."
B2/B2 trial - суд, судебное разбирательство, C1/B2 jury, B2/B1 court, --/C1 tribunal - трибунал (an assembly to conduct judicial business: "The military has historically been protected from civilian courts, with any crimes commited by soldiers being decided in closed military tribunals"), kangaroo court - судилище (an illegal court that punishes people unfairly), see also: proceedings:
		    A trial is the way a court discovers if a person is guilty or innocent. "He went on trial for robbing the bank."
        A jury is a group of people that listen to a trial and say if someone is guilty. "The jury listened closely to the attorney before they made their decision."
C1/B2 trial - испытание, тестирование, исследование (the process of testing the ability, quality or performance of somebody/something, especially before you make a final decision about them: "a clinical/field/randomized/controlled trial", "She agreed to employ me for a trial period.")
      trial - испытание, трудный период (an experience that causes difficulties for somebody: "The book is all about the trials of growing up."), tribulation (formal) - невзгоды (a problem or difficulty), see also: trials and tribulations
      trial - испытание, гемор (a person that causes difficulties for somebody: "She was a sore trial to her family at times."), see also: nuisance, liability
      trial - испытать, опробовать (to test something in a formal way to discover how effective or suitable it is: "We will trial the new drug in several hospitals.")
C2/C1 tribute - дань уважения (pay tribute to sb/sth - почтить память)
--/C1 trigger: A trigger is the part of the gun that a person pulls to make it fire. "The man had his finger on the trigger of the gun."
C2/B2 troops, corps: troops are soldiers that fight in groups in a battle. "The troops were all prepared to go into battle."
                     A corps is a division of a military force. "The army had a corps of archers who trained apart from the regular soldiers."
B2/C1 trophy - приз, трофей
C2/B2 trouble, C2/B2 disturb (C1/-- disturbance), C1/-- irritate, B1/B1 annoy(ing, ed), B2/B1 bother, ail, vex (old-fashioned or formal) - disturb, especially by minor irritations, see also: perturb, alarm; B2/-- nuisance - неприятность, неудобство, помеха; зануда, see also: blow, misfortune, disaster, trial:
        To disturb someone means to upset them. "The loud noise disturbed me while I was working."
        To irritate means to annoy someone. "She was irritated when her brother told her that he had lost her camera."
        To annoy someone means to bother them. The flies buzzing around John's head annoyed him very much.
        To ail a person or group is to cause difficulty or pain. "My brother went to the doctor to see what was ailling him."
        A nuisance is a person or thing that is annoying or causes a lot of problems. "The teenager considered her noisy little brothers to be quite a nuisance."
        "There are vexing problems slowing the growth and the practical implementation of big data technologies."
C2/B2 trouble, B2/B1 bother: To bother is to make the effort to do something. "No one bothered to wash the dishes today."
C2/B2 trouble; troublemaker - нарушитель спокойствия: trouble is a problem or a difficulty. "I have trouble working with my boss."
C1/C1 troubled
C2/-- troublesome, troubling, B1/B1 annoying(ly), B2/-- irritating(ly), galling ​(of a situation or fact) - бесяче, maddening, infuriating, pesky (informal) - бесячий, vexatious (old-fashioned or formal)
C1/B2 trust, B2/B2 rely (on/upon sb/sth) / distrust, mistrust, see also: suspect, innocent: To trust is to believe that someone is honest and will do what is right. "I trust my friends; they don't tell my secrets to other people."
                                                                                  			 To rely on something or someone is to trust or depend on them. "The boy rely(y)ied on his older brother to help him."
                                                                                  			 To distrust someone means to believe that they are not honest. "Don’t lend money to someone if you distrust them!"
C1/-- trustworthy, trusty, B1/B1 reliable, dependable(-ly, -ility) / untrustworthy, distrustful, mistrustful(ly), B2/-- unreliable, see also: suspicious:
        If someone is trustworthy, they are honest and truthful. "Mary is one of the most trustworthy people I’ve ever met."
--/C1 trustee
C1/C1 tuition (mainly UK) - репетиторство
--/C1 tuition (US), tuition fees (UK), A2/B1 rent, B1/B2 fare (airfare), B1/B2 fee, B1/B1 tax(ation), duty, tariff, levy, see also: rental:
        tuition is the amount of money paid to go to a school. "University tuitions have increased by fifty percent in the last five years."
        rent is the money people pay to someone to live in a certain place. "To live in this house, I have to pay rent at the start of each month."
        A fare is an amount of money paid to use a bus, train, or taxi. "Since he is a senior, my grandfather pays a low fare for the bus."
        A fee is an amount of money that a person or company asks for a service. "I had to pay an hourly fee to speak with my lawyer."
        A tariff is a tax or fee paid on certain imports or exports. "Our tariff on imported wool makes foreign wool more expensive."
      tutor - репетитор, --/C1 mentor - наставник, --/C1 educator - препод, B1/A2 professor:
      	A tutor is someone who gives lessons in a certain subject. "My sister is bad at math. So my mother hired a tutor to help her."
        A mentor is a person with experience or knowledge who advises someone. "The students each chose a mentor to help them with the experiment."
		A professor is a person who teaches in college. "Mike's science professor knows a lot about physics."
C2/C1 twist, wind: To twist something is to wrap it around itself or another thing. "She twisted the spaghetti around her fork."
C2/-- unanimous(ly) - единогласный(но), единодушный(но); unanimity - единодушие
--/C1 undergraduate, postgraduate, B2/B1 graduate: An undergraduate is a student at a college who is studying for a bachelor’s degree. "She was excited to finish high school and enroll as an undergraduate in the fall."
                                                   To graduate from a school means to complete and pass all courses of study there. "At the end of the spring, my friends and I will graduate from high school."
C2/C1 undermine - подорвать, пошатнуть, see also: debilitate, prevent, frustrate, foil, disrupt, weaken, rock: To undermine someone means to betray or weaken their efforts or authority. "The documents helped to undermine the workers’ trust in their bosses’ honesty."
B2/C1 upgrade, update, (bring) up to date, see also: reconstruct, gentrify: To upgrade something means to improve it or make it more efficient. "He upgraded to a real fancy car."
      															            An update is an act of making something more modern. "I’m doing an update on my personal phone directory."
        														            To update something means to make it more modern. "We need to update the programs on our computers."
C1/-- unjustified - незаслуженный, необоснованный, неоправданный, C2/-- undue (formal), see also: spare?
C2/C1 unprecedented
C2/-- truth - истина (a fact or principle that is thought to be true by most people)
B2/B1 truth - правда, C2/A2 true, truthfulness, honesty, veracity (formal), verity (formal) / C1/-- untrue, C1/B2 wrong, B1/B2 incorrect, C2/B2 fake, C1/A1 false, phony, bogus ("The mistake will manifest itself only later, after the bogus value has traveled through several functions."), C1/-- mistaken(ly), erroneous(ly), fallacious (formal), sham, fictitious, falsity (formal), falsehood (formal), mendacity (formal), see also: misguided:
		The truth is a fact or something that is right. "He was telling the truth about seeing a large green snake."
        If something is fake, it is made to look real in order to trick people. "The model was wearing fake eyelashes."
        If something is false, it is not correct. "If you think the answer is false, press the red button."
        When something is erroneous, it is incorrect or only partly correct. "The child held the erroneous belief that time machines were real."
        When something is fictitious, it is made up and not real. "The author said that the characters in her book were completely fictitious."
C1/-- unsuccessfully, C1 in vain
C1/-- unwanted
C2/-- upkeep - содержание, уход (the cost or process of keeping something in good condition: "Tenants are responsible for the upkeep of rented property.", "Money from visitors goes towards the upkeep of the palace and grounds.", "The upkeep of larger old properties is very expensive.", "Council employees are responsible for the upkeep of the gardens."). see also: maintenance
C2/-- upkeep - содержание (the cost or process of giving a child or an animal the things that they need: "He makes payments to his ex-wife for the upkeep of their children.", "You have not made any payments towards the children's upkeep in a year."), see also: maintenance
--/C1 utility - коммунальные услуги: A utility is a business that supplies services such as water or electricity. "If you don’t pay the utilities, you may have your electricity turned off."
      utility - полезность, польза, C1/-- usefulness, see also: asset / uselessness
C1/-- utmost
C2/-- utter, B1/A2 pronounce: To utter a word or a sound means to say it. "The lost boy was so scared that he could barely utter a single word."
                              To pronounce is to say the sounds of letters or words. "Young children often have trouble pronouncing words right."
      utterance (formal) - произнесение (the act of expressing something in words: "The audience was won over by the utterance of a few platitudes about freedom and the family.", literary: ""You may feel moved to give utterance to your thoughts."", "She has one great fear to which she will never give utterance."), B1/-- pronunciation
      utterance (formal) - высказывание (something that someone says: "This was one of her few recorded public utterances.", "In his public utterances he has suggested support for the bill, but in private he speaks against it.", "The senator's recent utterances were promptly rebutted by three of his colleagues on Monday."), see also: statement
C1/-- vacancy - вакансия (a job that is available for somebody to do): "job vacancies", "vacancies for bar staff", "to fill a vacancy", "There’s a vacancy in the accounts department.", "Her going on maternity leave will create a temporary vacancy."
B2/-- vacant - свободный (​(of a seat, hotel room, house, etc.) empty; not being used), see also: unoccupied: "The seat next to him was vacant.", "The hospital has no vacant beds."
B2/-- vacant - вакантный (if a job in a company is vacant, nobody is doing it and it is available for sb to take): "The position fell (= became) vacant when Rodman was promoted.", "The position left vacant in July has not yet been filled."
      vacant - пустой (showing no interest or mental activity), see also: blank: "a vacant look", "She had a vacant look/expression on her face.", "She had large vacant brown eyes."
C1/-- vegetation - растительность
C2/-- vague - рассеянный (absent-minded(ly, ness), forgetful(ly, ness))
C2/-- vain(glory(-ious)),   C2/C1 superior,    B2/-- arrogant(ly), C2/-- conceit(ed(ly)), haughty(-ily), supercilious(ly), imperious(ly), self-important,  hubristic(ally), (condescend(ing(ly)), patronizing):
C2/-- vanity,               C2/-- superiority,       arrogance,    C2/-- conceited,       haughtiness,   superciliousness, imperiousness, self-importance, hubris
        see also: presumptuous(ly, ness)
        If people are vain, they are only concerned with how they look. "Rebecca is so vain that she looks at herself in every mirror."
        vanity is excessive pride or love of one’s own appearance or things one has done. "Her vanity won’t allow her to pass a mirror without looking at herself."
        If someone is arrogant, they think that they are more important than others. "He is very arrogant. fEven though he’s not the boss, he tells everyone what to do."
C2/-- vanity, C1/-- fuss (суета; шум, истерика), see also: scene: A fuss is excited or annoyed behavior that is not useful in any way. "The child made an awful fuss because she didn’t want to go to bed."
C2/A2 vehicle, automobile, tram, aircraft, B1/B2 jet:
		A vehicle is a thing that moves people or things to another place. "A ferry is a vehicle that takes people from one island to another."
		An automobile is a car. "The first automobiles were very different from the ones that exist today."
		A tram is a vehicle like a streetcar that runs on electricity above ground. "I took the tram to Eighth Avenue."
		An aircraft is a vehicle that flies in the sky, such as an airplane or helicopter. "At the museum in the airport, you can see a lot of old aircraft."
C2/-- veil
      vent - отдушина, вентиляционное отверстие
      vent - шлиц, разрез сзади/сбоку пджака или рубашки (a cut in the bottom of a piece of clothing to allow the person wearing it to move more easily: "The skirt is long and straight with two side vents.")
C2/-- vent = C2 give (full) vent to sth - изливать, вываливать, выговориться (to express a negative emotion in a forceful and often unfair way: "I didn't mean to upset anyone, I just needed to vent.", "Please don't shout - there's no need to vent your frustration/anger/rage/spleen on me.", "She vented her spleen (= shouted in an angry way) on the assembled crowd.", "She vented for two minutes about work and her boss.")
      ventilate - проветривать (to cause fresh air to enter and move around a closed space: "a well-ventilated room", "I work in a very poorly-ventilated building.", "Ventilate the room well while applying the paint.", "The bathroom is ventilated by means of an extractor fan."), see also: air ("Leave the window open to air the room.")
      ventilate - высказать, выговориться (to express an opinion or mention a subject so that it can be discussed by others: "She used the meeting to ventilate all her grievances."), see also: air ("The weekly meeting enables employees to air their grievances.", "The issues were openly aired and discussed by the group."), voice - озвучить, выразить ("to voice complaints/criticisms/doubts/objections, etc.", "A number of parents have voiced concern about their children's safety.")
C2/C1 venture (see also: endeavor, enterprise): To venture is to go to a place that may be dangerous. "Even though it was dangerous, they ventured up the mountain."
C2/-- versatile - универсальный, разносторонний ((of a person) able to do many different things: "He's a versatile actor who has played a wide variety of parts.", "Teachers have to be versatile to cope with different ability levels.")
C2/-- versatile - универсальный ((of food, a building, etc.) having many different uses: "Eggs are easy to cook and are an extremely versatile food.", "A leather jacket is a timeless and versatile garment that can be worn in all seasons.")
      versatility
      vessel (сосуд): a container used for holding liquids, such as a bowl, cup, etc.
--/C1 vessel (сосуд), C1/C1 vein, artery: A vein is a tube in the body that carries blood toward the heart. "The blue veins in my hand are just under my skin."
                                          An artery is a tube that takes blood from the heart to the rest of the body. "Eating healthily keeps your arteries clean, so blood can flow with ease."
--/C1 vessel (судно), A2/A2 ship, A1/A1 boat: A vessel is a large ship or boat. "We toured the area aboard a luxury vessel."
C2/C1 viable(-y), C1/C1 feasible, workable, practicable (formal) , see also: credible/ unfeasibleviable, impracticable, unfeasible, unworkable:
        When something is viable, it is capable of doing what it is intended to do. "Her method of solving the math problem seemed viable."
--/C1 vibrant(ly, -cy) - яркий, насыщенный: If something is vibrant, then it is bright and full of color. "Their new shirts were a vibrant shade of red.", see also: radiant, vivid, brilliant (TODO)
--/C1 vibrant(ly, -cy) - энергичный, see also: dynamic
C2/C1 vice, C2/C1 sin, B2/B2 evil, villain(y, ous, arch-villain), fiend, nefarious(ly, ness): A sin is something is wrong for religious reasons. "Taking something that doesn't belong to you is a sin."
                                                                                              evil describes something or someone bad or cruel, not good. "The evil figure scared us all."
                                                                                              A villain is an evil person who breaks the law or hurts others. "The villain escaped with half of my family’s valuables."
C2/C1 vicious(ly, ness), C2/-- inhuman(ely, ity), C1/C1 brutal (brute - жЫвотное), C1/C1 harsh (UNKIND), B1/B1 cruel (also callous, uncaring, unfeeling, brittle), B2/A1 hard (SEVERE), barbaric, barbarous, savage (see also: feral), sadistic, tyrannical, tyrannous, see also fierce
        When something or someone is vicious, they are violent and cruel. "The vicious dog tried to bite the small child."
        A brute is someone who behaves or looks like a violent animal. "My older brother can act like a brute when he doesn’t get his way."
        When someone is cruel, they do bad things to hurt others. "The cruel man yelled at his sister."
        If something or someone is savage, they are very violent or cruel. "Wild animals are very savage when defending their babies."
C1/-- vice versa, see also: contrary: If a statement is vice versa, then its two main ideas are switched with one another. "Students learn from their teachers, and vice versa."
C1/-- vine (also grapevine) - лоза; vineyard - виноградник; winery - винодельня: A vine is a plant that has long, twisting stems and climbs upward. "The branches of the trees were covered with vines."
--/C1 violate (formal) - нарушать (to go against or refuse to obey a law, an agreement, etc.: "to violate international law", "They were charged with violating federal law."), flout, see also: defy
--/C1 violate (formal) - нарушать, вторгаться (to upset or not respect somebody’s peace, privacy, etc.: "The fishermen claimed that ships from another country had violated their territorial waters.", "She accused the press photographers of violating her privacy.")
      violate - осквернять, desecrate(-ion)
      violate (literary or old-fashioned) - изнасиловать (to force somebody to have sex), see also: rape
--/C1 violation (formal) - нарушение (the act of going against or refusing to obey a law, an agreement, etc.: "They were in open violation of the treaty."), see also: offense
--/C1 violation (formal) - нарушение, вторжение (the act of not respecting somebody's rights, peace, privacy, etc.: "gross violations of human rights")
      violation - осквернение (the act of damaging or destroying a holy or special place: "This was a violation of a sacred space."), desecration
      violation (literary or old-fashioned) - изнасилование, see also: rape
C2/B2 violent(ly, -ce), C2/-- forceful(ly), C2/B2 intense(ly), B2/C1 fierce(ly, ness), forcible(-y), C2/-- assertive - напористый, vehement, see also: outraged, furious, see also savage:
        If something is intense, it is very strong. "The skunk made an intense odor that filled the air."
        When people are violent, they want to hurt someone. "The man was put into jail because he was violent."
        If a person or animal is fierce, they are angry or violent. "Wolves are fierce animals. Do not disturb them."
        When somebody is vehement, they are angry and emotional. "Gina was vehement when she found out that Liz was bad in school."
C1/B2 virtual: If something is virtual, then it is very close to being true or accurate. "Because he's popular, Joe is the virtual leader of the group."
C2/C1 virtue - благодетель (a good moral quality in a person, or the general quality of being morally good: "Patience is a virtue.", "He led a life of virtue.", "She was certainly no paragon of virtue (= her moral standards were very far from perfect).")
        A virtue is a good quality or way of behaving. "My best virtue is forgiveness."
C2/C1 virtue - польза, толк, преимущество (an advantage or good thing: "Would there be any virtue in taking an earlier train?", "The plan has the virtue of simplicity.", "He was extolling the virtues of the internet.", "They could see no virtue in discussing it further."), see also: advantage
C1/B2 visible(-y, ility), audible, see also: perceptible(-y), noticeable(-y), / B2/C1 invisible(-y, ility), inaudible, imperceptible; C1/-- unnoticed (незамеченный):
        If something is audible, then it is able to be heard. "The sound of the drums was audible from miles away."
C1/B2 vision, hearing: vision is the act of seeing. "The eye doctor tested my vision."
C2/B2 volume, voluminous, volumetric
C2/-- vomit, spew, B2 throw up, puke (slang); belch - отрыгивать (отрыжка), изрыгать (= spew), burp = informal for belch: To vomit means to have food come up from one’s stomach. "It is common for women to vomit when they are pregnant."
C2/C1 vow, oath, --/C1 pledge; C2/C1 undertake (C2/-- undertaking), C1/C1 assurance, B2/-- guarantee, B2/B2 bond, B2/B2 commitment (приверженность; заинтересованность; обязательство), word; B2/B2 swear, C2/B2 commit(ment, tee, see also: perpetrate), B1/A2 promise:
        To vow means to make a promise to do something. "Before they are allowed to work, all senators must vow to never accept bribes."
        An oath is a formal, often public, promise. "Judges must take an oath to be fair to everyone in court."
        To pledge means to make a promise to do something. "Her mother pledged that she would find her daughter’s lost kitten."
        undertaking - any piece of work that is attempted: "Let my epitaph be, Here lies Joseph, who was unsuccessful in all his undertakings."
        To guarantee means to know something will happen. "I guarantee that the sun will come up in the morning."
        To swear means to promise to do something. "I will put my hand on the Bible and swear to do my best for the country."
        To commit to something is to promise to do it. "Seth wanted to go home, but he had committed to finishing the job."
        To promise is to say you will do something for sure. "He promised to return my key by tomorrow."
B2/C1 ward - палата ("a geriatric/maternity/surgical/psychiatric/children’s ward"), warder (тюремщик), warden: a person who is responsible for taking care of a particular place and making sure that the rules are obeyed (a park/traffic/forest/game warden)
      ward - административный район, see also: county
      ward sb/sth <-> off - отражать, отбиваться, fend sb/sth <-> off, see also: hold/keep sb/sth at bay: To fend off something means to push it away and avoid it. "Dave spent all night fending off bugs instead of sleeping."
C1/C1 warrior, knight, archer: A warrior is a brave soldier or fighter. "The samurai were some of the most skilled warriors in the ancient world."
                 		 	   A knight is a soldier of high rank and skill who usually serves a king. "He was the best soldier, so the king made him a knight."
							   An archer is a person who uses a bow and arrows. "The expert archer hit the target every time."
B1/B1 wave (sth at sb) - (по)махать рукой, кулаком и т.д., wave sb goodbye: "The driver leaped out, waving his fist and swearing." She waved vaguely in the direction of the house."
C1/B1 wave - колыхаться, see also: rock, swing, ripple
      wave - виться (о волосах)
C2/B1 wave - взмах (refuse with a wave, to give sb a wave)
C2/B2 wave - волна (a sudden increase in a particular activity or feeling; large number): "a wave of protests/strikes/scandals/violence/unrest", "A wave of fear swept over him.", see also: surge, ​shaft
B2/B1 wave - волна (на воде, электромагнитная, гравитационная, ...): A wave is a line of water that moves higher than the rest of the water. "The water was filled with large blue waves."
      wave - волнистость волос
C2/A1 wear, clad (in sth, literary) - одетый в (wearing or provided with clothing: "A few of the villagers came behind, clad in morning robes, and bearing lighted tapers.")
TODO wear
--/C1 weave - плести, C2/-- stitch, B1/-- sew, B1/-- knit, knitwear (трикотаж): To sew means to put pieces of cloth together using string. "I learned to sew when I was a little girl."
                                                                                To weave means to make cloth using horizontal and vertical threads. "We saw a woman weave a blanket on our vacation to South America."
                                                                                To stitch is to use a needle and thread to join pieces of cloth together. "My grandmother stitched the pieces together to make a big blanket."
                                                                                To knit is to make fabric by connecting strings together. "My grandmother knitted me a sweater."
--/C1 weave - TODO
C2/C1 weed - сорняк, seaweed, algae, A1/A2 grass: A weed is a plant, especially one that is not useful or wanted. "The yard of the house was full of ugly weeds."
										          grass is the green leaves that cover the ground. "The grass looked so soft and green."
      weed - полоть (to take out weeds from the ground): "I've been weeding the flower beds."
C2/-- weep, B2/-- sob: To weep means to cry. "My sister told me the dramatic movie would make me weep."
                       To sob is to cry loudly. "I sobbed when my youngest daughter got married."
C2/A2 weight (B2/B1 weigh): To weigh something means to see how heavy it is. "The little dog weighed exactly 3 kgs."
C1/B1 well: You use well to say that something was done in a good way. "The couple can dance quite well."
C1/C1 well, C2/A1 healthy / B1/-- unwell, ailing, sickly - болезненный, indisposed (formal)
TODO well
C2/B2 welfare - (социальная) помощь/защита/обеспечение (practical or financial help that is provided, often by the government, for people or animals that need it: "child welfare", "welfare provision/services/work", "a social welfare programme", "There must be adequate welfare provision for people with disabilities.", "Your taxes pay for welfare benefits such as unemployment and sickness pay."), see also: relief
C2/B2 welfare - благополучие (the general health, happiness and safety of a person, an animal or a group: "We are concerned about the child's welfare.", These organizations have fought very hard for the rights and welfare of immigrants.), C1/C1 well-being:
        welfare is the health and happiness of a person or group. "Having plenty of clean water is necessary for the welfare of people."
C1/C1 whatsoever - ни в кем случае, совершенно, "ни полраза"; B2/C1 whatever, at all: You use whatsoever after a noun to emphasize that there is nothing of that thing. "The boy had no idea whatsoever how to solve the story problem."
C2/-- whereabouts: The whereabouts of someone or something is the place where they are. "The police looked for the lost dog, but its whereabouts were still unknown."
C2/C1 whereby: by which; because of which - ..., посредством чего ...; ..., благодаря которому ..., и т.д.: whereby means by which or through which. "The mayor had a new bridge built whereby the citizens could cross the river."
C2/B2 wide(ly), B1/B2 broad(ly) / C2/B2 narrow: If something is wide, it is large from side to side. "The door was as wide as my arms."
                                                If something is broad, it is wide. "The river is very long and broad."
                                                When something is narrow, it is very thin. "The bridge is too narrow for a car to drive over."
B2/C1 width, C2/-- breadth; B2/C1 widen, C1/-- broaden; B1/A2 height, lofty (formal) - высокий; length; latitude, longitude, altitude:
        breadth is the distance from one side to the other side of something. "The breadth of the northern wall of the house is twenty meters."
        height is how tall someone or something is. "My height is 168 centimeters."
        The length of something is how long it is from one end to the other. "The length of the floor is three meters."
        The latitude of a place is its distance from the equator. "The device was able to tell the traveler his exact latitude."
        The altitude of a place is its height above sea level. "The air was thin at such a highaltitude on the mountain."
C2/-- wilderness: A wilderness is an area where no people live. "If you are not careful, you can get lost in the wilderness."
C2/B2 win - получить, добиться и т.д., see also: accomplish, scramble: "Her plans have won the support of many local people.", "She would do anything to win his love."
A2/A1 win - победить, C1/B2 beat, C2/B2 overcome, B2/B2 defeat: To beat someone means to do better than they do. "I managed to beat everyone in the race."
                                               					To defeat someone is to beat them in a game or battle. "The champion defeated the challenger in the boxing match."
A2/A2 winner, victor: A victor is a group or person that wins in a contest. "At the end of the game, the blue team was the victor."
B1/B1 wing - крыло (птицы, насекомого, самолёта, машины, здания): A wing is the part of an animal that lets it fly. "The bird used its wings to fly across the water."
C2/-- wing - крыло (партии, организации)
      wing - крыло  (здания), see also: extension
C2/-- wink - подмигивать, B2/-- blink - моргать: To blink means to shut the eyes and quickly open them again. "I blinked many times so that my eyes could adjust to the bright light."
B2/C1 wipe - тереть, B2/B2 rub, scour: To rub something is to push on it and move your hand back and forth. "Mom's feet were sore, so she rubbed them."
B2/C1 wipe - стереть, протереть, вытереть (о загрязнениях, поте и т.д.): To wipe something is to slide a piece of cloth over it to clean it. "She wiped the dust from the windows."
B2/C1 wipe - стереть, удалить (об информации из ПК), erase
B2/-- wipe - стереть из памяти, специально забыть, erase, see also: blank sth <-> out, blot sth <-> out
C1/-- witch, wizard; coven - шабаш, fairy: A witch is a woman with magical powers. "People think that witches fly around on broomsticks."
                     					   A wizard is a man who can do magic. "The wizard made gold fall from the sky."
										   A fairy is a small, magic creature with wings. "There are usually fairies in fantasy stories."
C1/C1 withdraw(al), C2/C1 retreat, B2 pull out (of sth), see also: disengage: To withdraw means to leave a place, usually during war. "After losing the battle, the enemy withdrew back to its own country."
                                                                              To retreat means to run away because you have been beaten in a fight. "The army retreated because they were losing the battle."
--/C1 withdraw, retract - отозвать, снять, отказаться, see also: scrap, abolish, overturn, reverse
      withdraw (from sth) (into sth/yourself) - замкнуться (в себе)
C2/-- withdrawn - замкнутый (в плане общения), see also: close, timid, humble
C2/-- woodland (wooded - лесистый); подлесок: undergrowth (US also underbrush); prairie, tundra:
      	If an area is wooded, it is covered with trees. "Jim and Ben decided to go hiking in the wooded area by the river."
      	A prairie is a large flat area of grassland. "The prairie was perfect for a farm because there were hills and trees."
C1/-- worsen, C1/C1 deteriorate(-ion), degenerate, degrade, impair(ment), vitiate (formal), see also: erode, diminish, weaken, slip, see also: blight:
		To worsen is to get worse. "The weather suddenly worsened, and we had to stay inside."
		To deteriorate means to become steadily worse. "The nation’s economy continued to deteriorate despite the politicians’ efforts."
        deterioration is the act of becoming worse. "The lack of care led to the deterioration of the house."
        To impair something means to damage it or make it worse. "Drinking coffee impairs my ability to go to sleep."
C1/-- worsen, C2/C1 intensify, --/C1 heighten, B2/B2 strengthen, escalate, aggravate, exacerbate, exasperate, see also: mount / C1/C1 weaken - ослабить, (о)слабеть, hamstring (often passive: hamstring - ослаблен) - ослабить ("подрезать сухожилия"), attenuate (formal), see also: undermine
        To heighten an emotion means to increase the intensity of it. "The pleasant music heightened their enjoyment of the wonderful dinner."
C2/-- wrinkle, crinkle: A wrinkle is a line on a person's face that happens as they get old. "My grandfather has some wrinkles on his face."
C2/C1 yield, C2/B2 produce, B2/B2 manufacture, B2/C1 craft, C2/-- issue, B1/A1 create, see also: crop:
        To produce something is to make or grow it. "This tree produces apples every year."
        To manufacture something means to make it in a factory. "My father’s company manufactures steel building materials."
        To craft something is to make it using skill. "She crafted the bookcas  e out of solid pine wood and then painted it."
        A product is something that is made. "My sister has many beauty products in her room."
        To create means to make something new. "She created an igloo from blocks of snow."
--/C1 yield, output, B1/A1 product, by-product; B2/B1 production; B2/B1 profit, C1/A1 return, --/C1 proceeds - the income or ptofit arising from a transaction ("His own share in the proceeds was about a hundred thousand dollars"), takings, take (informal); B2/C1 profitable / unprofitable, loss-making:
        output is the amount of something that a person or thing produces. "The boss hired more workers to increase the factory’s output of products."
--/C1 yield, C2/C1 surrender, relent, relinquish (formal), cede (formal), B1/A2 give (sth) up/in, see also: abandon, concede, succumb / C2/-- relentless(ly), unrelenting(ly):
        To yield something means to give up control of it or to give it away. "He had to yield his turn because he was in checkmate."
        To surrender something is to give it up. "The thief surrendered the money to the police when he was caught."
      yield, C2 give way to sth (also make way for sth) - сломаться
      yield, C2 give way to sth (also make way for sth) - уступить дорогу
      yield, C2 give way to sth (also make way for sth) - быть заменённым
      ablaze aflame aflutter alight
B1/A2 abroad, B2/B2 overseas: If someone goes or travels abroad, they go to another country. "My brother wants to go abroad next year."
                              If you go overseas, you go to a country on the other side of an ocean. "John often goes overseas for vacations."
      abseil (US rappel) - [спускаться вниз на верёвке

B1/B2 acceptable (acceptability), C1/-- satisfactory(ly),   tolerable(ly),         bearable,   endurable,   B2/B2 adequate(ly),   adequacy
        If something is satisfactory, it is good enough. "Mina often received satisfactory grades since she studied so hard."
        When something is adequate, it is good enough for something else. "Without adequate notice of the road block, they will have to turn around."
B2/B2 unacceptable(unacceptably), B2/-- unsatisfactory(ly), C2/-- intolerable(ly), unbearable, unendurable, C1/C1 inadequate(ly) (see also: insufficient), inadequacy, C1/C1 gross
        If something is intolerable, then it is so bad that people cannot bear it. "The weather was so intolerable that I had to put on my warmest clothes."
      accost, importune
B2/B2 account - счёт, учётная запись: An account with a bank is an arrangement to keep one's money there. "After I paid for the new car, my bank account was nearly empty."
B2/B2 account - отчёт, описание, B1/A1 report, B1/A1 description: A description of someone or something says what they are like. "I gave a description of the man with the gun and hat to the police."
TODO account for = , see also: comprise, constitute
B2/B2 accountant (--/B2 accounting), bookkeeper (bookkeeping): An accountant is a person whose job is to keep financial accounts. "The accountant helped me keep track of my money."
      accrete
      acne
A2/A1 across: To go across something is to go to the other side of it. "He walked across the board to the other side."
      acumen, sagacity (B2/B2 wisdom), sagacious (B2/-- wise), sage(ly): A sage is someone who is very wise. "Hal always visited the local sage for help with love."
      																	                                 To be wise is to use experience and intelligence to make good choices. "Many people believe that owls are very wise animals."
B2/B2 adopt, foster: To adopt someone is to make them as a part of one's own family. "The girl was adopted by the couple when she was three."
A2/A2 adventure, escapade - выходка: An adventure is a fun or exciting thing that you do. "Riding in the rough water was an adventure."
      adversarial (formal or specialist) - состязательный, противостоящий (involving people opposing or disagreeing with each other: "an adversarial system of justice", "the adversarial nature of the two-party system", "In the old days of two-party adversarial politics, voting was easy.")
B1/-- advertise, tout - пропагандировать, рекламировать, впаривать (в т.ч. билеты (US scalp)); билетный барыга (US scalper):
        To advertise is to tell people about something on TV, radio, etc. "They used a rabbit to help them advertise their product."
B1/A2 against: To be against something is to be touching it or opposed to it. "They both leaned against the wall."
      aggressor, assailant (formal), attacker
      aficionado (formal), devotee, A2/A2 fan
B2/B2 affair - событие, see also: event: An affair is an event or a thing that happened. "My wife and I attended a formal affair over the weekend."
B2/B2 affair - дело, a state of affairs - состояние дел, see also: matter: "world/international affairs", "What I do in my spare time is my affair (= only involves me)."
B2/B2 affair - роман, интрижка, love affair
      affiliate - относить(ся), принадлежать, состоять (to link a group, a company or an organization very closely with another, larger one), see also: relate: "The group is not affiliated to any political party.", "The hospital is affiliated with the local university."
      affiliate - относить(ся), принадлежать, состоять (to join, to be connected with, or to work for an organization), see also: relate: "The majority of people questioned affiliated themselves with a religious group."
      affiliate - филиал (a company, an organization, etc. that is connected with or controlled by another, larger one): "an affiliate of the World Bank", "Our college is an affiliate of the university."
      affiliated - аффилированный, связанный (​closely connected to or controlled by a group or an organization) / unaffiliated: "a government-affiliated institute", "All affiliated members can vote.", "The doctors are affiliated with the Relief Fund."
B1/B1 afford, --/B2 affordable: To afford something means you have enough money to pay for it. "I've been saving my money, so I can afford to buy a new bike."
      alight, see also: disembark
      alight, inlluminated
TODO alight
      alienate, alienation - отчуждённость (the feeling that you have no connection with the people around you or that you are not part of a group)
      alienate, alienation - отчуждение, отталкивание (the act of making somebody less friendly towards you)
      alloy - сплав
      altar - алтарь, жертвенник, sanctuary - алтарь, святилище, shrine - святыня, храм, see also: temple, sacred:
		     An altar is a table used in churches. "The altar had many lit candles on it."
      	 A shrine is a religious building built to honor a person, event, or god. "He prayed at the shrine for an hour."
      allude to somebody/something (formal) - упоминать, намекать, ссылаться, подразумевать (to mention something or something in an indirect way: "The problem had been alluded to briefly in earlier discussions.", "She mentioned some trouble that she'd had at home and I guessed she was alluding to her son.")
      allusion ​(formal) - отсылка, намёк (something that is said or written that refers to or mentions another person or subject in an indirect way (= alludes to it): "The film is full of allusions to Hitchcock.", "Her novels are packed with literary allusions.", "Her poetry is full of obscure literary allusion.")
      allusion ​(formal) - намёк, see also: cue, implication: "She was made uncomfortable by his veiled allusion to the previous night."
B2/A2 along (get along - уживаться, быть в хороших отношениях): along means to move from one part of a road, river etc. to another. "Walk along this tunnel for ten minutes, and you'll see a door on the left."
B1/-- aloud, B1/-- out loud (for crying out loud (informal) - "ради всего святого"): If you say something aloud, you say it so that others can hear you. "My father often reads stories aloud to me and my sister."
B1/B1 already: If something happens already, it happens before a certain time. "It is already time for the movie to start. Let's go in."
      ambient
      ambush, waylay, lurk
      amnesty, pardon: amnesty is a pardon given to prisoners of war. "She was denied amnesty for her involvement in the war."
B1/B2 amount, B1/A2 quantity: An amount is how much there is of something. "Can I use my card to pay for the entire amount?"
                              A quantity is a certain amount of something. "I have a small quantity of milk in my glass."
      anew (formal), afresh: If you do something anew, you do it again and in a different way. "Though he had failed his driving test, he decided to try it anew."
B1/B2 anniversary, centenary (US centennial), bicentenary (US bicentennial), tercentenary - зоолоетие: An anniversary is a day that celebrates something from the past. "My parents went out to eat for their wedding anniversary."
B1/B2 annual(ly), biannual(ly), biennial(ly), perennial(ly), fortnightly - раз в 2 недели: If something is annual, it happens once a year. "The only time I see my aunts and uncles is at our annual family picnic."
      antenatal (UK), prenatal (US) / postnatal, postpartum (specialized); perinatal (specialized)
      anthem (national anthem), hymn, psalm: A hymn is a religious song that often praises a god. "The book was filled with hymns that the worshippers sang."
B2/-- antique, vintage; artefact (US usually artifact): If something is antique, it is very old and rare, and therefore valuable. "My grandmother’s antique rocking chair is worth a lot of money."
                                                        An artifact is an old object made by humans that is historically interesting. "We studied artifacts from an ancient Chinese settlement."
A2/-- anymore (US), any more (UK): anymore means any longer. "Her old pants don't fit her anymore."
B1/A2 appear, B1/A2 seem: To appear is to seem. "She appeared to be sad. She was crying."
      apron - фартук
B1/B2 approach - подходить, подъезжать, приближаться, see also: draw up: To approach something means to move close to it. "The boy approached his school.", see also: close in
TODO  approach, see also: approach, pattern, tactic, mode
B2/B2 approval, approbation / C1/-- disapproval, disapprobation, condemnation, see also: denunciation
      archaic, outdated, C1/-- obsolete, outmoded, see also: clunky: If something is archaic, it is very old or outdated. "To be competitive, we must update our archaic equipment."
                                                                     When something is outdated, it is old and no longer useful in modern time. "Tape players are becoming outdated because of digital music."
                                                                     If something is obsolete, it is not used anymore because something better exists. "Since computers became inexpensive, typewriters have become obsolete."
                                                                     If something is outmoded, then it is no longer in fashion or use. "Black and white television sets are outmoded."
      archaic, B1/A2 ancient, prehistoric; primal - первобытный, основной, primeval (UK also primaeval) - первоначальный, изначальный, primordial (formal) - изначальный:
        If something is ancient, it is very old. "I want to see the ancient buildings in Rome."
        When something is prehistoric, it is from a time when there was no written history. "The scientists found prehistoric pots used by the people in the area."
        If something is primal, then it is very basic or related to the origin of something. "Cooking the food over the camp fire felt like a primal way of making a meal."
      archipelago
B1/A1 area - область, район, участок, зона, see also: plot, stretch, tract
B2/B1 area - область, сфера (a particular subject or activity, or an aspect of it), see also: realm
--/B2 area - площадь (the amount of space covered by a flat surface or piece of land, described as a measurement)
      area = penalty area (football)
      arson - поджог; arsonist - поджигатель
      artisan - ремесленник, craftsman/craftswoman
	  ascribe sth to sb/sth - приписывать, объяснять (to consider sth to be caused, created, or owned by sb or sth), see also: attribute:
	    "He ascribed his failure to bad luck."
	    "To what do you ascribe the enormous success of your latest book?"
	  ascribe sth to sb/sth - приписывать, придавать (to consider that sb/sth has or should have a particular quality), see also: attribute:
	    "People like to ascribe human feelings to animals (= believe animals have human feelings)."
	    "We ascribe great importance to these policies."
	  ascribe sth to sb (formal) - приписывать (to believe or claim that sth was said, written, or created by a particular person), see also: attribute:
	    "After years of research, scholars have finally ascribed this anonymous play to Christopher Marlowe."
	    "This play is usually ascribed to Shakespeare."
	  ascribable to sb/sth - объясним чем-л. (possible to consider as being caused by a particular thing or person), see also: attributable:
	    "Their success is ascribable to the quality of their goods."
	  ascription (of sth) (to sb) - приписывание (the act of considering or stating that a work of art, etc. was written or created by a particular person), see also: attribution:
	    "his ascription of the painting to Sully"
	  ascription (of sth) (to sb/sth) - приписывание (the act of considering or claiming that sth is caused by a particular thing or person), see also: attribution:
	    "the ascription of disease to poor people and foreigners"
	  ascription (of sth) (to sb/sth) - приписывание (the act of considering that sth has a particular quality), see also: attribution:
	    "the ascription of meaning to objects and events"
      ashore - на берег, inland: If something goes ashore, it goes from water to the land. "After a long day of fishing, Glen pulled his boat ashore, so it wouldn’t float away."
                                 If someone goes inland, they travel into the center of a country or land. "The river curved inland near the campground."
B1/A2 athlete: An athlete is a person who plays sports. "Some athletes can play many sports very well."
B1/B1 attach / detach: To attach is to put two things together. "I attached the socks to the clothesline to dry."
B2/-- aubergine (US eggplant) - баклажан
      auditorium: An auditorium is a large building used for public events. "People have gathered at the school auditorium to watch the play."
B2/A2 audience: An audience is a group of people who watch something together. "There was a large audience at the game."
      automate: To automate a company means to install machines or computers to do the work. "When the bank automated, it started installing ATM machines."
B1/-- awake, A1/A1 wake, rouse / B1/A2 asleep: When you are awake, you are not asleep. "Sometimes I lay awake in bed because I am not tired."
										       To wake is to not be sleeping anymore. "He is always full of energy when he wakes in the morning."
                                               When a person is asleep, they are not awake. "The baby has been asleep for hours."
B2/B1 award, B2/B2 reward, B2/-- repay, A2/A2 prize, accolade, bounty, redeem: An award is a prize someone gets for doing something well. "He got an award for having the best grades in class."
                                                        					   A reward is something given in exchange for good behavior or work. "He was given a reward for his excellent performance."
                                                        					   To repay is to pay back or to reward someone or something. "She repayid her friend for all of his hard work with a small gift."
                                                        					   A prize is something of value that is given to the winner. "I won a prize for getting the best grade on my science test."
      awhile (formal or literary): If you do something awhile, you do it for a short time. "Wait here awhile, and I'll bring some tea."
      azure, cerulean (literary) - лазурь, лазурный
      babble - журчать (literary)
      babble - лепетать, бормотать, blather
      babble - лепет, бормотание, шум голосов
      bachelor - холостяк, spinster - старая дева: A bachelor is an unmarried man. "Since he was a bachelor, Jason did his shopping by himself."
B1/A2 background: A background is a person’s education, family, and experience. "The new teacher had a background in science and math."
TODO background, see also: foil
      backpack (also mainly UK rucksack)
      backhanded - сомнительный (a backhanded compliment): "In a backhanded compliment she said he looked very good for his age."
A2/B1 bake, A2/-- roast: To bake means to cook food with heat. "My sister is a good cook. She bakes delicious cakes."
                         To roast something is to cook it in an oven or over a fire. "Mom roasted a turkey for the holiday dinner."
      balk (UK also baulk) - упираться, противиться, не хотеть (to be unwilling to do something or to allow something to happen: "I balkesd at the prospect of spending four hours on a train with him.")
B1/-- barber, B1/-- hairdresser: A barber is a person whose job is to cut hair. "My hair is getting much too long. I’d better go to the barber’s shop."
      basin - бассейн (реки)
      basin - таз
      basin (UK, also washbasin, washbowl; US - sink) - раковина: A basin is large bowl for washing things. A sink is sometimes called a basin. "She filled the basin with water and washed her face."
      beverage - напиток: A beverage is a drink. "The waiter brought our beverages first. Then he brought our food."
      bulb (луковица), tuber (клубень, трюфель), see also: bud
      bulb (лампа): A bulb is the glass part of an electric light. "I had to change the light bulb in my bedroom."
B1/-- bald: If someone is bald, they have no hair. "My oldest brother is bald."
      baleful, menacing, ominous, threatening, forbidding, sinister: If something or someone is sinister, they are evil. "Bad guys in most movies have sinister laughs."
      barbarity
      beaver - бобёр
      bevy - стая; группа людей или одинаковых вещей
B1/A2 beef - говядина, veal - телятина
      beet, beetroot
      beggar
A2/-- beginner, newcomer, neophyte (formal), newbie (informal), rookie (mainly US informal): A newcomer is a person who has recently arrived at a place or a group. "The students happily welcomed the newcomer to the school."
      behead, decapitate(-ion)
      beige (a pale brown colour), ecru (a pale brown or cream colour) - бежевый (цвет)
      besom - веник, broomstick - метла, broom - щётка для подметания, dustpan - совок, mop - швабра, rag - тряпка:
        A broom is a brush with a long handle used for cleaning floors. "My father usually uses a broom to sweep away dust in the basement."
        A rag is a small towel. "Please use a rag to clean the dust off the table."
A2/B1 better
B1/A2 bin: A bin is a container that holds things. "He put his trash in the bin."
A2/A2 biology (biological), botany (botanical), zoology (zoological): biology is the study of living things. "We learned about the human heart in biology class."
																	  biological describes the process of life and living things. "In science, we learned about the biological process of bacterial growth."
																	  botany is the study of plants. "Gardens are the best places for botany."
																	  zoology is a subject in which people study animals. "Helen wants to study zoology because she has always liked animals."
B2/B1 bite, see also: nibble: bite is the act of using your teeth to cut and tear into something. "The boy took a big bite out of his hamburger."
B2/B2 bitter(ly) - горький, B1/-- sour(ly, ness) - кислый, pungent(ly) - острый, резкий, едкий, see also: savoury:
        When something is sour, it has a sharp and unpleasant taste. "I don't like lemons because I think they are too sour."
        If something is pungent, then it tastes or smells strong and sharp. "The garlic made the soup taste so pungent that the chef wouldn’t serve it."
      blacksmith, smith: A blacksmith is a person who makes things out of metal. "The blacksmith pounded the piece of metal until it was flat."
A2/B2 blanket, quilt - лоскутное одеяло, eiderdown, duvet - пуховое одеяло (US also comforter): A blanket is a piece of cloth that you use to keep warm or to sit upon. "I laid a blanket on the ground so that we could have a picnic."
      blight - болезнь растений (any disease that kills plants, especially crops): "potato blight", "Many areas have been devastated by blights which destroyed cereal crops and vines."
      blight - мор, погибель, упадок, see also: devastation
      blight - омрачать, губить, портить, отравлять, наносить вред (to have a bad effect on sth, especially by causing a lot of problems), see also: worsen: "an area blighted by unemployment", "His career has been blighted by injuries.", "A broken leg blighted her chances of winning the championship."
      bliss; ecstasy, euphoria, see also: felicity: bliss is a state of complete happiness. "Every time he sees his girlfriend, he feels a sense of bliss."
                                          euphoria is a feeling of extreme happiness. "The athlete felt euphoria after he won the important game."
      felicity - счастье, see also: bliss: "the dubious felicity of marriage"
      felicity - виртуозность; точность формулировки (the quality of being well chosen or suitable, the fact that words or remarks are suitable and express what was intended): "As a songwriter, he combined great linguistic felicity with an ear for a tune."
      felicity - удачный оборот речи и т.д. (a word or remark that is suitable or right and expresses well the intended thought or feeling): "Her article contained one or two verbal felicities that will stay in my mind for years.", "The pianist’s performance contained no shortage of felicities."
      blot - пятно, клякса, see also: stain (synonyms: stain, fingerprint, streak, speck, mark, smear (, daub (TODO)), spot), smudge, see also: besmeared
      blot - пятно на репутации, "ложка дёгтя"
      blot - запятнать, сделать кляксу
      blot - промокнуть (to remove liquid from a surface by pressing soft paper or cloth on it)
      blot sth <-> out - затмить, закрыть полностью
      blot sth <-> out - стереть из памяти, see also: wipe, blank sth <-> out
      blur
      boilerplate - заготовка для копипаста (text that can be copied and used in legal documents or in computer programs, with only very small changes): "a boilerplate letter", "The document is mostly boilerplate."
      boilerplate - клише (a way of writing or thinking that is not special and does not show any imagination): "The lyrics are boilerplate and uninspiring.", see also: commonplace, platitude
B2/-- boiling
      bolt - болт (крепёж)
      bolt - болт (арбалетная стрела)
      bolt - рулон (a length or roll of cloth or wallpaper), see also: roll
      bolt - засов: "I closed the window and drew the bolt (= slid the bolt across)."
      bolt (of lightning) - удар (молнии), a bolt from the blue - гром с небес (an event or a piece of news which is sudden and unexpected; a complete surprise: "Her dismissal came as a bolt from the blue."), see also: thunder: "The house next to ours was struck by a bolt of lightning."
      bolt - рывок (короткий забег): "The thief tried to make a bolt for the exit."
      bolt - run away, see also: flee: "The blare of bugles was heard, and a few seconds afterwards Jackson, still facing the enemy, shouted: 'By Jupiter, they are bolting, sir'"
      bolt - запирать на засов, see also: lock
      bolt - прикрепить болтами
      bolt (also bolt down) - пожирать, see also: devour
      botch, bungle - испортить, запороть, завалить, седлать плохо, mishandle, mismanage
B1/A1 boot, waders - болотные сапоги: A boot is a heavy shoe that goes over your ankle. "He wore boots so that his feet wouldn't get wet."
      breadline - черта бедности: "Many people without jobs are living on the breadline (= are very poor).", "Most students are on/close to/below the breadline."
      breadwinner - кормилец, tower of strength - надёжа и опора (a person that you can rely on to help, protect and comfort you when you are in trouble): "He was a tower of strength to his sisters when their father died.", "Andrea was a tower of strength to me when I was ill."
      brew - заваривать (кофе), варить (пиво): To brew coffee or tea means to pour hot water over it. "Please brew a fresh pot of coffee."
B2/B2 brick - кирпич, slab - плита, плитка, tile - плитка; укладывать плитку: roof tiles - черепица, floor/ceramic/carpet tiles, shingle - черепица, slate - шифер(ная плита), plate - пластина
        A brick is a block of hard clay that is used for building things, such as walls. "There were several bricks scattered on the ground."
        A slab is a large, thick, flat piece of stone, concrete, metal, or wood. "I looked at various slabs of stone to decorate my house."
        If something is ceramic, it is made of baked clay. "The house’s roof was made of ceramic tiles."
        slate is a dark grey rock that can easily be split into layers. "The roof of the church was made of slate."
B1/-- boot - багажник (US trunk)
B1/B2 brief(ly), A2/A1 short(ly), succinct, concise, lapidary, pithy, terse(ly, ness) / prolix, verbose, wordy, long-winded: If something is brief, it only lasts for a short time. "The meeting this afternoon was very brief."
TODO  brim: see also: fringe, verge, rim
B1/A1 bring: To bring means to take someone or something to a person or place. "Oscar will bring in all the boxes."
      brood - дуться, обижаться, pout, sulk - киснуть, дуться
      brood - выводок (also humourous, about sb's children), see also: litter, offspring
      brooding - таинственный, задумчивый
C2/-- feature, B1/A1 article, A2/A2 program (US program), B2/B2 broadcast(er); bulletin: A broadcast is a television or radio show. "We watched the broadcast of the local news on TV.":
                                                                                         A bulletin is a news report that talks about very recent and important events. "There was a live bulletin reporting on the economy of the city."
B1/-- bucket, pail (mainly US): A bucket is a round container to put things in. "I filled the bucket with water."
B2/B2 bullet: A bullet is a small metal object that is shot out of guns. "bullets come in different sizes for different guns."
      bullet point
      bumble - запинаться, see also: stumble, mumble
      bumble - шебуршать (ковылять вокруг), see also: stumble, mumble
      bunk (also bunk bed)
B2/-- burglar(y)
      burr - колючка (репей), see also: spine
      burr - картавить
      burrow - рыть, see also: dig
      burrow - нора
 TODO burrow
      buoy sb/sth (up) - поддерживать на плаву (buoyant - плавучий)
      bypass - обходить, миновать, skirt - огибать (They skirted the forest and emerged on to a path.), circumvent(tion) (formal)
      bypass - обходной путь, detour, see also: roundabout, indirect
      bypass - (med) шунт
B1/-- cage, coop, aviary (птичник): A cage is something that holds an animal so it cannot leave. "We put the parrots in their cage at night."
      calculus, arithmetic - исчисление: calculus is an advanced type of mathematics. "calculus is an advanced type of mathematics."
                                         arithmetic is math. "I like to study arithmetic at school."
      camper - турист, ночующий в палатке
      camper - дом на колёсах (also camper van, motorhome, US also recreational vehicle, RV)
B2/B1 campus; hall of residence (US dormitory, dorm) - студ. общага, общая спальня (кубрик); dormitory suburb (US bedroom community) - спальный р-н:
		A dormitory is a school building where students live. "I will move into the dormitory at the beginning of the school year."
      canopy (dome, shelter)
B1/-- canteen - столовая, буфет
      canteen - фляга
      car park (US parking lot)
B2/-- cardboard - картон: cardboard is a material made out of stiff paper. It is often used to make boxes. "We packed our things into cardboard boxes and moved to our new home."
      carpenter - плотник, joiner - столяр: A carpenter is a person who builds things with wood. "We hired a carpenter to make a cupboard."
      cart (US) = trolley (UK), wagon: A wagon is a cart you use to carry heavy things. "He used his wagon to carry some of his gifts."
      catchy - легко запоминающийся: "a catchy tune/slogan"
B1/A2 celebrity - знаменитость: A celebrity is someone who is famous. "It was the highlight of the evening when the celebrities arrived."
      celebrity - известность, renown, B2/B2 fame, see also: profile: fame is reputation one has gained among the public. "He had fame and fortune, but he was not happy."
                                                   					  renown is the quality of being well known due to having done good things. "Michael is a singer of great renown in New Zealand."
B2/B2 cell - клетка, камера, келья; padded cell - комната с мягкими стенами, hutch - клетка (деревянная, с решёткой впереди, типа как для кроликов):
        A cell is a small room where a person is locked in. "The jail cell was very small."
B2/B2 cell - клетка организма
      cell - сота (each of the small sections that together form a larger structure, for example a honeycomb)
      cell - ячейка, элемент (​a device for producing an electric current, for example by the action of chemicals or light): "a photoelectric cell" - фотоэлемент
      cell - ячейка (a small group of people who work as part of a larger political organization, especially secretly): "a terrorist cell"
      certify (law, usually passive) - признать психически нездоровым (to officially state that somebody is mentally ill, so that they can be given medical treatment)
      cesspit, cesspool - выгребная яма
B2/B2 chaiTon: A chain is a series of connected loops often used to keep things in place. "The scary dog was secured with a chain."
B1/B1 chapter - глава (книги): A chapter is a part of a book that usually has a number or a title. "The first chapter of a book usually introduces the main character of a story."
      chapter - глава (период), see also: period
B2/B2 chart, B2/-- graph, B1/-- diagram (diagrammatic(ally) - схематичный, see also: crude(ly, ness))), see also: scheme:
		A chart is a list of information. "We used a chart to see how we had improved."
        A diagram is a simple drawing that explains what something is or how it works. "By following the diagram, I was able to put the desk together."
A2/A2 chat, chatter, blab (informal), blabber (informal), prattle - болтать, лепетать (по-детски), B2/-- mumble (see also: bumble), B2/-- mutter, slur, gabble - бормотать, причитать, лепетать (быстро и неразборчиво), jabber - болтать, молоть языком (неразборчиво), rant (on) (about sth) - разглагольствовать, rant at sb - ругаться, rant and rave​ (disapproving) - равть и метать, rave - восторгаться, бесноваться, неистовствовать; орать, бредить:
		To chat is to talk with someone. "Even though they were far apart, the couple chatted every day."
        To chatter means to talk quickly about unimportant things. "The children chattered in the back of the classroom."
B2/B1 chest: The chest is the front part of a person's body under the neck. "The water in the lake was as high as my chest."
B2/-- chew: To chew is to move your mouth to break up food. "I always chew my food carefully before swallowing it."
      childminder, babysitter
      chime, jingle
B2/-- chimney: A chimney is a tall pipe used to carry smoke out of a building. "The cat was on the roof sitting next to the chimney."
B1/-- chin: Your chin is the hard part at the bottom of your face. "Luke pointed to the hair on his chin."
B2/B1 chip (microchip): A microchip is a small device inside a computer that holds information. "I can put more data on my computer if I buy a more powerful microchip."
A1/A2 chip (US French fry)
A2/A2 chip (US also potato chip, UK (potato) crisp)
      chip - щепка, крошка, осколок: wood chip, paint chip etc, see also: dice, scrap
      chip - скол, see also: crack (трещина)
      chip - фишка (gambling), figurative: bargaining chip (UK also bargaining counter) - разменная монета: "The hostages are being held as a bargaining chip by terrorist organizations.", "The release of the prisoners was used as a bargaining chip.", "Ownership of the land gives us a strong bargaining counter.", "Should nuclear weapons be used as bargaining chips in arms negotiations?"
      chip ​(also chip shot) - "свеча" ((in golf, football (soccer), etc.) an act of hitting or kicking a ball high in the air so that it lands within a short distance)
      chirp - щебетать, стрекотать (a short high sound made by small birds and some insects): "the chirp of birds/crickets"
B2/B2 choir: A choir is a group of people who sing together. "He had choir practice every day after school."
      chopsticks - палочки для еды
      chronicle - хроника, вести хронику: To chronicle something means to record an event or speech. "The daily newspaper chronicles local and world events."
      chronology (chronological(ly)): The chronology of a series of past events is when they happened. "We learned the chronology of World War II in history class."
      chubby - пухлый (о детях и котиках)
      circumference - длина окружности, diameter: A circumference is the distance completely around a circular object. "The circumference of the Earth is obviously much larger than a baseball’s."
												  The diameter of a round thing is the length across its center. "The diameter of the tree was about 22 centimeters."
B2/B1 client, A2/A1 customer: A customer is a person who buys something at a store. "The customer put a few items in a bag."
      clockwise / anticlockwise, counterclockwise: If something moves clockwise, it moves in a circle in the same direction as a clock. "Turn the screw clockwise to tighten it."
      clog, congest(ion, ed), choke, obstruct(ion): If something is congested, it is full or blocked. "Tom didn’t get home until after dark because the road was so congested."
                                                    To obstruct something means to get in its way. "The car broke down on the road and obstructed traffic for hours."
      clot - сгусток, see also: lump, mass
      clot - свёртываться (when blood or cream clots or when something clots it, it forms thick, almost solid masses or clots: "a drug that stops blood from clotting during operations"), see also: coagulate
A2/-- closet: A closet is a small room used to store things. "Marie has many clothes inside of her closet."
      cloudy, overcast (облачный), sunless (пасмурный), gloomy (хмурый), sullen (literary: угрюмый, мрачный): When the sky is overcast, it is full of clouds and is not sunny. "The sky was overcast in the morning, but by noon it was bright again."
      clove - долька чесночной луковицы
B2/-- clue: A clue is a fact or object that helps solve a mystery or crime. "The detective found some clues on the sidewalk."
      clunk, thud, thump, see also: bang, crash, clap: A thump is the sound of a heavy object falling. "They heard the thump when the bowling ball hit the floor."
      clunky (disapproving) - неуклюжий, громоздкий (heavy and solid in an ugly way), see also: cumbersome
      clunky (disapproving) - неуклюжий, корявый (awkward or badly done): "The writing is clunky in places and full of clichés.", "The movie is ruined by wooden acting and clunky dialogue."
      clunky (disapproving) - тормознутый, корявый, устаревший (not well designed, old-fashioned or slow: "It was the slow, clunky technology it used that was responsible for the firm's failure.", "The device has clunky controls."), see also: archaic
      clutter - загромождать, захламлять (to fill something in an untidy or badly organized way: "Every shelf is cluttered with ornaments.", "The kids always clutter the hall (up) with school bags and coats and stuff.", "Don't clutter the page with too many diagrams.", (figurative) "I try not to clutter (up) my mind with useless information.", "Try not to clutter your head with trivia.")
      clutter - бардак, беспорядок (a lot of things in an untidy state, especially things that are not necessary or are not being used; a lack of order: "My desk is covered in/full of clutter.", "Try to get rid of screen clutter.", "There's always so much clutter on your desk!", "There was a clutter of bottles and tubes on the shelf.", "Sorry about the clutter in the kitchen."), see also: mess, muddle
      cluttered (up) (with somebody/something) - захламлённый (covered with, or full of, a lot of things or people, in a way that is untidy: "a cluttered room/desk", "The floor is cluttered with hoses, tools and buckets.",  (figurative) "a cluttered mind") / uncluttered
      coagulate - свёртываться (to change from liquid to a more solid state, or to cause something to do this: "The sauce coagulated as it cooled down.", "The venom of this snake coagulates the blood.", "Blood began to coagulate around the edges of the wound."), congeal  - свёртываться, застывать (to change from a liquid or soft state to a thick or solid state: "congealed fat/blood", "The blood had congealed in thick black clots.", "The cold remains of supper had congealed on the plate.", " (figurative) The bitterness and tears had congealed into hatred."), see also: clot
      coagulation - свёртывание (the process by which blood changes into a solid state to form a solid seal: "the coagulation of blood"), clotting (the process in which blood changes into a solid state to form a thick mass or lump: "Platelets are essential for blood clotting.")
      cobbler - сапожник
      cobbles - булыжники на мостовой
      cockpit
A2/A2 colleague, co-worker; B2/B2 fellow: A colleague is somebody you work with. "My colleague helped me finish the job."
                                          A fellow is someone who shares a job or quality with someone else. "All of my fellow patients at the hospital have also complained about the food."
      combust, ignite (вспыхнуть, воспламениться, в т.ч. в переносном смысле), kindle - catch fire, see also: incinerate: "Then a match was kindled and fire applied."
      combustion, see also: incineration
B2/B1 comment, B2/B2 remark, B2/B2 feedback: To comment means to say something that shows your personal opinion. "Tom commented on the poor quality of the food."
                                             To remark is to say something. "The teacher remarked on how quickly the students were learning."
                                             feedback is comments to a person about how they are doing something. "I asked my boss for feedback on my work."
      commission - акт совершения преступления (the act of committing a crime): "the commission of the crime/offence/murder", see also: offence
--/B2 commission - поручить, заказать, see also: contract, employ, charge, engage: To commission someone to do something is to pay them to do it. "The artist was commissioned to create a picture."
TODO commission
      commonplace - банальность, see also: boilerplate, platitude
      commonplace - банальный, see also: hollow, platitudinous
        If something is commonplace, then it is ordinary. "There is nothing commonplace about the way Morris dresses."
      communal(ly) - общинный
      communal(ly) - общий, общественный, совместный, shared: If something is communal, it involves a group of people. "On the weekends, Theo and his son picked up trash in the communal park."
      compartment - отсек, отделение
B1/A2 complain (complaint, grievance), moan - ныть, ворчать, канючить, gripe - ныть, remonstrate, grumble - ворчать (see also: roar), whine - скулить, ныть, жужжать, snivel - скулить, ныть, всхлипывать:
        When you complain, you say that you are unhappy about something. "The workers complained that they were being treated unfairly."
        A complaint is something you say to tell people that you don't like something. "Mom said she didn't want to hear my brother's complaints."
        To gripe means to complain constantly. "Lawrence always gripes when he has to do chores."
        To grumble means to complain. "He grumbled about having to work late on Friday."
      complainant, plaintiff / defendant
--/B2 compound, composite, B2/B1 mixture, see also: synthesis: A mixture is something that is made by mixing other things together. "The walls were built using a mixture of water, rock, and dirt."
      compress - сжать(ся), утрамбовать(ся), уплотнить(ся), condense - сжать (объём текста, информации), compact - утрамбовать, уплотнить, see also: cram:
        To compress something means to press or squeeze it so that it takes up less space. "I compressed my clothes to fit into a single suitcase."
      conjure - наколдовать, забубенить, see also: rustle sth <-> up (for sb/sth)
      concoct - состряпать (приготовить еду), improvise: To improvise something is to do it with whatever is available or without planning. "There was no meat for the pizza, so we improvised with what was in the fridge."
      concubine - наложница
      condense - конденсировать(ся): To condense a gas means to make it a liquid. "The cool air made tiny drops of water condense on the tops of the grass."
      condense - выпаривать (if a liquid condenses or you condense it, it becomes thicker and stronger because it has lost some of its water), distil (US distill), see also: reduce
B2/B2 conflict, strife, see also clash: A conflict is a fight between different people or groups. "The two nations had a conflict over which one could use the water in the river."
                                        There was a lot of strife between Jim and Lisa about what TV show to watch.trife is disagreement or fighting between people or groups. "
TODO conflict - конфликтовать, противоречить, see also: contradict
      congenial - близкий по духу, приятный, благоприятный
--/B2 conspiracy, conspire, conspiratorial(ly); collude, collusion, collusive, see also: plot, connive, be in cahoots (with somebody): A conspiracy is a secret plan made by a group of people to do something illegal. "Some people think that there was a conspiracy to kill American president John Kenne."
      converge - сходиться / diverge - расходиться, отклоняться, see also: divert: To diverge is to become different or to follow a different direction. "The road diverged into two paths that led to our houses."
      concussion - сотрясение мозга
      confiscate - конфисковать (to officially take something away from somebody, especially as a punishment: "Miss Edwards confiscated my phone!", "The teacher threatened to confiscate their phones if they kept using them in class.", "Their land was confiscated after the war.", "Our belongings were temporarily confiscated.", "His passport was confiscated by the police to prevent him from leaving the country."), impound - конфисковать (if the police impound something that belongs to you, they take it away because you have broken the law: "The vehicle was impounded by customs.", "The police impounded cars and other personal property belonging to the drug dealers.", "The car was impounded by the police after the accident."), sequester (also sequestrate, UK) - конфисковать, секвестировать (to take temporary possession of someone's property until they have paid money that is owed or until they have obeyed a court order), see also: seize (TODO)
B2/B2 confuse(-ion), see also: puzzle, stump: To confuse someone means to make them feel like they are unsure. "The sign confused the traveler because it pointed in two directions."
      contrive - придумать, умудриться, see also: conceive, envisage, scramble
      contrived - неестественный, надуманный (artificially formal, see also: artificial(ly, ity): "In lesser hands the story about a young man who discovers life among the dead could be impossibly cute and contrived"), stilted, see also: artificial
      convection: convection is the flow of hot air through gas or liquid. "The weather changed because of convection in the atmosphere."
      cork - пробка, затыкать пробкой
      cot (UK camp bed): A cot is a small portable bed. "At the camp, the boys’ cabin was lined with cots."
A2/-- couch, A2/-- sofa, divan, settee: A couch is a long, soft seat that many people can sit on. "Kim and Martin's new couch was very expensive."
      cradle, cot (US crib)
      cram - впихнуть, втиснуть(ся), влезть, запол(о)нить, stuff, throng, see also: compress: To cram things means to put them into a place that can barely contain them. "He crammed all of his shirts into the top drawer of the dresser."
      crate - ящик
B2/B2 credit
TODO credit
      crescent - полумесяц: A crescent is the curved shape lit on the moon’s face during its early and late stages. "Ten days ago the entire moon was bright, but now only a small crescent is shining."
B1/B2 crew (aircrew, cabin crew, flight crew, ground crew): A crew - 1) a group of workers; 2) the people who work on a play or film who are not actors or actresses. "My father has a crew. They help him build houses."
B1/B1 criminal, B2/B2 offender, outlaw, felon (LAW), malefactor (formal), culprit (виновник), evildoer (злодей), thug(gish) - бандит, хулиган, crook (informal: мошенник); felony, see also: fraud / misdemeanor:
        A criminal is a person who does something against the law. "The police made sure the criminal couldn't move his hands."
        An outlaw is a criminal who hides from the police. "The police passed out posters of the outlaw to all the people."
        A culprit is someone who did a crime or other bad deed. "The police were still searching for the culprit from the robbery."
        A crook is someone who is not honest or who commits crimes. "The manager was arrested by the police for being a crook."
      croak - квакать, квакание; каркать, каркание
      crook of your arm/elbow - изгиб локтя (the place where your arm bends at the elbow). "He was carrying a gun in the crook of his arm."
B1/B2 crop - с/х культуры, урожай, see also: harvest
        A crop is food that a farmer grows. "Wheat is a crop that is made into bread."
      crop - обрабатывать землю, растить на ней урожай (to use land to grow crops), see also: cultivate: "The river valley is intensively cropped."
      crop - уродиться, дать урожай, see also: yield: "The potatoes cropped well this year."
      crop - щипать (траву и т.д. - to bite off and eat the tops of plants, especially grass), see also: graze: "The horses were quietly cropping the grass."
      crop - подрезать (hair, image), see also: trim
A2/A2 cross, traverse: To cross means to go from one side to the other side. "We used his boat to cross to the other side of the lake."
					   To traverse means to move or travel through an area. "The explorer traversed the desert alone on a camel."
      crouch, squat - присесть (на корточки), curl up - свернуться клубочком, see also: cower, snuggle
      crow - кукарекать
      crumple - (с)мять(ся), (с)комкать(ся), (с)морщить(ся), рухнуть (collapse): "He crumpled up in agony." "The bullet hit him and he crumpled into a heap on the floor."
      crutch
      cub, pup (a seal/otter pup), puppy, whelp, joey (a young kangaroo, wallaby or possum): A cub is a baby animal, such as a bear or lion. "The lion cub was crying for its mother."
                                                                                             A pup is a young dog. "All the girl wanted for her birthday was a pup."
      cue - сигнал (a signal for sb to do sth, намёк, see also: signal, hint, allusion, implication: "They started washing up, so that was our cue to leave the party.", "Jon's arrival was a cue for more champagne."
      cue - реплика
      cue - кий
      culinary (formal) - кулинарный, gourmet - изысканый, cookery: If something is culinary, it is related to cooking. "I gained culinary skills after working in a restaurant for many years."
                                                                    If food is gourmet, then it is nicer and more expensive than regular food. "In order to get a gourmet meal, you have to eat at an expensive restaurant."
      cumulative(ly) - совокупный (в совокупности), see also: aggregate?: cumulative describes an increase by adding one after another. "The cumulative snowfall in the area is 50 centimeters per year."
B1/B2 curious(ly), curiosity, inquisitive(ly, ness) - пытливый, любознательный / incurious(ly): When you are curious about something, you want to know more about it. "I opened up the clock because I was curious about how it worked."
      curfew - ограничение по времени (комендантский час, лимит для детей)
B1/A2 curl(y, iness); wavy, B2/-- winding, sinuous (literary) - извилистый, гибкий, squiggly - волнистый, извилистый, squiggle - загогулина, see also: curve:
		A curl is a small piece of something with a round shape. "The colorful ribbons were bent into curls."
        When something is wavy, it is not straight but has a series of curves. "The child drew wavy lines all over the piece of paper."
        If something is winding, then it follows a twisting course. "The winding river turned and looped around the bases of the hills."
B1/B1 currency: currency is the form of money used in a certain place. "Elizabeth had to exchange her dollars for foreign currency."
B2/B1 current - текущий, B2/B1 currently - в настоящее время, see also: presently
--/B2 current - течение, see also: flow, stream: A current is a steady and constant flow of air or water in a river or ocean. "The ocean currents took the ship far off into the sea."
--/B2 current - ток
      curse - проклясть, jinx - сглаз(ить): To curse someone or something is to hope that bad things happen to them. "The witch cursed the village."
A2/B1 curtain, shutter: A curtain is a cloth hung over a window or used to divide a room. "She opened the curtains to let light into the room."
                        shutters are wooden or metal covers in front of a window. "Mr. Smith closed the shutters every night to make his bedroom dark."
B2/B2 dairy: If something is dairy, it is made from milk. "Things like milk and cheese are dairy foods."
B2/-- damp - сырой, влажный, dank - сырой и стылый, musty - затхлый, B1/-- humid, moist(ure); B1/A2 wet; soggy(-ily, -ines); boggy; marshy, swampy:
        If something is damp, it is somewhat wet. "My hair is still damp from my shower."
        When it is humid, there is a lot of water in the air. "It is very humid inside of a sauna."
        If something is wet, it has water on it. "Since my dog was wet, he tried to shake all the water off his body."
        When something is moist, it is slightly wet. "The ground is still moist from the rain last night."
        moisture is small drops of water in the air or on a surface. "If you breathe on a window, moisture from your breath collects on the glass."
B2/-- daytime, nighttime: daytime is the time of the day when the sky is light. "I only allowed my kids to play outside in the daytime."
      debilitate (formal) - истощать, изнурять, выматывать (to make sb’s body or mind weaker: "The troops were severely debilitated by hunger and disease.", "Chemotherapy exhausted and debilitated him.", "Prolonged strike action debilitated the industry."), enfeeble - ослаблять (to make sb or sth very weak: "The soldiers were enfeebled by lack of nutrition."), see also: exhaust, undermine
      debilitating - изнуряющий, инурительный (making somebody's body or mind weaker: "a debilitating condition/disease", "She found the heat debilitating.", "Diabetes can be severely debilitating or even life-threatening if not treated regularly.")
      debility (formal) - немощь, слабость (physical weakness, especially as a result of illness: "chronic muscle debility"), see also: frailty, weakness (TODO)
B2/B2 deck: A deck is a wooden floor built outside of a house or the floor of a ship. "A ship will store many supplies below its deck."
      demanding - тяжёлый, сложный, геморный (​(of a piece of work) needing a lot of skill, effort, etc.), see also: arduous, burdensome, heavy lifting: "the most demanding challenge I have ever faced"
      demanding - требовательный ((of a person) expecting a lot of work or attention from others; not easily satisfied): "a demanding boss/child/teacher", "My grandma became very demanding as she got older."
      demise (formal) - крах, see also: breakdown, collapse
      demise (formal) - смерть, кончина, see also: decease, grave
      dent - вмятина: A dent is damage caused by something heavy hitting something else. "That blue car hit my car, and now there is a small dent in my car door."
      dent - оставить вмятину
B2/B2 deny, renounce, repudiate, abdicate, abjure, disown  - отрекаться (see also: disinherit), recant, retract, forswear, disavow (formal, дезавуировать); отвергнуть, опровергнуть (formal): refute (refutation, refutable), rebut (rebuttal - опровержение, see also: disprove, dismiss, overturn):
        To deny something is to say it is not true. "The boy denied that he broke the window."
        To refute something means to prove that it is false or incorrect. "The bank manager has refuted the claims that he lied to his customers."
      desalination - опреснение (the process of removing salt from seawater: "a desalination plant (= factory)")
B1/A1 detail, minutiae - мелочи: A detail is a small piece of information. "Jane told Ben all the details of her trip to China."
      devout(ly, ness) - набожный, pious(ly) - благочестивый, piety / impious(ly, ness) - нечестивый, impiety
      decease (law or formal) - смерть, кончина (a person's death: "The house will not be yours till after your mother's decease."), see also: grave, demise
C2/-- deceased (formal) - покойный (dead: "her deceased parents", "the recently deceased Member of Parliament") TODO duplicate
        If someone is deceased, they are dead. "We visited the graves of our deceased grandparents."
B1/A2 disease, B2/A2 illness: A disease is an illness that causes specific problems. "He had a disease that caused him to lose his hearing."
TODO desert - пустыня: The desert is an area of land without many plants or water. "Not many plants grow in the desert."
--/B2 desert: , see also: abandon
A2/-- dessert: dessert is a sweet food that you eat after a meal. "Kayla wants ice cream for dessert."
      detergent: detergent is soap that is used to clean clothes or dishes. "My brother added too much detergent to the wash, and bubbles got all over the floor."
B1/-- dial: A dial is the front of a clock. "I looked at the dial to see what time it was."
A2/A2 diary: A diary is a book in which people write their personal experiences. "I do not let anybody read my diary."
      dine (formal), partake (old-fashioned or humorous) - отведать (to eat or drink: "Would you care to partake of a little wine with us?"): To dine means to eat dinner. "The young couple dined at their home."
      disinherit - лишить наследства ("He threatened to disinherit his eldest son.", "Are you worried that your father might disinherit you if you go off the tracks again?", "Her father said he'd disinherit her if she married Stephen."), see also: disown
      disperse
      dispersed
      dissect - вскрыть, препарировать (to cut up a dead person, animal or plant in order to study it): "dissecting instruments", "The biology students had to dissect a rat."
      dissect - разбирать, анализировать (to study something closely and/or discuss it in great detail), see also: scrutinise: "He's the kind of person who watches a movie and then dissects it for hours."
      dissect - разделять, рассекать (to divide something into smaller pieces, areas, etc.), see also: disassemble, dismember, divide (TODO): "The city is dissected by a network of old canals."
      disservice
      dissolution - расторжение, роспуск (the act or process of ending an official organization or legal agreement: "the dissolution of parliament", "the dissolution of their marriage", "The company was set up following the dissolution of the Soviet Union.")
      dissolution - стирание, растворение (the process in which something gradually disappears: "the dissolution of barriers of class and race", "the dissolution of old beliefs", "The treatment is used for the dissolution of kidney stones.")
B2/B2 distract(ed(ly)), digress(ion), sidetrack, see also: divert: To distract someone means to stop them from concentrating on something. "The phone call distracted him so much that he forgot all about his homework."
      ditch - канава, кювет: A ditch is a narrow hole cut into the ground by a road or a field. "When the car slid off of the road, it fell into the ditch."
      ditch - угробить, похерить
      ditch - избавиться, see also: dispose of sb/sth, scrap
B1/B2 dive, see also: plunge: To dive is to jump into water. "I will dive into the lake once we get there."
B2/B2 divorce: divorce is an event in which a marriage is ended. "divorce rates have increased in the past twenty years."
B2/-- dizzy = giddy - головокружительный (в пр. и переносном смысле): If someone is dizzy, then they feel off balance as if they will fall down. "The pregnant woman was dizzy after standing up too quickly."
B1/B1 documentary; factual: When something is factual, it is true. "John learns about history from factual books."
B2/B2 domestic - внутренний, отечественный / A2/A2 foreign, A2/A2 international, A2/A2 foreign(er), oriental - восточный (relating to the countries of East and Southeast Asia, especially China and Japan), the Orient - Восток (old-fashioned, literary), occidental - западный, the Occident - Запад (formal), see also: cosmopolitan:
		If something is international, it involves more than one country. "The United Nations is a powerful international organization."
		If something is foreign, it is from a different country. "Mexican food is a popular foreign food."
B2/B2 domestic - домашний, tame - ручной / stray - бродячий, бездомный (cat, dog, etc.), see also: feral: When an animal is tame, it is not afraid to be near people. "The tame bird rested on his hand."
B2/B1 double: If something is double, it is twice as much, or twice as many. "I paid almost double the amount for that shirt."
      downtime
A2/B2 downtown, B2/B2 suburb - пригород, slum - трущобы (slums, slummy): The downtown is the center of most cities. "The downtown is filled with many tall buildings."
                                                                         A suburb is a small part of a large city. "I grew up in the suburbs only a few minutes outside of the city."
      dowry - приданое
B1/B2 dozen: A dozen is a group of twelve things. "Mom brought home a dozen donuts for us as a treat."
      drill - дрель, свердиль дрелью: A drill is a tool with a point that spins in order to make a hole. "The carpenter used the drill to make several holes in the wood."
      drill (for sth) - бурить (для добычи чего-л.); excavate(-ion) - выкапывать, вести раскопки, B2/B2 dig, delve, see also: burrow:
      	To excavate means to dig on land and remove dirt to look for something. "The team wishes to excavate the site in hopes of finding fossils."
		To dig is to make a hole in the ground. "My dog digs in the yard so he can hide his bones."
      drill - учебная тревога, тренировка, муштра, учения
      drill (sb (to do sth / in sth) - тренировать, муштровать, натаскивать: "a well-drilled team", "The soldiers were being drilled outside the barracks."
      drill (the ball) - сильно пнуть/ударить мяч
B1/B1 duty: A duty is something that a person has to do. "It is parent's duty to take care of their children."
      dye: To dye something is to make it a certain color by using a special chemical. "Valery got her hair dyed at the salon yesterday."
      eclipse: An eclipse is an occasion when the moon moves in front of the sun. "A complete eclipse of the sun is a very rare occurrence."
      effluent (formal), sewage - сточные воды
B1/B1 effort: effort is hard work or an attempt to do something. "He always puts a lot of effort into his studies."
B2/B2 either, B2/-- neither, B2/B1 nor: either is used with ""or"" to say there are two or more possibilities. "You can choose to be either white or black when you play chess."
                                        You use neither to connect two negative statements. "neither the pass on the left nor the pass on the right will lead us home."
                                        You use nor to connect two negative ideas. "I eat neither apples nor oranges. I don’t like either one."
B1/B2 elementary: When something is elementary, it is the first or most simple thing. "Children go to elementary school before high school."
      eloquent - красноречивый, выразительный (able to use language and express your opinions well, especially when you are speaking in public: "an eloquent speech/speaker", "She made an eloquent appeal for action."), silver-tongued (literary) - красноречивый, see also: articulate, fluent
      eloquent - красноречивый, выразительный (able to express a feeling: "His eyes were eloquent.", "The pictures were an eloquent reminder of the power of the volcano.")
      eloquently - красноречиво, выразительно (in a way that uses language and expresses your opinions well, especially when you are speaking in public: "She spoke eloquently on the subject.", "She argued her point eloquently and persuasively."), see also: articulately
      eloquently - красноречиво, выразительно (in a way that shows a lot of feelings: "His face expressed his grief more eloquently than any words.")
      eloquence - красноречие, выразительность (the ability to use language and express your opinions well, especially when you are speaking in public: "a speech of passionate eloquence", "She was renowned for her eloquence and beauty.", "His wit and eloquence made it a joy to be around him."), see also: articulateness (also articulacy, UK), rhetoric
      eloquence - красноречие, выразительность (the quality of expressing a lot of feeling: "the eloquence of his smile")
      embellish, see also: decorate
      embellishment, see also: ornament
      embezzle, (mis)appropriate - присвоить, растратить
B2/B2 enable: To enable a person is to make it possible for them to do something. "Having the key enabled us to open the door."
      enamel - эмаль; покрывать эмалью
      encroach, encroachment
      engulf - поглотить, охватить: "He was engulfed by a crowd of reporters.", "The vehicle was engulfed in flames.", "Fear engulfed her."
      enlist - быть призванным, поступить на службу: To enlist means to join the military. "In their final year at school, the students were asked to enlist in the military."
      enlist - привлечь (помощь), заручиться (поддержкой)
      entangled - запутатьcя. "The bird had become entangled in the wire netting." "The dolphin had become entangled in/with the fishing nets."; disentangle, untangle, unravel, extricate(-ion), inextricable
      entanglement - проволочное заграждение = barbed wire; tangle - (с|за)путанный клубок/узел/ком, "мешанина": A tangle is something or many things twisted together. "The laces of his shoes were in such a tangle that he could not untie them."
      entourage, retinue - свита, see also: escort
      entwine (entwined) - переплетены, сплетены, опутаны, обвиты, interweave (interweaved) - переплетены (also figurative): Their arms were entwined around each other.
      enunciate - to pronounce words or parts of words clearly, enunciation
      enunciate - to express clearly, see also: articulate, formulate
B2/B2 equip: To equip someone is to give them the things needed to do something. "Steve was equipped with the tools needed to do the job."
      equivocate, prevaricate
      escort - сопровождать, see also: conduct
      escort - эскорт, сопровождение, see also: entourage
      Eskimo (a member of a race of people who live in the cold northern areas of North America, Greenland, and Siberia), Inuit (a member of a Native American people who live in the cold northern areas of North America and Greenland)
      estate - участок, владение: An estate is a large area of land owned by a family or organization. "He lived on his father’s estate in the country."
      estate - состояние, B2/B2 fortune
      etiquette: etiquette is the group of rules about how to be polite. "When in Asian countries, bowing is a form of etiquette."
	    et cetera (etc.): etc. is short for “etcetera.” It is used to refer to other unspecified objects. "She was going to bring treats to the party: cookies, muffins, cake, etc."
      evaporate - испаряться (if a liquid evaporates or if something evaporates it, it changes into a gas, especially steam)
      evaporate - испаряться (to disappear, especially by gradually becoming less and less)
      eve
B1/B1 exchange, interchange: To exchange means to give something for another thing in return. "I exchanged my foreign money for American dollars."
                             An interchange of ideas between people is a discussion of each person’s idea. "There was an interchange of ideas between the groups."
B1/B1 excitement, exhilaration: excitement means to feel a lot of happiness about something. "Did you see the excitement in her when the team scored?"
      excrete (specialist) - выделять, выводить (to pass solid or liquid waste matter from the body: "Most toxins are naturally excreted from the body.")
      excretion (specialist) - выделение, выведение ("the excretion of toxic substances through the skin", "It's the corals' excretions that become the scaffolding of coral reefs.", "Excretion is one of several activities common to both plants and animals.")
      exhort (formal) - призывать, увещевать (to strongly encourage or try to persuade someone to do something: " ‘Come on!’ he exhorted (them).", "They had been exhorted to action.", "The governor exhorted the prisoners not to riot.", "The party leader exhorted his members to start preparing for government."), see also: encourage, incentivize, reason with sb
      exhortation (formal) - призыв, увещевание (the act of strongly encouraging or trying to persuade someone to do something: "The book is essentially an exhortation to religious tolerance.", "The play becomes a strong exhortation to enjoy life while you still can.", "Despite the exhortations of the union leaders the workers voted to strike.")
      expanse
B1/A2 experience - опыт: An experience is something you have seen or done. "Rock climbing was a fun experience."
B1/A2 experience - испытывать, ощущать, B2/B1 feel
B1/B1 explore - (ис/об)следовать: To explore is to look for new places. "He wants to explore the world and see new things."
B2/A2 express - выразить, signify, see also: register: To express a feeling or idea means to show others how one thinks or feels. "The nurse expressed her sympathy for the sick patient."
B2/B1 express oneself - (само)выражать(ся), проявлять себя
      express (sth from sth) - выдавливать, сцеживать (to remove air or liquid from something by pressing): "Coconut milk is expressed from grated coconuts.", see also: squeeze?
      express - экспресс, скорый, срочный (moving or being sent fast)
      express - явный, чётко выраженный (​(formal) (of a wish or an aim) clearly and openly stated): "I came here with the express purpose of speaking with the manager.", see also: definite
      extenuate, mitigate - смягчать, уменьшать (что-то негативное, плохое), allay - развеять (to make something, especially a feeling, less strong: "to allay fears/concern/suspicion"), subside - утихнуть, улечься (wear off or die down: "Affliction is allayed, grief subsides, sorrow is soothed, distress is mitigated"), soften, cushion, abate(ment), see aslo: relieve
      extort(ion) - вымогать, extortionate(ly) - грабительский, exorbitant(ly) - чрезмерный, непомерный, завышенный ((of a price) much too high: "exorbitant costs/fares/fees/prices/rents", "It’s a good hotel but the prices are exorbitant.")
      facetious(ly, ness) - неуместно шутливый, flippant(ly), tongue in cheek, tongue-in-cheek
B2/A2 factor, see also: cause: A factor is something that has an effect on the way another thing happens. "Smoking is the main factor that causes lung cancer."
      factor in <-> something | factor something into something - учитывать что-л. (to consider information, esp. as something that might influence a result: "It’s going to feel like 110° there when you factor in the humidity.", "Remember to factor in staffing costs when you are planning the project."), see also: consider, take into account/consideration
B2/B2 fail(ed, ure), err (formal), see also: slip up: To fail means you do not succeed in what you try to do. "Since he failed to get the job, he was sad."
                                                      A failure happens when you do not do something right. "My cooking ended in failure because I burned the food."
                                                      To err means to make a mistake. "The pilot erred in his estimate of the time it would take to make the trip."
B2/-- faint, B2 pass out: To faint means to go unconscious and fall down. "Carol fainted because she hadn't eaten in over a day."
      falter(ing(ly))
      farewell - прощание: A farewell is an instance of saying goodbye or a way to say it. "She got on the plane after we said our farewells."
      faucet - вентиль, valve - клапан, see also: tap: A faucet is a device that controls the flow of a liquid or gas. "Turn off the faucet when you are done brushing your teeth."
                                                       A valve is a device attached to a pipe that controls the flow of liquid or air. "The mechanic removed the dirt to clear the engine valve."
B2/B2 feather: feathers are the things covering birds' bodies. "That bird has orange feathers on its chest."
B2/B1 fence: A fence is a structure around a house or field. "The farmer put up a fence so that no one could walk on her field."
      feral - дикий, одичавший, see also: savage
B1/-- ferry - паром: A ferry is a boat that carries passengers over short distances. "The ferry took the people across the lake."
      feud - вражда (an angry and bitter argument between two people or groups of people that continues over a long period of time: "a family feud (= within a family or between two families)", "a feud over money", "a feud with the neighbours", "a long-running feud between the two artists"), see also: discord, contentiousness, faction
      feud - враждовать (to have a feud with someone: "feuding families/gangs", "He has been feuding with his brother for years.", "They've been feuding with their neighbours for years over a boundary issue.")
      fidget - ёрзать, суетиться, to fiddle with - теребунькать (что-л.)
      fidget - непоседа
      fidgety - беспокойный, restless
      fiery - огненный, see also: flame: If something is fiery, it is burning strongly. "The fiery blaze burned all night long."
      fiery - вспыльчивый
      fiery - пылкий, страстный, B2/B2 passionate(ly), impassioned, fervent(ly) - (formal) пылкий (characterized by intense emotion: "But, to fervent applause and scattered first pumps from two sets of worshipers, he pledged to legally challenge the claims against him."), ardent(ly)
B1/B2 firework (fireworks = a display of fireworks), firecracker (петарда): fireworks are objects that create colored lights when they are lit. "The display of fireworks was so beautiful."
	  firsthand: If something is firsthand, then it is from an original source. "If you want firsthand knowledge, ask someone who saw it."
      fizzy
      flaccid
B2/B2 flame, blaze, B2/B1 burn, char(ed) - обуглить, see also: fiery: A flame is part of fire. "The torch was filled with yellow and orange flames."
                                                    				  To blaze means to burn brightly or powerfully. "The small fire soon blazed into a large dangerous one."
                                                    				  To burn something is to set it on fire. "I burned some wood in the camp fire."
                                                    				  To char means to burn something so that it turns black. "While Frank went inside to get the mustard, he accidentally charred the hotdogs."
      flammable, inflammable - огнеопасный, легковоспламеняющийся, combustible: If something is flammable, then it is able to catch on fire. "Be careful with that blanket near the candle. It is extremely flammable."
      flare (up) - вспыхнуть, накаляться ((especially of anger and violence) to suddenly start or become much stronger: "Tempers flared (up) towards the end of the meeting.", "Tempers flared (up) after a three-hour delay at the Airport yesterday.", "Violence flared (up) again last night.", "Anger suddenly flared in his eyes."), see also: erupt, run high, burst out
      flare up - обостриться ((of an illness, injury, etc.) to suddenly start again or become worse: "His eczema has flared up again.")
      flare up - разгореться ((of flames, a fire, etc.) to suddenly start burning more brightly: "He put more logs on the fire and watched it flare up again.")
      flare up - вспыхнуть, вспылить ((of a person) to suddenly become angry: "She flares up at the slightest provocation.")
      flare - вспылить, реско высказать ((+ speech) to say something in an angry and aggressive way: "‘You should have told me!’ she flared at him.")
      flare - вспыхнуть, полыхнуть (to burn brightly either for a short time or not regularly: "The match flared and went out.", "The fire flared into life.", figurative: "Colour flared in her cheeks.", "His dark eyes flared angrily.")
      flare - (о ноздрях) расширяться (to (cause to) become wider: "The horse backed away, its nostrils flaring with fear.", "He flared his nostrils in rage.", "The sleeves are tight to the elbow, then flare out.")
      flare - (об одежде) расширяться к низу ((of clothes) to become wider towards the bottom: "The sleeves are tight to the elbow, then flare out.", "The skirt fits tightly over the hips and flares just below the knees.")
      flare - вспышка, сигнальный огонь (a device that produces a bright flame, used especially as a signal; a flame produced in this way: "The ship sent up distress flares to attract the attention of the coastguard.", "A flare lit up the sky.")
      flare (also flare-up) - вспышка (a sudden increase in the brightness of a fire: "solar flare", ""a flare-up of the bushfires", "There was a sudden flare when she threw the petrol onto the fire.", "The flare of the match lit up his face.")
      flare (also flare-up) - вспышка, обострение (a period during which a medical condition returns for a time: "Some soap products may trigger eczema flares.")
      flare-up - вспышка, волна (a situation in which sth like violence, pain, or anger suddenly starts or gets much worse: "a flare-up of tension between the two sides", "There was another flare-up of rioting later that day."), see also: outburst, outbreak
B2/-- flashlight (US), B2/-- torch (UK), B1/B2 candle, taper - лучина: A flashlight is a small electric light that you carry in your hand. "We took a flashlight when we went camping."
                                         			   				   A torch is a stick with one end on fire that can be carried in order to give light. "He grabbed a piece of wood and stuck it in the fire in order to make a torch."
      flip, flick: To flip means to press a switch quickly to turn it on or off. "To turn on the lights, just flip this switch."
B1/B2 float: To float is to move on top of water without sinking. "The boy's toy boat floated in the pool."
      floss: candyfloss, dental floss
B2/B1 flow: To flow is to move easily and continuously in one direction. "The water flowed over the rocks and into the lake."
TODO flow, see also: current, stream
B1/A2 flu, influenza, avian/bird/chicken flu, swine flu: The flu is a type of sickness that makes you feel weak or your body hurt. "Since he had the flu, he felt miserable."
B2/-- fluent - свободный (when a language is fluent, it is spoken easily and without many pauses: "He speaks fluent Chinese/Italian/etc.")
B2/-- fluent(ly) - свободно говорящий (when a person is fluent, they can speak a language easily, well, and quickly: "a fluent speaker/reader", "She's fluent in French.", "‘Can he speak German?’ ‘Yes, he’s fluent.’"), see also: eloquent
      fluent(ly) - плавный (flowing in a smooth attractive way: "fluent handwriting", "fluent movements", "The dancers are fluent and poetic in their movement."), see also: fluid
      fluency - свободное владение, беглость (the ability to speak or write a language easily, well, and quickly: "His time here is certainly improving his fluency.", "One of the requirements of the job is fluency in two or more African languages.")
      fluency - плавность (the quality of doing something in a way that is smooth and shows skill: "to build up a fluency in written and spoken English", "The team lacked fluency during the first half.", "Her gestures have grace and fluency.", "As a player he possesses great fluency of movement."), see also: grace
      fluorescent (fluorescence), phosphorescent (phosphorescence): If something is fluorescent, it is such a bright color that it seems to give off light. "She highlighted the key words in the document with a fluorescent yellow pen."
	  flush - краснеть (go red), B2/-- blush - краснеть (go red), румянец, blusher (US also blush) - румяна, rouge, cosmetics:
		To flush means the face becomes red due to heat, illness, or emotion. "After the long race, the runner’s face was flushed."
		rouge is a red powder or cream used as makeup on the cheeks or lips. "Even when she didn’t wear rouge, her cheeks appeared red."
		cosmetics are substances that make the face and skin more beautiful. "Girls often look nicer when they don’t use so many cosmetics."
      flush - смывать (в туалете), flush sth out (with sth) - промыть (жидкостью), flush sth through sth ("Flush clean water through the pipe."), see also: rinse
      flush - вытащить/выгнать/выкурить (из укрытия)
      foam, froth
      foil - фольга
      foil - рапира
      foil - фон, контраст, see also: background
      foil - срывать (план, заговор, преступление и т.д.), thwart, scotch (formal), see also: prevent, undermine, frustrate, disrupt
B1/B2 fond
B2/B2 fool(ish(ly, ness)), B2/B1 silly, B1/A2 stupid, idiot, dim-witted:
		A fool is someone who makes unwise choices. "The girl was a fool for playing too close to the water."
        If someone or something is silly, they show a lack of thought. "I made a silly mistake of dropping mom's vase."
        When someone is stupid, they lack intelligence. "He said something stupid that made everyone angry at him."
        An idiot is a person who is not smart or who has done something silly. "Because he got lost in the forest, the man felt like an idiot."
      footnote - сноска; что-либо незначительное: "The incident seems destined to become a mere footnote in history." "His tumultuous triumph five years ago now seems like little more than a footnote in history."
B2/B2 forbid, B2/B2 prohibit, B2/B1 ban: To forbid is to tell someone they cannot do something. "My father forbids watching TV while we're eating dinner."
                                         To prohibit something means to not allow it. "She prohibited the students from speaking until their work was done."
                                         To ban something is to not let people do it. "Smoking is banned in this building."
      forcible(-y)
      foray (into sth) - набег (a short sudden attack made by a group of soldiers: "Those on the front line make regular forays into occupied territory."), see also: charge
      foray (to/into…) - набег, визит (a short visit, especially with a known purpose: "weekend shopping forays to France", "I made a quick foray into town before lunch to get my sister a present.", "the perfect venue for a foray into the Dales or a trip across the North York Moors"), see also: expedition
      foray (into sth) - проба, попытка (an attempt to become involved in a different activity or profession: "the company’s first foray into the computer market", "She made a brief foray into acting before becoming a teacher."), see also: bid, attempt
B1/B2 forecast, prognosis: A forecast is an idea about what the weather will be like in the future. "The forecast says that it will rain all week."
      foregoing - вышеупомянутый, the foregoing - вышесказанное, aforementioned (formal) - вышеупомянутый, above-mentioned (formal), aforesaid (UK formal), said (LAW) / undermentioned (UK formal), following
      forfeit - лишиться (to lose the right to do or have something because you have broken a rule), see also: forgo, deprive: "If you cancel now, you forfeit your deposit.", "These people have forfeited the right to live in society."
      forfeiture - лишение, конфискация
A2/A2 fork - вилка, вилы, развилка;
      fort: A fort is a small building that is specially built to defend an area from attack. "When the army arrived, they built a big fort on the top of the hill."
B2/B2 fortunate(ly), see also: serendipitous / B2/B2 unfortunate(ly), hapless(ly), alas (увы): If you are fortunate, you are lucky. "I was fortunate to get a seat."
                                                         			                                 If something is unfortunate, it is bad or unlucky. "It was unfortunate that Dave’s team lost, but he still had fun."
                                                         			                                 alas is a word that people say when something bad happens. "I looked everywhere for my purse, but alas, I couldn't find it."
--/B2 fossil: A fossil is the hard remains of a prehistoric animal or plant. "The expert arranged the fossils to build the skeleton of the dinosaur."
      fray - размохрить(ся), разлохматить(ся), протереть(ся), истрепать(ся) (например, при нити внизу штанины, на конце верёвки и тд)
      fray - битва (an energetic and often not well-organized effort, activity, fight, or disagreement: "With a third country about to enter (= take part in) the fray, the fighting looks set to continue.", A good holiday should leave you feeling refreshed and ready for the fray (= ready to work) again.), see also: combat, scrap, scramble
      fray at/around the edges/seams - расползаться по шмам (to start to come apart or to fail): "Support for the leader was fraying at the edges.", "Without the unifying forces of the army and the monarchy, it seems, the nation would begin to fray at the edges."
      freckle - веснушка, mole - родинка
B2/B1 fuel; gasoline (gas, UK petrol), petroleum, oil, kerosene: fuel is something that creates heat or energy. "Heat is the fuel that comes from fire."
                                                                 petroleum is a liquid natural resource from which many fuels are made. "The petroleum at that factory is used to make gasoline."
                                                                 kerosene is a type of oil. It used in some lamps and stoves. "Many people in poor countries cook on kerosene stoves."
      fugitive - беглец; "мимолётный" (also (в т.ч. "преходящий", "кратковременный"): transient, transitory, passing, ephemeral, evanescent, fleeting, brief)
--/B2 function, B2/B2 operate, see also: roll: The function of something is what it does. "The function of a flashlight is to help you see in the dark."
                               To operate means to work or function. "I'm sorry, but the trains are not operateing today."
      funfair, fair, circus, acrobat: An acrobat is a person who entertains people by doing amazing physical things. "There were acrobats at the circus that did impressive and complicated jumps."
      								  A circus is a traveling show with animals and people. "I like to go to the circus to see the animals do tricks."
      funnel - воронка (+ глагол); паровозная/пароходная труба: A funnel is an object with a wide top and a narrow bottom for pouring liquids. "The worker used a funnel when he poured the oil into the engine."
      furnish - меблировать: To furnish means to put furniture in a house or room. "Most homes are furnished with tables, chairs, and beds."
      furnish - предоставлять, see also: render
B2/B2 furthermore, B2/B2 moreover, B1/B2 besides, A1/A1 also, B1 in addition (to), C1 to cap/top it all, B2 on top of sth, A1 as well (as):
        moreover means besides or in addition to something. "It's cold outside. Moreover, the wind is very strong."
        "What other types of music do you like besides classical?" "I don’t think going for a walk is a good idea. It’s quite cold, and, besides, it’s getting late and we don’t want to be out in the dark."
      fuse - запал, взрыватель (have/be on a short fuse - быть вспыльчивым): A fuse is a string that you light on fireworks to make them explode. "The boy lit the fuse on the rocket and waited for it to burst in the sky."
      fuse - предохранитель; установить предохранитель
      fuse - плавить, B2/B2 melt, thaw: To melt means to turn from a solid to a liquid. "The snowman that we made yesterday melted in the sun."
      fuzzy
      gape - зиять (to be or become wide open), B1/-- yawn - зевать, зиять
B1/B1 garage: A garage is the part of a house where people put their cars. "My car does not get dirty because I keep it in the garage."
B2/B2 generate; B2/B1 generation: To generate something means to cause it to develop or begin. "The mayor promised to generate new jobs and programs to help the poor."
                                  A generation is a group of people who live at the same time. "My grandparents are from a different generation than me."
      genteel - утончённый, благородный, see also: dignity, noble, refined: "a genteel manner", "a genteel southern lady", "He lived in genteel poverty (= trying to keep the style of a high social class, but with little money)."
      genteel - благородный (​(of places) quiet and old-fashioned and perhaps slightly boring)
      gentility - утончённость, благородство, see also: refinement
      gentility - благородство (​the fact of being quiet and old-fashioned): "the faded gentility of the town"
B2/B1 gentleman: A gentleman is a nice man. "My grandfather is a kind and helpful gentleman."
      gild - покрывать позолотой, позолотить
      girth - обхват (дерева, талии); подпруга
      glacier - ледник, glacial - ледовый, ледниковый: A glacier is a large piece of ice that moves very slowly. "The North Pole is covered by a huge glacier."
                                                       When something is glacial, it relates to large masses of ice that move slowly. "Penguins thrive in the glacial regions of Antarctica."
      gloat(ing(ly)) - злорадствовать
B2/B1 global(ly): If something is global, it happens all around the world. "Pollution is a global problem."
      gloom(y), murk(y), dusk(y), swarthy (about skin - смуглый), see also: dim(ly, ness): gloom is a state of being almost completely dark. "In the gloom of the morning, it was difficult to see the boat on the lake."
      glossy (glossily, glossiness) - smooth and shiny (глянцевый, блестящий)
A2/B1 glove: A glove is a piece of clothing that covers your fingers and hand. "When it gets cold, I always put on a pair of gloves."
      goggles
      goodwill - доброая воля, дружеское расположение. "Goodwill that is lost is extremely difficult to retrieve." "Releasing the hostages has been seen as a gesture of goodwill/a goodwill gesture."
      gore; gory
B2/B2 gradual(ly):  When something is gradual, it happens slowly. "Children learn to read at a gradual pace. They do not learn right away."
      graffiti: graffiti is words or drawings in public places. "The wall was covered with colorful graffiti."
      granola - мюсли; granola bar - батончик из мюслей
      graze - царапина, ссадина, B2/B2 scratch. "Adam walked away from the crash with just cuts and grazes."
      graze - чиркнуть, царапнуть, B2/B2 scratch, scrape, rake: To scratch is to make small cuts with a claw or fingernail. "I used a stick to scratch my back."
                                                                To scrape something is to rub it very hard with something sharp. "I accidentally scraped the paint off the side of the car."
      graze - пасти(сь), forage, see also: crop: To graze means to eat grass. "The cows grazed in the field."
                                				 To forage means to look around for food. "Many animals hide food in the fall since little can be foraged in winter."
--/B2 greenhouse: A greenhouse is a small glass building that is used to grow plants. "We have a small greenhouse in our backyard where we grow plants."
      grease - жир, смазка: grease is an oily substance put on moving parts, so they work smoothly. "When I was done working on the car, I had grease all over my hands."
      grease - смазывать
      greasy - жирный, сальный
B1/A2 greet: To greet someone means to meet and welcome them. "When my friend came over, I greeted him at the door."
B1/B2 grocer, grocery, groceries: A grocer is a person who sells food. "Our grocer, Mr. Smith, is a very kind man."
B1/-- groom = bridegroom - жених
      groom - конюх
      groom - ухаживать (to clean or brush an animal): "to groom a horse/dog/cat", "Polly spends hours in the stables grooming her pony.", "The horses are all well fed and groomed."
      groom - ухаживать ((of an animal) to clean the fur or skin of another animal or itself): "a female ape grooming her mate", "The cat still sat on its wall, grooming itself.", "Two male lions groom each other to rid themselves of burrs."
      groom - утрамбовывать, накатать (to make the surface of snow smoother, flatter, or harder so it is easier to ski on): "Popular ski trails are groomed as often as once a day.", "You just get your skis and gloves on and head off down freshly groomed slopes."
      groom - готовить, тренировать, see also: prepare (to prepare someone for a special job or activity): "She was being groomed for leadership.", "My boss is grooming me to take over his job next year."
      grove - роща, forest: A grove is a small group of trees. "All the trees in this grove are apple trees."
      						A forest is a place with lots of trees and animals. "I love to go walking in the forest."
      grunt
      guise, pretext
      gush
A2/A2 gym, gymnasium (formal): A gymnasium is a building with equipment that you can use to get exercise. "When I go to the gymnasium, I use the treadmill for 20 minutes."
A1/A1 hair, B1/-- moustache (US usually mustache), A1/-- beard, goatee, plait (US usually braid (braiding - оплётка, cladding - обшивка, facing - облицовка)), pigtails, bun - пучок, ponytail
      herald (formal) - предвестник (a sign that something will happen, change, etc.: "I think of primroses as the heralds of spring.", "The government claims that the fall in unemployment is the herald of economic recovery."), harbinger (formal or literary) - педвестник (a sign that shows that something is going to happen soon, often something bad: "a harbinger of doom"), foretaste - предвестник, 'первые звоночки', 'только ягодки' ("a foretaste of spring", "The recent factory closures and job losses are just a foretaste of the recession that is to come.", "They were unaware that the street violence was just a foretaste of what was to come."), see also: portent, predecessor
      herald - глашатай (in the past, a person who carried important messages and made announcements)
      herald (formal) - предвещать, предзнаменовать, ознаменовать, возвестить (to be a sign that something is going to happen: "The president's speech heralds a new era in foreign policy.", "These talks could herald a new era of peace.", "She felt a dull ache in her right temple, heralding a migraine.", "Bringing the baby home heralds the start of a very different lifestyle.", "Voices and footsteps outside heralded their return."), see also: portend
      herald (formal, passive) - объявлен (to say in public that somebody/something is good or important: "The report is being heralded as a blueprint for the future of transport.", "This drug has been heralded as a major breakthrough in the fight against breast cancer."), see also: proclaim
      harbour (US harbor) - укрывать
      hatch
B1/B1 headline, B1/A2 title: A headline is the title of a newspaper story. "The headline on the front page was about the economy."
B2/B2 headquarters - управление, штаб-квартира, головной офис: A headquarters is a building where the bosses of a company work. "He drove the long route to headquarters because it was a nice day."
      heathen, pagan - язычник
B2/-- hedge
B2/B2 heel - каблук
      heel - крениться (to lean to one side)
      heel - "Рядом!/К ноге!" (команда собаке), (bring/come/etc..) to heel - в подчинение (into a controlled or obedient condition): ""
B1/B2 herb
      heuristic (formal) - эвристический ((of a method of teaching) allowing students to learn by discovering things themselves and learning from their own experiences rather than by telling them things)
      heyday, efflorescence (formal) - время расцвета, see also: prime
      highland(s), highlander / lowland (низина, низменность), lowlander, low-lying:  The highlands are high areas of land, usually with mountains. "The man had a small home in the highlands."
      hiccup - икать; икота
      hijack
      hike - поход, ходить в поход: To hike means to walk in the mountains or forest. "I always bring plenty of equipment with me when I hike."
      hinge - петля (дверная)
B2/B2 hip (бедро сбоку), B2/-- thigh (бедро спереди)
B2/A2 hit
      hoard
      hoarfrost
      holster - кобура
B2/-- hood: A hood is part of a coat that goes over your head. "She put on her hood to keep her head warm."
B2/B2 hook: A hook is a sharp curved piece of metal used for catching or holding things. "The fish went after the sharp hook."
      hound: A hound is a type of dog that is often used for racing or hunting. "The men took their hounds with them when they went on the hunting trip."
B2/B2 household - домочадцы: A household is all the people who live in one house. "Our household is made up of my father, my mother and me."
      hullabaloo - шум, суета (a loud noise made by people who are angry or annoyed), commotion, uproar, see also: tumult: uproar is loud noise caused by people who are very angry or upset. "The fans made a great uproar when their team lost the game."
      hullabaloo - шумиха (public disapproval or complaints)
      hum - гудеть, blare (blaring, blaringly obvious), toot, honk, beep: To hum means to make a low, continuous noise. "The man hummed his favorite song."
      hum - гул, see also: rumble, whirr
      hum - напевать под нос
B2/-- hyphen, B2/-- dash
      hush
      husk - шелуха, see also: peel: "Brown rice has not had the husks removed.", (figurative) "There was only the husk left of his former self."
      husk - шелушить, очищать от шелухи: "Husk the ears of corn and brush them with melted butter."
      husky(-ly), hoarse - хриплый, gruff(ly, ness) - грубый;
      idyllic(ally) - идиллия, пастораль ((literary) a happy and peaceful place, event or experience, especially one connected with the countryside): "Every year thousands of people flee the big cities in search of the pastoral/rural idyll.", see also: serene(ly)
      imbue, infuse
      impart (formal) - передавать, сообщать (transmit, as knowledge or a skill: "Long before writing and books were in common use, proverbs were the principal means of imparting instruction"), see also: convey
      impart (formal) - придавать (to give a particular quality to something), see also: lend
      impede (formal) - , impedance, ; speech impediment = дефект речи; lisp = шепелявость, шепелявить, stammer = заикание, заикаться, see also: bumble
      impediment (formal) - препятствие (sth that makes progress, movement, or achieving sth difficult or impossible: "In a number of developing countries, war has been an additional impediment to progress.", "The level of inflation is a serious impediment to economic recovery.", "Their boycott of the talks constitutes a serious impediment to peace negotiations.", "There are no legal impediments to their appealing against the decision."), see also: deterrent, obstacle, snag
      impediment - дефект, нарушение (a physical problem that makes it difficult to speak normally, hear easily, etc.: "a speech impediment", "People tell me they don't notice my hearing impediment.")
B2/B1 import / B2/B1 export: To import means to bring in a product from another country. "Foods that have been imported are usually more expensive."
                             To export products means to sell them to other countries. "The United States exports many cereals and grains."
      impostor (also imposter) - самозванец (a person who pretends to be someone else in order to deceive others): "He felt like an impostor among all those intelligent people, as if he had no right to be there."
      impostor syndrome - "синдром самозванца" (the feeling that your achievements are not real or that you do not deserve praise or success): "Students from working-class backgrounds often suffer from impostor syndrome, a deep-seated sense that the world of high culture is not for them."
B2/B2 impress(ed, ion), impressionable - впечатлительный (also susceptible - восприимчивый) / unimpressed:
        To impress someone means to make that person proud. "He was able to impress the girls with his new dance."
        An impression is the way of thinking about someone or something. "Most people's first impression of Dr. Giani is that he is mean."
      inchoate (literary), rudimentary (formal) - зачаточный, зарождающий, незаконченный, рудимент
      infatuated, infatuation
      inflame, inflamed, inflammable, inflammatory
      inflect - склонять (to change the form of a word according to its grammatical function): "Verbs inflect for tense and person.", "Most languages of the world inflect.", "Arabic verbs are inflected for person, number and gender."
B2/B1 ingredient: An ingredient is something that is part of a food dish. "The main ingredients in cake are eggs, sugar and flour."
B2/B2 initial(ly): When something is initial, it is the first thing. "The initial step when writing a paper is to find a good topic."
      inn: An inn is a place where travelers can rest and eat. "The visitor got a room at the inn."
      incinerate - сжигать, испепелять (to burn sth completely), see also: combust: "to incinerate waste", "Most of the waste is incinerated.", "The spacecraft and its crew were incinerated by the billion-degree temperatures generated by the fireball."
      incineration - сжигание (the process of burning something completely), see also: combustion: "The energy generated from waste incineration could be used to heat homes.", "The group opposes incineration as a way to dispose of chemical weapons."
      incinerator - мусоросжигательная печь (a device for burning things that are no longer wanted): "a garbage/hazardous-waste incinerator"
      interpose
      inventory, see also: stock: An inventory is a supply of something. "Gwen was checking the inventory to make sure we had what we needed."
B2/B2 investigate(-ion); --/C1 inquire(-y), --/C1 probe, interrogate (допрашивать), interrogative (вопросительный), delve (dig) into, pry (into) - любопытстовать, совать совй нос, see also: plea:
		To investigate means to search for something or learn about it. "The detective went to investigate the crime."
        To inquire about something is to ask about it. "Dad called to inquire about the price of tickets for the show."
        To probe into something means to ask questions to discover facts about it. "The bank probed into his financial history to see if he qualified for a loan."
      invincible (invincibly, invincibility), unbeatable, unconquerable - непобедимый
B1/A2 involve - включать, влечь за собой, B1/B1 mean (HAVE RESULT), entail
B1/A2 involve - заниматься, участвовать, see also: participate, engage in: To involve means to be actively taking part in something. "The whole family was involved in playing the game."
B1/B1 involve - вовлекать, embroil - впутывать, drag sb into sth
B2/-- itch: To itch means to rub the skin with your fingernails. "The rough fabric in his shirt made the back of his neck itch."
      ivory: ivory is a white, hard substance that comes from elephants. "The elephant's long ivory tusks looked very impressive."
      jack - домкрат
      jack - валет (also knave): "a jack of clubs"
      jack - разъём, штекер, гнездо, розетка
B1/B2 jail, B1/A2 prison: jail is a place where criminals go to be punished. "The thief was caught and sent to jail for ten years."
B1/-- jar
B2/A2 jewel(lery), gem: diamond - алмаз, бриллиант, emerald - изумруд, ruby- рубин, amber - янтарь:
		A jewel is a beautiful stone that is worth a lot of money. "A diamond is one of the most expensive jewels in the world."
        jewelry is something that people wear like earrings or necklaces. "The woman looked beautiful with her nice dress and jewelry."
        amber is a hard, yellowish material that comes from trees. "The necklace was made from pieces of amber."
B1/-- jog: To jog is to run slowly. "He jogs every day so he can be healthier."
B2/B2 joint(ly); in tandem with sb/sth, in concert with sb/sth (formal)
      jumble
B2/-- kneel: To kneel is to put one or both knees on the ground. "Daryl got down on one knee and asked Nina to marry him."
      lace - шнурок; кружево; lace (sth) up - зашнуровывать; lace/spike sth with sth - подмешать в напиток что-либо (алкоголь, наркоту, яд); lacy - кружевной
      lakeside - берег озера
A1/A1 late, belated, tardy (formal); tardiness / punctuality (punctual(ly)), prompt(ly): When someone is punctual, they do something or arrive at the right time. "My mother hates being late. She is the most punctual person I know."
																						 If something happens promptly, it happens quickly or on time. "Arrive promptly, or we won’t have time to discuss everything."
      lateral(ly) - боковой; (uni/bi/multi/equi)lateral - (одно/дву/мульти/равно)сторонний; isosceles - равнобедренный
B2/-- laundry: laundry is clothes that have been or need to be washed. "He folded the clean laundry and put the dirty laundry in a basket."
B2/B1 layer, coating = coat (LAYER): A layer covers over something or is between two things. "There was a layer of snow on the tops of the houses this morning."
B2/B2 leaflet, B2/-- booklet, B1/-- brochure, pamphlet
B2/A1 learn, memorize
B2/-- leek
	    legible(-y) - разборчивый (о написанном), intelligible ((of speech and writing) clear enough to be understood), see also: articulate / illegible(-y), unintelligible, see also: vague, inarticulate
      legibility - разборчивость
      libel, slander - клевета(ть), denigrate - очернять, defame - марать, besmirch (literary) - порочить, badmouth (informal) - обливать грязью
      lid: A lid is a top for a box or container that can be removed. "He lifted the lid of the box and revealed her present."
B1/B1 literature (B2/B2 literary): literature is books, plays, and poetry. "Early American literature covers the poetry and stories from 1500 to 1800."
                                   If someone or something is literary, it is involved with literature in some way. "He worked hard to create a successful literary career."
B2/B2 litter - мусор (small pieces of rubbish such as paper, cans and bottles, that people have left lying in a public place: "There will be fines for people who drop litter.", "About two percent of fast-food packaging ends up as litter."), see also: junk
      litter - приплод (a group of animals that are born at the same time and have the same mother: "a litter of kittens/puppies", "the runt (= the smallest and weakest baby) of the litter", "‘Chief’ was born six years ago, one of a litter of 11."), see also: brood, offspring
      litter - наполнитель для кошачьиз туалетов (a dry substance that is put in a shallow open box for pets, especially cats, to use as a toilet when they are indoors: "cat/pet litter", UK: "a litter tray", US: "a litter box")
      litter - настил (the substance, especially straw, that is used for farm animals to sleep on)
      litter - паланкин (a kind of chair or bed that was used in the past for carrying important), palanquin, sedan chair
      litter - мусорить, засирать (to be spread around a place, making it look untidy: "He was arrested for littering.", "Broken glass littered the streets.", "Piles of books and newspapers littered the floor.", "Dirty clothes littered the floor of her bedroom.")
      litter - засорять (be littered with sth = to contain or involve a lot of a particular type of thing, usually something bad: "Your essay is littered with spelling mistakes.", "The newspaper has a reputation for being littered with spelling mistakes.")
      logger, lumberjack, lumberman
      lullaby
      lush, luxuriant(ly) - пышный, literary: verdant, verdure (greenery): If something is lush, then it is full of a variety of large, healthy plants. "The lush jungle was filled with plants, trees, and vines."
      lucid(ity, ly) - ясный, доходчивый, вразумительный (clearly expressed; easy to understand: "a lucid style/explanation", "He gave a very lucid account of the events."), see also: unambiguous, clear
      lucid - в ясном сознании (able to think clearly, especially during or after a period of mental illness: "In a rare lucid moment, she looked at me and smiled.")
B2/-- loaf - буханка, bun - булочка: A loaf of bread is bread shaped and baked in one piece. "Could you please buy a loaf of bread for sandwiches?"
B2/A1 lose
      maize (US: corn) - кукуруза
B2/B2 major / minor: If something is major, it is big or important. "I have a major problem. My boss wants me to redo my project!"
      mangle(d) - исковеркать, изуродовать, изувечить, покалечить, покорёжить (и физически, и в переносном смысле), mutilate, see also: devastate, distort, cripple
      maid - горничная, butler - дворецкий, housekeeping - уборка (номеров, в доме): A butler is the most important male servant in a wealthy house. "Whenever he needed something, he rang a bell, and the butler appeared."
                                                                                     housekeeping is the maintenance of a house or an establishment like a hotel. "housekeeping is not much fun, but it has to be done."
      maiden
B1/B1 mainly, B2/B2 primarily, chiefly, principally
B2/A2 manner: A manner is the way someone does something. "His manner of not looking at someone while speaking, is a bit rude."
      manoeuvre (US maneuver) - манёвр (a movement performed with care and skill): "a complicated/skilful manoeuvre", "You will be asked to perform some standard manoeuvres during your driving test.", "Reversing round a corner is one of the manoeuvres you are required to perform in a driving test."
      manoeuvre (US maneuver) - уловка, отвлекающий манёвр (a cleverly planned action that is intended to get an advantage: "diplomatic manoeuvres", "a complex manoeuvre in a game of chess", "The amendment was somehow introduced by political manoeuvre.", "A series of impressive manoeuvres by the chairman had secured a lucrative contract for the company."), ploy - уловка (words or actions that are carefully planned to get an advantage over sb else: "a clever marketing ploy", "There are various ploys we can use if necessary.", "He only said he had a meeting as a ploy to get her to leave.", "It was a deliberate ploy to smear his opponents.", "It was all a ploy to distract attention from his real aims.", "a ploy for deflecting criticism")
      manoeuvre (US maneuver) - манёвры, учения (a planned and controlled movement or operation by the armed forces for training purposes and in war: "military/naval manoeuvres", "We saw the army on manoeuvres in the mountains.", "The army is on manoeuvres in the desert.")
      manure, dung - навоз, удобрять; dung - навоз, экскременты; muck - навоз, слизь, грязь; muck out | muck sth<->out - to clean out the place where an animal lives; muck sth<->up = mess up:
        dung is solid waste material produced by animals. "There was cow dung all over the field."
      mantle, robe, gown (мантия, халат), bathrobe = dressing gown, B2/-- pyjamas (US pajamas), cape (накидка), cope (риза):
        A robe is a long, loose piece of clothing. "Many people wear robes in the morning."
        A cape is a large cloth that covers one's back and is tied around the neck. "The superhero wore a long red cape."
      masher - давилка, картофелемялка
      matted - спутаный, свалявшийся
      maze, labyrinth (literary): A maze is a system of paths that is complicated and easy to get lost in. "We got lost in the maze in the garden."
A1/A1 meal, breakfast, supper: A meal is a time when food is eaten like breakfast, lunch, or dinner. "Breakfast is my favorite meal because I enjoy breakfast foods."
							   breakfast is the first meal of the day. "I eat breakfast at 8:00 every morning."
							   supper is a meal that is eaten in the evening. "We usually have supper around 6 o'clock at my house."
      mellow - мягкий (не резкий), приятный, сочный ((of colour or sound) soft, rich and pleasant): "mellow flavours", "mellow sounds", "mellow autumn sunlight", "mellow autumn colours", "a mellow mood/atmosphere", "Mellow music and lighting helped to create the right atmosphere.", "The leaves looked golden in the mellow afternoon light."
      mellow - мягкий (не резкий), приятный, сочный ((of a taste or flavour) smooth and pleasant): "a mellow, fruity wine", "coffee with a full mellow flavour"
      mellow - спокойный, расслабленный, умиротворённый ((of people) calm, gentle and reasonable because of age or experience), see also: casual, relaxed: "Dad's certainly grown mellower with age."
      mellow - сонный, расслабленный (relaxed, calm and happy, especially after drinking alcohol), see also: casual, sleepy: "After a few drinks, he became very mellow.", "After two glasses of wine, I was feeling mellow."
      mellow - смягчать(ся) (to become softer and more developed in a pleasing way): "The brickwork will mellow over the years so that it blends with the surroundings."
      mellow - расслаблять(ся), умировтворять(ся) (to become more relaxed): "The years have mellowed her.", "She used to be very impatient, but she's mellowed over time.", "She had mellowed a great deal since their days at college."
A1/A1 message; messenger - посыльный, courier: A message is a set of words that you send to someone. "I left a message for you in the envelope."
                                               A messenger is one who carries information from one place to another. "The messenger delivered an important document to the office."
                                               A courier is someone who takes and delivers mail or packages. "Before trains, most couriers used horses to travel."
      meteorology (meteorological): meteorology is the science that studies the weather. "In order to understand the weather, you have to study meteorology."
                                    If something is meteorological, it is concerned with the science of weather. "The thunderstorm was so large that it became a great meteorological event."
      miasma (literary) - миазмы (a mass of air that is dirty and smells unpleasant: "A miasma of stale alcohol hung around him.", "A miasma of pollution hung in the air above Mexico City."), see also: odor
      miasma (literary) - атмосфера, пучина, бездна и т.д. (a very unpleasant general feeling or character of a situation or place: "After he lost his job, he sank into a miasma of poverty and despair.")
B2/A2 mind(ful(ness))
--/B2 mineral: A mineral is a type of substance found in the Earth. "Rocks are made up of different kinds of minerals."
      misdemeanour
B2/A1 miss
B2/-- mist, A2/-- fog, haze, B2/B2 steam, vapour (US vapor): mist is water that you can see in the air or on a surface. "The forest was covered with mist."
                            								 fog is a thick cloud that is near the ground or water. "I did not want to drive in the thick fog."
															 steam is water that has become hot and has turned into a misty gas. "We could see the steam rise from the boiling water."
      module, modular
      moor - пришвартоваться, tie up
      mooring - место швартовки (the place where a ship or boat is moored): "private moorings", "to find a mooring"
      moorings - швартовы = "mooring ropes" (the ropes, chains, etc. by which a ship or boat is moored): "The boat slipped its moorings and drifted out to sea.", "The crowds cheered as the great ship slipped her moorings and slid out into the Atlantic."
      mortal - смертельный (enemy, combat, danger, threat, etc.)
B2/B2 motivation, B2/B2 enthusiasm, see also: enthusiast(ic): enthusiasm is a very strong good feeling about something. "The crowd showed their enthusiasm for the soccer team by cheering loudly."
      motley
      mould (US mold) - форма для отливки: A mold is a hollow container that is used to make certain shapes. "Using a cupcake mold will ensure that they come out just right."
      mould (A (into B); B (from/out of/in A)) - отливать с помощью формы
      mould ((into) sth) - сформировать, выковать, превратить (сильно влиять)
      mould (to/round) - облегать, плотно прилегать (про одежду)
      mould - форма, род, стиль, ... (a particular style showing the characteristics, attitudes or behaviour that are typical of sb/sth), see also (?) style, sort, kind
      mould(y) (US mold(y)) - плесень на продуктах; yeast - дрожжи; mildew(ed) - плесень на растениях, материалах и предметах; fungus - грибок "Mushrooms and mould are fungi." - грибы и плесень относятся к грибкам; mushroom (toadstool - поганка)
		A mushroom is a fungus with a round top. Some are used as food. "The soup had fresh mushrooms in it."
      mountainous - гористый (having many mountains: "having many mountains")
      mountainous - огромный (very large in size or amount; like a mountain: "mountainous waves"), see also: huge
      mourn (sth) - скорбеть (о чём-л.), grieve (for/over sb/sth) - скорбеть, grieve sb, it grieves sb (that/to do sth) - печалить
--/B2 moving - движущийся; moving target - something that is always changing, making it difficult to count, describe, achieve, etc. "The population at risk of hypertension is a moving target."
B2/B2 moving - трогательный, poignant(ly) - пронзительный, трогательный (see also: piercing(ly)), touching, affecting (formal), see also: sensory: When something is poignant, it causes a very strong feeling of sadness. "The girls cried at the end of the poignant movie."
B2/B1 mud, ooze, filth (грязь): mud is soft, wet dirt. "My brother played rugby in the mud. Now he's dirty."
                                filth is a large amount of dirt or dirty things that disgust you. "There was tons of filth and trash on the shore of the river."
      muffle
      mug - кружка, tankard/stein - пивная кружка, goblet - кубок
      multitude - толпа, простонародье, throng, crowd, mob - толпа, ​the masses - (народные) массы, банда, стадо, pleb (informal, disapproving) - быдлан, Everyman (also everyman) - обыватель
        A crowd is a large group of people. "A large crowd had gathered on the street to see the accident."
        A mob is a large crowd of people that often wants to cause violence. "The copier was destroyed by a mob of angry workers."
      mute (old-fashioned offensive) - немой, see also: dumb
      mute - безмолвный (silent or not speaking): "I gazed at her in mute admiration.", "The president has remained mute about plans to curtail the number of immigrants."
      nag
      nasal
B2/-- naughty, mischievous(ly, ness), mischief,  : When children are naughty, they behave badly or do not do what they are told. "The boy had to go to his room because he was being naughty."
                                                   mischief is behavior that is meant to trick or cause trouble for people. "Ben was up to mischief when he persuaded Ken to paint his face."
      nectar, pollen - пыльца: nectar is a sweet liquid produced by flowers that bees and other insects collect. "Bees use nectar to make their honey."
                               pollen is the tiny yellow powder made in the flowers of plants. "During the spring, the pollen in the air makes some people become sick."
B1/A1 neighbour (US neighbor): A neighbor is a person who lives near you. "I like my neighbor because he's very friendly."
B1/A2 nervous: When a person is nervous, they think something bad will happen. "The boy became nervous when he heard the news."
      nettle - крапива
      nibble - погрызть, надкусить, перекусить едой (to eat something by taking a lot of small bites: "Do you have some peanuts for us to nibble while the party warms up?", "We sat drinking wine and nibbling olives.", "Sheep were nibbling the grass.", "She took some cake from the tray and nibbled at it.")
      nibble - прогрызть, прокусить (to bite something with small bites, especially food: "A mouse has nibbled through the computer cables.", "Jenny's hamster's nibbled a hole in the sofa.")
      nibble - покусывать (to bite something gently and repeatedly: "She nibbled his ear.")
      nibble (at sth.) - задуматься, проявить интерес (to show a slight interest in an offer, idea, etc.: "He nibbled at the idea, but would not make a definite decision.", "He nibbled at the idea of changing careers [=he thought briefly about changing careers], but decided against it in the end.")
      nibble - кусочек, чуток (an act of nibbling sth;  small bite of sth, especially food: "Just take/have a nibble to see if you like the taste.", "I took a nibble from the biscuit., "Somebody’s had a nibble at this biscuit!"), see also: bite
      nibbles - закуски (small pieces of food that are eaten between or before meals, often with alcoholic drinks: "wine and nibbles", "I bought some crisps, nuts, and other nibbles."), munchies (mainly US informal) - закуски (small light things to eat: "We need a few munchies - some peanuts and crackers.", "The boys stopped at a convenience store for some munchies."), see also: snack (TODO)
      nibble away at sth - уменьшать, подрывать, поглощать (to slowly reduce something: "Inflation is nibbling away at spending power.", "Even when inflation is low, it nibbles away at people's savings, reducing their value considerably over several years."), see also: erode
      niggle - смутное беспокойство (​a slight feeling, such as worry, doubt, etc. that does not go away: "a niggle of doubt" - тень сомнения, "Don't you feel even a slight niggle about the morality of your experiments?", "In his mind there was that same old niggle — had he done the right thing?")
      niggle - лёгкая боль, покалывание, зуд, нытьё и т.д. (a slight pain: "He gets the occasional niggle in his right shoulder.")
      niggling - бесячий (мелкий/незначительный, но долго донимающий/беспокоящий, used to describe a slight feeling of worry or pain that does not go away: "a series of niggling injuries", "She had niggling doubts about their relationship.")
      niggling - мелкий/незначительный (not important: "niggling details"), see also: petty, minor (TODO)
      nook - уголок, укромное место (a small space that is hidden or partly sheltered): "a cosy/sheltered/quiet nook", "a shady nook in the garden", "dark woods full of secret nooks and crannies"
      nullify - нейтрализовать, negate (formal) - сводить на нет, see also: offset
      nullify - аннулровать, invalidate(-ion)
      nomad(ic)
B1/A2 none, nil: none means not any of someone or something. "He spent all his money. There is none left."
B1/-- noun; proper noun (also: proper name) - имя собственное (a word that is the name of a person, a place, an institution, etc. and is written with a capital letter, for example Tom, Mrs Jones, Rome, Texas, the Rhine, the White House);
        common noun - имя нарицательное (a word such as table, cat or sea, that refers to an object or a thing but is not the name of a particular person, place or thing)
        abstract noun - абстрактное существительное (a noun, for example goodness or freedom, that refers to an idea or a general quality, not to a physical object)
B1/A2 nowhere: You use nowhere to say that a place or thing does not exist. "Unfortunately, water was nowhere to be found."
B2/B1 nuclear, radioactive: When something is nuclear, it relates to the division or joining of atoms. "nuclear power plants provide inexpensive energy to cities."
                            If something is radioactive, then it lets out, or is related to, radiation. "radioactive materials can be very bad for anyone’s health."
      numb - онеметь, онемевший: When a body part is numb, it does not have any feeling. "After holding my hand under the icy water, my fingers went numb."
B2/A2 nut (орех; гайка): A nut is a hard seed or fruit that comes from some trees and bushes. "To eat a nut, first you have to crack its shell."
      oar, paddle - весло; row, paddle - грести (also pull): A paddle is a piece of wood or plastic that moves a boat across water. "We need a paddle to help us move across the water."
      oats - овёс; oat - овсяный; rolled oats - овсяные хлопья; gruel - каша; porridge (US usually oatmeal) - овсянка
      obstetrician - акушер, see also: practitioner
      obstetrics - акушерство (the area of medicine that deals with pregnancy and the birth of babies: "obstetrics and gynaecology")
      occupied - занятый (being used by someone; with someone in it), see also: busy, engaged / unoccupied, see also: vacant: "The bathroom at the back of the plane was occupied, so I waited.", "Only half of the rooms are occupied at the moment."
      occupied - занятый, увлечённый (busy or interested), see also: busy, engaged: "All the new toys kept the kids occupied for hours.", "At that time I was fully occupied taking care of my elderly mother.", "You will be mainly occupied in checking sales records.", "Only half her time is occupied with politics."
      occupied - занятый, оккупированный ((of a country, etc.) controlled by people from another country, etc., using military force): "occupied territory", "He spent his childhood in occupied Europe."
      omni- - everywhere or everything: omniscient (formal) - всезнающий, omnivore (omnivorous) - всеядный, omnidirectional - всенаправленный, omnipresent (formal) - вездесущий, ubiquitous (formal or humorous), widespread, see also: pervasive
      optic - зрительный, оптический (relating to light or the eyes: "a fibre optic cable", "the optic nerve (= from the eye to the brain)"), auditory - слуховой (of or about hearing: "auditory stimuli", "It's an artificial device that stimulates the auditory areas of the brain."), see also: visual:
        When something is optic, it relates to the eyes or light. "Her blindness was caused by a problem with her optic nerve."
      ordain - посвящать (в сан), рукополагать (invest with ministerial or priestly authority), ordination - рукоположение, consecrate, consecrations:
        "One of the present bishops was consecrated when a quite young boy, and deacons are often ordained at sixteen, and even much earlier"
      ordain - распорядиться, постановить, see also: command, proclaim, law, charter
      orderly - санитар
      orderly - дневальный
      orderly(-iness) - аккуратный, B1/B2 neat(ly, ness), tidy(-ily, -iness): If something is neat, it is very clean or organized well. "My sister always keeps her bedroom very neat."
                                                                              When something is tidy, it is clean and in order. "Leon has always been a very tidy boy."
      orderly(-iness) - мирный (например, протест)
B1/B2 otherwise: otherwise means different or in another way. "It's good to stay active; otherwise, you'll gain weight."
--/B1 ought: If someone ought to do something, then it is the right thing to do. "I ought to take my library books back."
--/B2 outfit; armour (US armor): armor is metal worn by soldiers to protect the body. "The soldier wore armor to protect his body."
B2/B2 overall, B2/B2 general(ly), all in all, see also: in summary: When a thing is talked about overall, the whole thing is considered. "overall, the party was a huge success."
      overthrow
      oyster - устрица
B2/B2 packet (UK) - пакет, пачка, упаковка, B2/B1 package, B1/-- parcel, pack: A parcel is a package of things to be carried or mailed somewhere. "The parcel looked like it had been stepped on by someone."
B2/B2 packet (UK sachet) - пакетик (сахара, соли, перца и т.д.)
      palate - нёбо: The palate is the top part of the mouth. "You can touch your palate with your tongue."
      palate - вкус (изысканный и т.д)
B2/B1 pale(paleness, pallor), wan(ly): When something is pale, it doesn't have a bright color. "The girl's skin was very pale."
B2/-- parachute: A parachute is a device that helps people and things fall to the ground safely. "They used parachutes dropped from airplanes to send supplies to the civilians."
	    paraphrase, rephrase, reword: To paraphrase is to make someone else’s writing or speech shorter. "The students were asked to paraphrase the story they just heard."
      paralysis - паралич: paralysis is the loss of the ability to move all or part of your body. "His paralysis meant that he had to use a wheelchair to get around."
      parry, see also: counter
TODO parry
      passer-by - прохожий
      paternal, paternity, maternal, maternity, maternity leave - декретный отпуск
      paternalism
B1/B2 patient(ly, -ce) / B2/B2 impatient(ly, -ce): patience is the ability to wait for something without becoming upset. "Sue's patience was rewarded by catching her very first fish."
                                                   If someone is impatient, they are not able to wait for things. "Bob was so impatient that he could barely wait for the light to turn green."
      pave: To pave the ground is to lay material on it to make it easier to walk or drive on. "The path was paved with yellow bricks."
      pavement (US sidewalk) - тротуар, дорожное покрытие; B2/B2 concrete - бетон, tarmac (US also blacktop) - асфальт, gravel - гравий, shingle - галька (масса), pebble - галька (одна штука), shingly - покрытый галькой, cement - цемент, marble - мрамор, granite - гранит, flint - кремень, shale - сланец
	    concrete is a substance made from stones. "The man covered the ground with concrete."
        gravel is a combination of small stones mixed with sand. "The ground around the swing set was covered with gravel."
        A pebble is a small, round stone. "We threw pebbles into the lake to make the water splash."
        marble is a type of rock that feels cold and is smooth when cut. "The large house had floors made of marble."
        granite is a very hard type of rock that is often black or pink. "The kitchen counter was made of granite."
        flint is a hard stone that people used to make weapons for hunting. "There are a lot of flint tools in the museum."
B2/-- paw - лапа, (cloven) hoof - (раздвоённое) копыто: A paw is an animal’s foot that has claws or soft bottoms. "The kitten cleaned its paws with its tongue."
      peck (at): When a bird pecks, it bites or hits something with its beak. "The birds pecked at the seeds on the ground."
      peg
      pellet - гранула, шарик (a small hard ball or tube-shaped piece of any substance, often of soft material that has become hard: "iron/lead/wax/plastic/paper pellets", "food pellets for chickens")
      pellet - дробинка (a very small metal ball that is fired from a gun: "shotgun pellets", "The cat had been hit by an airgun pellet.")
      pending
      pendulum - маятник, pendulous - hanging down loosely; dangle - свисать, болтаться, dangly, see also: suspend
      peninsula - полуостров: A peninsula is a large piece of land that is surrounded by the sea on three sides. "The state of Florida is an example of a peninsula."
      percussion - ударные. "Drums, tambourines, and cymbals are all percussion instruments" "The track features Joey Langton on percussion."
B1/A2 perform(ance) - выступать, B2/-- amuse, B1/B1 entertain(ing, ment): To perform is to do something in front of people who watch. "He will perform a song for the class."
                                                                          To amuse someone means to do something that is funny or entertaining. "The singer was very good. She amused the crowd."
                                                                          To entertain someone is to do something that they enjoy. "The clown entertained the kids at the party."
B2/B1 perform(ance) - выполнять, B2/B2 implement: B1/A2 carry sth <-> out: To implement something means to ensure that what has been planned is done. "The school decided to implement a new teaching strategy."
B1/A1 period - период (время), --/C1 spell, see also: stint, interval, see also: chapter: A period is an amount of time when something happens. "In one period in Europe, there were many knights."
B1/-- period - период (в геологии): era -> period -> epoch: An era is a period of time that has something special about it. "During the medieval era, knights wore protective armor."
B1/-- period - урок
      period - точка (UK full stop)
      period - месячные
      perk
      permeate (formal), pervade (formal), pervasive (see also: widespread), diffuse, penetrate; seep, ...
      perpetrate (formal), see also: commit, mount
      perpetration (formal)
      perpetrator (formal)
      perpetuate
      perpetuation
      perpetuity
      pest - вредитель ("insect/plant/garden pests", "common pests such as rats, mice, or cockroaches"), parasite:
      	A pest is an animal or insect that hurts plants or food. "Many farmers put up scarecrows to keep pests off of their corn."
      	A parasite is a tiny animal or plant that attaches to another animal to get food. "The sick dog was covered in parasites."
      pesticide, herbicide, insecticide, fungicide - противогрибковое средство: A pesticide is a substance used to kill insects. "The farmer sprayed his crops with a pesticide to keep bugs away."
A1/A2 pet: A pet is an animal that lives with people. "Out of all my pets, the dog is my favorite."
      petal - лепесток
B1/-- pharmacy (US), B1/-- drugstore (US), chemist's (UK); pharmaceutical: A pharmacy is a place where medicine is sold. "My mother sells medicine to people at the pharmacy."
                                                                           A chemist is a scientist who works with chemicals. "My mother is a successful chemist who helps invent new products."
                                                                           If something is pharmaceutical, then it is related to the development of drugs. "pharmaceutical companies discover new cures to illnesses all the time."
      pickle(d)
      pictorial - графический (shown in the form of a picture or photograph), see also: visual: "Pictorial representation of statistics or data in a chart is a kind of pictogram."
      pictorial - живописный (connected with pictures): "pictorial traditions", "The exhibition is a pictorial history/record of the town in the 19th century."
	  pictorially - наглядно, в графическом виде (​in a way that uses or contains pictures), see also: visually: "The vast bronze doors pictorially chart the island's history.", "It's one of the most pictorially spectacular films we'll see all year."
	  piercing(ly) - пронзительный ((of a sound) high, loud, and unpleasant), see also: shrill(ly, ness): "piercing screams", "a piercing shriek", "She has such a piercing voice."
	  piercing(ly) - пронзительный (of eyes or the way they look at somebody): "a piercing look", "She looked straight at me with her piercing blue eyes."
	  piercing(ly) - пронзительный ((of feelings) affecting you very strongly, especially in a way that causes you pain), see also: poignant(ly): "piercing sadness"
	  piercing(ly) - пронзающий, пробивающий (going through or into something): "Troops have been issued with new armour-piercing anti-tank grenades."
	  piercing(ly) - пронизывающий (very cold, or making you feel very cold): "We shivered in the piercing wind."
      pike
      pincer - клешня, claw - коготь, talon - птичий коготь
      pincers - клещи, tongs - клещи, щипцы, tweezers - пинцет, pliers - пасатижи, кусачки
      pinch - щепотка (dribble - то же самое, о жидкостях, "капелька"), see also: dice, touch
      pinch - щипок
      pinch - ущипнуть, nip (ущипнуть, цапнуть, сдавить), see also: snap: To pinch means to take a piece of skin between one’s fingers and squeeze.
      pinch - зажать, защемить: "I pinched my nose, so I couldn’t smell the odor from the garbage."
      pinch pennies (informal) - жёстко экономить, "считать копейки"
B1/B1 pipe, B2/B1 tube: A tube is a pipe through which water or air passes. "The pile of tubes was going to be put in the ground."
TODO pitch - кувшин
TODO pitch -
B1/A1 place, B1/A2 site, B2/B1 spot; B1/A1 area (see also: stretch), B1/A2 region, locale; B2/B1 setting; B2/B2 venue - место проведения:
        A site is a place. "We found the perfect site for our picnic."
        A spot is a place where something happens. "The kitchen is a good spot to eat meals."
        A locale is a small area or place where something specific happens. "The spa was the perfect locale for my mother to relax and enjoy her vacation."
      plaster - штукатурка, plaster cast - гипсовая повязка, plaster of Paris - гипс (gypsum), алебастр, bandage (US also gauze - марля, бинт):
        plaster is a smooth paste that gets hard when it dries. "He used plaster to fill in the cracks in the old walls."
        A bandage is a piece of cloth used to stop bleeding. "If you cut yourself, please get a bandage from the first-aid kit."
      platitude (disapproving) - банальность, клише (a comment or statement that has been made very often before and is therefore not interesting: "a political speech full of platitudes and empty promises"), commonplace (formal), see also: boilerplate, commonplace
      platitudinous (disapproving) - банальный, see also: hollow, commonplace
      pluck - выдёргивать, выщипывать ( to pull out hairs with your fingers or with tweezers): "expertly plucked eyebrows", "She plucked out a grey hair."
      pluck - ощипывать (to pull the feathers off a dead bird, for example a chicken, in order to prepare it for cooking)
      pluck - выдернуть, вытащить, вырвать (to remove sb from a place or situation, especially one that is unpleasant or dangerous): "She was plucked from obscurity to instant stardom.", "Police plucked a drowning girl from the river yesterday.", "Survivors of the wreck were plucked to safety by a helicopter."
      pluck - выдернуть, вытащить, вырвать (to pull something, especially with a sudden movement, in order to remove it): "Caged birds sometimes pluck out their breast feathers.", "He plucked the letter from/out of my hand, and ran off with it.", "He plucked the wallet from the man's grasp.",
B2/-- plumber - сантехник, plumbing - сантехника, водопровод, канализация и их ремонт: plumbing is the system of pipes used in a home to supply water. "When the plumbing stopped working, no one was allowed to use the toilets."
      poker - кочерга
      poker - покер
      polish: To polish something is to rub it in order to make it shiny. "Mark spent all morning polishing his shoes for the wedding."
      polish sth up - полировать (to rub or brush an object to make it shine, especially a metal or wooden object: "Robert was polishing up some old silver candlesticks.")
      polish sth up - полировать, оттачивать, освежить (to improve a skill, especially when you have allowed it to become less good over a period of time: "I really must polish up my Japanese before we visit Japan next year."), see also: refine
      portent - знамение, предзнаменование, примета (formal: portend - предвещать, foreshadow - предвещать, augur, bode, prefigure, presage, literary: betoken), omen (see also: prospect), see also: herald, superstition:
        An omen is a sign of what will happen in the future. "He thought that seeing a black cat in the street was an omen of bad luck."
      postdate (post-date) - to write a date on a document, especially a cheque, that is later than the date on which you are writing it: "a postdated letter of resignation", "a post-dated cheque", "Luckily, she let me postdate the cheque until the end of the month when I get paid.", "We always pay our credit card bill by post-dated cheque for encashment on the due date." / backdate (sth) - датировать задним числом (to write a date on a document that is earlier than the actual date)
      postdate (post-date) - (to happen or exist after something: "Most manuscripts postdate the stories that have circulated by word of mouth for centuries.", "The new terms and conditions, which postdate the time you used your card, state that if you make a charge in a currency other than sterling, that charge will be converted into sterling.") / predate
B1/B1 pot - коршок, cauldron (US also caldron) - котёл, казан, kettle - чайник, B1/B1 pan, saucepan - кастрюля, frying pan - сковорода; B1/-- saucer, A1/A2 plate, A2/A1 dish, A2/A2 bowl, vase, tray:
        A kettle is a large metal pot used for boiling liquids or cooking food. "The soup was being cooked in a large kettle.":
        A pot is a deep, round metal container used for cooking. "Don't touch the pot on the stove. It's hot."
        A saucer is a small round dish that you set a cup on. "He placed the spoon on the saucer."
        A plate is a flat round thing that you put food on. "I put my plate down so I could put some food on it."
        A dish is a plate. "She put a clean white dish on the table."
        A bowl is a deep, round dish that holds food or liquid. "I ate a bowl of cereal for breakfast."
        A vase is an attractive container where people keep flowers. "The vase was filled with such lovely flowers."
        A tray is a flat plate used to hold food. "The waiter brought our food on a tray."
      pounce - наброситься, атаковать (to jump or move quickly in order to catch or take hold of something: "The lion crouched ready to pounce.", "The cat sat in the tree ready to pounce on the ducks below.", "The police were waiting to pounce when he arrived at the airport."), swoop
      pounce on sth - ухватиться (to accept something quickly and with enthusiasm: "I think if she were given the opportunity to work here, she'd pounce on it.")
      pounce on/upon sth - ухватиться, наброситься (to quickly notice something that somebody has said or done, especially in order to criticize it: "His comments were pounced upon by the press.", "He knows that his critics are waiting to pounce on any slip that he makes."), seize on/upon
B2/A1 pound, bludgeon - отдубасить, buffet [often passive]: To pound something is to hit it many times with a lot of force. "He pounded the nail with the hammer."
B2/B1 poverty (A1/A1 poor, impoverished), need (needy), destitution (destitute (обездоленный)), indigence (indigent - нуждающийся, бедный), homeless, waif - беспризорник, waifs and strays - бездомные:
		poverty is the state of being poor. "poverty is a problem in many countries around the world."
        If someone is needy, they are very poor. "After he lost his job, he became very needy."
      precipit
      precipitate - осаждать(ся) (CHEMISTRY)
      precipitate - осадок (CHEMISTRY), dregs (coffee/wine dregs, the dregs of society/humanity)
      precipitate - спровоцировать, ускорить, see also: compel, provoke, stir sth <-> up
        To precipitate an event means to cause it to happen sooner than normal. "The violent attack precipitated an all-out war."
      precipitate(ly) - поспешный (also: hasty(-ily, -iness), rushed), hurried - торопливый, headlong, head first
      precipitation - поспешность
      precipitation - выпадение в осадок (CHEMISTRY)
      precipitation - атмосферные осадки
      precipitous(ly) - поспешный
      precipitous(ly) - крутой, отвесный, C2/-- sheer - отвесный, C1/B2 steep(ness): If something is steep, then its slope or angle rises or falls sharply. "He rode his bike up the steep hill to reach the top."
      predate (also antedate (formal)) - предшествовать, существовать на момент чего-л. (to have existed or happened before another thing: "These cave paintings predate any others which are known.", "Few of the town's fine buildings predate the earthquake of 1755."), "The crypt antedates the rest of the building by several centuries.", see aslo: precede / postdate
      predate (BIOLOGY) - охотиться, питаться (to kill and eat another animal: "Some species of bat predate small mammals.", "Possums will predate on baby birds and eggs.")
      predation (BIOLOGY) - нападение хищников (the fact that an animal hunts, kills, and eats other animals): "For local cattle ranchers, predation by mountain lions is a problem.", "Goldfish are particularly prone to predation by cats and birds such as herons."
B1/B2 pregnant: When a female is pregnant, she is going to have a baby. "The pregnant woman was shopping for baby clothes."
      prejudge: to make a judgement about a situation before you have all the necessary information - предвосхищать. "Let's not prejudge the situation - we need to hear both sides of the story first."
      premiere - премьера; представлять(ся) впервые
      preoccupy, preoccupied,
B1/A1 prepare - (при|под)готовить(ся), see also: groom: To prepare is to get ready for something. "I prepared my speech to the class."
      pressurize (ususally pressure, UK also pressurise) - давить, прессовать (to strongly persuade someone to do something they do not want to do: "Stop trying to pressurize me!", "He was pressurized into signing the agreement.", "He was pressurized into getting married.", "He felt that he was being pressurized to resign."), see also: compel, pressure
      pressurize - герметизировать (to keep the air pressure in a submarine, an aircraft, etc. the same as it is on earth: "a pressurized cabin")
      presumptuous(ly, ness) - самонадеянный (​too confident, in a way that shows a lack of respect for other people: a person who is presumptuous shows little respect for others by doing things they have no right to do), opinionated (also self-opinionated) - (disapproving) самоуверенный (having very strong opinions that you are not willing to change: "He was opinionated and selfish, but undeniably clever.", "I’ve never met anyone so arrogant and opinionated."), see also: arrogant: "It would be presumptuous of me to comment on the matter.", "Would it be presumptuous of me to ask to borrow your car?"
      preview - превью, sneak preview: A preview is an opportunity to see something before it is available to the public. "The band played us a preview of their new song."
      preview - предпросмотр (a chance to see what something will be like before it happens or is shown): "Click on the print preview button."
      preview (US) - трейлер, see also: trailer (UK)
      preview - предварительно обозревать/ознакомить (to give sb a short account of sth that is going to happen, be studied, etc.): "The professor previewed the course for us.", "On page 11, Sally Gaines previews next week's movies on TV."
      preview - предварительно демонстрировать(ся): "The exhibition was previewed in last week's issue.", "Miller's new play is previewing (= being performed publicly before it officially opens) at the Theatre Royal tomorrow."
B2/B2 pride, B1/B1 proud; B2 take pride in sth/sb - to feel very pleased about something or someone you are closely connected with: "If you don't take professional pride in your work, you're probably in the wrong job."
        When you have pride, you are happy with yourself. "I take pride in getting good grades."
        If someone feels proud, they are happy about what they have done. "She is proud of the picture she drew of her house."
      prig(gish(ness)) - педант, self-righteous(ly, ness), sanctimonious (all are disapproving), see also: hypocritical
      pristine - нетронутый, первозданный, девственно-чистый, see also: intact
      pristine - нетронутый, безупречный, как новый, brand new - совершенно новый, "с нуля", see also: immaculate
      prodigal(ly) - богатый, обильный, многочисленный (very great in amount or degree), see also: abundant
      prodigal(ly) - расточительный (too willing to spend money or waste time, energy or materials), profligate (formal) - расточительный, see also: extravagant, generous
      prodigality
B2/B1 promote, exalt / (demote, relegate): To promote someone means to raise them to a higher position or rank. "After two years in the company, she was promoted to a manager."
      prophecy - пророчество, предсказание; prophet - пророк, предсказатель, oracle - оракул: A prophecy is a prediction about what will happen in the future. "Some people believe that prophecies are actually true."
                                                                                              A prophet is a person chosen by a god to give the god’s message to people. "Harold believed that he was one of the prophets of his god."
                                                                                              An oracle is person who speaks with gods and gives advice about the future. "The king went to the oracle to ask if going to war was a good idea."
B2/-- prove, substantiate (formal) - подтвердить, обосновать / disprove (see also: dismiss, refute, overturn), confute (formal):
		To prove something is to show that it is true. "My teacher proved the answer on the board."
        To disprove something means to show that it is not true. "The scientist disproved the theory that the sun moved around the Earth."
      proxy - доверенность (the authority that you give to sb to do sth for you, when you cannot do it yourself): "a proxy vote", "Can I nominate someone as a proxy to sign for me?", "You can vote either in person or by proxy.", "My brother's voting for me by proxy in the club elections."
      proxy - доверенное лицо, представитель (a person who has been given the authority to represent sb else): "They were like proxy parents to me.", "Your proxy will need to sign the form on your behalf.", "She is acting as proxy for her husband."
      proxy - показатель (sth that you use to represent sth else that you are trying to measure or calculate): "The number of patients on a doctor's list was seen as a good proxy for assessing how hard they work."
      psychic, paranormal, otherworldly - потусторонний, supernatural, preternatural (formal), transcendental (formal):
        When someone is psychic, they know what will happen or what people think. "I think my grandmother has psychic abilities because she can predict anything."
        If something is supernatural, it is not real or explainable by natural law. "The dragon had supernatural powers such as flying and breathing fire."
      psychotic, weirdo (informal, dissaproving): If someone is psychotic, they have a very serious mental illness. "The psychotic patient believed he saw things that weren’t real."
B2/B2 publication, B1/A2 publish, --/B2 publishing (издательская деятельность), publicize (UK usually publicise): A publication is something printed, like a newspaper or book. "She's been a subscriber to that publication for over ten years."
                                                                                                                  To publish a book is to get it printed and ready to sell. "That company publishes daily newspapers."
                                                                                                                  To publicize is to make something get a lot of attention. "The company publicized the job positions in the newspaper."
B2/B2 pure / impure: "If something is pure, it is very clear and beautiful." / The rose was pure. It had no dirt or imperfections; "pure/applied mathematics", "technology as opposed to pure science subjects"
      purge
      pus - гной
B2/B1 qualify: To qualify is to get, or to be declared, adequate or good enough. "He qualifyied to go to the final match by beating the opponent."
B2/B1 quality: The quality of something is how good it is. "The quality of his car is very good."
      qualitative - качественный, quantitative - количественный
      quench, slake (literary) - утолить (жажду), appease: to drink liquid so that you stop being thirsty; to satisfy a need or wish; (literary) to use water to put out a fire (also: extinguish (sth) - погасить, потушить (свет, огонь), put sth<->out):
        "When it's hot, it's best to quench your thirst with water." "After our long game of tennis, we slaked our thirst with a beer"
        "Her thirst for knowledge will never be quenched." "I don't think Dick will ever manage to slake his lust for power."
        "The flames were quenched by heavy rain."
      	To extinguish a fire means to make it stop. "Michael extinguished the small fire with the hose."
B1/A1 quite: quite is used to say that something is complete or very much. "I think typing on a keyboard is quite easy."
      quiver - колчан
      raft - плот, punt - плоскодонка, кататься на лодке: A raft is a floating platform made from pieces of wood tied together. "The man made a raft out of bamboo and floated out to sea."
B1/-- rainforest, tropics, B2/-- (sub)tropical: A rainforest is a forest that is in a place where it rains very often. "The rainforest is home to many animals."
												The tropics are the areas of land and sea close to the equator. "People like to go to the tropics for vacation because it’s warm."
      rake - грабли/скребок
      rake - прочёсывать, поливать (прожектором, пулемётным огнём и т.д.)
B2/A2 rather: rather is used when you want to do one thing but not the other. "I would rather have the red one than the blue one."
      recap = recapitulate (formal)
B1/A2 recipe - рецепт: A recipe is a set of instructions to make food. "The apple cake that you made is really tasty. Can I have the recipe, please?"
A2/B1 receipt - квитанция, чек, A2/A1 bill: A receipt is a paper that proves that something was received or bought. "After looking at my receipt, I realized that I had spent too much money."
											A bill is a statement of money owed for goods or a service. "I have so many bills that I do not know how to pay for them all."
      recite: To recite something means to repeat or say aloud in front of a group. "Katie recited the Pledge of Allegiance in class."
B1/A2 recycle(-able), reuse(-able)
B2/B2 referee, umpire: A referee is a person who makes sure that the rules are followed in sports. "The soccer player didn’t agree with the referee."
      refill, replenish, see also: regain: To replenish something means to make it full or complete again. "We planted nearly one hundred seeds to replenish the garden after the fire."
      reflex: A reflex is an unconscious action in which a body part responds to an event. "There was a reflex when the doctor hit his knee with a rubber hammer."
B1/-- regarding = about
      regiment - полк
B2/B1 regular(ly): If something is regular, it happens often and in equal amounts of time. "Our regular lunch time is around noon."
B2/B1 reject, B1/A2 refuse, B2/B2 decline (formal), B2/B2 deny, rebuff (formal), B2 turn sth/sb down, see also: spurn:
        To reject is to refuse something because you do not want it. "The girl rejected the broken cup."
        To refuse something is to say ""no"" to it. "The dog refused to play with the cat."
        To decline an offer or invitation means to say no to it. "She declined his offer to pay for her dinner."
      relic - пережиток, реликвия (an object, a tradition, a system, etc. that has survived from the past: "During the dig, the archaeological team found some relics from the Stone Age.", "Videotapes may already seem like relics of a bygone era.", "The country's employment system is a relic of the 1960s when jobs were scarce."), see also: trace
      relic - мощи (a part of the body or something that belonged to a holy person: "holy relics", "These bones are the relics of a 12th-century saint.")
B2/B1 religious, ecclesiastical: When something is religious, it has to do with religion. "The holy man spoke about religious topics."
      reprieve
B2/B2 reputation, repute(d): reputation is the opinion that people have about someone. "The doctor had a reputation for helping people."
B1/B2 rescue, rescuer, see also: bail sb/sth <-> out (of sth): To rescue someone means to remove them from danger. "The firefighter rescued the man from the burning building."
B1/B2 resort
TODO resort (to sth) - применение чег-л., recourse - пременение, обращение за помощью: "There are hopes that the conflict can be resolved without resort to violence."
TODO resort (to sth) - прибегнуть к чему-л.: To resort to something is to depend on it in order to solve a problem. "I hope they don't resort to violence to end the argument."
      respirator - респиратор; аппарат ИВЛ (искусственной вентиляции лёгких); respiration = breathing: A respirator is a machine that helps weak or sick people breathe. "The man needed a respirator to breathe."
                                                                                                       respiration is the act of breathing. "Artificial respiration is the best thing to do if someone stops breathing."
      respite
B2/A2 respond (B2/A2 response), B1/A2 reply, A1/A1 answer, retort - a quick reply to a question or remark ("Having put him in ill humour with this retort, she fled away rejoicing"):
		To respond is to give an answer to what someone else said. "When the teacher asked the question, we all responded."
        A response is the answer to a question. "He asked if I was sad. My response was ""No""."
        To reply is to give an answer or say back to someone. "She asked him what time his meeting was. He replied, “at three.”"
B1/A2 ride: To ride something is to travel on it. You can ride an animal, a bike, etc. "I will ride a roller-coaster for the first time today."
      riddle - изрешетить
      riddled - поражён
      ridge - горный хребет / trough - ложбина: A ridge is a long, narrow piece of raised land. "The brown bear walked along the edge of the mountain ridge."
      ridge - конёк крыши
      rig - подтасовать, сфальсифицировать, see also: distort, deceive, forge: To rig something means to dishonestly arrange it. "The bad politician rigged the election so that he would win."
      rig - буровая установка (вышка, платформа)
      rig - оснастка, такелаж
      rig (US) - большая фура с прицепом, van - фургон: A van is a vehicle that is used for carrying things but is smaller than a truck. "The delivery company uses large vans to deliver packages."
      rim - ободок, обод, hoop - обруч, кольцо, bracelet, see also: brim: The rim is the outside edge of a round thing, like a cup or bottle. "I put my lips to the rim of the bottle and took a drink."
                                                                          A hoop is a ring that is made of plastic, metal, or wood. "The boys tried to toss the ball through the basketball hoop."
                                                                          A bracelet is a piece of jewelry that you wear around your wrist. "My father gave me a pretty gold bracelet for my birthday."
B2/-- ripe (ripen), see also: mature / unripe, see also: immature: When a fruit is ripe, it is ready to be eaten. "The cherries were nice and ripe."
      ripple - рябь
      ripple - колыхать(ся), перекатывать(ся), трепать/трепыхать/трепетать и т.д. (stir up so as to form small waves: "That could precipitate higher interest rates that would ripple across the economy"), see also: rock, wave, fit, swing, wax and wane
      riven: divided because of disagreements, especially in a violent way "a party riven by internal disputes"; (of an object) divided into two or more pieces "The wood was riven with deep cracks."
B1/A2 role - роль (в фильме, cпектакле и т.д.)
B2/B1 role - роль (статус, положение, предназначение и т.д.), see also position: A role is the normal purpose or function of a person or thing. "My role at work is to check the quality of the products."
      rolling pin - скалка
A2/A2 roof: A roof is the outside top part of a building. "The roof was covered with snow."
      rotary - круговой, see also: circular
      rotary - роторный
      rotary (US) - участок дооги с круговым движением, see also: roundabout
      roundabout - окольный, see also: indirect, bypass
      roundabout (UK) - участок дооги с круговым движением, traffic circle, see also: rotary
TODO roundabout
      round sb/sth <-> up - собрать (​to find and gather together people, animals or things), see also: assemble, summon: "I rounded up a few friends for a party.", "The cowboys rounded the cattle up.", "The cattle are rounded up in the evenings."
      round sb <-> up - задержать (​if police or soldiers round up a group of people, they find them and arrest or capture them), see also: capture, detain: "A number of suspects were rounded up and questioned."
      round-up - сводка, обзор (a summary of the most important points of a particular subject, especially the news), see also: overview, summary: "a news round-up", "We'll be back after the break with a round-up of today's other stories.", "This week’s issue includes a round-up of the latest record releases."
      round-up - облава, отлов (an act of bringing people, animals, things, etc. together for a particular purpose): "the round-up of sheep for shearing", "The police carried out their usual round-up of Saturday night drunks.", "The president ordered the round-up and imprisonment of all opposition politicians."
      rouse, rousing
B2/B1 row: A row is a line of things. "James put all of his toy soldiers into neat rows."
B2/-- rust(y): rust is a red and brown coating on iron objects caused by water and air. "The old metal gate would not swing because the hinges were covered in rust."
      rustle - шелестеть, шуршать, see also: sough, murmur: "The leaves rustled in the breeze.", "The light wind rustled the leaves.", "Her silk dress rustled as she moved."
      rustle - угонять (красть) скот (to steal farm animals)
      rustle sth <-> up (for sb/sth) - ​(informal) наколдовать (to make or find something quickly for somebody and without planning), see also: "conjure": "I'm sure I can rustle you up a sandwich." "She's trying to rustle up some funding for the project."
      rustler - угонщик скота (a person who steals farm animals): "He was shot dead trying to stop cattle rustlers raiding a farm."
      rustling = rustle - шелест, шорох (the sound of light, dry things moving together), see also: sough: "the soft rustling of leaves"
      rustling - угон скота (the act of stealing farm animals): "cattle rustling"
B2/A2 sad(ly, ness), woeful(ly)
      saliva, spittle - слюна, mucus - слизь, snot - сопли: saliva is the watery liquid in people’s mouths that helps in digestion. "The baby could not keep the saliva from dripping out of its mouth."
      savoury (US savory) - солёный, пряный (savoury food is salty or spicy and not sweet in taste: "a savoury dish/sauce/flavour", "savoury snacks/dumplings/pancakes", "A pie can be sweet or savoury.", "What’s in the pastry? Is it sweet or savoury?"), see also: bitter
      savoury (US savory) - пикантный, пряный (having a pleasant taste or smell: "a savoury smell from the kitchen")
      savoury (US savory) - хороший (if you say that something is not savoury, you mean that it is not pleasant or socially acceptable: "That hotel doesn't have a very savoury reputation.")
      saw, jigsaw - электролобзик, fretsaw - лобзик
      scaffold - эшафот (a platform used when executing criminals by cutting off their heads or hanging them from a rope: "to be sent to the scaffold", "to die on the scaffold", "She was led to the scaffold in front of a crowd of several hundred")
      scaffold - строительные леса (a structure made of scaffolding for workers to stand on when they want to reach high parts of a building)
      scaffolding - строительные леса (poles and boards that are joined together to make a structure for workers to stand on when they are working high up on the outside wall of a building: "scaffolding poles", "The statue is currently surrounded by scaffolding.")
      scald - ошпарить, довести до кипения; ожог
B2/B2 scale - масштаб (of map/diagram/model), see also: proportion(s)
B2/B2 scale - масштаб, размах, extent, degree, see also: incidence, magnitude
        The scale of something is its size, especially when it is very large. "I was surprised by the scale of the buildings in the downtown area."
        The extent of something is how large, important, or serious it is. "He ate to such an extent that he bacame overweight."
B2/B2 scale - шкала
B2/B2 scale - весы
      scale - чешуйка
      scale - зубной камень (plaque - зубной налёт; бляшки), tartar
      scale - очищать зубы от зубного камня
      scale - взбираться, see also: scramble, ascend, mount
B2/A2 schedule: A schedule is a plan that tells you when to do things. "What is your class schedule for today?"
B1/A2 score
      scour sth out - промыть, вымыть (русло реки, ложбину и т.д. - постепенно)
      scour sth away - смыть (слой почвы и т.д. - постепенно)
      scourge, bane
	  scribe: A scribe was a person whose job was to copy written works. "In Ancient Egypt, scribes recorded important events."
	  scribble, scrawl - набросать, написать быстро и небрежно, dash sth <-> off, see also: jot (sth <-> down): "I carry a notebook so that I can jot down any ideas.", "Could you jot your address and phone number in my address book?"
	  	To scribble is to write something quickly without caring about how it looks. "I scribbled a rough diagram of our plan and gave it to him."
	  scribble, scrawl - писанина, каракули
	  scribbler ​(disapproving or humorous) - писака (a journalist, author or other writer), B1/A2 author, B1/B1 poet:
		An author is a person who wrote a certain piece of writing. "The author was hard at work on his next novel."
		A poet is a person who writes poems. "William Shakespeare was one of the greatest poets."
      scrupulous - скурпулёзный (meticulous?), see also: academic
      scrupulous - щепетильный (having ethical or moral principles: "The reason is that the vast majority of businesses are scrupulous and treat their employees well"), see also: explicit
      seabed - морское дно
      seam - шов, seamless - бесшовный
      seasoning - приправа, dressing (also salad dressing) - заправка для салата, flavouring (US flavoring) - ароматизатор (sth that is added to food or drink to give it a particular taste: "artificial/natural flavouring(s)"):
        seasoning is a mix of salt, herbs, and spices that improves the taste of food. "This steak tastes bland. Maybe I’ll add some seasoning to it."
      seethe (with/at sth) - бурлить, кипеть (эмоционально), see also: fume
      seethe (literary) - бурлить, кипеть (of liquids): "The grey ocean seethed beneath them."
      seethe (with sth) - бурлить, кишеть, see also: teem, flood
B1/B2 select, see also: opt
B2/B2 selection - выбор (the act of choosing someone or something): "the selection process", "Success is achieved by the careful selection of projects.", "The coach made her selection (= chose who she wanted) for the team."
B2/B2 selection - выбор (a choice or range of different types of something): "Most schools would have a good selection of these books in their libraries.", "The larger stores are able to stock a wider selection of goods."
B2/B2 senior / junior: If one is senior, they are the oldest or have been there the longest. "Because he got his job first, Bob is the senior chef."
 					   If someone is junior in their job, they do not have a lot of power. "When she started at the company, she was only a junior manager."
B2/B2 sensitive: When someone or something is sensitive, they are easily hurt. "My teeth are sensitive to cold things."
B2/B1 separate - отделять(ся), разлучать(ся), B1/B1 divide (division), split sth <-> up: A division is the act of making smaller groups out of a larger one. "The chart had six divisions which all had different colors."
B1/A2 separate - отдельный, раздельный, see also: discrete: If two things are separate, they are not together. "New York and Los Angeles are in two separate parts of America."
      shaft - шахта (well/ventilation/air/lift/elevator shaft, mineshaft), see also: mine
      shaft - рукоятка, hilt, see also: handle: A shaft is a handle of a tool or weapon. "The golf club had a long wooden shaft that he held in his hands."
      shaft - оглобля
      shaft - вал (карданный и т.д.), crankshaft - коленчатый вал, camshaft - распределительный вал
      ​shaft of pain, fear, etc. (literary) - a sudden strong feeling of pain, etc. that travels through your body: "Shafts of fear ran through her as she heard footsteps behind her.", see also: surge, wave
      shaft of wit/wisdom/etc. (literary) - a clever remark that is intended to upset or annoy somebody: "John came out with an unexpected shaft of wit/wisdom."
      shaggy - лохматый, косматый
A2/B1 shelf: A shelf is a place on a wall where you put things. "I keep my clothes on a shelf in my closet."
B2/B1 shell: A shell is a hard covering that protects the body of some sea creatures. "There were many pretty shells on the beach."
      shimmer
      shingle (UK) - вывеска, sign, plate - табличка, plaque - памятная дощечка, A2/A2 poster, placard: A poster is a written announcement that is used to advertise something. "I saw a poster about a free concert in the park."
      shrill - визжать пронзительно кричать/звучать, shriek, see also: yell, wail, squall
	  shrill(ly, ness) - пронзительный, see also: piercing(ly)
      shuffle
B2/A2 sign: A sign is a notice giving information, directions, a warning, etc. "The sign indicated that today would be a bad day."
B2/B1 silent: If someone or something is silent, they make no sound. "Since no one was home, the house was silent."
B2/B2 silence: silence is complete quiet. "The man asked for silence while he worked on the problem."
      silica - диоксид кремния
A2/A2 since - с: since is used to talk about a past event still happening now. "since 1992, he has been driving that car."
B2/B1 since - с тех пор, до сих пор (B1/B2 so far), see also: thereafter, afterwards
B1/B2 since - поскольку (because; as): "Since we've got a few minutes to wait for the train, let's have a cup of coffee." "We thought that, since we were in the area, we'd stop by and see them."
B1/B1 sink - погружаться (to go down below the surface or towards the bottom of a liquid or soft substance), see also: submerge
B1/B1 sink - тонуть (to damage a boat or ship so that it goes below the surface of the sea, etc.)
B2/-- sink - снижаться, опускаться ((of an object) to move slowly downwards): "The sun glowed red as it sank slowly below the horizon."
B2/-- sink - снижаться, уменьшаться, слабеть (to decrease in amount, volume, strength, etc.), see also: decline: "Student numbers have sunk considerably this year.", "The pound has sunk to its lowest recorded level against the dollar.", "He is clearly sinking fast (= getting weaker quickly and will soon die)."
B2/-- sink - опуститься, рухнуть ((of a person) to move downwards, especially by falling or sitting down), see also: collapse: "I sank into an armchair.", "The old man had sunk to his knees."
B2/-- sink - опуститься, стихнуть (to become quieter), see also: fade: "Her voice sank to a whisper."
      sink - выкопать, пробурить (to make a deep hole in the ground), see also: drill: "to sink a well/shaft/mine"
      sink - вкопать (to place something in the ground by digging): "The first stage of building the fence is sinking the posts into the ground."
      sink (informal) - обламать, разрушить (to cause something to fail or be in trouble): "This rain could sink our plans for the barbecue.", "If the car breaks down, we'll be sunk"
      sink - раковина, see also: basin
      simmer, simmering
      skewer - шампур
      skid
B1/A2 sleep, slumber (literary)
B1/-- sleeve, lining: sleeves are the part of a shirt where your arms go. "Ryan bought a new shirt with long sleeves to keep his arms warm."
                      lining is a piece of cloth that covers the inside of clothes. "This jacket is very warm because it has a thick lining."
      sleigh - сани; sledge (UK), sled (US) - санки: A sled is a small vehicle that you use on snow. "Marvin likes to ride his sled down the hill in winter."
B2/B2 slide, glide
      slime (-y) - слизь
B2/B2 slope, B2/B2 pitch, incline, rake: A slope is ground that is not flat. "The slope to the top of the mountain was very steep."
                                         An incline is a sharp rise in something, especially a hill or mountain. "This mountain has one of the steepest inclines in the world."
      sloppy - неряшливый, небрежный, корявый: "a sloppy worker" - халтурщик
      sloppy - слишком жидкий, слякотный (very wet or liquid, often in a way that is unpleasant)
      sloppy (of clothes) - мешковатый, небрежный, baggy, loose-fitting / tight-fitting
      sloppy (informal) - слезливый, see also: slushy
      slurp
      slush - слякоть
      slush (informal) - "сопли с сахаром", mushy - "сопли с сахаром", slushy - слезливый, see also: sloppy, see also: sentimental
      smug - самодовольный, complacent(ly), self-satisfied
      snag (informal) = difficulty (загвоздка, гемор), see also: deterrent, obstacle, impediment
B2/-- sneeze: To sneeze is to suddenly blow air out of your nose and mouth. "He sneezed after smelling the flower."
B2/-- snore - храп(еть): To snore means to make a loud noise each time a sleeping person breathes. "It was impossible to get to sleep because my husband snored."
      snug (UK) - закуток (a small room or area in a pub where only a few people can sit), cubbyhole - закуток, каморка (a very small room or space, especially for storing things: "My office is a cubbyhole in the basement.", "You could have a romantic dinner hidden away in the two-person cubby hole, complete with curtain.")
      snug - уютный ((of a person) feeling warm, comfortable, and protected, or (of a place, especially a small place) giving feelings of warmth, comfort, and protection: "a snug little house", "I spent the afternoon snug and warm in bed.", "It had rained during the night but our tents were snug and dry."), see also: cosy (cozy)
      snug - тесный, плотный (fitting closely: "These shoes are a bit too snug - do you have them in a larger size?", "These jeans are a bit snug (= too tight)."), see also: close, tight
      snugly - уютно (in a way that is warm, comfortable and protected, especially from the cold: "I left the children tucked up snugly in bed.", "She's curled up snugly in the armchair, reading a book.", "She tucked patients snugly in their beds like a loving grandmother."), see also: cosily
      snugly - тесно, плотно (in a way that fits closely: "The straps of the seat must fit snugly to protect the baby.", "If we put the washing machine over there, the fridge will fit snugly into this space.", "The lid should fit snugly."), see also: closely, tigtly
      snugness - уют (a feeling of being warm, comfortable and protected, especially from the cold), see also: cosiness
      snuggle - прижаться, уютно устроиться, see also (to get into, or to put somebody/something into, a warm comfortable position, especially close to somebody: "She snuggled closer.", "He snuggled his head onto her shoulder.", "The child snuggled up to her mother.", "He snuggled down under the bedclothes.", ""): curl up
B2/B1 soil, B2/B1 ground, turf - дёрн, loam(y) - суглинок, clay(ey) - глина, silt - ил, limestone - известняк, slag - шлак, ore - руда, epoxy resin - эпоксидня смола:
        soil is the top layer of land on the Earth. "The boy planted flowers in the soil and watered them every day."
        The ground is the top part of the Earth that we walk on. "The ground under our feet was dry and brown."
        turf is a section of grass and the dirt in which it grows. "After the game, the turf looked ragged."
        clay is a type of heavy, wet soil used to make pots. "She made a bowl out of the clay."
        ore is the raw form of rock or material from which a valuable metal is taken. "The factory melted the ore and used it to make iron products."
        "A moist loam is ideal for growing currant bushes." "Mix equal parts of clay and loam." "Loam is a soil with roughly equal proportions of clay, sand and silt" Clay is used for making bricks and pots." "Loam is a good quality soil containing sand, clay and decayed vegetable matter."
      solemn(ly) - торжественный
      solemn(ly) - серьёзный, see also: serious, sober, grave: If something is solemn, then it is serious and honest. "The professor preferred a solemn relationship between him and his students."
      solvent - растворитель (a liquid in which solids will dissolve: "solvent cleaners", "industrial solvents for removing oil")
      solvent - платежеспособный (having enough money to pay your debts; not in debt: "The company managed to remain solvent during the recession.", "Many insurance companies are under pressure to increase premiums to stay solvent.") / insolvent - неплатежеспособный, see also: bankrupt
      solvency - платёжеспособность / insolvency - неплатёжеспособность, see also: bankruptcy
B1/-- sore(ness), cold sore (герпес), B1/B1 hurt, B1/-- ache (toothache, headache, etc.; migraine), B1/B1 pain(ful(ly), excruciating(ly) = very painful:
        When a part of your body is sore, it hurts. "After lifting the heavy box, Mona's back was sore."
        To hurt is to do something that makes you feel pain. "She hurt her leg falling down the stairs."
        If something aches, it hurts. "Mindy's head ached because she bumped it against the wall."
        migraine: A migraine is a painful headache that makes one feel sick. "My sister gets a migraine every time she has a lot of stress."
      sore, A2/A1 angry, B2/B2 furious, incensed, fuming, livid, seething, apoplectic, incandescent, irate, B1/B1 mad, wrath(ful), C2 be beside yourself, see also: outraged, vehement:
        If you are furious, you are extremely angry. "My father was furious when he read my bad school report."
A2/A2 sort, kind, type, --/B2 genre, category (in a category,  fall/fir/divide into a category, filter by category):
        A sort of something is a type of it. "What sort of instrument do you want to learn to play?"
        A genre is a type of literature, art, or music characterized by its style. "She is considered a master in the comedy genre."
      sough (literary) - шелестеть ((especially of the wind or sea) to make a long high or low sound while moving), see also: rustle, murmur: "The wind soughed through the towering pines nearby.", "We walked across the moor with the sea soughing below."
      sough (literary) - шелест (the high or low long sound that something such as the wind or sea makes as it moves), see also: rustling: "the sough of wind through the pine trees", "You can almost hear the sough of the sea far off."
B2/A1 space, spatial(ly): A space is an empty area. "I don't have much space for things in my small house."
						  When something is spatial, it relates to the position and size of things. "He was asked where the books were located to test his spatial ability."
      spatula - кухонная лопатка, шпатель
A2/B2 spend (time, money, energy, effort etc.): To spend is to use time doing something or being somewhere. "I like to spend my free time fishing."
      spillover - разлив, избыточное количество, see also: flood: something that is too large or too much for the place where it starts, and spreads to other places. "The spillover from the adjacent river flooded the lower fields."
      spillover - побочные эффекты, side effect
      spillway - водосброс (на дамбе)
      splatter - брызги, пятна (drops of a thick liquid that have splashed or fallen somewhere): "There was a splatter of paint on the floor.", "His car was covered in mud splatters."
      splatter - заляпать, (за/раз)брызгать ((especially of a thick liquid) to hit and cover a surface with small drops, or to cause this to happen), see also: shed: "The bike was splattered with mud.", "Coffee had splattered across the front of his shirt."
      splatter - тяжело капать, долбить каплями ((of large drops of liquid) to fall or hit something noisily): Heavy rain splattered on the roof.
      sponge - губка
      spontane(ity, ous(ly)), see also: unscripted; improvise: When an act is spontaneous, it is not planned. It happens suddenly. "My wife made a spontaneous decision to buy a new sofa while I was at work."
      spout - носик (чайника)
TODO spout
      squabble - перебранка, мелкая ссора, bicker - спорить, пререкаться (squabble = bicker, just a bit stronger), quibble - спорить, пререкаться, придираться, see also: quarrel
      squabble - переругиваться, ссориться (не сильно), bickering - ссора, спор, препирательства, грызня, quibble - придирка, see also: quarrel
      squall - шквал (​a sudden strong and violent wind, often with rain or snow during a storm: "Violent squalls signalled the approach of the hurricane.", "A sudden vicious squall knocked her to the ground.", "We got caught in a sudden squall of rain."), see also: hurricane, hail
      squall - визжать, вопить ((especially of a baby) to make a loud, sharp noise: "squalling kids", "The baby was squalling in its crib."), see also: yell, wail, shrill
B1/B2 stall - прилавок, киоск, see also: counter
      stall - стойло
      stall - кабинка (душевая, туалетная)
      stall - заглохнуть, заглушить, затормозить: To stall means to stop a process and continue it at a later time. "If you give the car a push, it won’t stall."
      stall - задержать, застопорить, заморозить, see also: suspend
      stall (for time) - отмораживаться (тянуть время)
      standard of living, cost of living - уровень жизни
      staple - скоба для степлера, крепёжная скоба
      staple - основная (производимая) продукция; товар первой необходимости: "Rubber became the staple of the Malayan economy.", "Shortages mean that even staples (= basic foods) like bread are difficult to find."
      staple - основное (типичное) содержимое, основа: "Royal gossip is a staple of the tabloid press.", "Romantic fiction and reference books are a staple of many public libraries."
      staple - основной, базовый, B1/B1 basic(ally), main(ly), see also: accustom(ed), mainstream, characteristic: If something is staple, it is standard or basic. "Hamburgers, steaks and hotdogs are staple foods to cook on a grill."
      staple - скреплять степлером: "Staple the invoice to the receipt.", "Staple the invoice and the receipt together."
      stationery - канелярские принадлежности; качественная бумага для писем и бланков; letterhead - фирменный бланк
      stationary - стационарный, неизменный, static / mobile
      stealth(y, ily)
      sterile: When something is sterile, it is completely clean and free from germs. "The hospital room looked quite sterile."
      steward(ess): A steward is a person like a waiter who serves food on planes and ships. "The steward is bringing some tea."
B2/B1 stick - (при)клеить(ся), прилипать, застревать, B1/B2 sticky, glutinous, gluey - липкий; paste, see also: adhere, fix, viscous:
        If something is sticky, then it is covered with a substance that things stick to. "Place the sticky part of the tape against the paper, so it will cling to the wall."
		A paste is a thick and smooth substance. "My son needed some paste for a school project."
--/B1 stick - палочка, пластинка: "carrot/cinnamon/celery/bread sticks", "a stick of celery/rhubarb/chewing gum/chalk/dynamite"
B1/B1 stick - палка, ветка (сухая), клюка (US usually cane)
B1/-- stick - клюшка: "a hockey/lacrosse/polo stick"
B2/B1 stick - воткнуть, see also: insert
B2/B2 stick to sth - придерживаться (мысли, направления, диеты, планов и т.д.)
      stick to sth - придерживаться (правил и т.д.), подчиняться, следовать, see also: comply, adhere
B2/B1 still - неподвижный, stock-still - "как вкопанный" (совсем неподвижный), motionless
TODO still - всё же, see also: regardless: still is used when you say that a situation keeps going on. "They are still waiting in line to get tickets."
TODO still, so far (formal: thus far)
      stint - поскупиться, крахоборить, выделять крохи, отказывать себе в чём-то (to provide, take, or use only a small amount of something), see also: unstinting: "The bride's parents did not stint on the champagne - there was plenty for everyone.", "Don't stint yourself - take another slice of cake."
      stint - период/промежуток/интервал времени, see also: period
A2/-- stove - плита, A2/A2 cooker (UK), range (US), B1/A2 oven - печка, духовка: A stove is a device used to cook food. "Our new stove helps us to cook food much faster than before."
      stowaway - "заяц", безбилетник (sb who hides on a ship or aircraft to travel without having to pay)
B1/A2 strange
      strangle - задушить (to kill sb by pressing their throat and neck hard, especially with your fingers), choke, suffocate, stifle, smother, throttle, gag, retch:
        To choke means to cough because you have difficulty breathing. "There was a lot of smoke in the air, and it made me choke."
      strangle - душить, сдерживать, see also: constrain (to prevent sth from growing or developing): "This project should have been strangled at birth.", "‘Oh, no!’ she cried, strangling a sob.", "The current monetary policy is strangling the economy."
B2/B2 stream, brook, creek (UK - залив, US, AU, NZ - ручей, речушка): A stream is a small river. "The boy caught a fish in the stream."
                                                                      A brook is a small stream. "Water flows down several brooks on the mountain."
                                                                      A creek is a stream or small river. "Only small fish lived in the shallow waters of the creek."
TODO stream, see also: current, flow
      stub - окурок, огрызок, (the short part of something long and thin, such as a cigarette or pencil, that is left when the rest has been used)
      stub (UK also counterfoil) - окурок, огрызок, корешок (the part of a cheque, ticket, etc. that you keep when you give the other part to somebody else)
      stub your toe - удариться пальцем ноги (to hurt your toe by hitting it against a hard object by accident: "She stubbed her toe on the step.")
      stub something <-> out - затушить, забычковать (to stop a cigarette, etc. from burning by pressing the end against something hard: "He stubbed out his cigarette in the ashtray.")
      stubby
      stuff: stuff is a word used to refer to things without mentioning the things by name. "We gave a lot of stuff to the charity."
      stump - пень
      stump - пенёк, обрубок, культя
      stump - ставить в тупик (cause to be perplexed or confounded"), baffle, confound (formal), see also: puzzle, confuse
      stump - идти, топая ногами,, stamp, stomp, see also: tread
      subdue - потушить, погасить (to reduce the force of something, or to prevent something from existing or developing: "The fire burned for eight hours before the fire crews could subdue it."), see also: extinguish
      subdue - подавить, погасить (to calm or control your feelings: "Julia had to subdue an urge to stroke his hair."), see also: suppress
      subdue - подавить (to bring sb/sth under control, especially by using force: "Troops were called in to subdue the rebels.", "The most serious charges relate to the regime’s efforts to subdue insurgents in the northern provinces.", "He criticized the school for trying to subdue individual expression."), see also: defeat
      subdued - приглушённый (​(of light or colours) not very bright: "subdued lighting", "the subdued greens and browns of the landscape", "She was dressed in grey and looked suitably subdued.")
      subdued - приглушённый ((of sounds) not very loud: "a subdued conversation", "the sound of subdued laughter")
      subdued - тихий, скромный ("The reception was a subdued affair."), low-key - скромный, неброский (​not intended to attract a lot of attention: "Their wedding was a very low-key affair.")
      subdued - тихий, подавленный ((of a person) unusually quiet, and possibly unhappy: "He seemed a bit subdued at lunch - is he all right?", "She was in a subdued mood.")
      subdued - спокойный, умеренный ((of business activity) not very busy; with not much activity: "a period of subdued trading")
      subordinate - подчинённый (a person who has a position with less authority and power than somebody else in an organization), see also: inferior: "the relationship between subordinates and superiors"
      subordinate - подчинённый (having less power or authority than somebody else in a group or an organization): "She was directly subordinate to the president."
      subordinate - вторичный, второстепенный (less important than something else), see also: secondary: "All other issues are subordinate to this one."
      subtract: To subtract means to take something away. "We learned how to subtract numbers from each other in class."
      suffice (formal) - быть достаточным, хватать (to be enough: "I'm taking $400 - I think that should suffice.", "Generally a brief note or a phone call will suffice.", " One example will suffice to illustrate the point.")
      suffice (it) to say - достаточно будет сказать (it is enough to say: "Suffice (it) to say, Mike won't be going to Tina's birthday party after what he said about her to her boss.", "I won’t go into all the details. Suffice (it) to say that the whole event was a complete disaster.")
B2/B2 sufficient - достаточный (enough for a particular purpose; as much as you need: "Allow sufficient time to get there.", "One dose should be sufficient.", "These reasons are not sufficient to justify the ban.", "The salary proved sufficient for his needs.")
B1/-- surf: To surf means to use a special board to ride on waves in the ocean. "The students went to the beach to surf during their vacation."
B2/A2 succeed, fare, get on​ (also get along): To succeed is to complete something that you planned or tried to do. "He will continue to work on the robot until he succeeds."
      sulphur - сера
      summary - сводка, резюме, краткое изложение (a short, clear description that gives the main facts or ideas about something), see also: overview, round-up: "a news summary", "The following is a summary of our conclusions.", "He has provided a useful summary of the main categories."
      summary - итог (in summary - таким образом, в общем, в целом, короче, see also: overall): "In summary, they decided against the proposal.", "In summary, this was a disappointing performance."
      summary - поспешный, внесудебный (done suddenly, without discussion or a legal process): "summary arrest/dismissal/execution", "a summary judgement"
      suppository - свеча (ректальная)
      swamp, marsh, bog (boggy - болотистый): A swamp is a very wet area of land. "There are lots of wild animals living in the swamp."
      				                          A marsh is a type of wet land covered with grasses and short plants. "The marsh looked so lovely against the mountains."
B2/-- sweat, perspire, perspiration: To sweat means to lose liquid from the body through the skin. "Whenever I workout, I sweat quite a bit."
                                     To perspire means to sweat. "I usually perspire a lot when I am at practice."
      symmetry, symmetrical(ly) / asymmetry, asymmetrical(ly): symmetry is the state of having two halves that are exactly the same. "The artist made sure to use perfect symmetry when painting the butterfly."
      synapse: "Information from one neuron flows to another neuron across a synapse.", synaptic: "synaptic connections between brain cells"
B2/-- tablecloth - скатерть
      tack - канцелярская кнопка
TOODO tack
      tacky (informal) - безвкусный: "Her outfits are always really tacky" "That was a tacky this to say"
--/B2 tag
B2/B1 tail: A tail is a part of an animal's body, sticking out from its rear or back. "Our dog wags its tail when it's happy."
      tailor - портной, dressmaker (dressmaking - пошив дамского платья), seamstress (old-fashioned) - швея
      tailor - подгонять, адаптировать, приспосабливать (to make or adapt something for a particular purpose, a particular person, etc.: "Much of the software is supplied ready tailored for the user."), see also: accommodate, adapt
B2/B2 tale: A tale is a story. "She told her two friends about the wild tale of her day."
B2/B2 tap: To tap something is to hit it lightly. "He tapped the keys of the keyboard to write a short word."
TODO tap
      tapestry - гобелен
B2/-- tease, mock, ridicule, trifle, kid, make fun of sb/sth: To tease someone means to laugh at or make fun of them. "Jake teased Charlie because he was the new student."
                                                		      To mock someone means to tease them in a cruel way. "The girls mocked Nancy because she was a new student."
                                                		      To ridicule is to make fun of something in a mean way. "The other students ridicule Peter’s foreign accent."
                                                		      To kid is to make a joke to make someone believe something which is not true. "I am not really mad. I was kidding when I said I was angry."
B1/B2 temple, A2/A2 church, mosque, synagogue, cathedral, abbey, monastery, see also: sanctuary: A temple is a building that is used for religious purposes. "The people visited the temple to pray."
                                                         					  					 An abbey is a house or group of houses where monks or nuns live. "When the monk returned to the abbey, he went immediately to his bedroom."
                                                         					  					 A cathedral is an important and often large and beautifully built church. "The large cathedral is full of people on Sunday mornings."
                                                         					  					 A monastery is a building in which monks live. "The monks at this monastery are famous for their bread and music."
B2/B2 term: A term is a word for something. "I often use the term ""oops"" when I make a mistake."
--/B1 term, semester: A semester is a portion of a school year. "Jack is in his second semester of college."
TODO term
B2/-- terrace, veranda (also verandah, US usually porch - веранда, крыльцо), B1/-- balcony - балкон: A terrace is an open area that is connected to a house or an apartment. "In the afternoons, she liked to sit on the terrace and check her email."
B2/B2 territory: A territory is a piece of land that belongs to a country but isn’t a state. "Gibraltar is a territory of Great Britain."
      testament - завещание (the last will and testament of sb), завет (The New/Old Testament)
      tether, leash (UK usually lead): A leash is a rope or chain that is used to lead an animal. "A lot of dogs must wear a leash to keep them from running away."
      thaw
A2/A1 theatre (US theater): A theater is a building where you watch plays, shows, and movies. "We went to the theater to see a play."
B2/-- thermometer, Fahrenheit, Celsius (also centigrade): A thermometer is a device that measures temperature. "The thermometer outside the window indicated that it was a hot day today."
                                                          Fahrenheit temperature is a scale where water freezes at 32° and boils at 212°. "When the temperature dropped to 32° Fahrenheit, it started snowing."
                                                          Celsius is a scale for measuring temperature. "Water freezes at zero degrees Celsius."
                                                          If a temperature is centigrade, it is scaled, so water freezes at 0° and boils at 100°. "During the spring time, the temperature gets as warm as 26 degrees centigrade."
B2/B2 threat, menace: A threat is something bad that might happen. "Due to the dark clouds, there was a threat of a bad storm."
      throes - муки, агония; to be in the (death) death throes
B1/B1 through, B1/B2 via: To travel via something means to travel through or using something. "We arrived in the city from the airport via the train."
TODO through
B1/-- thunder, B1/-- lightning; thunderbolt - удар молнии, (figurative) полная неожтданность, "гром с небес":
        thunder is the loud noise heard during a storm. "The sound of the thunder startled me."
		lightning is the bright light seen during a storm. "The lightning flashed above the water."
      thunderous - оглушительный, deafening - оглушающий
      tickle - щекотать: To tickle someone is to touch them in a way that causes laughter. "The mother tickled the little boy’s foot, and he screamed with laughter."
      tightrope - канат; tread/walk a tightrope - идти по краю, действовать на грани (to be in a difficult situation in which you do not have much freedom of action and need to be extremely careful about what you do: "The government is walking a difficult tightrope in wanting to reduce interest rates without pushing up inflation.", "Many manufacturers have to walk a tightrope between pricing their goods too high and not selling them, and pricing them low and losing money.")
      toil - вкалывать (to work hard): "He toiled in the sweat of his brow, tilling the stubborn ground, taking	out stones, building fences.
      toil - тащиться (to move slowly and with difficulty), see also: stumble, stagger, slog, lag
      toiletries, toiletry bag
A2/A2 towel - полотенце
      tract - тракт (a system of body parts that serve some particular purpose): "the urinary/respiratory/digestive tract, a nerve tract", "When probiotics flourish in the digestive tract, nutrients are better absorbed and bad bugs are held at bay, research suggests"
      tract - область, пространство, see also: area, plot, stretch: A tract is a large area of land. "On the other side of the mountains was a long tract of forest."
      tract - трактат (a short piece of writing, especially on a religious, moral or political subject, that is intended to influence people’s ideas): "a moral/religious/socialist tract, feminist tracts"
      transpire (formal) - происходить, see also: occur, happen
      transpire (formal) - выясняться, становиться известным, see also: emerge
B2/B2 tribe: A tribe is a group of people who live in the same culture. "There's a small tribe of people who live in the mountains of Spain."
B1/B1 trick, stunt: A trick is something you do to fool another person. "His card trick really surprised us."
					A stunt is something that is done in order to get attention or publicity. "The man jumped over the cars as a promotional stunt."
      trickle
      trim, prune, --/B2 clip, mow, shave, see also: crop, cut sth <-> back: To trim something is to cut it a little bit. "I had my hair trimmed this afternoon."
                                           				                           To mow grass is to cut it to make it very short. "I mow our lawn every weekend."
                                           				                           To shave means to cut the hairs on your face with a sharp tool. "My father shaves his face every day because he doesn't want a beard."
      trivia - пустяки, мелочи жизни (unimportant matters, details or information: "The museum celebrates the trivia of everyday life.", "We spent the whole evening discussing domestic trivia.")
      trot, canter, gallop
      tuck - заправить, подвернуть: To tuck something means to put it somewhere so that it is neat or safe. "He looked sloppy without his shirt being tucked into his pants."
      tusk - бивень; fang - клык (в т.ч. у змей); sting - жало (у насекомых): A tusk is a long, curved, pointed tooth of an elephant, boar, or walrus. "Sadly, some people hunt elephants and remove their tusks to sell them."
                                                                              To sting is to cause pain by pushing a sharp part into the skin. "The needle stung my arm and made me say, ""Ouch!"""
      tuxedo - смокинг
      twine, entwine, intertwine
      typewriter (typewritten, typewriting = typing): If something is typewritten, it is written on a computer or typewriter. "This is an important, formal project and must be typewritten."
      ulterior motive, reason, purpose, etc.
      umbra, penumbra
B2/B2 unique(ly, ness) - уникальный, единственный в своём роде, unparalleled (formal): If people or things are unique, they are not like the others. "Her dog is unique. I've never seen one quite like it."
B2/B2 unique(ly, ness) - уникальный, присущий чему-то одному, see also: indigenous: "The koala is unique to Australia.".
B1/B1 universe, galaxy, constellation, comet, meteor, asteroid, astronaut, cosmonaut, B2/B2 satellite:
		The universe is the known or supposed objects in space. "The universe is so large that it cannot be measured."
        A galaxy is any extremely large collection of star systems. "Our solar system is located in the outer area of our galaxy."
        A constellation is a group of stars with a recognizable shape. "That constellation in the shape of a square is named after a flying horse."
        A comet is an object in space made of ice and rock with a tail of glowing dust. "comets take many decades to complete an orbit around a star."
        A meteor is a rock from outer space that falls to Earth. "We saw a meteor in the sky last night."
        An asteroid is a giant rock from outer space. "In 1908, a giant asteroid hit Siberia."
        An astronaut is a person that goes into outer space. "The astronaut was walking on the moon."
		A satellite is something that is sent into space to get information. "The satellite was traveling around the earth."
      upbeat
      underwhelmed - не в восторге, underwhelming - не вызывающий восторга (informal, humorous)
      unruffled, unperturbed, unflappable, imperturbable, imperturbably, imperturbability; stolid, impassive, deadpan, expressionless, poker-faced, passionless, emotionless
      unspeakable, indescribable, ineffable, indefinable, unutterable
      untold
      up-and-coming
      upbraid
B2/-- upbringing - воспитание: An upbringing is the way that someone is taught to behave by their parents. "He had a strict upbringing and was never allowed to watch television."
      uproot - искоренять, выкорчёвывать, выселять, see also: exile, displace, eradicate
      upstage / downstage
B2/B2 upper / lower: upper means higher in position or place. "A home's attic is at the upper part of the structure."
      utensil: A utensil is a common tool or container. "It seemed that a fork was the wrong utensil for trying to eat the soup."
      uterus, womb (old-fashioned in US)
B2/B2 value: If something has value, it is worth a lot of money. "Matthew found a treasure of very high value."
B2/C1 vanish, B2/A2 disappear: To disappear means to go away or not be seen. "The top of the building is disappearing in the clouds."
                               To vanish is to go away suddenly. "All the passengers vanished from the train station."
      varnish - лак
      verbatim - дословно, слово в слово (exactly as spoken or written: "a verbatim report/account", "He reported the speech verbatim.", "I don’t think I will read the whole thing verbatim to you."), C2 word for word - слово в слово (using exactly the same words: "a word-for-word copy of a government report", "a word-for-word translation", "I can give you a word-for-word transcript of what we talked about.", "She listened to everything I said and repeated it word for word to her mum.")
B2/B2 version: A version is an account of something that differs slightly from the original. "She read the students British version of the Chinese fairy tale."
      vet, --/B2 screen
      veer, swerve
B1/-- vegetarian(ism), vegan(ism), fruitarian, pescatarian (someone who eats fish but not meat): A vegetarian is someone who does not eat any meat products. "I became a vegetarian because I don’t like the taste of meat."
      verge - край, граница, cusp, see also: fringe, brim
      verge on sth - граничить (​to be very close to an extreme state or condition), border on sth
      veterinarian (vet): A veterinarian is a doctor that takes care of animals. "Wanda became a veterinarian because she loves dogs."
      viscosity - вязкость (the quality in a liquid of being thick and sticky; the quality of not flowing freely): "The viscosity of the fluid in the system can be modified.", "Fish oils reduce inflammation in the arteries, and improve your blood viscosity."
      viscous - вязкий, густой и липкий, see also: sticky
      viscous - вязкость
	  visual - визуальный, зрительный (relating to seeing), see also: optic: "visual stimulus/impact/abilities", "I have a very good visual memory."
	  visual - визуальный (of or connected with seeing or sight)б the visual arts - изрбразительное искусство, see also: pictorial: "dramatic visual effects", "The building makes a tremendous visual impact.", "The photographs she takes are a visual record of her travels."
	  visual - графический материал, наглядное пособие (something such as a picture, photograph, or piece of film used to give a particular effect or to explain sth): "He used striking visuals to get his point across.", "The wildlife programme has some stunning visuals.", "Using both words and visuals makes it easier for students to focus on and improve their writing methods."
	  visually - визуально (​in a way that is connected with seeing or sight), see also: pictorially: "visually handicapped/impaired", "visually exciting"
B2/-- vivid (see also: radiant, vibrant, brilliant (TODO)), B2/-- picturesque(ly, ness), quaint: When something is vivid, it is bright and colorful. "The figures in the painting were vivid."
      wade - переходить вброд; шлёпать по воде (UK paddle): To wade is to walk in or pass through water. "The child waded in the water at the beach."
      waive - отказываться от права (to choose not to demand something in a particular case, even though you have a legal or official right to do so), forgo (also forego), see also: renounce, forfeit: "The bank manager waived the charge (= said we didn't have to pay), as we were old and valued customers."
      waiver - отказ от права (a situation in which somebody gives up a legal right or claim; an official document stating this): "We had to sign a waiver, giving up any rights to the land in the future."
      wax: wax is a substance that is slightly shiny and melts when heated. "The candles are made of wax."
      weal, welt
B1/A2 web: A web is a home made by a spider. "Mom cleaned the spider webs out of the garage."
      weld - сварной шов
B2/B2 whereas, B2/B1 while - а, в то время как; B1/B1 meanwhile, B1 in the meantime, in the interim:
        You use whereas to show how two things are different. "My sister loves horror movies, whereas I prefer comedies."
        meanwhile means until something happens or while something is happening. "He wants to be a doctor in the future, but meanwhile, he works a regular job."
        The meantime is the time between two events. "Ted began setting the table. In the meantime, I began preparing the food."
B2/B1 whether: You use whether when you must choose between two things. "I could not decide whether to go left or right."
      whirr (US whir) - урчание, гудение, гул, see also: hum, rumble
      whirr (US whir) - урчать, гудеть (​to make a continuous, low sound like the parts of a machine moving), see also: hum, rumble
      wimp (informal, disapproving): a person who is not strong, brave or confident (слабак)
      windward - наветренный, с наветренной стороны ((on the side of a hill, etc.) facing the wind), leeward - подветренный, с подветренной стороны ((on the side of a ship, etc.) facing away from the wind)
B2/B2 whisper, see also: rustle, sough, murmur: To whisper means to say very quietly. "We have to whisper in the library so people can focus on reading."
B2/-- whistle: To whistle is to make a sound by putting your lips together and blowing. "As he was listening to music, Daryl whistled."
      willy-nilly (informal) - волей-неволей, хошь - не хошь (whether you want to or not): "She was forced willy-nilly to accept the company's proposals.", "Both sides were drawn, willy-nilly, into the conflict."
      willy-nilly (informal) - хаотично, беспорядочно (​in a careless way without planning, without any order): "She threw her clothes willy-nilly into a drawer.", "Don't use your credit card willy-nilly."
      woe
B1/B1 wonder; wonderment, B2/-- admiration, B2/-- amazement, B2/-- astonishment
      wonder: To wonder is to ask yourself questions or have a need to know. "The young mother wondered if she'd have a boy or a girl."
      woo
A2/B1 wool, yarn: wool is the hair that a sheep has. "Grandma wants to use the blue wool to knit me a sweater."
B2/B2 wound, B2/A2 injury (B1/B1 injure): A wound is an injury to the body. "He had many wounds after the car accident."
                                          To injure someone means to damage a part of their body. "The car crash injured two people."
      wrath(ful(ly))
      wrench - гаечный ключ; выкручивать/выворачивать с силой (wrest from);
B2/B2 wrist - запястье
      yank, tug
B1/B1 yard, courtyard: A yard is the ground just outside of a person's house. "The girls jumped rope in the yard."
                       A courtyard is an outdoor area that is surrounded by the walls of a building. "During the summer, the courtyard is a nice place to have lunch."
B1/-- yawn - зевать; зевок: To yawn means to open one’s mouth wide and breathe in air. "The child yawned and stretched her arms before bed for the night."
B2/B1 youth: youth is a time in people's lives when they are young. "My mother wanted to be a nurse in her youth."
      zap - быстро читать (пробежаться глазами, "проглотить"), devour - "поглощать книги" (to read books or literature quickly and eagerly)
      zap - проноситься (в указанном по контексту направлении), see also: race, charge
      zap - пристрелить, грохнуть, пришлёпнуть, долбануть (в т.ч. током)
      zeal
      zealot
      zealous(ly, ness), overzealous, see also: avid
B1/B2 zone: A zone is an area that has different qualities from the ones around it. "Firefighters often work in danger zones."

C1/C1 contrary, see also: vice versa: If something is contrary to something else, it is the opposite. "It isn't warm outside at all. On the contrary, it is quite cold."

B2/C1 contrary (the contrary): the opposite. "I was worried that it might be too hard for me but it turned out the contrary was true." "In the end the contrary was proved true: he was innocent and she was guilty."
   quite the contrary: ​used to emphasize that the opposite of what has been said is true. "I don't find him funny at all. Quite the contrary."
B2 on the contrary. ‘It must have been terrible.’ ‘On the contrary, I enjoyed every minute.’; "I thought you said the film was exciting?" "On the contrary, I nearly fell asleep half way through it!"
C1 to the contrary. "Show me some evidence to the contrary (= proving that something is not true)." "I will expect to see you on Sunday unless I hear anything to the contrary (= that you are not coming)."
   converse, the converse
B2/A1 opposite: If A is the opposite of B, A is completely different from B. "The opposite of black is white."
